10-K 1 form10k.htm ANNUAL REPORT
 
UNITED ST ATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
☑  ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF
THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2018
OR
☐  TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF
THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from ___  to  ___.
Commission file number:  1-14323
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
(Exact name of Registrant as Specified in Its Charter)
DELAWARE 76-0568219
(State or Other Jurisdiction
of(I.R.S. Employer Identification No.)
Incorporation or
Organization) 
   
 1100 LOUISIANA STREET, 10th FLOOR, HOUSTON, TEXAS 77002  
 (Address of Principal Executive Offices) (Zip Code)  
   
 (713) 381-6500  
 (Registrant's Telephone Number, Including Area Code)  
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of Each Class Name of Each Exchange On Which Registered
Common Units New York Stock Exchange
Securities to be registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act:  None.
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act.   Yes ☑   No ☐
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act.   Yes ☐   No ☑
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the
preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past
90 days.   Yes ☑   No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically and posted on its corporate Website, if any, every Interactive Data File required to be
submitted and posted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit
and post such files).   Yes ☑   No ☐
Indicate by check mark if disclosure of delinquent filers pursuant to Item 405 of Regulation S-K is not contained herein, and will not be contained, to the best of
registrant’s knowledge, in definitive proxy or information statements incorporated by reference in Part III of this Form 10-K or any amendment to this Form 10-K. 
☑
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller reporting company or an emerging
growth company.  See definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company” and “emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the
Exchange Act.
Large accelerated filer þ Accelerated filer ☐    Non-accelerated filer   ☐    Smaller reporting company  ☐    Emerging growth company   ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any new or revised
financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act.  ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act).   Yes ☐    No ☑
The aggregate market value of the partnership’s common units held by non-affiliates at June 29, 2018 (the last business day of the registrant’s most recently
completed second fiscal quarter) was $41.02 billion based on a closing price on that date of $27.67 per common unit on the New York Stock Exchange Composite
ticker tape.  There were 2,184,873,868 common units outstanding at January 31, 2019.
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
TABLE OF CONTENTS
  Page
  Number
PART I
Items 1 and 2. Business and Properties. 2
Item 1A. Risk Factors. 38
Item 1B. Unresolved SEC Staff Comments. 58
Item 3. Legal Proceedings. 59
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures. 60
   
PART II
Item 5. Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Unitholder
Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities. 61
Item 6. Selected Financial Data. 62
Item 7. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and
Results of Operations. 63
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk. 105
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data. 108
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and
Financial Disclosure. 108
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures. 109
Item 9B. Other Information. 112
   
PART III
Item 10. Directors, Executive Officers and Partnership Governance. 112
Item 11. Executive Compensation. 124
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management
and Related Unitholder Matters. 134
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence. 137
Item 14. Principal Accountant Fees and Services. 140
   
PART IV
Item 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules. 141
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary. 150
   
Signatures 151
Table of Contents
KEY REFERENCES USED IN THIS REPORT
Unless the context requires otherwise, references to “we,” “us,” “our,” “Enterprise” or “Enterprise Products Partners” are intended
to mean the business and operations of Enterprise Products Partners L.P. and its consolidated subsidiaries.  References to “EPO”
mean Enterprise Products Operating LLC, which is a wholly owned subsidiary of Enterprise, and its consolidated subsidiaries,
through which Enterprise Products Partners L.P. conducts its business.  Enterprise is managed by its general partner, Enterprise
Products Holdings LLC (“Enterprise GP”), which is a wholly owned subsidiary of Dan Duncan LLC, a privately held Texas limited
liability company.
The membership interests of Dan Duncan LLC are owned by a voting trust, the current trustees (“DD LLC Trustees”) of which are:
(i) Randa Duncan Williams, who is also a director and Chairman of the Board of Directors (the “Board”) of Enterprise GP; (ii)
Richard H. Bachmann, who is also a director and Vice Chairman of the Board of Enterprise GP; and (iii) Dr. Ralph S. Cunningham,
who is also an advisory director of Enterprise GP.  Ms. Duncan Williams and Mr. Bachmann also currently serve as managers of
Dan Duncan LLC along with W. Randall Fowler, who is also a director and the President and Chief Financial Officer of Enterprise
GP.
References to “EPCO” mean Enterprise Products Company, a privately held Texas corporation, and its privately held affiliates.  A
majority of the outstanding voting capital stock of EPCO is owned by a voting trust, the current trustees (“EPCO Trustees”) of
which are:  (i) Ms. Duncan Williams, who serves as Chairman of EPCO; (ii) Dr. Cunningham, who serves as Vice Chairman of
EPCO; and (iii) Mr. Bachmann, who serves as the President and Chief Executive Officer of EPCO.  Ms. Duncan Williams and Mr.
Bachmann also currently serve as directors of EPCO along with Mr. Fowler, who is also the Executive Vice President and Chief
Financial Officer of EPCO. EPCO, together with its privately held affiliates, owned approximately 31.9% of our limited partner
interests at December 31, 2018.
As generally used in the energy industry and in this annual report, the acronyms below have the following meanings:
/d =per day MMBbls=million barrels
BBtus=billion British thermal unitsMMBPD=million barrels per day
Bcf =billion cubic feet MMBtus=million British thermal units
BPD =barrels per day MMcf =million cubic feet
MBPD=thousand barrels per day TBtus =trillion British thermal units
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT REGARDING FORWARD-LOOKING INFORMATION
This annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2018 (our “annual report”) contains various forward-looking
statements and information that are based on our beliefs and those of our general partner, as well as assumptions made by us and
information currently available to us.  When used in this document, words such as “anticipate,” “project,” “expect,” “plan,”
“seek,” “goal,” “estimate,” “forecast,” “intend,” “could,” “should,” “would,” “will,” “believe,” “may,” “potential” and
similar expressions and statements regarding our plans and objectives for future operations are intended to identify forward-
looking statements.  Although we and our general partner believe that our expectations reflected in such forward-looking
statements are reasonable, neither we nor our general partner can give any assurances that such expectations will prove to be
correct.  Forward-looking statements are subject to a variety of risks, uncertainties and assumptions as described in more detail
under Part I, Item 1A of this annual report.  If one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or if underlying assumptions
prove incorrect, our actual results may vary materially from those anticipated, estimated, projected or expected.  You should not put
undue reliance on any forward-looking statements.  The forward-looking statements in this annual report speak only as of the date
hereof.  Except as required by federal and state securities laws, we undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any
forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or any other reason.
1
Table of Contents
PART I
ITEMS 1 AND 2.  BUSINESS AND PROPERTIES
General
We are a publicly traded Delaware limited partnership, the common units of which are listed on the New York Stock Exchange
(“NYSE”) under the ticker symbol “EPD.”  We were formed in April 1998 to own and operate certain natural gas liquids (“NGLs”)
related businesses of EPCO and are a leading North American provider of midstream energy services to producers and consumers
of natural gas, NGLs, crude oil, petrochemicals and refined products. 
Our integrated midstream energy asset network links producers of natural gas, NGLs and crude oil from some of the largest supply
basins in the United States (“U.S.”), Canada and the Gulf of Mexico with domestic consumers and international markets.  Our
midstream energy operations currently include: natural gas gathering, treating, processing, transportation and storage; NGL
transportation, fractionation, storage, and export and import terminals (including those used to export liquefied petroleum gases, or
“LPG,” and ethane); crude oil gathering, transportation, storage, and export and import terminals; petrochemical and refined
products transportation, storage, export and import terminals, and related services; and a marine transportation business that
operates primarily on the U.S. inland and Intracoastal Waterway systems.  Our assets currently include approximately 49,200 miles
of pipelines; 260 MMBbls of storage capacity for NGLs, crude oil, petrochemicals and refined products; and 14 Bcf of natural gas
storage capacity.  
The safe operation of our assets is a top priority.  We are committed to protecting the environment and the health and safety of the
public and those working on our behalf by conducting our business activities in a safe and environmentally responsible manner.  
For additional information, see “Environmental, Safety and Conservation” within the Regulatory Matters section of this Part I,
Items 1 and 2 discussion.
We conduct substantially all of our business through EPO and are owned 100% by our limited partners from an economic
perspective.  Enterprise GP manages our partnership and owns a non-economic general partner interest in us.  We, Enterprise GP,
EPCO and Dan Duncan LLC are affiliates under the collective common control of the DD LLC Trustees and the EPCO Trustees. 
Our principal executive offices are located at 1100 Louisiana Street, 10th Floor, Houston, Texas 77002, our telephone number is
(713) 381-6500 and our website address is www.enterpriseproducts.com.
Like many publicly traded partnerships, we have no employees.  All of our management, administrative and operating functions are
performed by employees of EPCO pursuant to an administrative services agreement (the “ASA”) or by other service providers.  As
of February 1, 2019, there were approximately 7,000 EPCO personnel who spend all or a substantial portion of their time engaged
in our business.  For additional information regarding the ASA, see Note 15 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report.
Business Strategy
Our integrated midstream energy asset network links producers of natural gas, NGLs and crude oil from some of the largest supply
basins in the U.S., Canada and Gulf of Mexico with domestic consumers and international markets.  Our business strategy seeks to
leverage this network to:
§capitalize on expected demand growth, including exports, for natural gas, NGLs, crude oil and petrochemical and refined
products;
§maintain a diversified portfolio of midstream energy assets and expand this asset base through growth capital projects and
accretive acquisitions of complementary midstream energy assets;
§enhance the stability of our cash flows by investing in pipelines and other fee-based businesses; and
2
Table of Contents
§share capital costs and risks through business ventures or alliances with strategic partners, including those that provide
processing, throughput or feedstock volumes for growth capital projects or the purchase of such projects’ end products.
Commercial and Liquidity Outlook for 2019
For information regarding our commercial and liquidity outlook for the year ending December 31, 2019, see “General Outlook for
2019” included under Part II, Item 7 of this annual report.
Major Customer Information
Substantially all of our consolidated revenues are earned in the U.S. and derived from a wide customer base.  Our largest non-
affiliated customer for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016 was Vitol Holding B.V. and its affiliates (collectively,
“Vitol”), which accounted for 7.8%, 11.2% and 9.9%, respectively, of our consolidated revenues.  Vitol is a global energy and
commodity trading company.
Business Segments
General
The following sections provide an overview of our business segments, including information regarding principal products produced
and/or services rendered and properties owned.  Our operations are reported under four business segments:  (i) NGL Pipelines &
Services, (ii) Crude Oil Pipelines & Services, (iii) Natural Gas Pipelines & Services, and (iv) Petrochemical & Refined Products
Services.  Our business segments are generally organized and managed according to the types of services rendered (or technologies
employed) and products produced and/or sold.
Each of our business segments benefits from the supporting role of our related marketing activities.  The main purpose of our
marketing activities is to support the utilization and expansion of assets across our midstream energy asset network by increasing
the volumes handled by such assets, which results in additional fee-based earnings for each business segment.  In performing these
support roles, our marketing activities also seek to participate in supply and demand opportunities as a supplemental source of gross
operating margin, a non-generally accepted accounting principle (“non-GAAP”) financial measure, for the partnership.  The
financial results of our marketing efforts fluctuate due to changes in volumes handled and overall market conditions, which are
influenced by current and forward market prices for the products bought and sold.
Our results of operations and financial condition are subject to certain significant risks.  Factors that can affect the demand for our
products and services include domestic and international economic conditions, the market price and demand for energy, the cost to
develop natural gas and crude oil reserves in the U.S., federal and state regulation, the cost and availability of capital to energy
companies to invest in upstream exploration and production activities and the credit quality of our customers.  For information
regarding such risks, see Part I, Item 1A of this annual report.  In addition, our business activities are subject to various federal,
state and local laws and regulations governing a wide variety of topics, including commercial, operational, environmental, safety
and other matters.  For a discussion of the principal effects of such laws and regulations on our business activities, see “Regulatory
Matters” within this Part I, Items 1 and 2 discussion.
For management’s discussion and analysis of our results of operations, liquidity and capital resources and capital investment
program, see Part II, Item 7 of this annual report.
For detailed financial information regarding our business segments, see Note 10 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report.
3
Table of Contents
NGL Pipelines & Services Segment
Our NGL Pipelines & Services business segment currently includes 26 natural gas processing plants and related NGL marketing
activities; approximately 19,200 miles of NGL pipelines; NGL and related product storage facilities; and 16 NGL fractionators. 
This segment also includes our LPG and ethane export terminals and related operations.
Natural gas processing plants and related NGL marketing activities
At the core of our natural gas processing business are 26 processing plants located in Colorado, Louisiana, Mississippi, New
Mexico, Texas and Wyoming.  The results of operations from our natural gas processing plants are primarily dependent on the
difference between the revenues we earn from extracting NGLs (in terms of cash processing fees and/or the value of any retained
NGLs) and the cost of natural gas and other operating costs incurred in connection with such extraction activities.
In its raw form, natural gas produced at the wellhead (especially in association with crude oil) contains varying amounts of NGLs,
such as ethane and propane.  Natural gas streams containing NGLs are usually not acceptable for transportation in natural gas
pipelines or for commercial use as a fuel; therefore, the raw (or unprocessed) natural gas streams must be transported to a natural
gas processing plant to remove the NGLs and other impurities.  Once the natural gas is processed and NGLs and impurities are
removed, the residue natural gas meets pipeline and commercial quality specifications.  Natural gas that has a high NGL content is
referred to as “rich” or “wet” natural gas, whereas natural gas from the wellhead that is relatively free of NGLs and impurities is
referred to as “lean” or “dry” natural gas.  Dry natural gas can be shipped on pipelines and used as fuel with little to no processing.
In general, on an energy-equivalent basis, most NGLs have greater economic value as feedstock for petrochemical and motor
gasoline production than as components of a natural gas stream. Once the mixed NGLs are extracted at a natural gas processing
plant, they are transported to a centralized fractionation facility for separation into purity NGL products (ethane, propane, normal
butane, isobutane and natural gasoline).  Typical uses of purity NGL products include the following:
§Ethane is primarily used in the petrochemical industry as a feedstock in the production of ethylene, one of the basic building
blocks for a wide range of plastics and other chemical products.
§Propane is used for heating, as an engine and industrial fuel, and as a petrochemical feedstock in the production of ethylene
and propylene.
§Normal butane is used as a petrochemical feedstock in the production of ethylene and butadiene (a key ingredient of synthetic
rubber), as a blendstock for motor gasoline, and to produce isobutane through isomerization.
§Isobutane is fractionated from mixed butane (a mixed stream of normal butane and isobutane) or produced from normal butane
through the process of isomerization, and is used in refinery alkylation to enhance the octane content of motor gasoline, in the
production of isooctane and other octane additives, and in the production of propylene oxide.
§Natural gasoline, a mixture of pentanes and heavier hydrocarbons, is primarily used as a blendstock for motor gasoline, diluent
in crude oil to aid in transportation, and as a petrochemical feedstock.
In our natural gas processing business, contracts are either fee-based, commodity-based or a combination of the two.  When a cash
fee for natural gas processing services is stipulated by a contract, we record revenue when a producer’s natural gas has been
processed and redelivered.  Our commodity-based contracts include keepwhole, margin-band, percent-of-liquids, percent-of-
proceeds and contracts featuring a combination of commodity and fee-based terms. To the extent we earn all or a portion of the
extracted NGLs as consideration for our processing services, we refer to such volumes as our “equity NGL production.”  The terms
of our natural gas processing agreements typically range from month-to-month to life of the associated production lease, with
intermediate terms of one to ten years being common.
4
Table of Contents
In recent years, our portfolio of natural gas processing contracts has become increasingly weighted towards those with fee-based
terms as producers seek to maximize the value of their production by retaining all or a portion of the NGLs extracted from their
natural gas stream.  As of December 31, 2018, we estimate that approximately 47% of our current portfolio of natural gas
processing contracts (based on natural gas inlet volumes) were entirely fee-based, with an additional 25% of this portfolio
reflecting a combination of fee-based and commodity-based terms.  The terms of the remaining 28% of our portfolio of natural gas
processing contracts were entirely commodity-based.
The value of natural gas that is removed from the processed stream as a result of NGL extraction (i.e., the “shrinkage”) and the
value of natural gas that is consumed as plant fuel are significant costs of natural gas processing.  To the extent that we are
obligated under keepwhole and margin-band contracts to compensate the producer for shrinkage and plant fuel, we are exposed to
fluctuations in the price of natural gas; however, margin-band contracts typically contain terms that limit our exposure to such
risks.  Under the terms of our other processing arrangements (i.e., those agreements with fee-based, percent-of-liquids and percent-
of-proceeds terms), the producer typically bears the cost of shrinkage. If the operating costs of a natural gas processing plant are
higher than the incremental value of the NGL products that would be extracted, then recovery levels of certain NGL products,
principally ethane, may be purposefully reduced. This scenario is typically referred to as “ethane rejection” and leads to a reduction
in NGL volumes available for subsequent transportation, fractionation, storage and marketing.
Our NGL marketing activities entail spot and term sales of NGLs that we take title to through our natural gas processing activities
(i.e., our equity NGL production) and open market and contract purchases.  The results of operations for NGL marketing are
primarily dependent on the difference between NGL sales prices and the associated purchase and other costs, including those costs
attributable to the use of our other assets.  In general, sales prices referenced in the underlying contracts are market-based and may
include pricing adjustments for factors such as location, timing or product quality.  Market prices for NGLs are subject to
fluctuations in response to changes in supply and demand and a variety of additional factors that are beyond our control.  We
attempt to mitigate these price risks through the use of commodity derivative instruments.  For a discussion of our commodity
hedging program, see Part II, Item 7A of this annual report.
Our NGL marketing activities utilize a fleet of approximately 800 railcars, the majority of which are leased from third parties. 
These railcars are used to deliver feedstocks to our facilities and to distribute NGLs throughout the U.S. and parts of Canada.  We
have rail loading and unloading capabilities at certain of our terminal facilities in Arizona, Kansas, Louisiana, Minnesota,
Mississippi, New York, North Carolina and Texas. These facilities service both our rail shipments and those of our customers. Our
NGL marketing activities also utilize a fleet of approximately 150 tractor-trailer tank trucks that are used to transport LPG for us
and on behalf of third parties.  We lease and operate the majority of these trucks and trailers.
5
Table of Contents
The following table presents selected information regarding our natural gas processing facilities at February 1, 2019:
     Total Gas
    Net Gas Processing
  Production  Processing Capacity
  Region Ownership Capacity of Plant
Plant Name Location(s) Served Interest (MMcf/d) (1) (MMcf/d)
Meeker Colorado Piceance 100.0%  1,800  1,800
Pioneer (two facilities) Wyoming Green River 100.0%  1,400  1,400
Yoakum Texas Eagle Ford 100.0%  1,050  1,050
Pascagoula Mississippi Gulf of Mexico 100.0%  1,000  1,000
North Terrebonne Louisiana Gulf of Mexico   83.0%   (2) 789  950
Chaco New Mexico San Juan 100.0%  600  600
Orla Texas Delaware 100.0% 600 600
Neptune Louisiana Gulf of Mexico   66.0%   (2)  430  650
Sea Robin Louisiana Gulf of Mexico   54.1%   (2)  352  650
Thompsonville Texas Eagle Ford 100.0%  330  330
Shoup Texas Eagle Ford 100.0%  280  280
Armstrong Texas Eagle Ford 100.0%  250  250
Gilmore Texas Frio-Vicksburg 100.0%  250  250
San Martin Texas Eagle Ford 100.0%  200  200
South Eddy New Mexico Delaware 100.0%  200  200
Waha (3) Texas Delaware 100.0% 150  150
Delmita Texas Frio-Vicksburg 100.0%  145  145
Carlsbad New Mexico Delaware 100.0%  130  130
Panola Texas Cotton Valley 100.0%  125  125
Sonora Texas Strawn 100.0%  120  120
Shilling Texas Eagle Ford 100.0%  110  110
Venice Louisiana Gulf of Mexico   13.1%   (4)  98  750
Indian Springs Texas Wilcox-Woodbine   75.0%   (2)  90  120
Chaparral New Mexico Delaware 100.0%  45  45
Fairway Texas Cotton Valley 100.0%  5  5
    Total    10,549 11,910
      
(1) The approximate net gas processing capacity does not necessarily correspond to our ownership interest in each facility.  The capacity is based on a variety
of factors such as the level of volumes an owner processes at the facility and contractual arrangements with joint owners.
(2) We proportionately consolidate our undivided interest in these operating assets.
(3) Prior to March 2018, our ownership in the Waha plant was held through our 50% equity investment in Delaware Basin Gas Processing LLC (“Delaware
Processing”).  We acquired the remaining 50% equity interest in Delaware Processing in March 2018 for $150.6 million in cash.  For information regarding
this transaction, see Note 12 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report.
(4) Our ownership in the Venice plant is held indirectly through our equity method investment in Venice Energy Services Company, L.L.C.
We operate all of our natural gas processing facilities except for the Venice plant.  On a weighted-average basis, utilization rates for
our natural gas processing plants were approximately 52.7%, 51.8% and 50.8% for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and
2016, respectively.
Orla natural gas processing facility.  In June 2016, we announced plans to construct a cryogenic natural gas processing plant and
related natural gas gathering lines near Orla, Texas in Reeves County.  The Orla facility is designed to support the continued growth
in NGL-rich natural gas production from the Delaware Basin and is supported by long-term customer commitments.  We own and
operate the Orla facility.
6
Table of Contents
The Orla facility will be completed in three stages. The first processing train (“Orla I”), which commenced operations in May 2018,
has a natural gas processing capacity of 300 MMcf/d and the capability to extract more than 40 MBPD of mixed NGLs.  In
conjunction with the start-up of Orla I, we placed into service approximately 70 miles of residue natural gas pipelines that connect
Orla to our Texas Intrastate System. We also placed into service a 30-mile extension of our NGL system that provides customers at
Orla with NGL takeaway capacity and direct access to our integrated network of downstream NGL assets.  A second processing
train (“Orla II”), which commenced operations in October 2018, added 300 MMcf/d of incremental processing capacity to the Orla
facility and increased the overall extraction rate for mixed NGLs up to 80 MBPD.   A third processing train (Orla III) is scheduled
to be completed in the second quarter of 2019.   Once Orla III is completed, the Orla facility will have 900 MMcf/d of total
processing capacity and allow us to extract up to 120 MBPD of mixed NGLs.
Mentone natural gas processing facility.  In October 2018, we announced that construction of our Mentone cryogenic natural gas
processing plant had commenced.  The Mentone plant, which is located in Loving County, Texas, is expected to have the capacity
to process 300 MMcf/d of natural gas and extract more than 40 MBPD of NGLs.  The project is scheduled to be completed in the
first quarter of 2020 and is supported by a long-term acreage dedication agreement.
The Mentone plant further extends our presence in the growing Delaware Basin and provides access to our fully integrated
midstream asset network. To support the development of Mentone, we are constructing approximately 70 miles of gathering and
residue pipelines and expanding compression capabilities.  These projects will allow the Mentone plant to link to our NGL system,
including the Shin Oak NGL Pipeline which entered limited commercial service in February 2019, as well as our Texas Intrastate
System.  We will own and operate the Mentone facility and related infrastructure.
When the Mentone plant is completed and placed into service, we expect to have an aggregate 1.6 Bcf/d of natural gas processing
capacity and 250 MBPD of NGL production from our processing plants in the Delaware Basin.
NGL pipelines
Our NGL pipelines transport mixed NGLs from natural gas processing plants, refineries and marine terminals to downstream
fractionation plants and storage facilities; gather and distribute purity NGL products to and from fractionation plants, storage and
terminal facilities, petrochemical plants, refineries and export facilities; and deliver propane and ethane to destinations along our
pipeline systems.
The results of operations from our NGL pipelines are primarily dependent upon the volume of NGLs transported (or capacity
reserved) and the associated fees we charge for such transportation services. Transportation fees charged to shippers are based on
either tariffs regulated by federal governmental agencies, including the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (“FERC”), or
contractual arrangements.  See “Regulatory Matters” within this Part I, Items 1 and 2 for additional information regarding
governmental oversight of our liquids pipelines.
Excluding certain linefill volumes and volumes shipped in connection with our marketing activities, we typically do not take title to
NGLs transported by third party shippers on our pipelines; rather, the third party shipper retains title and the associated commodity
price risk.
7
Table of Contents
The following table presents selected information regarding our NGL pipelines at February 1, 2019:
   Pipeline
  Ownership Length
Description of Asset Location(s) Interest (Miles)
Mid-America Pipeline System (1) Midwest and Western U.S.  100.0% 8,035
South Texas NGL Pipeline System Texas  100.0% 1,917
Dixie Pipeline (1) South and Southeastern U.S.  100.0% 1,307
ATEX (1) Texas to Midwest and Northeast U.S.  100.0% 1,192
Chaparral NGL System (1) Texas, New Mexico  100.0% 1,085
Louisiana Pipeline System (1) Louisiana  100.0% 950
Seminole NGL Pipeline (1,2) Texas  100.0% 869
Texas Express Pipeline (1) Texas    35.0% 594
Skelly-Belvieu Pipeline (1) Texas, Oklahoma    50.0% 572
Front Range Pipeline (1) Colorado, Oklahoma, Texas    33.3%  447
Aegis Ethane Pipeline (1) Texas, Louisiana  100.0% 299
Houston Ship Channel Pipeline System Texas  100.0% 275
Rio Grande Pipeline (1) Texas    70.0% 249
Panola Pipeline (1) Texas    55.0% 249
Lou-Tex NGL Pipeline (1) Texas, Louisiana  100.0% 206
Promix NGL Gathering System Louisiana    50.0% 201
Texas Express Gathering System Texas    45.0% 170
Tri-States NGL Pipeline (1) Alabama, Mississippi, Louisiana    83.3% 168
Others (seven systems) (3) Various  Various (4) 454
   Total   19,239
    
(1) Interstate transportation services provided by these liquids pipelines, in whole or part, are regulated by federal governmental agencies.
(2) Pipeline mileage shown for the Seminole NGL Pipeline excludes 379 miles converted to crude oil service in February 2019 and used by our Midland-to-
ECHO 2 Pipeline System.
(3) Includes our Belle Rose and Wilprise pipelines located in the coastal regions of Louisiana; two pipelines located near Port Arthur in southeast Texas; our
San Jacinto pipeline located in East Texas; our Permian NGL lateral pipelines located in West Texas; Leveret pipeline in West Texas and New Mexico; and a
pipeline in Colorado associated with our Meeker facility.  Transportation services provided by the Wilprise, Permian NGL and Leveret pipelines are
regulated by federal governmental agencies.
(4) We own a 74.7% consolidated interest in the 30-mile Wilprise pipeline through our majority owned subsidiary, Wilprise Pipeline Company, LLC.  We
proportionately consolidate our 50% undivided interest in a 45-mile segment of the Port Arthur pipelines.  The remainder of these NGL pipelines are wholly
owned.
The maximum number of barrels per day that our NGL pipelines can transport depends on operating rates achieved at a given point
in time between various segments of each system (e.g., demand levels at each injection and delivery point and the mix of products
being transported).  As a result, we measure the utilization rates of our NGL pipelines in terms of net throughput, which is based on
our ownership interest.  In the aggregate, net throughput volumes for these pipelines were 3,461 MBPD, 3,168 MBPD and 2,965
MBPD during the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively.
The following information describes our principal NGL pipelines.  We operate our NGL pipelines with the exception of the Skelly-
Belvieu Pipeline and Texas Express Gathering System.
§The Mid-America Pipeline System is an NGL pipeline system consisting of four primary segments:  the 3,119-mile Rocky
Mountain pipeline, the 2,138-mile Conway North pipeline, the 632-mile Ethane-Propane (“EP”) Mix pipeline, and the 2,146-
mile Conway South pipeline. The Mid-America Pipeline System operates in 13 states: Colorado, Illinois, Iowa, Kansas,
Minnesota, Missouri, Nebraska, New Mexico, Oklahoma, Texas, Utah, Wisconsin and Wyoming.  Volumes transported on the
Mid-America Pipeline System primarily originate from natural gas processing plants located in the Rocky Mountains and Mid-
Continent regions, as well as NGL fractionation and storage facilities in Kansas and Texas.
8
Table of Contents
The Rocky Mountain pipeline transports mixed NGLs from production fields located in the Rocky Mountain Overthrust and
San Juan Basin areas to the Hobbs NGL hub located on the Texas-New Mexico border.  The Conway North segment links the
NGL hub at Conway, Kansas to refineries, petrochemical plants and propane markets in the upper Midwest.  NGL hubs, such
as those at Mont Belvieu, Hobbs and Conway, provide buyers and sellers with a centralized location for the storage and pricing
of products, while also providing connections to intrastate and/or interstate pipelines. The EP Mix segment transports EP mix
from the Conway hub to petrochemical plants in Iowa and Illinois.  The Conway South pipeline connects the Conway hub with
Kansas refineries and provides bi-directional transportation of NGLs between the Conway and Hobbs hubs.  At the Hobbs
NGL hub, the Mid-America Pipeline System interconnects with our Seminole NGL Pipeline and Hobbs NGL fractionation and
storage facility.  The Mid-America Pipeline System is also connected to 18 non-regulated NGL terminals that we own and
operate.
§The South Texas NGL Pipeline System is a network of NGL gathering and transportation pipelines located in South Texas that
gather and transport mixed NGLs from natural gas processing plants (owned by either us or third parties) located in South
Texas to our NGL fractionators in South Texas and NGL fractionation and storage complex located in and near Mont Belvieu,
Texas.  The Mont Belvieu area in Chambers County, Texas, with its significant energy-related infrastructure, is a key hub of the
global NGL industry (the “Mont Belvieu hub”). In addition, this system transports purity NGL products from our South Texas
NGL fractionators to refineries and petrochemical plants located between Corpus Christi, Texas and Houston, Texas and within
the Texas City-Houston area, as well as to interconnects with other NGL pipelines and to our Mont Belvieu storage complex. 
The South Texas NGL Pipeline System is a component of our ethane header system, extending it from the Mont Belvieu hub to
Corpus Christi, Texas.
§The Dixie Pipeline transports propane and other NGLs and extends from southeast Texas to markets in the southeastern U.S. 
Propane supplies transported on this system primarily originate from southeast Texas, south Louisiana and Mississippi.  The
Dixie Pipeline operates in seven states:  Alabama, Georgia, Louisiana, Mississippi, North Carolina, South Carolina and Texas,
and is connected to eight non-regulated propane terminals that we own and operate.
§The ATEX, or Appalachia-to-Texas Express, pipeline transports ethane in southbound service from third-party owned NGL
fractionation plants located in Ohio, Pennsylvania and West Virginia to our Mont Belvieu storage complex.  The ethane
extracted by these fractionation facilities originates from the Marcellus and Utica Shale production areas.  ATEX operates in
nine states: Arkansas, Illinois, Indiana, Louisiana, Missouri, Ohio, Pennsylvania, Texas and West Virginia.
§The Chaparral NGL System transports mixed NGLs from natural gas processing plants located in West Texas and New Mexico
to Mont Belvieu.  This system consists of the 906-mile Chaparral pipeline and the 179-mile Quanah pipeline.  Interstate and
intrastate transportation services provided by the Chaparral pipeline are regulated; however, transportation services provided
by the Quanah pipeline are not.
§The Louisiana Pipeline System is a network of NGL pipelines located in southern Louisiana.  This system transports NGLs
originating in Louisiana and Texas to refineries and petrochemical plants located along the Mississippi River corridor in
southern Louisiana.  This system also provides transportation services for our natural gas processing plants, NGL fractionators
and other assets located in Louisiana.
§The Seminole NGL Pipeline transports NGLs from the Hobbs hub and the Permian Basin to markets in southeast Texas,
including our NGL fractionation complex located in and near Mont Belvieu.  NGLs originating on the Mid-America Pipeline
System are a significant source of throughput for the Seminole NGL Pipeline.
Historically, the Seminole NGL Pipeline system was comprised of two parallel pipelines extending to Mont Belvieu.  In
January 2019, we completed the conversion of a portion of one of these pipelines from NGL service to crude oil service. The
conversion does not reduce our NGL transportation capacity since displaced NGLs are transported using our other NGL
pipelines, including our Shin Oak NGL Pipeline.  Furthermore, we have the ability to convert this pipeline back to NGL
service should market and physical takeaway conditions warrant.  See “Crude Oil Pipelines & Services Segment – Crude Oil
Pipelines” within this Items 1 and 2 section for additional information regarding the Midland-to-ECHO 2 Pipeline System.
9
Table of Contents
§The Texas Express Pipeline extends from Skellytown, Texas to our NGL fractionation and storage complex located in and near
Mont Belvieu.  Mixed NGLs from production fields located in the Rocky Mountains, Permian Basin and Mid-Continent
regions are delivered to the Texas Express Pipeline via an interconnect with our Mid-America Pipeline System near
Skellytown.  In addition, the Texas Express Pipeline transports mixed NGLs gathered by the Texas Express Gathering System. 
Also, mixed NGLs originating from the Denver-Julesburg (“DJ”) Basin in Colorado are transported to the Texas Express
Pipeline using the Front Range Pipeline.  Our 35% ownership interest in the Texas Express Pipeline is held indirectly through
our equity method investment in Texas Express Pipeline LLC.
In May 2018, we conducted open commitment periods to determine shipper interest in expansions of the Texas Express
Pipeline and Front Range Pipeline.  Given the positive responses we received from shippers, we are proceeding with the
expansions, which are expected to increase the transportation capacity of Texas Express Pipeline and Front Range Pipeline by
90 MBPD and 100 MBPD, respectively. The expansions are designed to facilitate growing production of NGLs from domestic
shale basins, including the DJ Basin, by providing producers with flow assurance and greater access to Gulf Coast markets. 
We anticipate the expansion projects will be placed into service during the third quarter of 2019.
§The Skelly-Belvieu Pipeline transports mixed NGLs from Skellytown, Texas to Mont Belvieu.  The Skelly-Belvieu Pipeline
receives a significant quantity of NGLs through an interconnect with our Mid-America Pipeline System at Skellytown.  Our
50% ownership interest in the Skelly-Belvieu Pipeline is held indirectly through our equity method investment in Skelly-
Belvieu Pipeline Company, L.L.C.
§The Front Range Pipeline transports mixed NGLs from natural gas processing plants located in the DJ Basin in Colorado to an
interconnect with our Texas Express Pipeline, Mid-America Pipeline System and other third party facilities located at
Skellytown, Texas. Our 33.3% ownership interest in the Front Range Pipeline is held indirectly through our equity method
investment in Front Range Pipeline LLC.  As previously mentioned, we are in the process of expanding the transportation
capacity of the Front Range Pipeline by 100 MBPD.
§The Aegis Ethane Pipeline (“Aegis”) delivers purity ethane to petrochemical facilities located along the southeast Texas and
Louisiana Gulf Coast.  Aegis, when combined with a portion of our South Texas NGL Pipeline System, forms an ethane header
system stretching from Corpus Christi, Texas to the Mississippi River in Louisiana.
§The Houston Ship Channel Pipeline System connects our Mont Belvieu area assets to our marine terminals on the Houston
Ship Channel and to area petrochemical plants, refineries and other pipelines.
§The Rio Grande Pipeline transports mixed NGLs from near Odessa, Texas to a pipeline interconnect at the Mexican border
south of El Paso, Texas.  We own a 70% consolidated interest in the Rio Grande Pipeline through our majority owned
subsidiary, Rio Grande Pipeline Company.
§The Panola Pipeline transports mixed NGLs from injection points near Carthage, Texas to the Mont Belvieu hub and supports
the Haynesville and Cotton Valley oil and gas production areas.  We own a 55% consolidated interest in the Panola Pipeline
through our majority owned subsidiary, Panola Pipeline Company, LLC.
§The Lou-Tex NGL Pipeline system transports mixed NGLs, purity NGL products and refinery grade propylene (“RGP”)
between the Louisiana and Texas markets.
§The Promix NGL Gathering System gathers mixed NGLs from natural gas processing plants in southern Louisiana for delivery
to our Promix NGL fractionator.  Our 50% ownership interest in the Promix NGL Gathering System is held indirectly through
our equity method investment in K/D/S Promix, L.L.C. (“Promix”).
§The Texas Express Gathering System is comprised of two gathering systems, Elk City and North Texas, that deliver mixed
NGLs to the Texas Express Pipeline.  Our 45% ownership interest in the Texas Express Gathering System is held indirectly
through our equity method investment in Texas Express Gathering LLC.
10
Table of Contents
§The Tri-States NGL Pipeline transports mixed NGLs from Mobile Bay, Alabama to points near Kenner, Louisiana.  We own an
83.3% consolidated interest in the Tri-States NGL Pipeline through our majority owned subsidiary, Tri-States NGL Pipeline,
L.L.C.
Shin Oak NGL Pipeline.  In April 2017, we announced plans to build the 658-mile Shin Oak NGL Pipeline to transport growing
NGL production from the Permian Basin to our NGL fractionation and storage complex located at the Mont Belvieu hub.  In
February 2019, the 24-inch diameter mainline segment from Orla, Texas to Mont Belvieu was placed into limited commercial
service with an initial transportation capacity of 250 MBPD.  Completion of the related 20-inch diameter Waha lateral is scheduled
for the second quarter of 2019. Supported by long-term customer commitments, the Shin Oak NGL Pipeline will ultimately provide
up to 550 MBPD of transportation capacity, which is expected to be available in the fourth quarter of 2019.
In May 2018, Apache Corporation (“Apache”) executed a long-term supply agreement to sell all of its NGL production from the
Alpine High discovery to us. Alpine High is a major hydrocarbon resource located in the Delaware Basin that encompasses rich and
dry natural gas and oil-bearing horizons.  Enterprise has committed to purchase up to 205 MBPD of NGLs from Apache over the
initial ten-year term of the supply agreement, the term of which may be extended at the consent of the parties.
In conjunction with the long-term NGL supply agreement, we granted Apache an option to acquire up to a 33% equity interest in
our subsidiary that owns the Shin Oak NGL Pipeline.  In November 2018, Apache contributed this option to Altus Midstream
Company, which is a majority-owned subsidiary of Apache. The option is exercisable within sixty days after certain completion
milestones are met (as defined in the underlying agreements), which we expect to occur in the second quarter of 2019.
NGL fractionation
We own or have interests in 16 NGL fractionators located in Texas and Louisiana that separate mixed NGL streams into purity
NGL products for third party customers and also our NGL marketing activities.  Mixed NGLs extracted by domestic natural gas
processing plants represent the largest source of volumes processed by our NGL fractionators.  Based upon industry data, we
believe that sufficient volumes of mixed NGLs, especially those originating from natural gas processing plants located in West
Texas, along the Gulf Coast and in the Rocky Mountains and Mid-Continent regions, will be available for fractionation in
commercially viable quantities for the foreseeable future.  Significant volumes of mixed NGLs are contractually committed to be
processed at our NGL fractionators by joint owners and third party customers.
The results of operations of our NGL fractionation business are generally dependent upon the volume of mixed NGLs fractionated
and either the level of fractionation fees charged (under fee-based contracts) or the value of NGLs received (under percent-of-
liquids arrangements).  Our fee-based fractionation customers retain title to the NGLs that we process for them.  To the extent we
fractionate volumes for customers under percent-of-liquids contracts, we are exposed to fluctuations in NGL prices (i.e.,
commodity price risk).  We attempt to mitigate these risks through the use of commodity derivative instruments.
11
Table of Contents
The following table presents selected information regarding our NGL fractionation facilities at February 1, 2019:
   Net Plant Total Plant
  Ownership Capacity Capacity
Description of Asset Location Interest (MBPD) (1) (MBPD)
NGL fractionation facilities:     
Mont Belvieu complex:     
   Fracs I, II and III Texas   75.0% (2) 189 245
   Fracs IV, V, VI and IX Texas 100.0% 345 345
   Fracs VII and VIII Texas   75.0% (3) 128 170
   Total Mont Belvieu complex   662 760
Shoup and Armstrong Texas 100.0% 93 93
Hobbs Texas 100.0% 75 75
Norco Louisiana 100.0% 75 75
Promix Louisiana   50.0% 73 145
Tebone Louisiana 100.0% 30 30
Baton Rouge Louisiana   32.2% 19 60
   Total   1,027 1,238
     
(1) The approximate net plant capacity does not necessarily correspond to our ownership interest in each facility.  The capacity is based on a variety of factors
such as the level of volumes an owner processes at the facility and contractual arrangements with joint owners.
(2) We proportionately consolidate a 75% undivided interest in these fractionators.
(3) We own a 75% consolidated equity interest in NGL fractionators VII and VIII through our majority owned subsidiary, Enterprise EF78 LLC.
On a weighted-average basis, overall utilization rates for our NGL fractionators were 94.0%, 91.0% and 90.2% during the years
ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively.
The following information describes our NGL fractionators, all of which we operate.
§The Mont Belvieu NGL fractionation complex includes fractionators located either in Mont Belvieu or in surrounding areas of
Chambers County, Texas.  This complex processes mixed NGLs from several major NGL supply basins in North America,
including the Permian Basin, Rocky Mountains, Eagle Ford Shale, Mid-Continent and San Juan Basin.  In addition, the Mont
Belvieu NGL fractionation complex features connectivity to our network of NGL supply and distribution pipelines,
approximately 130 MMBbls of underground salt dome storage capacity, along with access to international markets through our
marine terminals located on the Houston Ship Channel.
Demand for NGL fractionation capacity continues to expand as producers in domestic shale plays such as the Permian Basin,
Eagle Ford Shale and DJ Basin seek market access and end users require supply assurance.  In May 2018, we placed our ninth
NGL fractionator, which is located in Chambers County, Texas, into service. The new fractionator has a capacity of 90 MBPD,
which increased total NGL fractionation capacity at our Mont Belvieu complex to 760 MBPD.  In addition, we announced in
November 2018 plans to construct a new NGL fractionation facility in Chambers County, Texas adjacent to our existing Mont
Belvieu NGL fractionation complex.  The new facility will consist of two fractionation trains capable of processing a combined
300 MBPD of NGLs. The first of the two fractionation trains will have a nameplate capacity of 150 MBPD and is scheduled to
be completed and begin service in the fourth quarter of 2019. The second of these fractionation trains will also have a
nameplate capacity of 150 MBPD, and is scheduled to begin service in the first half of 2020.
§The Shoup and Armstrong NGL fractionators in South Texas process mixed NGLs supplied by regional natural gas processing
plants.  Purity NGL products from the Shoup and Armstrong fractionators are transported to local markets in the Corpus Christi
area and also to the Mont Belvieu hub using our South Texas NGL Pipeline System.
In November 2018, we announced a project to optimize our Shoup NGL fractionator by expanding and repurposing a portion
of our South Texas pipelines.  The project will entail the construction of approximately 21 miles of new pipeline along with the
conversion of approximately 65 miles of existing natural gas pipelines to NGL service, which will allow us to supply Shoup
with an additional 25 MBPD of NGL volumes.  The expanded pipeline capacity is expected to be available in the third quarter
of 2019.
12
Table of Contents
§The Hobbs NGL fractionator serves NGL producers in West Texas, New Mexico and Colorado. This fractionator receives
mixed NGLs from several major supply basins, including the Mid-Continent, Permian Basin, San Juan Basin and Rocky
Mountains.  The facility is located at the interconnect of our Mid-America Pipeline System and Seminole NGL Pipeline, thus
providing customers access to both the Mont Belvieu and Conway hubs.
§The Norco NGL fractionator receives mixed NGLs from refineries and natural gas processing plants located in southern
Louisiana and along the Mississippi and Alabama Gulf Coast, including our Pascagoula, Venice and Toca plants.
§The Promix NGL fractionator receives mixed NGLs from natural gas processing plants located in south Louisiana and along
the Mississippi Gulf Coast, including our Neptune and Pascagoula plants. The Promix NGL fractionation facility includes three
NGL storage caverns and a barge dock that are integral to its operations.  Our 50% ownership interest in the Promix
fractionator is held indirectly through our equity method investment in Promix.
§The Tebone NGL fractionator, which was restarted in February 2019 in light of regional demand for fractionation services,
receives mixed NGLs from our Louisiana natural gas processing plants, as well as our Mont Belvieu storage complex.  The
resumption of service at our Tebone fractionator complements our operations at the Norco and Promix NGL fractionators and
provides us with another processing option for mixed NGLs delivered to Mont Belvieu.
§The Baton Rouge NGL fractionator receives mixed NGLs from natural gas processing plants located in Alabama, Mississippi
and south Louisiana.  This facility includes a leased NGL storage cavern. Our 32.2% ownership interest in the Baton Rouge
fractionator is held indirectly through our equity method investment in Baton Rouge Fractionators LLC.
NGL and related product storage facilities
We utilize underground salt dome storage caverns and above-ground storage tanks to store mixed and purity NGLs, petrochemicals
and related products that are owned by us and our customers.  The results of operations from our storage facilities are dependent
upon the level of storage capacity reserved by customers, the volume of product delivered into and withdrawn from storage, and the
level of associated fees we charge.
The following table presents selected information regarding our NGL and related product storage assets at February 1, 2019:
   Net Usable
   Storage
  Ownership Capacity
Storage Capacity by Asset Location Interest (MMBbls) (1)
Mont Belvieu storage complex Texas 100.0% 129.8
Almeda and Markham (2) Texas Leased 12.4
Breaux Bridge, Anse La Butte and Sorrento (3) Louisiana 100.0% 12.7
Petal (4) Mississippi 100.0% 5.1
Hutchinson (5) Kansas 100.0% 4.0
Others (6) Various Various 14.2
   Total   178.2
    
(1) Net usable storage capacity is based on our ownership interest or contractual right-of-use.
(2) These storage facilities are used in connection with our South Texas NGL Pipeline System.
(3) These storage facilities are used in connection with our Louisiana Pipeline System.
(4) This storage facility is used in connection with our Dixie Pipeline.
(5) This storage facility is used in connection with our Mid-America Pipeline System.
(6) Primarily consists of operational storage capacity for our major pipeline systems, including the Mid-America Pipeline System, Dixie Pipeline and TE
Products Pipeline.  We own substantially all of this storage capacity.
We operate substantially all of our NGL and related product storage facilities.
13
Table of Contents
Our largest underground storage facility is located at the Mont Belvieu hub in Chambers County, Texas. This facility consists of 38
underground salt dome caverns used to store and redeliver mixed and purity NGLs, petrochemicals and related products.  This
facility has an aggregate usable storage capacity of 129.8 MMBbls, a brine system with approximately 31 MMBbls of above-
ground brine storage capacity and five wells used in brine production.
NGL marine terminals and related operations
We own and operate marine export and import terminals for NGLs. The results of operations of these facilities, all of which are
located on the Houston Ship Channel, are primarily dependent upon the level of volumes handled and the associated
loading/unloading fees we charge for such services.
The following information describes our Houston Ship Channel terminals, both of which we operate.
§The Enterprise Hydrocarbons Terminal (“EHT”) is located on the Houston Ship Channel and provides terminaling services to
exporters, marketers, distributors, chemical companies and major integrated oil companies.  EHT has extensive waterfront
access consisting of seven deep-water ship docks and one barge dock.  The terminal can accommodate vessels with up to a 45
foot draft, including Suezmax tankers, which are the largest tankers that can navigate the Houston Ship Channel.  We believe
that our location on the Houston Ship Channel enables us to handle larger vessels than our competitors because our waterfront
has fewer draft and beam (width) restrictions.  The size and structure of our waterfront allows us to receive and unload
products for our customers and provide terminaling and dock services.
EHT can load refrigerated cargoes of low-ethane propane and/or butane (collectively referred to as LPG) onto multiple tanker
vessels simultaneously.  Our LPG export services continue to benefit from increased NGL supplies produced from domestic
shale plays such as the Permian Basin and Eagle Ford Shale and international demand for propane as a feedstock in ethylene
production and for power generation and heating purposes.  LPG loading volumes at EHT averaged 445 MBPD, 424 MBPD
and 420 MBPD during the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively.
Our current loading capacity for LPG is approximately 545 MBPD. In September 2018, we announced a project to increase
LPG loading capacity at EHT by 175 MBPD, or approximately 5 MMBbls per month.  The expansion will bring our total LPG
export capacity at EHT to 720 MBPD, or approximately 21 MMBbls per month. Upon completion of this expansion project,
EHT will have the capability to load up to six Very Large Gas Carrier (“VLGC”) vessels simultaneously, while maintaining the
option to switch between loading propane and butane. Once operational, the expansion will allow EHT to load a single VLGC
in less than 24 hours, creating greater efficiencies and cost savings for our customers. The incremental loading capacity is
expected to be available in the third quarter of 2019.
The primary customer of EHT is our NGL marketing group, which uses EHT to meet the needs of export customers. NGL
marketing transacts with these customers using long-term sales contracts with take-or-pay provisions and/or exchange
agreements.  In recent years, the U.S. has become the largest exporter of LPG in the world, with shipments originating from
EHT playing a key role.
Of the LPG cargoes we loaded for export at EHT during the year ended December 31, 2018, the destination markets were as
follows: 55% to Asia; 18% to North America and the Caribbean; 13% to Central and South America; 12% to Europe and
Africa; and 2% to other destinations, including Australia and the Middle East.  Based on available information, our LPG sales
to export customers represented the following percentage of each destination market’s approximate total supply: 51% for North
America and the Caribbean; 43% for Asia; 34% for Central and South America; 21% for Europe and Africa; and 10% for other
destinations, including Australia and the Middle East.
EHT also includes an NGL import terminal.  This import terminal can offload NGLs from tanker vessels at rates up to 14,000
barrels per hour depending on the product.  Our NGL import volumes for the last three years were minimal.
14
Table of Contents
EHT also provides terminaling services involving crude oil, petrochemical and refined products.  EHT’s assets and activities
associated with crude oil terminaling and storage are classified and presented as a component of our Crude Oil Pipelines &
Services business segment.  EHT’s activities associated with petrochemical and refined products customers are classified and
described within our Petrochemical & Refined Products Services business segment.
§The Morgan’s Point Ethane Export Terminal, located on the Houston Ship Channel, has an aggregate loading rate (nameplate
capacity) of approximately 10,000 barrels per hour of fully refrigerated ethane and is the largest of its kind in the world. The
terminal supports domestic production of U.S. ethane from shale plays by providing the global petrochemical industry with
access to a low-cost feedstock option and opportunities for supply diversification. We estimate that U.S. Gulf Coast ethane
supply currently exceeds U.S. demand by approximately 300 MBPD and could exceed demand by approximately 1 MMBPD
in 2024, after considering estimated incremental demand from third party ethylene production facilities that are being
constructed along the Gulf Coast.  By providing producers with access to the export market, the Morgan’s Point Ethane Export
Terminal supports continued development of U.S. energy reserves.
Ethane volumes handled by the terminal are sourced from our Mont Belvieu NGL fractionation and storage complex.  Ethane
loading volumes at the terminal averaged 146 MBPD, 90 MBPD and 15 MBPD during the years ended December 31, 2018,
2017 and 2016, respectively.   The terminal was placed into commercial service in August 2016.
Crude Oil Pipelines & Services Segment
Our Crude Oil Pipelines & Services business segment currently includes approximately 5,300 miles of crude oil pipelines, crude oil
storage and marine terminals, and associated crude oil marketing activities.
Crude oil pipelines
We have crude oil gathering and transportation pipelines located in Oklahoma, New Mexico and Texas. The results of operations
from providing crude oil transportation services is primarily dependent upon the volume handled (or capacity reserved) and the
level of fees charged (typically on a per barrel basis). Fees charged to shippers are based on either tariffs regulated by governmental
agencies, including the FERC, or contractual arrangements.  See “Regulatory Matters” within this Part I, Items 1 and 2 discussion
for additional information regarding governmental oversight of our crude oil pipelines and storage facilities.
The following table presents selected information regarding our crude oil pipelines and related operations at February 1, 2019:
   Operational 
  Our Storage Pipeline
  Ownership Capacity Length
Description of Asset Location(s) Interest (MMBbls) (2) (Miles)
Seaway Pipeline (1) Texas, Oklahoma     50.0% 8.8 1,271
West Texas System (1) Texas, New Mexico   100.0% 0.9 1,034
South Texas Crude Oil Pipeline System Texas   100.0% 3.8 648
Basin Pipeline (1) Texas, New Mexico, Oklahoma     13.0% (3) 6.0 618
EFS Midstream System Texas   100.0% 0.3 485
Midland-to-ECHO 2 Pipeline System Texas   100.0% -- 440
Midland-to-ECHO 1 Pipeline System Texas     80.0% 3.9 418
Eagle Ford Crude Oil Pipeline System Texas     50.0% 4.5 378
   Total   28.2 5,292
     
(1) Transportation services provided by these liquids pipelines are regulated, in whole or part, by federal governmental agencies.
(2) Operational storage capacity amounts presented on a gross basis.
(3) We proportionately consolidate our 13% undivided interest in the Basin Pipeline.
In October 2018, we sold our Red River System and associated crude oil linefill for $134.9 million.  For additional information
regarding this sale, see Note 4 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual
report.
15
Table of Contents
The maximum number of barrels per day that our crude oil pipelines can transport depends on the operating rates achieved at a
given point in time between various segments of each system (e.g., demand levels at each delivery point and grades of crude oil
being transported).  As a result, we measure the utilization rates of our crude oil pipelines in terms of net throughput, which is based
on our ownership interest.  In the aggregate, net throughput volumes for these pipelines were 2,000 MBPD, 1,820 MBPD and 1,388
MBPD during the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively.
The following information describes our principal crude oil pipelines, all of which we operate with the exception of the Basin
Pipeline and Eagle Ford Crude Oil Pipeline System.
§The Seaway Pipeline connects the Cushing, Oklahoma crude oil hub with markets in southeast Texas. Our 50% ownership
interest in the Seaway Pipeline is held indirectly through our equity method investment in Seaway Crude Pipeline Company
LLC (“Seaway”). The Seaway Pipeline is comprised of the Longhaul System, the Freeport System and the Texas City System.
The Cushing hub is an industry trading hub and price settlement point for West Texas Intermediate (“WTI”) crude oil on the
New York Mercantile Exchange (“NYMEX”).
The Longhaul System consists of two approximately 500-mile, 30-inch diameter pipelines (Seaway I and the Seaway Loop)
that provide north-to-south transportation of crude oil from the Cushing hub to Seaway’s Jones Creek terminal located near
Freeport, Texas. The aggregate transportation capacity of the Longhaul System is approximately 950 MBPD, depending on the
type and mix of crude oil being transported and other variables. The Jones Creek terminal is connected by pipeline to our
Enterprise Crude Houston (“ECHO”) storage terminal, which enables Seaway to serve a variety of customers along the upper
Texas Gulf Coast including the Beaumont/Port Arthur area.
The Freeport System consists of a marine terminal that facilitates both crude oil imports and exports, along with pipelines that
transport crude oil to and from Freeport, Texas and the Jones Creek terminal.
The Texas City System consists of a marine terminal and storage tanks, various pipelines and related infrastructure used to
transport crude oil to refineries in the Texas City, Texas area and to and from terminals in the Galena Park, Texas area, our
ECHO terminal and locations along the Houston Ship Channel.  The Texas City System also receives production from certain
offshore Gulf of Mexico developments. The intrastate pipeline transportation capacity of the Freeport System and Texas City
System is approximately 480 MBPD and 800 MBPD, respectively. Seaway’s Texas City marine terminal features two docks, a
45-foot draft, an overall length of 1,125 feet, a 200-foot beam (width) and the capacity to load crude oil at a rate of 35,000
barrels per hour.
In June 2018, our crude oil marketing group commenced the loading of Very Large Crude Carrier (“VLCC”) tankers using
Seaway’s Texas City terminal in combination with lightering operations in the Gulf of Mexico.
§The West Texas System connects crude oil gathering systems in West Texas and southeast New Mexico to our terminal facility
located in Midland, Texas.  The West Texas System, including the recently completed Loving County pipeline, is a key part of
our strategic aggregation program designed to support Permian Basin producers.   The Loving County pipeline, which was
completed in July 2018, can currently transport 200 MBPD of crude oil and condensate from various points in New Mexico
and West Texas to our Midland, Texas crude oil terminal; however, we expect to complete an expansion project in March 2019
that will increase its transportation capacity up to 350 MBPD.  At Midland, shippers will have access to storage and terminal
services, as well as connectivity to multiple transportation alternatives such as trucking and pipeline infrastructure that offer
access to various downstream markets, including the Gulf Coast.
§The South Texas Crude Oil Pipeline System transports crude oil and condensate originating in South Texas to customers in the
Houston area.  This system includes storage terminal assets located at Sealy, Texas.  The South Texas Crude Oil Pipeline
System also includes our Rancho II pipeline, which extends 89-miles from the Sealy terminal to our ECHO terminal. From
ECHO, we have connectivity to refinery customers and our marine terminals.
§The Basin Pipeline transports crude oil from the Permian Basin in West Texas and southern New Mexico to the Cushing hub.
16
Table of Contents
§The EFS Midstream System serves producers in the Eagle Ford Shale, providing condensate gathering and processing services
as well as gathering, treating and compression services for associated natural gas.  The EFS Midstream System includes 485
miles of gathering pipelines, 11 central gathering plants having a combined condensate storage capacity of 0.3 MMBbls, 171
MBPD of condensate stabilization capacity and 1.0 Bcf/d of associated natural gas treating capacity.
§The Midland-to-ECHO 2 Pipeline System, which began limited commercial service in February 2019, provides us with
approximately 200 MBPD of incremental crude oil transportation capacity from the Permian Basin to markets in the Houston
area.  The pipeline is expected to enter full commercial service in April 2019.  The pipeline originates at our Midland terminal
and extends 440 miles to our Sealy storage terminal, with volumes arriving at Sealy transported to our ECHO terminal using
the Rancho II pipeline, which is a component of our South Texas Crude Oil Pipeline System.
We converted a portion of our Seminole NGL Pipeline system from NGL service to crude oil service to create the Midland-to-
Sealy segment of this pipeline system. The conversion is supported by a 10.75-year transportation contract with firm demand
fees.  We have the ability to convert this pipeline back to NGL service should market and physical takeaway conditions
warrant.
§The Midland-to-ECHO 1 Pipeline System, which became fully operational in the second quarter of 2018, provides Permian
Basin producers with the ability to transport multiple grades of crude oil, including WTI, WTI light sweet crude oil (“WTI
Light”), West Texas Sour, and condensate, to Gulf Coast markets. As a result of operating enhancements and supplementary
infrastructure, the pipeline’s transportation capacity is expected to increase to 620 MBPD beginning in March 2019.
The Midland-to-ECHO 1 Pipeline System originates at our Midland terminal and extends 418 miles to our Sealy storage
terminal. Volumes arriving at Sealy are then transported to our ECHO terminal using the Rancho II pipeline.  Using the ECHO
terminal, shippers on the Midland-to-ECHO 1 Pipeline System have access to every refinery in Houston, Texas City, Beaumont
and Port Arthur, Texas, as well as our crude oil export dock facilities.  The Midland-to-ECHO 1 Pipeline System includes
certain storage assets located at Sealy, Texas.
The majority of the Midland-to-ECHO 1 Pipeline System is owned by Whitethorn Pipeline Company LLC (“Whitethorn”), in
which we own an 80% equity interest.  In June 2018, an affiliate of Western Gas Partners, LP acquired a 20% equity interest in
Whitethorn for $189.6 million in cash.
§The Eagle Ford Crude Oil Pipeline System transports crude oil and condensate for producers in South Texas.  The system,
which is effectively looped and has a capacity to transport over 600 MBPD of light and medium grades of crude oil, consists of
378 miles of crude oil and condensate pipelines originating in Gardendale, Texas and extending to Corpus Christi, Texas.  The
system interconnects with our South Texas Crude Oil Pipeline System in Wilson County, Texas and a marine terminal located
in Corpus Christi that is under construction.  Our 50% ownership interest in the Eagle Ford Crude Oil Pipeline System is held
indirectly through our equity method investment in Eagle Ford Pipeline LLC.
Crude oil terminals
In addition to the operational storage capacity associated with our crude oil pipelines, we also own and operate crude oil terminals
located in Houston, Midland and Beaumont, Texas and Cushing, Oklahoma that are used to store crude oil for us and our
customers.  In conjunction with other aspects of our midstream network, our crude oil terminals provide Gulf Coast refiners with an
integrated system featuring supply diversification, significant storage capabilities and a high capacity pipeline distribution system
that is connected to customers having an aggregate refining capacity of approximately 4.4 MMBPD.
The results of operations from crude oil terminals are primarily dependent upon the level of volumes stored and the length of time
such storage occurs, including the level of firm storage capacity reserved, pumpover volumes and the fees associated with each
activity.  If the terminal offers marine services, the results of operations from these activities are primarily dependent upon the level
of volumes handled and the associated loading/unloading fees we charge for such services.
17
Table of Contents
The following table presents selected information regarding our crude oil terminals at February 1, 2019:
    Number of Storage
  Ownership Number of Above-Ground Capacity
Description of Asset Location(s) Interest Marine Docks Tanks in Service (MMBbls)
EHT (crude oil) Texas 100.0% 7 deep-water ship; 1 barge 84 24.0
ECHO (1) Texas 100.0% n/a 15 6.4
Beaumont Marine West Texas 100.0% 4 deep-water ship; 2 barge 12 4.1
Cushing Oklahoma 100.0% n/a 20 3.5
Midland Texas 100.0% n/a 12 2.5
   Total    143 40.5
      
(1) Number of tanks and storage capacity excludes three tanks that are used in the operation of our Midland-to-ECHO 1 Pipeline System and two tanks owned
by Seaway.
The following information describes our principal crude oil terminals, all of which we operate.
§The EHT crude oil terminal is one of the largest such facilities on the Gulf Coast and part of our EHT complex, which is
located on the Houston Ship Channel and features extensive waterfront access consisting of seven deep-water ship docks and a
barge dock.  As noted previously, the terminal can accommodate vessels with up to a 45-foot draft, including Suezmax tankers,
which are the largest tankers that can navigate the Houston Ship Channel.
§The ECHO terminal is located in Houston, Texas and provides storage customers with access to major refineries located in the
Houston, Texas City and Beaumont/Port Arthur areas.  ECHO also has connections to marine terminals, including EHT, that
provide access to any refinery on the U.S. Gulf Coast and international markets.
In September 2018, the CME Group, a leading derivatives marketplace, announced that suppliers, refiners and end users of
U.S. crude oil have a new way to price and hedge WTI in Houston, Texas.  Participants will have the flexibility to make or take
delivery of WTI at our ECHO terminal, EHT or pipeline interconnect at Genoa Junction. The new futures contracts received
regulatory approval in October 2018 and are listed with and subject to the rules of the NYMEX, beginning with the January
2019 contract month.
§The Beaumont Marine West terminal is located on the Neches River near Beaumont, Texas.  This terminal includes four deep-
water docks and two barge docks that facilitate the exporting and importing of crude oil and related products.
§The Cushing terminal is located at the Cushing hub in Oklahoma and provides crude oil storage, pumpover and trade
documentation services.  This terminal is one of the origination points for our Seaway Pipeline.
§The Midland terminal provides crude oil storage, pumpover and trade documentation services.  The Midland terminal is the
origination point for our Midland-to-ECHO 1 and 2 Pipeline Systems.
Texas Gulf Coast Offshore Oil Terminal.  We are in the planning stage of developing a crude oil export terminal located offshore
along the Texas Gulf Coast.  The terminal would be capable of fully loading VLCC marine tankers, which have capacities of
approximately 2 MMBbls and provide the most efficient and cost-effective solution to export crude oil to the largest international
markets in Asia and Europe. We started front-end engineering and design work for the terminal in 2018 and filed our application for
regulatory permitting with the Maritime Administration (“MARAD”) in January 2019.  Based on initial designs, the project would
include onshore and offshore facilities capable of exporting crude oil at approximately 85,000 barrels per hour.  A final investment
decision for the project will be subject to the execution of long-term customer contracts and receiving state and federal permits.
18
Table of Contents
Corpus Christi Marine Terminal.  We are joint owners of a marine crude oil terminal being constructed in Corpus Christi, Texas
that will be capable of loading ocean-going vessels with either crude oil or condensate.  Initial storage capacity of the terminal will
be approximately 1.2 MMBbls.  The facility will have access to production from both the Eagle Ford Shale and the Permian Basin
through a connection with our Eagle Ford Crude Oil Pipeline System.  The Corpus Christi marine terminal is expected to be placed
into commercial service in the second quarter of 2019. Our 50% ownership interest in the terminal is held indirectly through our
equity method investment in EF Terminals Corpus Christi LLC.
Crude oil marketing activities
Our crude oil marketing activities generate revenues from the sale and delivery of crude oil and condensate purchased either
directly from producers or from others on the open market.  The results of operations from our crude oil marketing activities are
primarily dependent upon the difference, or spread, between crude oil and condensate sales prices and the associated purchase and
other costs, including those costs attributable to the use of our assets.  In general, sales prices referenced in the underlying contracts
are market-based and include pricing differentials for factors such as delivery location or crude oil quality.  We use derivative
instruments to mitigate our exposure to commodity price risks associated with our crude oil marketing activities.  For a discussion
of our commodity hedging program, see Part II, Item 7A of this annual report.
Our Crude Oil Pipelines & Services segment also includes a fleet of approximately 360 tractor-trailer tank trucks, the majority of
which we lease and operate, that are used to transport crude oil.
Natural Gas Pipelines & Services Segment
Our Natural Gas Pipelines & Services business segment currently includes approximately 19,700 miles of natural gas pipeline
systems that provide for the gathering, treating and transportation of natural gas in Colorado, Louisiana, New Mexico, Texas and
Wyoming.  This segment also includes our natural gas marketing activities.
Natural gas pipelines and related storage assets
Our natural gas pipeline systems gather, treat and transport natural gas from producing regions including the Permian, Eagle Ford
Shale, Haynesville Shale, and the Piceance, San Juan and Greater Green River supply basins. In addition, certain of these pipelines
receive natural gas production from Gulf of Mexico developments. Our natural gas pipelines redeliver the natural gas to processing
facilities, electric generation plants, local gas distribution companies, industrial and municipal customers, storage facilities or other
onshore pipelines.
The results of operations from our natural gas pipelines and related storage assets are primarily dependent upon the volume of
natural gas gathered, treated, transported or stored, the level of firm capacity reservations made by shippers, and the associated fees
we charge for such activities.  Transportation fees charged to shippers (typically per MMBtu of natural gas) are based on either
tariffs regulated by governmental agencies, including the FERC, or contractual arrangements.  See “Regulatory Matters” within this
Part I, Items 1 and 2 discussion for additional information regarding governmental oversight of our natural gas pipelines.
19
Table of Contents
The following table presents selected information regarding our natural gas pipelines and related infrastructure at February 1, 2019:
    Net Capacity (1)
   Pipeline Pipeline Natural Gas Usable
  Ownership Length Capacity Treating Storage
Description of Asset Location(s) Interest (Miles) (MMcf/d) (MMcf/d) (Bcf)
Texas Intrastate System  (2) Texas  Various 6,944 7,345 80 12.9
Acadian Gas System (2) Louisiana  100.0% 1,312 3,100 -- 1.3
Jonah Gathering System Wyoming  100.0% 761 2,360 -- --
Piceance Basin Gathering System Colorado  100.0% 190 1,800 -- --
San Juan Gathering System New Mexico, Colorado 100.0% 6,073 1,750 440 --
Permian Basin Gathering System Texas, New Mexico  100.0% 1,687 1,575 150 --
White River Hub (3) Colorado    50.0% 10 1,500 -- --
Haynesville Gathering System Louisiana, Texas  100.0% 357 1,300 810 --
BTA Gathering System(4) Texas  100.0% 783 1,000 160 --
Fairplay Gathering System (4) Texas  100.0%  (5) 273 285 -- --
Indian Springs Gathering System (4) Texas    80.0%  (6) 145 160 -- --
Delmita Gathering System Texas  100.0% 204 145 -- --
South Texas Gathering System Texas  100.0% 518 143 -- --
Old Ocean Pipeline Texas    50.0% 240 80 -- --
Big Thicket Gathering System Texas  100.0% 250 60 -- --
Central Treating Facility Colorado  100.0% -- -- 200 --
   Total   19,747 22,603 1,840 14.2
       
(1) Net capacity amounts are based on our ownership interest or contractual right-of-use.
(2) Transportation services provided by these pipeline systems, in whole or part, are regulated by both federal and state governmental agencies.
(3)  Services provided by the White River Hub are regulated by federal governmental agencies.
(4) Transportation services provided by these systems are regulated in part by state governmental agencies.
(5) This system includes approximately 52 miles of pipeline held under an operating lease.
(6) We proportionately consolidate our 80% undivided interest in the Indian Springs Gathering System.
On a weighted-average basis, overall utilization rates for our natural gas pipelines were approximately 58.3%, 57.1% and 57.4%
during the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively.  These utilization rates represent actual natural gas
volumes delivered as a percentage of our nominal delivery capacity and do not reflect firm capacity reservation agreements where
capacity fees are earned whether or not the shipper actually utilizes such capacity.
The following information describes our principal natural gas pipelines.  With the exception of the White River Hub and certain
segments of the Texas Intrastate System, we operate our natural gas pipelines and storage facilities.
§The Texas Intrastate System is comprised of the 6,319-mile Enterprise Texas pipeline system and the 625-mile Channel
pipeline system. The Texas Intrastate System gathers, transports and stores natural gas from supply basins in Texas including
the Permian Basin and Eagle Ford and Barnett Shales for delivery to local gas distribution companies, electric utility plants and
industrial and municipal consumers. The system is also connected to regional natural gas processing plants and other intrastate
and interstate pipelines.  The Texas Intrastate System serves a number of commercial markets in Texas, including Corpus
Christi, San Antonio/Austin, Beaumont/Orange and Houston, including the Houston Ship Channel industrial market.
We proportionately consolidate our undivided interests, which range from 22% to 80%, in 1,471 miles of pipeline.  The Texas
Intrastate System also includes our Wilson natural gas storage facility, which consists of a network of leased and owned
underground salt dome storage caverns located in Wharton County, Texas with an aggregate 12.9 Bcf of usable storage
capacity.  Four of these caverns, comprising 6.9 Bcf of usable capacity, are held under an operating lease.  The remainder of
our Texas Intrastate System is wholly owned.
20
Table of Contents
§The Acadian Gas System transports, stores and markets natural gas in Louisiana.  The Acadian Gas System is comprised of the
582-mile Cypress pipeline, 429-mile Acadian pipeline, 275-mile Haynesville Extension pipeline and 26-mile Enterprise
Pelican pipeline.  The Acadian Gas System includes a leased underground salt dome natural gas storage cavern located at
Napoleonville, Louisiana.  The Acadian Gas System links natural gas supplies from Louisiana (e.g., from Haynesville Shale
supply basin) and offshore Gulf of Mexico developments with local gas distribution companies, electric utility plants and
industrial customers located primarily in the Baton Rouge/New Orleans/Mississippi River corridor.
§The Jonah Gathering System is located in the Greater Green River Basin of southwest Wyoming.  This system gathers natural
gas from the Jonah and Pinedale supply fields for delivery to regional natural gas processing plants, including our Pioneer
facility.
§The Piceance Basin Gathering System gathers natural gas produced from the Piceance Basin in northwestern Colorado to our
Meeker natural gas processing plant.
§The San Juan Gathering System gathers and treats natural gas produced from the San Juan Basin in northern New Mexico and
southern Colorado and delivers the natural gas either directly into interstate pipelines (if dry natural gas) or to regional natural
gas plants, including our Chaco facility, for further processing (if rich natural gas) prior to being transported on interstate
pipelines.
§The Permian Basin Gathering System is comprised of the 982-mile Carlsbad pipeline system, the 671-mile Waha pipeline
system and the 34-mile Orla pipeline system. The Permian Basin Gathering System gathers natural gas from the Permian Basin
for delivery to regional natural gas processing plants, including our Chaparral, Carlsbad, South Eddy, Waha and Orla plants,
and delivers residue and treated natural gas into our Texas Intrastate System and third party pipelines.
§The White River Hub is a natural gas hub facility serving producers in the Piceance Basin.  The facility enables producers to
access six interstate natural gas pipelines and has a gross throughput capacity of 3 Bcf/d of natural gas.  Our 50% ownership
interest in White River Hub is held indirectly through our equity method investment in White River Hub, LLC.
§The Haynesville Gathering System consists of the 214-mile State Line gathering system, the 73-mile Southeast Mansfield
gathering system, and the 70-mile Southeast Stanley gathering system.  The Haynesville Gathering System gathers and treats
natural gas produced from the Haynesville and Bossier Shale supply basins and the Cotton Valley and Taylor Sand formations
in Louisiana and eastern Texas for delivery to regional markets, including (through an interconnect with the Haynesville
Extension pipeline) markets served by our Acadian Gas System.
§The BTA Gathering System, which is located in East Texas, gathers and treats natural gas from the Haynesville Shale and
Bossier, Cotton Valley and Travis Peak formations.  We acquired this system, along with our Panola and Fairway natural gas
processing plants, in April 2017 for $191.4 million.  For information regarding this acquisition, see Note 12 of the Notes to
Consolidated Financial Statements included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report.
§The Fairplay Gathering System gathers natural gas produced from the Cotton Valley formation within Panola and Rusk
Counties in East Texas for delivery to regional markets.
§The Indian Springs Gathering System, along with the Big Thicket Gathering System, gather natural gas from the Woodbine,
Wilcox and Yegua production areas in East Texas.
§The Delmita Gathering System gathers natural gas from the Frio-Vicksburg formation in South Texas for delivery to our
Delmita natural gas processing plant.
§The South Texas Gathering System gathers natural gas from the Olmos and Wilcox formations for delivery into our Texas
Intrastate System, which delivers the natural gas to our South Texas natural gas processing plants.
21
Table of Contents
§The Old Ocean Pipeline transports natural gas from an injection point on our Texas Intrastate System near Maypearl, Texas for
delivery to a pipeline interconnect at Sweeny, Texas. In May 2018, we announced the formation of a 50/50 joint venture with
Energy Transfer Partners, L.P. ( “ETP”) to resume full service on the Old Ocean natural gas pipeline owned by ETP. The 24-
inch diameter Old Ocean Pipeline originates in Maypearl, Texas in Ellis County and extends south approximately 240 miles to
Sweeny, Texas in Brazoria County.  ETP serves as operator of the pipeline, which has a gross natural gas transportation
capacity of 160 MMcf/d.  Repairs were completed on the pipeline, and it entered full service in January 2019.
In addition, both parties expanded their jointly owned North Texas 36-inch diameter natural gas pipeline, which is a component
of our Texas Intrastate System. The expansion project was completed in January 2019 and provides us with additional natural
gas takeaway capacity of 150 MMcf/d from West Texas, including deliveries into the Old Ocean Pipeline.  The resumption of
full service on the Old Ocean Pipeline and expansion of the North Texas Pipeline provide producers with additional takeaway
capacity to accommodate growing natural gas production from the Delaware and Midland Basins.
§The Central Treating Facility is located in Rio Blanco County, Colorado and serves producers in the Piceance Basin.  Natural
gas delivered to the treating facility is treated to remove impurities and transported to our Meeker gas plant for further
processing.
Natural gas marketing activities
Our natural gas marketing activities generate revenues from the sale and delivery of natural gas purchased from producers, regional
natural gas processing plants and on the open market.  Our natural gas marketing customers include local gas distribution
companies and electric utility plants. The results of operations from our natural gas marketing activities are primarily dependent
upon the difference, or spread, between natural gas sales prices and the associated purchase and other costs, including those costs
attributable to the use of our assets.  In general, sales prices referenced in the underlying contracts are market-based and may
include pricing differentials for factors such as delivery location.
We are exposed to commodity price risk to the extent that we take title to natural gas volumes in connection with our natural gas
marketing activities and certain intrastate natural gas transportation contracts.  In addition, we purchase and resell natural gas for
certain producers that use our San Juan, Piceance, Permian Basin and Jonah Gathering Systems and certain segments of our
Acadian Gas and Texas Intrastate Systems.  Also, several of our natural gas gathering systems, while not providing marketing
services, have some exposure to risks related to fluctuations in commodity prices through transportation arrangements with
shippers.  For example, nearly all of the transportation revenues generated by our San Juan Gathering System are based on a
percentage of a regional natural gas price index.  This index may fluctuate based on a variety of factors, including changes in
natural gas supply and consumer demand.  We attempt to mitigate these price risks through the use of commodity derivative
instruments.  For a discussion of our commodity hedging program, see Part II, Item 7A of this annual report.
Petrochemical & Refined Products Services Segment
Our Petrochemical & Refined Products Services business segment currently includes: (i) propylene production facilities, which
include propylene fractionation units and a propane dehydrogenation (“PDH”) facility, approximately 800 miles of pipelines, and
associated marketing operations; (ii) a butane isomerization complex and related deisobutanizer (“DIB”) operations, along with
approximately 70 miles of associated pipelines; (iii) octane enhancement and high purity isobutylene (“HPIB”) production
facilities; (iv) refined products pipelines aggregating approximately 4,100 miles, terminals and associated marketing activities; and
(v) marine transportation.  This segment will also include our ethylene export terminal and related operations.
Propylene production and related operations
Our propylene production and related operations include seven propylene fractionation (or splitter) units, a PDH facility,
approximately 800 miles of related pipelines, marine export dock infrastructure, and associated marketing activities.
22
Table of Contents
Propylene is a key feedstock used by the petrochemical industry.  There are three grades of propylene; polymer grade (“PGP”) with
a minimum purity of 99.5%; chemical grade (“CGP”) with a minimum purity of approximately 93-94%; and refinery grade
(“RGP”) with a purity of approximately 70%.  In 2018, global demand for propylene (PGP and CGP combined) was estimated at
108 million tons.  Propylene fractionation units separate RGP, which is a mixture of propane and propylene, into either PGP or
CGP.  The PDH facility produces PGP using propane feedstocks. The demand for PGP primarily relates to the manufacture of
polypropylene, which has a variety of end uses including packaging film, fiber for carpets and upholstery, molded plastic parts for
appliances, and automotive, houseware and medical products.  CGP is a basic petrochemical used in the manufacturing of plastics,
synthetic fibers and foams.
Our PDH facility entered full service in April 2018.  The facility, which is located in Chambers County, Texas at our Mont Belvieu
complex, has the capacity to produce up to 1.65 billion pounds per year, or approximately 25 MBPD, of PGP.  At this nameplate
production rate, the facility consumes approximately 35 MBPD of propane as feedstock.  The PDH facility is integrated with our
legacy Mont Belvieu propylene fractionation units, which provides us with operational reliability and flexibility for both the PDH
facility and the fractionation units. The facility’s construction was underwritten by long-term, fee-based contracts that feature
minimum volume commitments.
To the extent we fractionate RGP for customers, we enter into toll processing arrangements.  In our petrochemical marketing
activities, we purchase RGP on the open market for fractionation at our splitter units and sell the resulting PGP to customers at
market-based prices.  The results of this marketing activity are primarily dependent upon the difference, or spread, between the
sales prices of the PGP and the associated purchase and other costs, including the costs attributable to use of our propylene
production assets and related infrastructure. To limit the exposure of these marketing activities to price risk, we attempt to match
the timing and price of our feedstock purchases with those of the sales of end products.
Our petrochemical marketing activities also include the purchase of propane for our PDH facility to process into PGP, which is then
sold to customers under long-term sales contracts (take-or-pay arrangements) that feature minimum volume commitments and
contractual pricing that minimizes our commodity price risk.
The results of operations from our petrochemical pipelines are primarily dependent upon the volume of products transported and
the level of fees charged to shippers.  In order to meet the growing international demand for PGP, this business also includes export
assets located at EHT that are capable of loading up to 5,000 metric tons per day of refrigerated PGP.
The following table presents selected information regarding our propylene production facilities at February 1, 2019:
  Our Net Plant Total Plant
  Ownership Capacity Capacity
Description of Asset Location(s) Interest (MBPD) (MBPD)
Propylene fractionation facilities:     
Mont Belvieu (six units) Texas     Various   (1) 81 95
BRPC (one unit) Louisiana        30.0%  (2) 7 23
   Total   88 118
     
PDH facility:     
Mont Belvieu Texas      100.0% 25 25
     
(1) We proportionately consolidate a 66.7% undivided interest in three of the propylene splitters, which have an aggregate 41 MBPD of total plant capacity. 
The remaining three propylene fractionation units are wholly owned.
(2) Our ownership interest in the BRPC facility is held indirectly through our equity method investment in Baton Rouge Propylene Concentrator LLC
(“BRPC”).
We produce PGP at our propylene fractionation units and PDH facility located at the Mont Belvieu hub and CGP at our BRPC
facility located in Baton Rouge, Louisiana.  On a weighted-average basis, the overall utilization rate of our propylene production
facilities was approximately 86.7%, 89.9% and 81.9% during the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively.
23
Table of Contents
The following table presents selected information regarding our propylene pipelines at February 1, 2019:
  Ownership Length
Description of Asset Location(s) Interest (Miles)
Lou-Tex Propylene Pipeline Texas, Louisiana   100.0% 263
Texas City RGP Gathering System Texas   100.0% 167
North Dean Pipeline System Texas   100.0% 157
Propylene Splitter PGP Distribution System Texas   100.0% 82
Louisiana RGP Gathering System Louisiana   100.0% 63
Lake Charles PGP Pipeline Texas, Louisiana     50.0%  (1) 27
La Porte PGP Pipeline Texas     80.0%  (2) 20
Sabine Pipeline Texas, Louisiana   100.0% 15
Total   794
    
(1) We proportionately consolidate our undivided interest in the Lake Charles PGP Pipeline.
(2) We own an 80% consolidated interest in the La Porte PGP Pipeline through our majority owned subsidiaries, La Porte Pipeline Company, L.P. and La Porte
Pipeline GP, L.L.C.
The maximum number of barrels per day that our petrochemical pipelines can transport depends on the operating rates achieved at
a given point in time between various segments of each system (e.g., demand levels at each delivery point and the mix of products
being transported).  As a result, we measure the utilization rates of our petrochemical pipelines in terms of net throughput, which is
based on our ownership interest.  Total net throughput volumes were 125 MBPD, 106 MBPD and 121 MBPD during the years
ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively.
The Lou-Tex Propylene pipeline is used to transport CGP from Sorrento, Louisiana to Mont Belvieu.  In June 2015, we announced
plans to convert the Lou-Tex Propylene pipeline from CGP to PGP service.  This conversion is scheduled for completion in 2020.
With the exception of the Lake Charles PGP Pipeline in Louisiana, we operate all of our propylene production assets and related
pipelines.
Isomerization and related operations
We own and operate three isomerization units at our Mont Belvieu complex having an aggregate processing capacity of 116 MBPD
that comprise the largest commercial isomerization facility in the U.S.  These operations also include a 70-mile pipeline system
used to transport high-purity isobutane from the Mont Belvieu hub to Port Neches, Texas.  We own and operate this pipeline
system.
The demand for commercial isomerization services depends upon the energy industry’s requirements for isobutane and high-purity
isobutane in excess of the isobutane produced through the process of NGL fractionation and refinery operations.  Isomerization
units convert normal butane feedstock into mixed butane, which is a stream of isobutane and normal butane.  DIB units, of which
we own and operate nine located at our Mont Belvieu complex, then separate the isobutane from the normal butane.  Any
remaining unconverted (or residual) normal butane generated by the DIB process is then recirculated through the isomerization
process until it has been converted into varying grades of isobutane, including high-purity isobutane.  The primary uses of
isobutane are for the production of propylene oxide, isooctane, isobutylene and alkylate for motor gasoline. We also use certain of
our DIB units to fractionate mixed butanes originating from NGL fractionation activities, imports and other sources into isobutane
and normal butane.  The operating flexibility provided by our multiple standalone DIBs enables us to capture market opportunities
resulting from fluctuations in demand and prices for different types of butanes.
The results of operations from our isomerization business are generally dependent on the volume of normal and mixed butanes
processed and the level of toll processing fees charged to customers.
Our isomerization assets provide processing services to meet the needs of third party customers and our other businesses, including
our NGL marketing activities and octane enhancement production facility. On a weighted-average basis, the utilization rates of our
isomerization facility were approximately 92.2%, 92.2% and 93.1% during the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016,
respectively.
24
Table of Contents
In January 2018, we announced plans to expand our butane isomerization facility by up to 30 MBPD of incremental capacity.  The
expansion is supported by long-term agreements to provide butane isomerization, storage and related pipeline services.  We
currently expect this project to be completed during the fourth quarter of 2021.
Octane enhancement and related operations
We own and operate an octane enhancement production facility located at our Mont Belvieu complex that is designed to produce
isobutylene and either isooctane or methyl tertiary butyl ether (“MTBE”).  The products produced by this facility are used by
refiners to increase octane values in reformulated motor gasoline blends.  The high-purity isobutane feedstocks consumed in the
production of these products are supplied by our isomerization units.
We sell our octane enhancement products at market-based prices.  We attempt to mitigate the price risk associated with these
products by entering into commodity derivative instruments.  To the extent that we produce MTBE, it is sold exclusively into the
export market.  We measure the utilization of our octane enhancement facility in terms of its combined isooctane, isobutylene and
MTBE production volumes, which averaged 24 MBPD, 23 MBPD and 19 MBPD during the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017
and 2016, respectively.
We also own and operate a facility located on the Houston Ship Channel that produces up to 4 MBPD of HPIB and includes an
associated storage facility with 0.6 MMBbls of related product storage capacity.  The primary feedstock for this plant, an
isobutane/isobutylene mix, is produced by our octane enhancement facility.  HPIB is used in the production of polyisobutylene,
which is used in the manufacture of lubricants and rubber.  In general, we sell HPIB at market-based prices with a cost-based floor. 
On a weighted-average basis, utilization rates for this facility were 88.9%, 75.9% and 58.4% for the years ended December 31,
2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively.
The results of operations from our octane enhancement and HPIB facilities are generally dependent on the level of production
volumes and the difference, or spread, between the sales prices of the products and the associated feedstock purchase costs and
other operating expenses.
Isobutane Dehydrogenation Unit.  In January 2017, we announced plans to construct an isobutane dehydrogenation (“iBDH”) unit
at our Mont Belvieu complex that is expected to have the capability to produce 425,000 tons of isobutylene per year.  The project,
which is underwritten by long-term customer contracts, is expected to be completed in the fourth quarter of 2019.  Isobutylene
produced by the new plant will also provide additional feedstocks for our downstream octane enhancement and petrochemical
facilities.
Historically, steam crackers and refineries have been the major source of propane and butane olefins for downstream use. 
However, with the increased use of light-end feedstocks such as ethane, the need for on-purpose olefins production has increased. 
Like our PDH facility, the iBDH plant will help meet market demand where traditional supplies have been reduced.  The iBDH
plant will increase our production of high purity and low purity isobutylene, both of which are used as feedstocks to manufacture
lubricants, rubber products and alkylate for gasoline blendstocks, as well as MTBE for export.
Refined products services
Our refined products services business includes refined products pipelines aggregating approximately 4,100 miles, terminals and
associated marketing activities.
Refined products pipelines.  We own and operate the TE Products Pipeline, which is a 3,278-mile pipeline system comprised of
2,953 miles of regulated interstate pipelines and 325 miles of unregulated intrastate Texas pipelines.  The system primarily
transports refined products from the upper Texas Gulf Coast to Seymour, Indiana. From Seymour, segments of the TE Products
Pipeline extend to Chicago, Illinois; Lima, Ohio; Selkirk, New York; and a location near Philadelphia, Pennsylvania.  East of
Seymour, Indiana, the TE Products Pipeline is primarily dedicated to NGL transportation service. The refined products transported
by the TE Products Pipeline are produced by refineries and include motor gasoline and distillates.  
25
Table of Contents
The results of operations for this pipeline system are dependent upon the volume of products transported and the level of fees
charged to shippers.  The tariffs charged for such services are either contractual or regulated by governmental agencies, including
the FERC. See “Regulatory Matters” within this Part I, Items 1 and 2 discussion for additional information regarding governmental
oversight of our liquids pipelines, including tariffs charged for transportation services.
The maximum number of barrels per day that our TE Products Pipeline can transport depends on the operating balance achieved at
a given point in time between various segments of the system (e.g., demand levels at each delivery point and the mix of products
being transported).  As a result, we measure the utilization rate of this pipeline in terms of throughput.  Aggregate throughput
volumes by product type for the TE Products Pipeline were as follows for the years indicated:
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Refined products transportation (MBPD)   456   456   474 
Petrochemical transportation (MBPD)   148   156   164 
NGL transportation (MBPD)   71   57   55 
The TE Products Pipeline system includes five non-regulated refined products truck terminals and 18.5 MMBbls of aggregate
storage capacity.
We also own a 50% equity interest in the Centennial Pipeline, which is a 795-mile refined products pipeline that extends from
Beaumont, Texas to Bourbon, Illinois.  The Centennial Pipeline includes a refined products storage terminal located near Creal
Springs, Illinois with a gross storage capacity of 2.3 MMBbls (1.2 MMBbls net to our ownership interest).  Although the
Centennial Pipeline is currently idle, we continue to evaluate potential projects with our joint venture partner that could repurpose
the line.
Refined products marine terminals.  We own and operate marine terminals located on the Neches River near Beaumont, Texas that
handle refined products along with crude oil. Our Beaumont facilities include five deep-water ship docks, three barge docks and
access to approximately 7.8 MMBbls of aggregate refined products storage capacity.
We also handle refined products at EHT on the Houston Ship Channel.  In addition to providing vessel loading and unloading
services for refined products, EHT’s refined products operations include 2.0 MMBbls of aggregate storage capacity through the use
of 24 above-ground storage tanks.
The results of operations for these marine terminals are primarily dependent upon the volume handled and the associated storage
and other fees we charge.
Refined products marketing activities.  Our refined products marketing activities generate revenues from the sale and delivery of
refined products obtained on the open market.  The results of operations from our refined products marketing activities are
primarily dependent upon the difference, or spread, between product sales prices and the associated purchase and other costs,
including those costs attributable to the use of our other assets.  In general, we sell our refined products at market-based prices,
which may include pricing differentials for factors such as grade and delivery location.  We use derivative instruments to mitigate
our exposure to commodity price risks associated with our refined products marketing activities.  For a discussion of our
commodity hedging program, see Part II, Item 7A of this annual report.
Marine transportation
Our marine transportation business consists of 64 tow boats and 148 tank barges used to transport refined products, crude oil,
asphalt, condensate, heavy fuel oil, LPG and other petroleum products along key U.S. inland and intracoastal waterway systems. 
The marine transportation industry uses tow boats as power sources and tank barges for freight capacity. Our marine transportation
assets serve refinery and storage terminal customers along the Mississippi River, the intracoastal waterway between Texas and
Florida and the Tennessee-Tombigbee Waterway system.  We own and operate shipyard and repair facilities located in Houma and
Morgan City, Louisiana and marine fleeting facilities located in Bourg, Louisiana and Channelview, Texas.
26
Table of Contents
The results of operations of our marine transportation business are generally dependent upon the level of fees charged (e.g., set day
rates or fee per cargo movement) to transport petroleum products.
Our fleet of marine vessels operated at an average utilization rate of 93.5%, 86.3% and 85.2% during the years ended December 31,
2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively.
Our marine transportation business is subject to regulation, including by the U.S. Department of Transportation (“DOT”),
Department of Homeland Security, U.S. Department of Commerce and the U.S. Coast Guard (“USCG”).  For information
regarding these regulations, see “Regulatory Matters – Federal Regulation of Marine Operations,” within this Part I, Items 1 and 2
discussion.
Ethylene export terminal and related operations
We are constructing an ethylene export terminal located at Morgan’s Point on the Houston Ship Channel. When completed, the
terminal, which we will operate, is expected to have an export capacity of approximately 2.2 billion pounds of ethylene per year,
with loading rates of 2.2 million pounds per hour, and feature on-site refrigerated storage for 66 million pounds of ethylene. The
project, which is underwritten by long-term customer commitments, is expected to begin limited commercial service in the fourth
quarter of 2019, with full operations expected in the fourth quarter of 2020 once certain refrigeration assets are complete.  We own
a 50% equity interest in Enterprise Navigator Ethylene Terminal LLC, which owns the export facility.
In the second quarter of 2019, we expect to complete a project at our Mont Belvieu storage complex that repurposes a large, high-
capacity ethane storage well into ethylene service.  The new 5.3 MMBbl ethylene storage cavern will feature an
injection/withdrawal rate of approximately 210,000 pounds per hour (or approximately 2,000 barrels per hour) and be expandable
to 420,000 pounds per hour (or approximately 4,000 barrels per hour).  There are eight third party ethylene pipelines within a half-
mile of the new high-capacity well, which provides us with significant connection opportunities.
In further support of our ethylene capabilities, we are building a 24-mile ethylene pipeline extending from our Mont Belvieu
complex to Bayport, Texas. The new pipeline will have the potential to connect both producing and consuming customers located
south of the Houston Ship Channel to our ethylene storage facility in Mont Belvieu.  The pipeline between our Mont Belvieu
complex and Morgan’s Point terminal is expected to be completed in 2019, with the remaining sections completed in 2020.
Regulatory Matters
The following information describes the principal effects of regulation on our operations, including those regulations involving
safety and environmental matters and the rates we charge customers for transportation services.
Environmental, Safety and Conservation
The safe operation of our pipelines and other assets is a top priority.  We are committed to protecting the environment and the
health and safety of the public and those working on our behalf by conducting our business activities in a safe and environmentally
responsible manner.
Occupational Safety and Health
Certain of our facilities are subject to general industry requirements of the Federal Occupational Safety and Health Act, as amended
(“OSHA”), and comparable state statutes.  We believe we are in material compliance with OSHA and similar state requirements,
including general industry standards, record keeping requirements and monitoring of occupational exposures of employees.
Certain of our facilities are also subject to OSHA Process Safety Management (“PSM”) regulations, which are designed to prevent
or minimize the consequences of catastrophic releases of toxic, reactive, flammable or explosive chemicals.  These regulations
apply to any process involving certain chemicals, flammable gases or liquids at or above a specified threshold (as defined in the
regulations).  In addition, we are subject to  Risk Management Plan regulations of the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency
(“EPA”) at certain facilities.  These regulations are intended to complement the OSHA PSM regulations.  These EPA regulations
require us to develop and implement a risk
27
Table of Contents
management program that includes a five-year accident history report, an offsite consequence analysis process, a prevention
program and an emergency response program.  We believe we are operating in material compliance with the OSHA PSM
regulations and the EPA’s Risk Management Plan requirements.
The OSHA hazard communication standard, the community right-to-know regulations under Title III of the federal Superfund
Amendment and Reauthorization Act, and comparable state statutes require us to organize and disclose information about the
hazardous materials used in our operations.  Certain parts of this information must be reported to federal, state and local
governmental authorities and local citizens upon request.  These laws and provisions of the Comprehensive Environmental
Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (“CERCLA”) require us to report spills and releases of hazardous chemicals in certain
situations.
Pipeline Safety
We are subject to extensive regulation by the DOT as authorized under various provisions of Title 49 of the United States Code and
comparable state statutes relating to the design, installation, testing, construction, operation, replacement and management of our
pipeline facilities.  These statutes require companies that own or operate pipelines to (i) comply with such regulations, (ii) permit
access to and copying of pertinent records, (iii) file certain reports and (iv) provide information as required by the U.S. Secretary of
Transportation.  The DOT regulates natural gas and hazardous liquids pipelines through its Pipeline and Hazardous Materials
Safety Administration (“PHMSA”).  We believe we are in material compliance with DOT regulations.
We are also subject to DOT pipeline integrity management regulations that specify how companies should assess, evaluate, validate
and maintain the integrity of pipeline segments that, in the event of a release, could impact High Consequence Areas (“HCAs”). 
HCAs include populated areas, unusually sensitive areas and commercially navigable waterways.  These regulations require the
development and implementation of an integrity management program that utilizes internal pipeline inspection techniques, pressure
testing or other equally effective means to assess the integrity of pipeline segments in HCAs.  These regulations also require
periodic review of pipeline segments in HCAs to ensure that adequate preventative and mitigative measures exist and that
companies take prompt action to address integrity issues raised in the assessment and analysis process.  We have identified our
pipeline segments in HCAs and developed an appropriate integrity management program for such assets.
The Pipeline Safety, Regulatory Certainty, and Job Creation Act of 2011 (the “Pipeline Safety Act”) provides for regulatory
oversight of the nation’s pipelines, penalties for violations of pipeline safety rules, and other DOT matters.  The Pipeline Safety Act
currently provides for penalties involving non-compliance with DOT regulations of $0.2 million for a single violation and a
maximum fine for the most serious pipeline safety violations (e.g., those violations resulting in deaths, injuries or major
environmental harm) of $2.1 million per incident.   In addition, the Pipeline Safety Act includes additional safety requirements for
newly constructed pipelines.
In June 2016, the “Securing America’s Future Energy:  Protecting our Infrastructure of Pipelines and Enhancing Safety Act of
2016” (the “SAFE PIPES Act”) was signed into law. The SAFE PIPES Act extends the PHMSA’s statutory mandate through 2019
and establishes or continues the development of requirements affecting pipeline safety including, but not limited to, the following:
(i) providing the PHMSA with additional authority to address imminent hazards by imposing emergency restrictions, prohibitions
and safety measures on owners and operators of gas or hazardous liquid pipeline facilities, without prior notice or an opportunity
for a hearing; (ii) obligating the PHMSA to develop safety standards for natural gas storage facilities; and (iii) requiring the
PHMSA to complete certain of the outstanding mandates under existing legislation and to report to Congress on the status of
overdue rulemakings.
DOT regulations have incorporated by reference American Petroleum Institute Standard 653 (“API 653”) as the industry standard
for the inspection, repair, alteration and reconstruction of above-ground storage tanks. API 653 requires that above-ground storage
tanks undergo regularly scheduled maintenance, which may result in significant and unanticipated expenditures for repairs or
upgrades that are deemed necessary to ensure the continued safe and reliable operation of such tanks.
PHMSA has issued proposed new or revised regulations under either the Pipeline Safety Act or the SAFE PIPES Act that may
impact our pipelines. The proposed new or revised regulations for hazardous liquid pipelines include: (i) extending the reporting
requirements to all hazardous liquid gravity and gathering lines; (ii) requiring inspections of pipelines in areas affected by extreme
weather; (iii) requiring periodic inline integrity assessments of hazardous liquid
28
Table of Contents
pipelines in all locations; (iv) modifying the provisions for making pipeline repairs; (v) requiring all pipelines subject to integrity
management requirements be capable of accommodating inline inspection tools within 20 years, with certain exceptions; and (vi)
clarifying of other regulations to improve compliance.  The notice regarding these regulations was issued in October 2015 and the
final rule remains pending.
In March 2016, the PHMSA issued proposed new safety regulations for natural gas transmission pipelines that broaden the scope of
safety coverage in several ways, including but not limited to: (i) modifying the regulation of gathering lines by eliminating the
exemption from reporting requirements for gas gathering line operators and revising the definition for gathering lines; (ii) adding
new assessment and revising repair criteria for pipeline segments in HCAs and establishing repair criteria for pipelines that are
outside of HCAs; (iii) expanding the scope of the regulations to include pipelines located in areas of Medium Consequence Areas
(“MCAs”); (iv) adding a requirement to test pipelines built before 1970, which are currently exempt from certain pipeline safety
requirements; (v) modifying the way that pipeline operators secure and inspect transmission pipeline infrastructure following
extreme weather events; (vi) clarifying requirements for conducting risk assessment associated with integrity management
activities; (vii) expanding mandatory data collection and integration requirements associated with integrity management activities,
including data validation; (viii) requiring new safety features for pipeline “pig” launchers and receivers; and (ix) requiring a
systematic approach to verify a pipeline’s maximum allowable operating pressure and requiring operators to report maximum
allowable operating pressure exceedances.  A final rule regarding these proposals remains pending.
PHMSA has also issued a final rule, which became effective in January 2019, that amends pipeline safety regulations covering the
types, design, and installation of plastic materials that can be used to transport natural gas. The new rule permits the use of PVC
pipe, adopts a variety of applicable industry standards, and revises regulations related to storage and handling, component design,
valve design, standard fittings, and pipe testing associated with the use of plastic pipe.
In response to the SAFE PIPES Act, PHMSA issued an interim final rule adopting federal safety regulations and reporting
requirements for underground natural gas storage facilities in December 2016.  Petitions for review of the interim final rule are
pending at the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Fifth Circuit, which is holding the proceeding in abeyance.  In June 2017, PHMSA
partially stayed enforcement of the interim rule’s new safety standards until one year after publication of the final rule.
The development and/or implementation of more stringent requirements pursuant to regulations implementing all of the
requirements of the Pipeline Safety Act or the SAFE PIPES Act may result in us incurring significant and unanticipated
expenditures to comply with such standards.  Until the proposed regulations are finalized, the impact on our operations, if any, is
not known.
Environmental Matters
Our operations are subject to various environmental and safety requirements and potential liabilities under extensive federal, state
and local laws and regulations. These include, without limitation: the CERCLA; the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act
(“RCRA”); the Federal Clean Air Act (“CAA”); the Clean Water Act (“CWA”); the Oil Pollution Act of 1990 (“OPA”); the OSHA;
the Emergency Planning and Community Right to Know Act; the National Historic Preservation Act; and comparable or analogous
state and local laws and regulations.  Such laws and regulations affect many aspects of our present and future operations, and
generally require us to obtain and comply with a wide variety of environmental registrations, licenses, permits, inspections and
other approvals with respect to air emissions, water quality, wastewater discharges and solid and hazardous waste management. 
Failure to comply with these requirements may expose us to fines, penalties and/or interruptions in our operations that could have a
material adverse effect on our financial position, results of operations and cash flows.
If a leak, spill or release of hazardous substances occurs at any facilities that we own, operate or otherwise use, or where we send
materials for treatment or disposal, we could be held liable for all resulting liabilities, including investigation, remedial and clean-
up costs.  Likewise, we could be required to remove previously disposed waste products or remediate contaminated property,
including situations where groundwater has been impacted.  Any or all of these developments could have a material adverse effect
on our financial position, results of operations and cash flows.
29
Table of Contents
We believe our operations are in material compliance with existing environmental and safety laws and regulations and that our
compliance with such regulations will not have a material adverse effect on our financial position, results of operations and cash
flows.  However, environmental and safety laws and regulations are subject to change.  The trend in environmental regulation has
been to place more restrictions and limitations on activities that may be perceived to impact the environment, and thus there can be
no assurance as to the amount or timing of future expenditures for environmental regulation compliance or remediation.  New or
revised regulations that result in increased compliance costs or additional operating restrictions, particularly if those costs are not
fully recoverable from our customers, could have a material adverse effect on our financial position, results of operations and cash
flows.
On occasion, we are assessed monetary sanctions by governmental authorities related to administrative or judicial proceedings
involving environmental matters.  See Part I, Item 3 of this annual report for additional information.
Air Quality
Our operations are associated with regulated, permitted emissions of air pollutants.  As a result, we are subject to the CAA and
comparable state laws and regulations including state air quality implementation plans.  These laws and regulations regulate
emissions of air pollutants from various industrial sources, including certain of our facilities, and also impose various monitoring
and reporting requirements.  These laws and regulations may also require that we (i) obtain pre-approval for the construction or
modification of certain projects or facilities expected to produce air emissions or result in an increase in existing levels of air
emissions, (ii) obtain and strictly comply with the requirements of air permits containing various emission and operational
limitations, or (iii) utilize specific emission control technologies to limit emissions.
Increasingly, environmental groups are challenging requests to modify or renew permits and seeking to apply more stringent
provisions on applicants.  Our failure to comply with applicable requirements could subject us to monetary penalties, injunctions,
conditions or restrictions on operations, including enforcement actions, and our inability to renew or secure a needed modification
to an existing permit could adversely affect our operations.  We may also be required to incur certain capital expenditures for air
pollution control equipment in connection with obtaining and maintaining permits and approvals for air emissions.
Water Quality
The CWA and comparable state laws impose strict controls on the discharge of petroleum and its derivatives into regulated waters. 
The CWA provides penalties for any discharge of petroleum products in reportable quantities and imposes substantial potential
liability for the costs of removing petroleum or other hazardous substances.  State laws for the control of water pollution also
provide varying civil and criminal penalties and liabilities in the case of a release of petroleum or its derivatives into navigable
waters or groundwater. Federal spill prevention control and countermeasure mandates require appropriate containment berms and
similar structures to help prevent a petroleum tank release from impacting regulated waters.  The EPA has also adopted regulations
that require us to have permits in order to discharge certain storm water run-off.  Storm water discharge permits may also be
required by certain states in which we operate and may impose monitoring and other requirements.  The CWA prohibits discharges
of dredged and fill material in wetlands and other waters of the U.S. unless authorized by an appropriately issued permit.  We
believe that our costs of compliance with these CWA requirements will not have a material adverse effect on our financial position,
results of operations and cash flows.
The primary federal law for crude oil spill liability is the OPA, which addresses three principal areas of crude oil pollution:
prevention, containment and clean-up, and liability.  The OPA applies to vessels, deepwater ports, offshore production platforms
and onshore facilities, including terminals, pipelines and transfer facilities.  In order to handle, store or transport crude oil above
certain thresholds, onshore facilities are required to file oil spill response plans with the USCG, the DOT’s Office of Pipeline Safety
(“OPS”) or the EPA, as appropriate.  Numerous states have enacted laws similar to the OPA.  Under the OPA and similar state laws,
responsible parties for a regulated facility from which crude oil is discharged may be liable for remediation costs, including damage
to surrounding natural resources.  Any unpermitted release of petroleum or other pollutants from our pipelines or facilities could
result in fines or penalties as well as significant remediation costs.
30
Table of Contents
Contamination resulting from spills or releases of petroleum products is an inherent risk within the pipeline industry.  To the extent
that groundwater contamination requiring remediation exists along our pipeline systems or other facilities as a result of historical
operations, we believe any such contamination could be controlled or remedied; however, such costs are site specific and there is
no assurance that the impact will not be material in the aggregate.
Environmental groups have instituted lawsuits regarding certain nationwide permits issued by the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers.
These permits allow for streamlined permitting of pipeline projects.  If these lawsuits are successful, timelines for future pipeline
construction projects could be adversely impacted.
Disposal of Hazardous and Non-Hazardous Wastes
In our normal operations, we generate hazardous and non-hazardous solid wastes that are subject to requirements of the federal
RCRA and comparable state statutes, which impose detailed requirements for the handling, storage, treatment and disposal of solid
waste.  We also utilize waste minimization and recycling processes to reduce the volumes of our solid wastes.
CERCLA, also known as “Superfund,” imposes liability, often without regard to fault or the legality of the original act, on certain
classes of persons who contributed to the release of a “hazardous substance” into the environment.  These persons include the
owner or operator of a facility where a release occurred and companies that disposed or arranged for the disposal of hazardous
substances found at a facility.  Under CERCLA, responsible parties may be subject to joint and several liability for the costs of
cleaning up the hazardous substances that have been released into the environment, for damages to natural resources and for the
costs of certain health studies.  CERCLA and RCRA also authorize the EPA and, in some instances, third parties to take actions in
response to threats to the public health or the environment and to seek to recover the costs they incur from the responsible parties. 
It is not uncommon for neighboring landowners and other third parties to file claims for personal injury and property damage
allegedly caused by hazardous substances or other pollutants released into the environment.  In the course of our ordinary
operations, our pipeline systems and other facilities generate wastes that may fall within CERCLA’s definition of a “hazardous
substance” or be subject to CERCLA and RCRA remediation requirements.  It is possible that we could incur liability for
remediation, or reimbursement of remediation costs, under CERCLA or RCRA for remediation at sites we currently own or
operate, whether as a result of our or our predecessors’ operations, at sites that we previously owned or operated, or at disposal
facilities previously used by us, even if such disposal was legal at the time it was undertaken.
Endangered Species
The federal Endangered Species Act, as amended, and comparable state laws, may restrict commercial or other activities that affect
endangered and threatened species or their habitats.  Some of our current or future planned facilities may be located in areas that
are designated as a habitat for endangered or threatened species and, if so, may limit or impose increased costs on facility
construction or operation.  In addition, the designation of previously unidentified endangered or threatened species could cause us
to incur additional costs or become subject to operating restrictions or bans in the affected areas.
FERC Regulation – Liquids Pipelines
Certain of our NGL, refined products and crude oil pipeline systems have interstate common carrier movements subject to
regulation by the FERC under the Interstate Commerce Act (“ICA”).  Pipelines providing such movements (referred to as
“interstate liquids pipelines”) include, but are not limited to, the following: ATEX, Aegis, Dixie Pipeline, TE Products Pipeline,
Front Range Pipeline, Mid-America Pipeline System, Seaway Pipeline, Seminole NGL Pipeline and Texas Express Pipeline.  These
pipelines are owned by legal entities whose movements are subject to FERC regulation, including periodic reporting requirements. 
For example, ATEX, Aegis and the TE Products Pipeline are owned by Enterprise TE Products Pipeline Company LLC
(“Enterprise TE”), which provides FERC-regulated movements.
31
Table of Contents
The ICA prescribes that the rates we charge for transportation on these interstate liquids pipelines must be just and reasonable, and
that the rules applied to our services not unduly discriminate against or confer any undue preference upon any shipper. The FERC
regulations implementing the ICA further require that interstate liquids pipeline transportation rates and rules be filed with the
FERC.  The ICA permits interested persons to challenge proposed new or changed rates or rules, and authorizes the FERC to
investigate such changes and to suspend their effectiveness for a period of up to seven months.  Upon completion of such an
investigation, the FERC may require refunds of amounts collected above what it finds to be a just and reasonable level, together
with interest.  The FERC may also investigate, upon complaint or on its own motion, rates and related rules that are already in
effect, and may order a carrier to change them prospectively.  Upon an appropriate showing, a shipper may obtain reparations
(including interest) for damages sustained for a period of up to two years prior to the filing of its complaint.
The rates charged for our interstate liquids pipeline services are generally based on a FERC-approved indexing methodology, which
allows a pipeline to charge rates up to a prescribed ceiling that changes annually based on the year-to-year change in the U.S.
Producer Price Index for Finished Goods (“PPI”).  A rate increase within the indexed rate ceiling is presumed to be just and
reasonable unless a protesting party can demonstrate that the rate increase is substantially in excess of the pipeline’s operating
costs.  For the five-year period ending June 30, 2021, we are permitted to adjust the indexed rate ceiling annually by PPI plus
1.23%.  In any year in which the index is negative due to a decline in the PPI, a pipeline must file to lower its rates if they
otherwise would be above the indexed rate ceiling.  Otherwise, a pipeline is permitted to increase its rates to the new ceiling.  As an
alternative to this indexing methodology, we may also choose to support changes in our rates based on a cost-of-service
methodology, by obtaining advance approval to charge “market-based rates,” or by charging “settlement rates” agreed to by all
affected shippers.
In December 2014, Seaway submitted an application requesting market-based rate setting authority. Certain parties filed protests to
the application.  In September 2015, the FERC issued an order setting the matter for hearing. In December 2016, an administrative
law judge issued an initial decision in the market-based rate proceeding (“2016 Initial Decision”) finding that the FERC should
grant Seaway’s application for market-based rates.  In May 2018, the FERC issued an order affirming the initial decision’s finding
that Seaway lacks market power in the applicable markets, thereby granting Seaway market-based rate authority.
In October 2016, the FERC sought comments regarding potential modifications to its policies for evaluating changes in oil pipeline
indexed rates and the associated reporting requirements. The FERC observed that some pipelines continue to obtain additional
index rate increases despite reporting on Form No. 6 that their revenues exceed their costs. The FERC is proposing a new policy
that would deny proposed index increases if a pipeline’s Form No. 6 reflects (i) revenues that exceed the total cost-of-service by
15% for the two preceding years or (ii) the proposed increase in the rate index exceeds the percentage change in the pipeline’s
annual costs by 5%. The FERC is also considering requiring pipelines to file additional information for crude and refined product
pipelines, non-contiguous systems and major pipeline systems.  Comments on these proposals were filed with the FERC through
March 2017; however, the FERC has taken no position at this time and we are unable to predict the outcome of this proceeding.
In March 2018, the FERC issued a Revised Policy Statement on the Treatment of Income Taxes (the “Revised Policy”). The
Revised Policy reversed a 13-year old policy that permitted a pipeline owned by a master limited partnership (“MLP”) to recover
an income tax allowance (“ITA”) in its cost-of-service rates, if it could demonstrate that the ultimate owners of the pipeline (i.e., the
unitholders of the MLP) have an actual or potential income tax liability. In July 2018, the FERC, in an Order on Rehearing, decided
to provide pipeline MLPs the opportunity to argue for inclusion of an ITA in cost-of-service rates on a case-by-case basis, as
opposed to having no opportunity to recover an ITA. Two third parties filed petitions for review of the Revised Policy and Order on
Rehearing in the D.C. Circuit in September 2018.  We are unable to predict the outcome of these pending petitions for review.
32
Table of Contents
The Revised Policy and Order on Rehearing do not impact oil and liquids pipelines with market-based rate authority, or those that
charge “settlement rates,” and have no immediate effect on oil and liquid pipelines with rates set using the indexing methodology,
given that the current index will remain in effect through June 30, 2021. However, following issuance of the Revised Policy, the
FERC now requires oil and liquids pipelines owned by MLPs to remove the ITA from their cost-of-service reporting in FERC Form
No. 6.  The FERC has stated that it will incorporate the effects of this change when it commences its next five-year review of the
oil pipeline index in 2020, for rates that will take effect on July 1, 2021.  The FERC has not yet commenced this proceeding and we
are unable predict the outcome at this time.
Changes in the FERC’s methodologies for approving rates could adversely affect us.  In addition, challenges to our regulated rates
could be filed with the FERC and future decisions by the FERC regarding our regulated rates could adversely affect our cash
flows.  We believe the transportation rates currently charged by our interstate liquids pipelines are in accordance with the ICA and
applicable FERC regulations.  However, we cannot predict the rates we will be allowed to charge in the future for transportation
services by such pipelines.
FERC Regulation – Natural Gas Pipelines and Related Matters
Certain of our intrastate natural gas pipelines, including the Texas Intrastate System and Acadian Gas System, are subject to
regulation by the FERC under the Natural Gas Policy Act of 1978 (“NGPA”), in connection with the transportation and storage
services they provide pursuant to Section 311 of the NGPA.  Under Section 311, along with the FERC’s implementing regulations,
an intrastate pipeline may transport gas “on behalf of” an interstate pipeline company or any local distribution company served by
an interstate pipeline, without becoming subject to the FERC’s broader regulatory authority under the Natural Gas Act of 1938
(“NGA”).  These services must be provided on an open and nondiscriminatory basis, and the rates charged for these services may
not exceed a “fair and equitable” level as determined by the FERC in periodic rate proceedings.
In July 2018, the FERC issued a final rule to address the impact of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act on cost-of-service rates for
jurisdictional natural gas pipelines.  The final rule primarily impacts interstate pipelines regulated under the NGA.  With respect to
intrastate pipelines regulated by the FERC under the NGPA, the rule requires an intrastate pipeline with rates on file with a state
regulatory agency to file with the FERC a new rate election for its interstate rates if the state rates are reduced to reflect the reduced
income tax rates adopted in the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act.  As of the date of this report, we have not been required to refile the rates for
our intrastate systems as a result of this rule.
We believe that the transportation rates currently charged and the services performed by our natural gas pipelines are all in
accordance with the applicable requirements of the NGPA and FERC regulations.  However, we cannot predict the rates we will be
allowed to charge in the future for transportation services by our pipelines.
The resale of natural gas in interstate commerce is subject to FERC oversight.  In order to increase transparency in natural gas
markets, the FERC has established rules requiring the annual reporting of data regarding natural gas sales.  The FERC has also
established regulations that prohibit manipulation of energy markets.  The Federal Trade Commission and the Commodity Futures
Trading Commission (“CFTC”) have also issued rules and regulations prohibiting energy market manipulation.  We believe that our
natural gas sales activities are in compliance with all applicable regulatory requirements.
A violation of the FERC’s regulations may subject us to civil penalties, suspension or loss of authorization to perform services or
make sales of natural gas, disgorgement of unjust profits or other appropriate non-monetary remedies imposed by the FERC. 
Pursuant to the Energy Policy Act of 2005, the potential civil and criminal penalties for any violation of the NGPA, or any rules,
regulations or orders of the FERC, were $1.2 million per day per violation as of January 2018.
33
Table of Contents
State Regulation of Pipeline Transportation Services
Transportation services rendered by our intrastate liquids and natural gas pipelines are subject to regulation in many states,
including Alabama, Colorado, Illinois, Kansas, Louisiana, Minnesota, Mississippi, New Mexico, Oklahoma, Texas and Wyoming. 
Although the applicable state statutes and regulations vary widely, they generally require that intrastate pipelines publish tariffs
setting forth all rates, rules and regulations applying to intrastate service, and generally require that pipeline rates and practices be
reasonable and nondiscriminatory.
Federal Regulation of Marine Operations
The operation of tow boats, barges and marine equipment create obligations involving property, personnel and cargo under General
Maritime Law.  These obligations create a variety of risks including, among other things, the risk of collision and allision, which
may precipitate claims for personal injury, cargo, contract, pollution, third party claims and property damages to vessels and
facilities.
We are subject to the Jones Act and other federal laws that restrict maritime transportation between U.S. departure and destination
points to vessels built and registered in the U.S. and owned and manned by U.S. citizens.  As a result of this ownership
requirement, we are responsible for monitoring the foreign ownership of our common units and other partnership interests.  If we
do not comply with such requirements, we would be prohibited from operating our vessels in U.S. coastwise trade, and under
certain circumstances we would be deemed to have undertaken an unapproved foreign transfer, resulting in severe penalties,
including permanent loss of U.S. coastwise trading rights for our vessels, fines or forfeiture of the vessels.  In addition, the USCG
and American Bureau of Shipping maintain the most stringent regime of vessel inspection in the world, which tends to result in
higher regulatory compliance costs for U.S.-flagged operators than for owners of vessels registered under foreign flags of
convenience.  Our marine operations are also subject to the Merchant Marine Act of 1936, which under certain conditions would
allow the U.S. government to requisition our marine assets in the event of a national emergency.
Climate Change Debate
There is considerable debate over climate change and the environmental effects of greenhouse gas emissions and their associated
consequences on global climate, oceans and ecosystems.  As a commercial enterprise, we are not in a position to validate or
repudiate the existence of global warming or various aspects of the scientific debate.  However, if global warming is occurring, it
could have a long-term impact on our operations.  For example, our facilities that are located in low lying areas such as the coastal
regions of Louisiana and Texas may be at increased risk due to flooding, rising sea levels, or disruption of operations from more
frequent and severe weather events.  Facilities in areas with limited water availability may be impacted if droughts become more
frequent or severe.  Changes in climate or weather may hinder exploration and production activities or increase the cost of
production of oil and gas resources and consequently affect the volume of hydrocarbon products entering our system.  Changes in
climate or weather may also affect consumer demand for energy or alter the overall energy mix.
In response to scientific studies suggesting that emissions of certain gases, commonly referred to as greenhouse gases, including
gases associated with oil and natural gas production such as carbon dioxide, methane and nitrous oxide among others, may be
contributing to a warming of the earth’s atmosphere and other adverse environmental effects, various governmental authorities have
considered or taken actions to reduce emissions of greenhouse gases.  For example, the EPA has taken action under the CAA to
regulate greenhouse gas emissions.  In addition, certain states (individually or in regional cooperation), including states in which
some of our facilities or operations are located, have taken or proposed measures to reduce emissions of greenhouse gases. Also,
the U.S. Congress has proposed legislative measures for imposing restrictions or requiring emissions fees for greenhouse gases.
Actions have also taken place at the international level, with the U.S. being involved.  Various policies and approaches, including
establishing a cap on emissions, requiring efficiency measures, or providing incentives for pollution reduction, use of renewable
energy, or use of fuels with lower carbon content are under discussion and have and may continue to result in additional actions
involving greenhouse gases.
34
Table of Contents
These federal, regional and state measures generally apply to industrial sources (including facilities in the oil and gas sector) and
suppliers and distributors of fuel, and could increase the operating and compliance costs of our pipelines, natural gas processing
plants, fractionation plants and other facilities, and the costs of certain sale and distribution activities.  These regulations could also
adversely affect market demand and pricing for products handled by our midstream network, by affecting the price of, or reducing
the demand for, fossil fuels or providing competitive advantages to competing fuels and energy sources.  The potential increase in
the costs of our operations could include costs to operate and maintain our facilities, install new emission controls on our facilities,
acquire allowances to authorize our greenhouse gas emissions, pay taxes related to our greenhouse gas emissions, or administer and
manage a greenhouse gas emissions program.  While we may be able to include some or all of such increased costs in the rates
charged by our pipelines or other facilities, such recovery of costs is uncertain and may depend on events beyond our control,
including the outcome of future rate proceedings before the FERC and the provisions of any final regulations.  In addition, changes
in regulatory policies that result in a reduction in the demand for hydrocarbon products that are deemed to contribute to greenhouse
gases, or restrictions on their use, may reduce volumes available to us for processing, transportation, marketing and storage.
Competition
NGL Pipelines & Services
Within their respective market areas, our natural gas processing plants and related NGL marketing activities encounter competition
primarily from independent processors, major integrated oil companies, and financial institutions with commodity trading
platforms.  Each of our marketing competitors has varying levels of financial and personnel resources, and competition generally
revolves around price, quality of customer service and proximity to customers and other market hubs.  In the markets served by our
NGL pipelines, we compete with a number of intrastate and interstate pipeline companies (including those affiliated with major oil,
petrochemical and natural gas companies) and barge, rail and truck fleet operations.  In general, our NGL pipelines compete with
these entities in terms of transportation fees, reliability and quality of customer service.
Our primary competitors in the NGL and related product storage business are major integrated oil companies, chemical companies
and other storage and pipeline companies.  We compete with other storage service providers primarily in terms of the fees charged,
number of pipeline connections provided and operational dependability.  Our export terminal operations compete with those
operated by major oil and gas and chemical companies and other midstream service providers primarily in terms of loading and
offloading throughput capacity and access to related pipeline and storage infrastructure.
We compete with a number of NGL fractionators in Kansas, Louisiana, New Mexico and Texas.  Competition for such services is
primarily based on the fractionation fee charged.  However, the ability of an NGL fractionator to receive a customer’s mixed NGLs
and store and distribute the resulting purity NGL products is also an important competitive factor and is a function of having the
necessary pipeline and storage infrastructure.
Crude Oil Pipelines & Services
Within their respective market areas, our crude oil pipelines, storage terminals and related marketing activities compete with other
crude oil pipeline companies, rail carriers, major integrated oil companies and their marketing affiliates, financial institutions with
commodity trading platforms and independent crude oil gathering and marketing companies.  The crude oil business can be
characterized by intense competition for supplies of crude oil at the wellhead.  Competition is based primarily on quality of
customer service, competitive pricing and proximity to customers and market hubs.
35
Table of Contents
Natural Gas Pipelines & Services
In our natural gas gathering business, we encounter competition in obtaining contracts to gather natural gas supplies, particularly
new supplies.  Competition in natural gas gathering is based in large part on reputation, efficiency, system reliability, gathering
system capacity and pricing arrangements.  Our key competitors in the natural gas gathering business include independent gas
gatherers and major integrated energy companies.  Our natural gas marketing activities compete primarily with other natural gas
pipeline companies and their marketing affiliates as well as standalone natural gas marketing and trading firms.  Competition in the
natural gas marketing business is based primarily on competitive pricing, proximity to customers and market hubs, and quality of
customer service.
Petrochemical & Refined Products Services
We compete with numerous producers of PGP, which include many of the major refiners and petrochemical companies located
along the Gulf Coast, in terms of the level of toll processing fees charged and access to pipeline and storage infrastructure.  Our
petrochemical marketing activities encounter competition from major integrated oil companies and various petrochemical
companies that have varying levels of financial and personnel resources and competition generally revolves around product price,
quality of customer service, logistics and location.
With respect to our isomerization operations, we compete primarily with facilities located in Kansas, Louisiana and New Mexico. 
Competitive factors affecting this business include the level of toll processing fees charged, the quality of isobutane that can be
produced and access to supporting pipeline and storage infrastructure.  We compete with other octane additive manufacturing
companies primarily on the basis of price.
With respect to our TE Products Pipeline, the pipeline’s most significant competitors are third party pipelines in the areas where it
delivers products.  Competition among common carrier pipelines is based primarily on transportation fees, quality of customer
service and proximity to end users. Trucks, barges and railroads competitively deliver products into some of the markets served by
our TE Products Pipeline and river terminals.  The TE Products Pipeline also faces competition from rail and pipeline movements
of NGLs from Canada and waterborne imports into terminals located along the upper East Coast.
Our marine transportation business competes with other inland marine transportation companies as well as providers of other
modes of transportation, such as rail tank cars, tractor-trailer tank trucks and, to a limited extent, pipelines.  Competition within the
marine transportation business is largely based on performance and price. Also, substantial new construction of inland marine
vessels could create an oversupply and intensify competition for our marine transportation business. 
For a discussion of the general risks involving competition, see “We face competition from third parties in our midstream energy
business” under Part I, Item 1A  of this annual report.
Seasonality
Although the majority of our businesses are not materially affected by seasonality, certain aspects of our operations are impacted by
seasonal changes such as tropical weather events, energy demand in connection with heating and cooling requirements and for the
summer driving season.  Examples include:
§Our operations along the Gulf Coast, including those at our Mont Belvieu complex, may be affected by weather events such as
hurricanes and tropical storms, which generally arise during the summer and fall months.
§Residential demand for natural gas typically peaks during the winter months in connection with heating needs and during the
summer months for power generation for air conditioning. These seasonal trends affect throughput volumes on our natural gas
pipelines and associated natural gas storage levels and marketing results.
§Due to increased demand for fuel additives used in the production of motor gasoline, our isomerization and octane
enhancement businesses experience higher levels of demand during the summer driving season, which typically occurs in the
spring and summer months.  Likewise, shipments of refined products and normal butane experience similar changes in demand
due to their use in motor fuels.
36
Table of Contents
§Extreme temperatures and ice during the winter months can negatively affect our trucking and inland marine operations on the
upper Mississippi and Illinois rivers.
Title to Properties
Our real property holdings fall into two basic categories: (i) parcels that we and our unconsolidated affiliates own in fee (e.g., we
own the land upon which our Mont Belvieu complex is constructed) and (ii) parcels in which our interests and those of our
affiliates are derived from leases, easements, rights-of-way, permits or licenses from landowners or governmental authorities
permitting the use of such land for our operations.  The fee sites upon which our significant facilities are located have been owned
by us or our predecessors in title for many years without any material challenge known to us relating to title to the land upon which
the assets are located, and we believe that we have satisfactory title to such fee sites.  We and our affiliates have no knowledge of
any material challenge to the underlying fee title of any material lease, easement, right-of-way, permit or license held by us or to
our rights pursuant to any material lease, easement, right-of-way, permit or license, and we believe that we have satisfactory rights
pursuant to all of our material leases, easements, rights-of-way, permits and licenses.
Available Information
As a publicly traded partnership, we electronically file certain documents with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission
(“SEC”).  We file annual reports on Form 10-K; quarterly reports on Form 10-Q; and current reports on Form 8-K (as appropriate);
along with any related amendments and supplements thereto.  Occasionally, we may also file registration statements and related
documents in connection with equity or debt offerings.  The SEC maintains a website at www.sec.gov that contains reports and
other information regarding registrants that file electronically with the SEC.
We provide free electronic access to our periodic and current reports on our website, www.enterpriseproducts.com.  These reports
are available as soon as reasonably practicable after we electronically file such materials with, or furnish such materials to, the
SEC.  You may also contact our Investor Relations department at (866) 230-0745 for paper copies of these reports free of charge. 
The information found on our website is not incorporated into this annual report.
37
Table of Contents
ITEM 1A.  RISK FACTORS.
An investment in our common units or debt securities involves certain risks.  If any of the following key risks were to occur, it
could have a material adverse effect on our financial position, results of operations and cash flows, as well as our ability to maintain
or increase distribution levels.  In any such circumstance and others described below, the trading price of our securities could
decline and you could lose part or all of your investment.
Risks Relating to Our Business
Changes in demand for and prices and production of hydrocarbon products could have a material adverse effect
on our financial position, results of operations and cash flows.
We operate predominantly in the midstream energy industry, which includes gathering, transporting, processing, fractionating and
storing natural gas, NGLs, crude oil, petrochemical and refined products.  As such, changes in the prices of hydrocarbon products
and in the relative price levels among hydrocarbon products could have a material adverse effect on our financial position, results
of operations and cash flows.  Changes in prices may impact demand for hydrocarbon products, which in turn may impact
production, demand and the volumes of products for which we provide services.  In addition, decreases in demand may be caused
by other factors, including prevailing economic conditions, reduced demand by consumers for the end products made with
hydrocarbon products, increased competition, adverse weather conditions and government regulations affecting prices and
production levels.  We may also incur credit and price risk to the extent customers do not fulfill their obligations to us in connection
with our marketing of natural gas, NGLs, propylene, refined products and/or crude oil and long-term take-or-pay agreements.
Crude oil and natural gas prices have been volatile in recent years.  For example, crude oil prices (based on WTI as measured by
the NYMEX) ranged from a high of $76.41 per barrel to a low of $26.21 per barrel in the three year period ending December 31,
2018.  Likewise, natural gas prices (based on Henry Hub as measured by the NYMEX) ranged from a high of $4.84 per MMBtu to
a low of $1.64 per MMBtu over the same three-year period.
Generally, prices of hydrocarbon products are subject to fluctuations in response to changes in supply, demand, market uncertainty
and a variety of other uncontrollable factors, such as: (i) the level of domestic production and consumer product demand; (ii) the
availability of imported oil and natural gas and actions taken by foreign crude oil and natural gas producing nations; (iii) the
availability of transportation systems with adequate capacity; (iv) the availability of competitive fuels; (v) fluctuating and seasonal
demand for crude oil, natural gas, NGLs and other hydrocarbon products, including demand for NGL products by the
petrochemical, refining and heating industries; (vi) the impact of conservation efforts; (vii) governmental regulation and taxation of
production; and (viii) prevailing economic conditions.
We are exposed to natural gas and NGL commodity price risks under certain of our natural gas processing and gathering and NGL
fractionation contracts that provide for fees to be calculated based on a regional natural gas or NGL price index, or to be paid in-
kind by taking title to natural gas or NGLs.  A decrease in natural gas and NGL prices can result in lower margins from these
contracts, which could have a material adverse effect on our financial position, results of operations and cash flows.  Volatility in
the prices of natural gas and NGLs can lead to ethane rejection, which results in lower pipeline and fractionation volumes for our
assets.  Volatility in these commodity prices may also have an impact on many of our customers, which in turn could have a
negative impact on their ability to fulfill their obligations to us.
The crude oil, natural gas and NGLs currently transported, gathered or processed at our facilities originate primarily from existing
domestic resource basins, which naturally deplete over time.  To offset this natural decline, our facilities need access to production
from newly discovered properties.  Many economic and business factors beyond our control can adversely affect the decision by
producers to explore for and develop new reserves.  These factors could include relatively low oil and natural gas prices, cost and
availability of equipment and labor, regulatory changes, capital budget limitations, the lack of available capital or the probability of
success in finding hydrocarbons.  A decrease in exploration and development activities in the regions where our facilities and other
energy logistics assets are located could result in a decrease in volumes handled by our assets, which could have a material adverse
effect on our financial position, results of operations and cash flows.  
38
Table of Contents
For a discussion regarding our current commercial outlook for 2019, please read “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of
Financial Condition and Results of Operations – General Outlook for 2019” included under Part II, Item 7 of this annual report.
We face competition from third parties in our midstream energy businesses.
Even if crude oil and natural gas reserves exist in the areas served by our assets, we may not be chosen by producers in these areas
to gather, transport, process, fractionate, store or otherwise handle the hydrocarbons extracted.  We compete with other companies,
including producers of crude oil and natural gas, for any such production on the basis of many factors, including but not limited to
geographic proximity to the production, costs of connection, available capacity, rates and access to markets.
Our NGL, refined products and marine transportation businesses may compete with other pipelines and marine transportation
companies in the areas they serve.  We also compete with railroads and third party trucking operations in certain of the areas we
serve.  Competitive pressures may adversely affect our tariff rates or volumes shipped.  Also, substantial new construction of inland
marine vessels could create an oversupply and intensify competition for our marine transportation business.  
The crude oil gathering and marketing business can be characterized by intense competition for supplies of crude oil at the
wellhead.  A decline in domestic crude oil production could intensify this competition among gatherers and marketers.  Our crude
oil transportation business competes with common carriers and proprietary pipelines owned and operated by major oil companies,
large independent pipeline companies, financial institutions with commodity trading platforms and other companies in the areas
where such pipeline systems deliver crude oil.
In our natural gas gathering business, we encounter competition in obtaining contracts to gather natural gas supplies, particularly
new supplies.  Competition in natural gas gathering is based in large part on reputation, efficiency, system reliability, gathering
system capacity and pricing arrangements.  Our key competitors in the natural gas gathering business include independent gas
gatherers and major integrated energy companies.  Alternate gathering facilities are available to producers we serve, and those
producers may also elect to construct proprietary gas gathering systems.  
Both we and our competitors make significant investments in new energy infrastructure to meet anticipated market demand.  The
success of our projects depends on utilization of our assets.  Demand for our new projects may change during construction, and our
competitors may make additional investments or redeployments of assets that compete with our projects and existing assets.  If
either our investments or construction by competitors in the markets we serve result in excess capacity, our facilities and assets
could be underutilized, which could cause us to reduce rates for our services, and to reduce the returns on our investments and
value of our assets.
A significant increase in competition in the midstream energy industry, including construction of new assets or redeployment of
existing assets by our competitors, could have a material adverse effect on our financial position, results of operations and cash
flows.
39
Table of Contents
Our debt level may limit our future financial and operating flexibility.
As of December 31, 2018, we had $23.75 billion in principal amount of consolidated senior long-term debt outstanding and $2.67
billion in principal amount of junior subordinated debt outstanding.  The amount of our future debt could have significant effects on
our operations, including, among other things:
§a substantial portion of our cash flow could be dedicated to the payment of principal and interest on our future debt and may
not be available for other purposes, including the payment of distributions on our common units and for capital expenditures;
§credit rating agencies may take a negative view of our consolidated debt level;
§covenants contained in our existing and future credit and debt agreements will require us to continue to meet financial tests that
may adversely affect our flexibility in planning for and reacting to changes in our business, including possible acquisition
opportunities;
§our ability to obtain additional financing, if necessary, for working capital, capital expenditures, acquisitions or other purposes
may be impaired or such financing may not be available on favorable terms;
§we may be at a competitive disadvantage relative to similar companies that have less debt; and
§we may be more vulnerable to adverse economic and industry conditions as a result of our significant debt level.
Our public debt indentures currently do not limit the amount of future indebtedness that we can incur, assume or
guarantee.  Although our credit agreements restrict our ability to incur additional debt above certain levels, any debt we may incur
in compliance with these restrictions may still be substantial.  For information regarding our long-term debt, see Note 7 of the
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report.
Our credit agreements and each of the indentures related to our public debt instruments include traditional financial covenants and
other restrictions.  For example, we are prohibited from making distributions to our partners if such distributions would cause an
event of default or otherwise violate a covenant under our credit agreements.  A breach of any of these restrictions by us could
permit our lenders or noteholders, as applicable, to declare all amounts outstanding under these debt agreements to be immediately
due and payable and, in the case of our credit agreements, to terminate all commitments to extend further credit.
Our ability to access capital markets to raise capital on favorable terms could be affected by our debt level, when such debt
matures, and by prevailing market conditions.  Moreover, if the rating agencies were to downgrade our credit ratings, we could
experience an increase in our borrowing costs, difficulty assessing capital markets and/or a reduction in the market price of our
securities.  Such a development could adversely affect our ability to obtain financing for working capital, capital expenditures or
acquisitions, or to refinance existing indebtedness.  If we are unable to access the capital markets on favorable terms in the future,
we might be forced to seek extensions for some of our short-term debt obligations or to refinance some of our debt obligations
through bank credit, as opposed to long-term public debt securities or equity securities.  The price and terms upon which we might
receive such extensions or additional bank credit, if at all, could be more onerous than those contained in existing debt
agreements.  Any such arrangements could, in turn, increase the risk that our leverage may adversely affect our future financial and
operating flexibility and thereby impact our ability to pay cash distributions at expected levels.
40
Table of Contents
We may not be able to fully execute our growth strategy if we encounter illiquid capital markets or increased competition for
investment opportunities.
Our growth strategy contemplates the development and acquisition of a wide range of midstream and other energy infrastructure
assets while maintaining a strong balance sheet.  This strategy includes constructing and acquiring additional assets and businesses
that enhance our ability to compete effectively and to diversify our asset portfolio, thereby providing us with more stable cash
flows.  We consider and pursue potential joint ventures, standalone projects and other transactions that we believe may present
opportunities to expand our business, increase our market position and realize operational synergies.
We will require substantial new capital to finance the future development and acquisition of assets and businesses.  For example,
our capital expenditures for 2018 reflected $4.49 billion of cash payments for capital projects and other investments.  Based on
information currently available, we expect our total capital expenditures for 2019 to approximate $3.5 billion to $3.9 billion, which
includes $350 million for sustaining capital projects. Any limitations on our access to capital may impair our ability to execute this
growth strategy.  If our cost of debt or equity capital becomes too expensive, our ability to develop or acquire accretive assets will
be limited.  We also may not be able to raise the necessary funds on satisfactory terms, if at all.  
Any sustained tightening of the credit markets may have a material adverse effect on us by, among other things, decreasing our
ability to finance growth capital projects or business acquisitions on favorable terms and by the imposition of increasingly
restrictive borrowing covenants.  In addition, the distribution yields of any new equity we may issue may be higher than historical
levels, making additional equity issuances more expensive. Accordingly, increased costs of equity and debt will make returns on
capital expenditures with proceeds from such capital less accretive on a per unit basis.
We also may compete with third parties in the acquisition of energy infrastructure assets that complement our existing asset base. 
Increased competition for a limited pool of assets could result in our losing to other bidders more often than in the past or acquiring
assets at less attractive prices.  Either occurrence could limit our ability to fully execute our growth strategy.  Our inability to
execute our growth strategy may materially adversely affect our ability to maintain or pay higher cash distributions in the future.
Our actual construction, development and acquisition costs could materially exceed forecasted amounts.
We have announced and are engaged in multiple significant construction projects involving existing and new assets for which we
have expended or will expend significant capital.  These projects entail significant logistical, technological and staffing challenges. 
We may not be able to complete our projects at the costs we estimated at the time of each project’s initiation or that we currently
estimate.  Similarly, force majeure events such as hurricanes along the U.S. Gulf Coast may cause delays, shortages of skilled labor
and additional expenses for these construction and development projects. 
If capital expenditures materially exceed expected amounts, then our future cash flows could be reduced, which, in turn, could
reduce the amount of cash we expect to have available for distribution.  In addition, a material increase in project costs could result
in decreased overall profitability of the newly constructed asset once it is placed into commercial service.
Our construction of new assets is subject to operational, regulatory, environmental, political, legal and economic risks, which
may result in delays, increased costs or decreased cash flows.
One of the ways we intend to grow our business is through the construction of new midstream energy infrastructure assets.  The
construction of new assets involves numerous operational, regulatory, environmental, political, legal and economic risks beyond
our control and may require the expenditure of significant amounts of capital.  These potential risks include, among other things,
the following:
 
§we may be unable to complete construction projects on schedule or at the budgeted cost due to the unavailability of required
construction personnel or materials, accidents, weather conditions or an inability to obtain necessary permits;
41
Table of Contents
§we will not receive any material increase in operating cash flows until the project is completed, even though we may have
expended considerable funds during the construction phase, which may be prolonged;
§we may construct facilities to capture anticipated future production growth in a region in which such growth does not
materialize;
§since we are not engaged in the exploration for and development of crude oil or natural gas reserves, we may not have access
to third party estimates of reserves in an area prior to our constructing facilities in the area.  As a result, we may construct
facilities in an area where the reserves are materially lower than we anticipate;
§in those situations where we do rely on third party reserve estimates in making a decision to construct assets, these estimates
may prove inaccurate;
§the completion or success of our construction project may depend on the completion of a third party construction project (e.g.,
a downstream crude oil refinery expansion or construction of a new petrochemical facility) that we do not control and that may
be subject to numerous of its own potential risks, delays and complexities; and
§we may be unable to obtain rights-of-way to construct additional pipelines or the cost to do so may be uneconomical.
A materialization of any of these risks could adversely affect our ability to achieve growth in the level of our cash flows or realize
benefits from expansion opportunities or construction projects, which could impact the level of cash distributions we pay to
partners.
Several of our assets have been in service for many years and require significant expenditures to maintain them. As a result, our
maintenance or repair costs may increase in the future.
Our pipelines, terminals and storage assets are generally long-lived assets, and many of them have been in service for many years.
The age and condition of our assets could result in increased maintenance or repair expenditures in the future. Any significant
increase in these expenditures could adversely affect our results of operations, financial position or cash flows, as well as our ability
to make cash distributions to our unitholders.
The inability to continue to access lands owned by third parties could adversely affect our operations and have a material
adverse effect on our financial position, results of operations and cash flows.
Our ability to operate our pipeline systems on certain lands owned by third parties will depend on our maintaining existing rights-
of-way and obtaining new rights-of-way on those lands. We are parties to rights-of-way agreements, permits and licenses
authorizing land use with numerous parties, including private land owners, governmental entities, Native American tribes, rail
carriers, public utilities and others. Our ability to secure extensions of existing agreements, permits and licenses is essential to our
continuing business operations, and securing additional rights-of-way will be critical to our ability to pursue expansion projects. We
cannot provide any assurance that we will be able to maintain access to all existing rights-of-way upon the expiration of the current
grants, that all of the rights-of-way will be obtained in a timely fashion or that we will acquire new rights-of-way as needed.
In particular, various federal agencies within the U.S. Department of the Interior, particularly the Bureau of Indian Affairs, Bureau
of Land Management, and the Office of Natural Resources Revenue, along with each Native American tribe, promulgate and
enforce regulations pertaining to natural gas and oil operations on Native American tribal lands. These regulations and approval
requirements relate to such matters as drilling and production requirements and environmental standards. In addition, each Native
American tribe is a sovereign nation having the right to enforce laws and regulations and to grant approvals independent from
federal, state and local statutes and regulations. These tribal laws and regulations include various taxes, fees, requirements to
employ Native American tribal members and other conditions that apply to operators and contractors conducting operations on
Native American tribal lands. One or more of these factors may increase our cost of doing business on Native American tribal lands
and impact the viability of, or prevent or delay our ability to conduct our operations on such lands.
42
Table of Contents
Furthermore, whether we have the power of eminent domain for our pipelines varies from state to state, depending upon the type of
pipeline and the laws of the particular state and the ownership of the land to which we seek access. When we exercise eminent
domain rights or negotiate private agreements, we must compensate landowners for the use of their property and, in eminent
domain actions, such compensation may be determined by a court. The inability to exercise the power of eminent domain could
negatively affect our business if we were to lose the right to use or occupy the property on which our pipelines are located.
We may face opposition to the operation of our pipelines and facilities from various groups.
We may face opposition to the operation of our pipelines and facilities from environmental groups, landowners, tribal groups, local
groups and other advocates. Such opposition could take many forms, including organized protests, attempts to block or sabotage
our operations, intervention in regulatory or administrative proceedings involving our assets, or lawsuits or other actions designed
to prevent, disrupt or delay the operation of our assets and business. For example, repairing our pipelines often involves securing
consent from individual landowners to access their property; one or more landowners may resist our efforts to make needed repairs,
which could lead to an interruption in the operation of the affected pipeline or facility for a period of time that is significantly
longer than would have otherwise been the case. In addition, acts of sabotage or eco-terrorism could cause significant damage or
injury to people, property or the environment or lead to extended interruptions of our operations. Any such event that interrupts the
revenues generated by our operations, or which causes us to make significant expenditures not covered by insurance, could reduce
our cash available for paying distributions to our partners and, accordingly, adversely affect our financial condition and the market
price of our securities.
Our growth strategy may adversely affect our results of operations if we do not successfully integrate and manage the
businesses that we acquire or if we substantially increase our indebtedness and contingent liabilities to make acquisitions.
Our growth strategy includes making accretive acquisitions.  From time to time, we evaluate and acquire additional assets and
businesses that we believe complement our existing operations.  We may be unable to successfully integrate and manage the
businesses we acquire in the future.  We may incur substantial expenses or encounter delays or other problems in connection with
our growth strategy that could have a material adverse effect on our financial position, results of operations and cash flows. 
Moreover, acquisitions and business expansions involve numerous risks, such as:
§difficulties in the assimilation of the operations, technologies, services and products of the acquired assets or businesses;
§establishing the internal controls and procedures we are required to maintain under the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002;
§managing relationships with new joint venture partners with whom we have not previously partnered;
§experiencing unforeseen operational interruptions or the loss of key employees, customers or suppliers;
§inefficiencies and complexities that can arise because of unfamiliarity with new assets and the businesses associated with them,
including with their markets; and
§diversion of the attention of management and other personnel from day-to-day business to the development or acquisition of
new businesses and other business opportunities.
If consummated, any acquisition or investment would also likely result in the incurrence of indebtedness and contingent liabilities
and an increase in interest expense and depreciation, amortization and accretion expenses.  As a result, our capitalization and results
of operations may change significantly following a material acquisition.  A substantial increase in our indebtedness and contingent
liabilities could have a material adverse effect on our financial position, results of operations and cash flows.  In addition, any
anticipated benefits of a material acquisition, such as expected cost savings or other synergies, may not be fully realized, if at all.
43
Table of Contents
Acquisitions that appear to increase our operating cash flows may nevertheless reduce our operating cash flows on a per unit
basis.
Even if we make acquisitions that we believe will increase our operating cash flows, these acquisitions may ultimately result in a
reduction of operating cash flow on a per unit basis, such as if our assumptions regarding a newly acquired asset or business did not
materialize or unforeseen risks occurred.  As a result, an acquisition initially deemed accretive based on information available at the
time could turn out not to be.  Examples of risks that could cause an acquisition to ultimately not be accretive include our inability
to achieve anticipated operating and financial projections or to integrate an acquired business successfully, the assumption of
unknown liabilities for which we become liable, and the loss of key employees or key customers.  If we consummate any future
acquisitions, our capitalization and results of operations may change significantly, and our unitholders will not have the opportunity
to evaluate the economic, financial and other relevant information that we will in making such decisions.  As a result of the risks
noted above, we may not realize the full benefits we expect from a material acquisition, which could have a material adverse effect
on our financial position, results of operations and cash flows.
A natural disaster, catastrophe, terrorist attack or other event could result in severe personal injury, property damage and
environmental damage, which could curtail our operations and have a material adverse effect on our financial position, results
of operations and cash flows.
Some of our operations involve risks of personal injury, property damage and environmental damage, which could curtail our
operations and otherwise materially adversely affect our cash flow.  For example, natural gas facilities operate at high pressures,
sometimes in excess of 1,100 pounds per square inch.  In addition, our marine transportation business is subject to additional risks,
including the possibility of marine accidents and spill events.  From time to time, our octane enhancement facility may produce
MTBE for export, which could expose us to additional risks from spill events.  Virtually all of our operations are exposed to
potential natural disasters, including hurricanes, tornadoes, storms, floods and/or earthquakes.  The location of our assets and our
customers’ assets in the U.S. Gulf Coast region makes them particularly vulnerable to hurricane or tropical storm risk.  In addition,
terrorists may target our physical facilities and computer hackers may attack our electronic systems.
If one or more facilities or electronic systems that we own or that deliver products to us or that supply our facilities are damaged by
severe weather or any other disaster, accident, catastrophe, terrorist attack or other event, our operations could be significantly
interrupted.  These interruptions could involve significant damage to people, property or the environment, and repairs could take
from a week or less for a minor incident to six months or more for a major interruption.  Additionally, some of the storage contracts
that we are a party to obligate us to indemnify our customers for any damage or injury occurring during the period in which the
customers’ product is in our possession.  Any event that interrupts the revenues generated by our operations, or which causes us to
make significant expenditures not covered by insurance, could reduce our cash available for paying distributions and, accordingly,
adversely affect the market price of our common units.
We believe that EPCO maintains adequate insurance coverage on our behalf, although insurance will not cover many types of
interruptions that might occur, will not cover amounts up to applicable deductibles and will not cover all risks associated with
certain of our products.  As a result of market conditions, premiums and deductibles for certain insurance policies can increase
substantially, and in some instances, certain insurance may become unavailable or available only for reduced amounts of coverage.
In the future, circumstances may arise whereby EPCO may not be able to renew existing insurance policies on our behalf or
procure other desirable insurance on commercially reasonable terms, if at all.  If we were to incur a significant liability for which
we were not fully insured, it could have a material adverse effect on our financial position, results of operations and cash flows.  In
addition, the proceeds of any such insurance may not be paid in a timely manner and may be insufficient if such an event were to
occur.
44
Table of Contents
A cyber-attack on our information technology (“IT”) systems could affect our business and assets, and have a material adverse
effect on our financial position, results of operations and cash flows.
We rely on our IT systems to conduct our business, as well as systems of third-party vendors.  These systems include information
used to operate our assets, as well as cloud-based services.  These systems are subject to possible security breaches and cyber-
attacks.
Cyber-attacks are becoming more sophisticated, and U.S. government warnings have indicated that infrastructure assets, including
pipelines, may be specifically targeted by certain groups.  These attacks include, without limitation, malicious software,
ransomware, attempts to gain unauthorized access to data, and other electronic security breaches.  These attacks may be perpetrated
by state-sponsored groups, “hacktivists”, criminal organizations or private individuals (including employee malfeasance).  These
cybersecurity risks include cyber-attacks on both us and third parties who provide material services to us.  In addition to disrupting
operations, cyber security breaches could also affect our ability to operate or control our facilities, render data or systems unusable,
or result in the theft of sensitive, confidential or customer information.  These events could also damage our reputation, and result
in losses from remedial actions, loss of business or potential liability to third parties.
We do not carry insurance specifically for cybersecurity events; however, certain of our insurance policies may allow for coverage
of associated damages resulting from such events.  If we were to incur a significant liability for which we were not fully insured, it
could have a material adverse effect on our financial position, results of operations and cash flows.  In addition, the proceeds of any
such insurance may not be paid in a timely manner and may be insufficient if such an event were to occur.
Failure of our critical IT systems could have an adverse impact on our business, financial condition, results of operations and
cash flows, as well as our ability to pay cash distributions.
We rely on IT systems to operate our assets and manage our businesses.  We depend on these systems to process, transmit and store
electronic information, including financial records and personally identifiable information such as employee, customer, investor
and payroll data, and to manage or support a variety of business processes, including our supply chain, pipeline and storage
operations, gathering and processing operations, financial transactions, banking and numerous other processes and transactions. 
Some of these IT systems are proprietary and custom designed for our business, while others are based upon or reside on
commercially available technologies.
Failures of these IT systems, whether due to power failures, a cybersecurity event or other reason, could result in a breach of
critical operational or financial controls and lead to a disruption of our operations, commercial activities or financial processes.
Such failures could adversely affect our results of operations, financial position or cash flow, as well as our ability to pay cash
distributions in a timely manner.  State and federal cybersecurity legislation could also impose new requirements, which could
increase our cost of doing business.
The use of derivative financial instruments could result in material financial losses by us.
Historically, we have sought to limit a portion of the adverse effects resulting from changes in energy commodity prices and
interest rates by using derivative instruments.  Derivative instruments typically include futures, forward contracts, swaps, options
and other instruments with similar characteristics.  Substantially all of our derivatives are used for non-trading activities.
To the extent that we hedge our commodity price and interest rate exposures, we will forego the benefits we would otherwise
experience if commodity prices or interest rates were to change in our favor.  In addition, hedging activities can result in losses that
might be material to our financial condition, results of operations and cash flows.  Such losses could occur under various
circumstances, including those situations where a counterparty does not perform its obligations under a hedge arrangement, the
hedge is not effective in mitigating the underlying risk, or our risk management policies and procedures are not followed.  Adverse
economic conditions (e.g., a significant decline in energy commodity prices that negatively impact the cash flows of oil and gas
producers) increase the risk of nonpayment or performance by our hedging counterparties.  
45
Table of Contents
See Part II, Item 7A of this annual report and Note 14 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included under Part II,
Item 8 of this annual report for a discussion of our derivative instruments and related hedging activities.
Our business requires extensive credit risk management that may not be adequate to protect against customer nonpayment.
We may incur credit risk to the extent customers do not fulfill their obligations to us in connection with our marketing of natural
gas, NGLs, crude oil, petrochemicals and refined products and long-term contracts with minimum volume commitments or fixed
demand charges.  Risks of nonpayment and nonperformance by customers are a major consideration in our businesses, and our
credit procedures and policies may not be adequate to sufficiently eliminate customer credit risk.  Further, adverse economic
conditions in our industry may increase the risk of nonpayment and nonperformance by customers, particularly customers that have
sub-investment grade credit ratings.  We manage our exposure to credit risk through credit analysis, credit approvals, credit limits
and monitoring procedures, and for certain transactions may utilize letters of credit, prepayments, net out agreements and
guarantees.  However, these procedures and policies do not fully eliminate customer credit risk.
Our primary market areas are located in the Gulf Coast, Southwest, Rocky Mountains, Northeast and Midwest regions of the
U.S.  We have a concentration of trade receivable balances due from domestic and international major integrated oil companies,
independent oil companies and other pipelines and wholesalers.  These concentrations of market areas may affect our overall credit
risk in that the customers may be similarly affected by changes in economic, regulatory or other factors.  
See Note 2 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report for information
regarding our allowance for doubtful accounts.
Our risk management policies cannot eliminate all commodity price risks.  In addition, any noncompliance with our risk
management policies could result in significant financial losses.
When engaged in marketing activities, it is our policy to maintain physical commodity positions that are substantially balanced
with respect to price risks between purchases, on the one hand, and sales or future delivery obligations, on the other hand.  Through
these transactions, we seek to earn a margin for the commodity purchased by selling the commodity for physical delivery to third
party users, such as producers, wholesalers, local distributors, independent refiners, marketing companies or major integrated oil
companies.  These policies and practices cannot, however, eliminate all price risks.  For example, any event that disrupts our
anticipated physical supply could expose us to risk of loss resulting from price changes if we are required to obtain alternative
supplies to cover our sales transactions.  We are also exposed to basis risks when a commodity is purchased against one pricing
index and sold against a different index.  Moreover, we are exposed to some risks that are not hedged, including price risks on
product we own, such as pipeline linefill, which must be maintained in order to facilitate transportation of the commodity in our
pipelines.  In addition, our marketing operations involve the risk of non-compliance with our risk management policies.  We cannot
assure you that our processes and procedures will detect and prevent all violations of our risk management policies, particularly if
deception or other intentional misconduct is involved.  If we were to incur a material loss related to commodity price risks,
including non-compliance with our risk management policies, it could have a material adverse effect on our financial position,
results of operations and cash flows.
Our variable-rate debt, including those fixed-rate debt obligations that may be converted to variable-rate through the use of
interest rate swaps, make us vulnerable to increases in interest rates, which could have a material adverse effect on our
financial position, results of operation and cash flows.
At December 31, 2018, we had $26.15 billion in principal amount of consolidated fixed-rate debt outstanding, including current
maturities thereof.  Due to the short term nature of commercial paper notes, we view the interest rates charged in connection with
these instruments as variable.
46
Table of Contents
The Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System raised benchmark interest rates three times during 2017, four times during
2018, and has stated that it expects to raise rates again in 2019.  Should interest rates increase significantly, the amount of cash
required to service our debt (including any future refinancing of our fixed-rate debt instruments) would increase.  Additionally,
from time to time, we may enter into interest rate swap arrangements, which could increase our exposure to variable interest rates. 
As a result, significant increases in interest rates could have a material adverse effect on our financial position, results of operations
and cash flows.
An increase in interest rates may also cause a corresponding decline in demand for equity securities in general, and in particular, for
yield-based equity securities such as our common units.  A reduction in demand for our common units may cause their trading price
to decline.
Our pipeline integrity program as well as compliance with pipeline safety laws and regulations may impose significant costs and
liabilities on us.
If we were to incur material costs in connection with our pipeline integrity program or pipeline safety laws and regulations, those
costs could have a material adverse effect on our financial condition, results of operations and cash flows.
The DOT requires pipeline operators to develop integrity management programs to comprehensively evaluate their pipelines, and
take measures to protect pipeline segments located in HCAs.  The majority of the costs to comply with this integrity management
rule are associated with pipeline integrity testing and any repairs found to be necessary as a result of such testing.  Changes such as
advances in pipeline inspection tools, identification of additional threats to a pipeline’s integrity and changes to the amount of pipe
determined to be located in HCAs can have a significant impact on the costs to perform integrity testing and repairs.  We will
continue our pipeline integrity testing programs to assess and maintain the integrity of our pipelines.  The results of these tests
could cause us to incur significant and unanticipated capital and operating expenditures for repairs or upgrades deemed necessary to
ensure the continued safe and reliable operation of our pipelines.
In total, our pipeline integrity costs for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016 were $122.0 million, $91.1 million and
$103.7 million, respectively.  Of these annual totals, we charged $71.8 million, $52.3 million and $55.8 million to operating costs
and expenses during the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively.  The remaining annual pipeline integrity
costs were capitalized and treated as sustaining capital projects.  We expect the cost of our pipeline integrity program, regardless of
whether such costs are capitalized or expensed, to approximate $126 million for 2019.
For additional information regarding the pipeline safety regulations, the Pipeline Safety Act and the SAFE PIPES Act, see
“Regulatory Matters – Safety Matters – Pipeline Safety” included under Part I, Items 1 and 2 of this annual report.
Environmental, health and safety costs and liabilities, and changing environmental, health and safety regulation, could have a
material adverse effect on our financial position, results of operations and cash flows.
Our operations are subject to various environmental, health and safety requirements and potential liabilities under extensive federal,
state and local laws and regulations.  Further, we cannot ensure that existing environmental, health and safety regulations will not
be revised or that new regulations will not be adopted or become applicable to us.  Governmental authorities have the power to
enforce compliance with applicable regulations and permits and to subject violators to civil and criminal penalties, including
substantial fines, injunctions or both.  Certain environmental laws, including the CERCLA and analogous state laws and
regulations, may impose strict, joint and several liability for costs required to clean-up and restore sites where hazardous substances
or hydrocarbons have been disposed or otherwise released.  Moreover, third parties, including neighboring landowners, may also
have the right to pursue legal actions to enforce compliance or to recover for personal injury and property damage allegedly caused
by the release of hazardous substances, hydrocarbons or other waste products into the environment.  Failure to comply with these
requirements may expose us to fines, penalties and/or interruptions in our operations that could have a material adverse effect on
our financial position, results of operations and cash flows.
47
Table of Contents
In addition, future environmental, health and safety law developments, such as stricter laws, regulations, permits or enforcement
policies, could significantly increase some costs of our operations.  Areas of potential future environmental, health and safety law
developments include the following items.
Greenhouse Gases/Climate Change
Responding to scientific reports regarding threats posed by global climate change, the U.S. Congress has considered legislation to
reduce emissions of greenhouse gases.  In addition, some states, including states in which our facilities or operations are located,
have individually or in regional cooperation, imposed restrictions on greenhouse gas emissions under various policies and
approaches, including establishing a cap on emissions, requiring efficiency measures, or providing incentives for pollution
reduction, use of renewable energy sources, or use of replacement fuels with lower carbon content.
The adoption and implementation of any federal, state or local regulations imposing reporting obligations on, or limiting emissions
of greenhouse gases from, our equipment and operations could require us to incur significant costs to reduce emissions of
greenhouse gases associated with our operations or could adversely affect demand for the crude oil, natural gas or other
hydrocarbon products that we transport, store or otherwise handle in connection with our midstream services.  The potential
increase in our operating costs could include costs to operate and maintain our facilities, install new emission controls on our
facilities, acquire allowances to authorize greenhouse gas emissions (whether emitted by our operations or associated with fuel that
we supply into the markets), pay taxes related to greenhouse gas emissions, and administer and manage a greenhouse gas emissions
program.  We may not be able to recover such increased costs through customer prices or rates, which may limit our access to, or
otherwise cause us to reduce our participation in, certain market activities.  In addition, changes in regulatory policies that result in
a reduction in the demand for hydrocarbon products that are deemed to contribute to greenhouse gases, or restrictions on their use,
may reduce volumes available to us for processing, transportation, marketing and storage.  These developments could have a
material adverse effect on our financial position, results of operations and cash flows.
In addition, due to concerns over climate change, numerous countries around the world have adopted or are considering adopting
laws or regulations to reduce greenhouse gas emissions.  It is not possible to know how quickly renewable energy technologies may
advance, but if significant additional legislation and regulation were enacted, the increased use of renewable energy could
ultimately reduce future demand for hydrocarbons.  These developments could have a material adverse effect on our financial
position, results of operations and cash flows.
Hydraulic Fracturing
Certain of our customers employ hydraulic fracturing techniques to stimulate natural gas and crude oil production from
unconventional geological formations (including shale formations), which entails the injection of pressurized fracturing fluids
(consisting of water, sand and certain chemicals) into a well bore.  The U.S. federal government, and some states and localities,
have adopted, and others are considering adopting, regulations or ordinances that could restrict hydraulic fracturing in certain
circumstances, or that would impose higher taxes, fees or royalties on natural gas production.  Increased regulation and attention
given to the hydraulic fracturing process could lead to greater opposition to crude oil and natural gas drilling activities using
hydraulic fracturing techniques, including increased litigation.  Additional legislation or regulation could also lead to operational
delays and/or increased operating costs in the production of crude oil and natural gas (including natural gas produced from shale
plays like the Eagle Ford, Haynesville, Barnett, Marcellus and Utica Shales) incurred by our customers or could make it more
difficult to perform hydraulic fracturing.  If these legislative and regulatory initiatives cause a material decrease in the drilling of
new wells and related servicing activities, it may affect the volume of hydrocarbon projects available to our midstream businesses
and have a material adverse effect on our financial position, results of operations and cash flows.
See “Regulatory Matters” under Part I, Items 1 and 2 of this annual report for more information and specific disclosures relating to
environmental, health and safety laws and regulations, and costs and liabilities.
Federal, state or local regulatory measures could have a material adverse effect on our financial position, results of operations
and cash flows.
The FERC regulates our interstate liquids pipelines under the ICA.  State regulatory agencies regulate our intrastate natural gas and
NGL pipelines, intrastate storage facilities and gathering lines.
48
Table of Contents
Our intrastate NGL and natural gas pipelines are subject to regulation in many states, including Colorado, Kansas, Louisiana, New
Mexico, Texas and Wyoming.  To the extent our intrastate natural gas pipelines engage in interstate transportation, they are also
subject to regulation by the FERC pursuant to Section 311 of the NGPA.  We also have natural gas underground storage facilities in
Louisiana and Texas.  Although state regulation is typically less comprehensive in scope than regulation by the FERC, our services
are typically required to be provided on a nondiscriminatory basis and are also subject to challenge by protest and complaint.
Although our natural gas gathering systems are generally exempt from FERC regulation under the NGA, our natural gas gathering
operations could be adversely affected should they become subject to federal regulation of rates and services, or, if the states in
which we operate adopt policies imposing more onerous regulation on gas gathering operations.  Additional rules and legislation
pertaining to these matters are considered and adopted from time to time at both state and federal levels.  We cannot predict what
effect, if any, such regulatory changes and legislation might have on our operations, but we could be required to incur additional
capital expenditures.
For a general overview of federal, state and local regulation applicable to our assets, see “Regulatory Matters” included within Part
I, Items 1 and 2 of this annual report.  This regulatory oversight can affect certain aspects of our business and the market for our
products and could have a material adverse effect on our financial position, results of operations and cash flows.
The rates of our regulated assets are subject to review and possible adjustment by federal and state regulators, which could
adversely affect our revenues.
The FERC, pursuant to the ICA (as amended), the Energy Policy Act and rules and orders promulgated thereunder, regulates the
tariff rates for our interstate common carrier liquids pipeline operations.  To be lawful under the ICA, interstate tariff rates, terms
and conditions of service must be just and reasonable and not unduly discriminatory, and must be on file with the FERC.  In
addition, pipelines may not confer any undue preference upon any shipper.  Shippers may protest (and the FERC may investigate)
the lawfulness of new or changed tariff rates.  The FERC can suspend those tariff rates for up to seven months.  It can also require
refunds of amounts collected pursuant to rates that are ultimately found to be unlawful and prescribe new rates prospectively.  The
FERC and interested parties can also challenge tariff rates that have become final and effective.  The FERC can also order new
rates to take effect prospectively and order reparations for past rates that exceed the just and reasonable level up to two years prior
to the date of a complaint.  Due to the complexity of rate making, the lawfulness of any rate is never assured.  A successful
challenge of our rates could adversely affect our revenues.
The FERC uses prescribed rate methodologies for approving regulated tariff rate changes for interstate liquids pipelines.  The
FERC’s indexing methodology currently allows a pipeline to increase its rates by a percentage linked to the PPI.  However, in any
year in which the index is negative, a pipeline must file to lower its rates if its rates would be above the indexed rate ceiling.  As an
alternative to this indexing methodology, we may also choose to support our rates based on a cost-of-service methodology, or by
obtaining advance approval to charge “market-based rates,” or by charging “settlement rates” agreed to by all affected
shippers.  These methodologies may limit our ability to set rates based on our actual costs or may delay the use of rates reflecting
increased costs.  
In October 2016, the FERC sought comments regarding potential modifications to its policies for evaluating changes in oil pipeline
indexed rates and the associated reporting requirements. The FERC observed that some pipelines continue to obtain additional
index rate increases despite reporting on Form No. 6 that their revenues exceed their costs. The FERC is proposing a new policy
that would deny proposed index increases if a pipeline’s Form No. 6 reflects (i) revenues that exceed the total cost-of-service by
15% for the two preceding years or (ii) the proposed increase in the rate index exceeds the percentage change in the pipeline’s
annual costs by 5%.  Changes in the FERC’s approved methodology for approving rates, or challenges to our application of that
methodology, could adversely affect us.  Adverse decisions by the FERC in approving our regulated rates could adversely affect our
cash flow.
The intrastate liquids pipeline transportation services we provide are subject to various state laws and regulations that apply to the
rates we charge and the terms and conditions of the services we offer.  Although state regulation typically is less onerous than
FERC regulation, the rates we charge and the provision of our services may be subject to challenge.
49
Table of Contents
The adoption and implementation of new statutory and regulatory requirements for derivative transactions could have an
adverse impact on our ability to hedge risks associated with our business and increase the working capital requirements to
conduct these activities.
The Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act enacted in 2010 (the “Dodd-Frank Act”) provides for statutory
and regulatory requirements for swaps and other derivative transactions, including financial and certain physical oil and gas
hedging transactions.  Under the Dodd-Frank Act, the CFTC has adopted regulations requiring registration of swap dealers and
major swap participants, mandatory clearing of swaps, election of the end-user exception for any uncleared swaps by certain
qualified companies, recordkeeping and reporting requirements, business conduct standards and position limits among other
requirements.  Several of these requirements, including position limits rules, allow the CFTC to impose controls that could have an
adverse impact on our ability to hedge risks associated with our business and could increase our working capital requirements to
conduct these activities.
Based on an assessment of final rules promulgated by the CFTC, we have determined that we are not a swap dealer, major swap
participant or a financial entity, and therefore have determined that we currently qualify as an end-user.  In addition, the vast
majority of our derivative transactions are currently transacted through a Derivatives Clearing Organization, and we believe our use
of the end-user exception will likely not be necessary on a routine basis.  We will also seek to retain our status as an end-user by
taking reasonable measures necessary to avoid becoming a swap dealer, major swap participant or financial entity, and other
measures to preserve our ability to elect the end-user exception should it become necessary.  However, derivative transactions that
are not clearable, and transactions that are clearable but for which we choose to elect the end-user exception, are subject to
recordkeeping and reporting requirements and potentially additional credit support arrangements including cash margin or
collateral.  Posting of additional cash margin or collateral could affect our liquidity and reduce our ability to use cash for capital
expenditures or other company purposes.
In September 2012, the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia vacated and remanded the position limits rules adopted by
the CFTC based on a necessity finding.  In December 2013, the CFTC responded by proposing amended rules in an effort to better
conform to the Dodd-Frank Act and in December 2016, the CFTC further refined and reproposed rules on position limits.  Under
the reproposed rules, the CFTC would place volumetric limitations on certain positions in 25 core physical commodity futures
contracts and their economically equivalent futures, options and swaps.  While we believe that the majority of our hedging
transactions would meet one or more of the enumerated categories for Bona Fide Hedges, the rules could have an adverse impact
on our ability to hedge certain risks associated with our business and could potentially affect our profitability. The comment period
on the reproposed rules closed on February 28, 2017, and the proposal remains pending.
President Trump and the U.S. Congress have taken various actions suggesting some interest in amending some of the statutory and
regulatory provisions impacting financial markets and institutions. The CFTC Chairman and Commissioners have also indicated an
interest in reevaluating some of the existing regulations and regulatory proposals. It is not clear at this time what, if any, changes in
the law will be enacted or what, if any, changes in the existing regulations will be adopted, or how any such changes would impact
our hedging activity.  In addition, the President has nominated a new Chairman for the CFTC.  (The existing Chairman’s term
expires in April 2019, although he can stay on for a period of time if his successor has not been confirmed.)  It is not clear what, if
any, effect a change in leadership at the CFTC would have on consideration of any changes in the existing regulations.
Our standalone operating cash flow is derived primarily from cash distributions we receive from EPO.
On a standalone basis, Enterprise Products Partners L.P. is a holding company with no business operations and conducts all of its
business through its wholly owned subsidiary, EPO.  As a result, we depend upon the earnings and cash flows of EPO and its
subsidiaries and unconsolidated affiliates, and the distribution of their cash flows to us in order to meet our obligations and to allow
us to make cash distributions to our limited partners.
The amount of cash EPO and its subsidiaries and unconsolidated affiliates can distribute to us depends primarily on cash flows
generated from their operations.  These operating cash flows fluctuate based on, among other things, the: (i) volume of hydrocarbon
products transported on their gathering and transmission pipelines; (ii) throughput volumes in their processing and treating
operations; (iii) fees charged and the margins realized for their various storage, terminaling, processing and transportation services;
(iv) price of natural gas, crude oil and NGLs; (v) relationships
50
Table of Contents
among natural gas, crude oil and NGL prices, including differentials between regional markets; (vi) fluctuations in their working
capital needs; (vii) level of their operating costs; (viii) prevailing economic conditions; and (ix) level of competition encountered by
their businesses.  In addition, the actual amount of cash EPO and its subsidiaries and unconsolidated affiliates will have available
for distribution will depend on factors such as: (i) the level of sustaining capital expenditures incurred; (ii) their cash outlays for
expansion (or growth) capital projects and acquisitions; and (iii) their debt service requirements and restrictions included in the
provisions of existing and future indebtedness, organizational documents, applicable state business organization laws and other
applicable laws and regulations.  Because of these factors, we may not have sufficient available cash each quarter to continue
paying distributions at our current levels.
Risks Relating to Our Partnership Structure
We may issue additional securities without the approval of our common unitholders.
At any time, we may issue an unlimited number of limited partner interests of any type (to parties other than our affiliates) without
the approval of our unitholders.  Our partnership agreement does not give our common unitholders the right to approve the issuance
of equity securities, including equity securities ranking senior to our common units.  The issuance of additional common units or
other equity securities of equal or senior rank will have the following effects: (i) the ownership interest of a unitholder immediately
prior to the issuance will decrease; (ii) the amount of cash available for distribution on each common unit may decrease; (iii) the
ratio of taxable income to distributions may increase; (iv) the relative voting strength of each previously outstanding common unit
may be diminished; and (v) the market price of our common units may decline.
We may not have sufficient operating cash flows to pay cash distributions at the current level following establishment of cash
reserves and payments of fees and expenses.
Because cash distributions on our common units are dependent on the amount of cash we generate, distributions may fluctuate
based on our performance and capital needs.  We cannot guarantee that we will continue to pay distributions at the current level
each quarter.  The actual amount of cash that is available to be distributed each quarter will depend upon numerous factors, some of
which are beyond our control and the control of our general partner.  These factors include, but are not limited to: (i) the volume of
the products that we handle and the prices we receive for our services; (ii) the level of our operating costs; (iii) the level of
competition in our business; (iv) prevailing economic conditions, including the price of and demand for crude oil, natural gas,
NGLs and other products we transport, store and market; (v) the level of capital expenditures we make; (vi) the amount and cost of
capital we can raise compared to the amount of our capital expenditures and debt service requirements; (vii)  restrictions contained
in our debt agreements; (viii) fluctuations in our working capital needs; (ix) weather volatility; (x) cash outlays for acquisitions, if
any; and (xi) the amount, if any, of cash reserves required by our general partner in its sole discretion.
Furthermore, the amount of cash that we have available for distribution is not solely a function of profitability, which will be
affected by non-cash items such as depreciation, amortization and provisions for asset impairments.  Our cash flows are also
impacted by borrowings under credit agreements and similar arrangements.  As a result, we may be able to make cash distributions
during periods when we record losses and may not be able to make cash distributions during periods when we record net income. 
An inability on our part to pay cash distributions to partners could have a material adverse effect on our financial position, results
of operations and cash flows.
Our general partner and its affiliates have limited fiduciary responsibilities to, and conflicts of interest with respect to, our
partnership, which may permit it to favor its own interests to your detriment.
The directors and officers of our general partner and its affiliates have duties to manage our general partner in a manner that is
beneficial to its members.  At the same time, our general partner has duties to manage our partnership in a manner that is beneficial
to us.  Therefore, our general partner’s duties to us may conflict with the duties of its officers and directors to its members.  Such
conflicts may include, among others, the following:
§neither our partnership agreement nor any other agreement requires our general partner or EPCO to pursue a business strategy
that favors us;
51
Table of Contents
§decisions of our general partner regarding the amount and timing of asset purchases and sales, cash expenditures, borrowings,
issuances of additional units, and the establishment of additional reserves in any quarter may affect the level of cash available
to pay quarterly distributions to our unitholders;
§under our partnership agreement, our general partner determines which costs incurred by it and its affiliates are reimbursable
by us;
§our general partner is allowed to resolve any conflicts of interest involving us and our general partner and its affiliates, and
may take into account the interests of parties other than us, such as EPCO, in resolving conflicts of interest, which has the
effect of limiting its fiduciary duty to our unitholders;
§any resolution of a conflict of interest by our general partner not made in bad faith and that is fair and reasonable to us is
binding on the partners and is not a breach of our partnership agreement;
§affiliates of our general partner may compete with us in certain circumstances;
§our general partner has limited its liability and reduced its fiduciary duties and has also restricted the remedies available to our
unitholders for actions that might, without the limitations, constitute breaches of fiduciary duty.  As a result of purchasing our
units, you are deemed to consent to some actions and conflicts of interest that might otherwise constitute a breach of fiduciary
or other duties under applicable law;
§we do not have any employees and we rely solely on employees of EPCO and its affiliates;
§in some instances, our general partner may cause us to borrow funds in order to permit the payment of distributions;
§our general partner may cause us to pay it or its affiliates for any services rendered to us or entering into additional contractual
arrangements with any of these entities on our behalf;
§our general partner intends to limit its liability regarding our contractual and other obligations and, in some circumstances, may
be entitled to be indemnified by us;
§our general partner controls the enforcement of obligations owed to us by our general partner and its affiliates; and
§our general partner decides whether to retain separate counsel, accountants or others to perform services for us.
We have significant business relationships with entities controlled by EPCO and Dan Duncan LLC.  For information regarding
these relationships and related party transactions with EPCO and its affiliates, see Note 15 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial
Statements included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report.  Additional information regarding our relationship with EPCO and
its affiliates can also be found under Part III, Item 13 of this annual report.
The NYSE does not require a publicly traded limited partnership like us to comply with certain of its corporate governance
requirements.
We currently list our common units on the NYSE under the symbol “EPD.” Because we are a publicly traded limited partnership,
the NYSE does not require us to have a majority of independent directors on our general partner’s Board or to establish a
compensation committee or a nominating and corporate governance committee. Additionally, any future issuance of additional
common units or other securities, including to affiliates, will not be subject to the NYSE’s shareholder approval rules that apply to
a corporation. Accordingly, unitholders do not have the same protections afforded to certain corporations that are subject to all of
the NYSE corporate governance requirements. See Part III, Item 10 of this annual report for additional information.
52
Table of Contents
Unitholders have limited voting rights and are not entitled to elect our general partner or its directors.  In addition, even if
unitholders are dissatisfied, they cannot easily remove our general partner.
Unlike the holders of common stock in a corporation, unitholders have only limited voting rights on matters affecting our business
and, therefore, limited ability to influence management’s decisions regarding our business.  Unitholders did not elect our general
partner or its directors and will have no right to elect our general partner or its directors on an annual or other continuing basis.  The
owners of our general partner choose the directors of our general partner.
Furthermore, if unitholders are dissatisfied with the performance of our general partner, they currently have no practical ability to
remove our general partner or its officers or directors.  Our general partner may not be removed except upon the vote of the holders
of at least 60% of our outstanding units voting together as a single class.  Since affiliates of our general partner currently own
approximately 31.9% of our outstanding common units, the removal of Enterprise GP as our general partner is highly unlikely
without the consent of both our general partner and its affiliates.  As a result of this provision, the trading price of our common
units may be lower than other forms of equity ownership because of the absence of a takeover premium in the trading price.
Our partnership agreement restricts the voting rights of unitholders owning 20% or more of our common units.
Unitholders’ voting rights are further restricted by a provision in our partnership agreement stating that any units held by a person
that owns 20% or more of any class of our common units then outstanding, other than our general partner and its affiliates, cannot
be voted on any matter.  In addition, our partnership agreement contains provisions limiting the ability of unitholders to call
meetings or to acquire information about our operations, as well as other provisions limiting our unitholders’ ability to influence
our management.  As a result of this provision, the trading price of our common units may be lower than other forms of equity
ownership because of the absence of a takeover premium in the trading price.
Our general partner has a limited call right that may require common unitholders to sell their common units at an undesirable
time or price.
If at any time our general partner and its affiliates own 85% or more of the common units then outstanding, our general partner will
have the right, but not the obligation, which it may assign to any of its affiliates or to us, to acquire all, but not less than all, of the
remaining common units held by unaffiliated persons at a price not less than the then current market price.  As a result, common
unitholders may be required to sell their common units at an undesirable time or price and may therefore not receive any return on
their investment.  Unitholders may also incur a tax liability upon the sale of their common units.
Our common unitholders may not have limited liability if a court finds that limited partner actions constitute control of our
business.
Under Delaware law, common unitholders could be held liable for our obligations to the same extent as a general partner if a court
determined that the right of limited partners to remove our general partner or to take other action under our partnership agreement
constituted participation in the “control” of our business.  Under Delaware law, our general partner generally has unlimited liability
for our obligations, such as our debts and environmental liabilities, except for those of our contractual obligations that are expressly
made without recourse to our general partner.
The limitations on the liability of holders of limited partner interests for the obligations of a limited partnership have not been
clearly established in some of the states in which we do business. You could have unlimited liability for our obligations if a court or
government agency determined that (i) we were conducting business in a state, but had not complied with that particular state’s
partnership statute; or (ii) your right to act with other unitholders to remove or replace our general partner, to approve some
amendments to our partnership agreement or to take other actions under our partnership agreement constituted “control” of our
business.
53
Table of Contents
Unitholders may have liability to repay distributions.
Under certain circumstances, our unitholders may have to repay amounts wrongfully distributed to them.  Under Section 17-607 of
the Delaware Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act, we may not make a distribution to our unitholders if the distribution would
cause our liabilities to exceed the fair value of our assets.  Liabilities to partners on account of their partnership interests and
liabilities that are non-recourse to the partnership are not counted for purposes of determining whether a distribution is
permitted.  Delaware law provides that for a period of three years from the date of an impermissible distribution, limited partners
who received the distribution and who knew at the time of the distribution that it violated Delaware law will be liable to the limited
partnership for the distribution amount.  A purchaser of common units who becomes a limited partner is liable for the obligations of
the transferring limited partner to make contributions to the partnership that are known to such purchaser of common units at the
time it became a limited partner, and for unknown obligations if the liabilities could be determined from our partnership agreement.
Our general partner’s interest in us and the control of our general partner may be transferred to a third party without
unitholder consent.
Our general partner, in accordance with our partnership agreement, may transfer its general partner interest without the consent of
unitholders.  In addition, our general partner may transfer its general partner interest to a third party in a merger or consolidation or
in a sale of all or substantially all of its assets without the consent of our unitholders.  Furthermore, there is no restriction in our
partnership agreement on the ability of the sole member of our general partner, currently Dan Duncan LLC, to transfer its equity
interests in our general partner to a third party.  The new equity owner of our general partner would then be in a position to replace
the Board and officers of our general partner with their own choices and to influence the decisions taken by the Board and officers
of our general partner.
We do not have the same flexibility as other types of organizations to accumulate cash and issue equity to protect against
illiquidity in the future.
Unlike a corporation, our partnership agreement requires us to make quarterly distributions to our unitholders of all available cash,
after taking into account reserves for commitments and contingencies, including capital and operating costs and debt service
requirements.  The value of our common units and other limited partner interests may decrease in correlation with any reduction in
our cash distributions per unit.  Accordingly, if we experience a liquidity problem in the future, we may not be able to issue more
equity to recapitalize.
Tax Risks to Common Unitholders
Our tax treatment depends on our status as a partnership for federal income tax purposes, as well as our not being subject to a
material amount of entity-level taxation by individual states.  If the Internal Revenue Service were to treat us as a corporation
for federal income tax purposes or if we were otherwise subject to a material amount of entity-level taxation, then cash available
for distribution to our unitholders would be reduced.
The anticipated after-tax economic benefit of an investment in our common units depends largely on our being treated as a
partnership for federal income tax purposes.  Despite the fact that we are organized as a limited partnership under Delaware law, we
will be treated as a corporation for federal income tax purposes unless we satisfy a “qualifying income” requirement. Based on our
current operations, we believe we satisfy the qualifying income requirement.  Failing to meet the qualifying income requirement or
a change in current law could cause us to be treated as a corporation for federal income tax purposes or otherwise subject us to
taxation as an entity.  We have not requested, and do not plan to request, a ruling from the Internal Revenue Service (“IRS”) with
respect to our classification as a partnership for federal income tax purposes.
54
Table of Contents
If we were treated as a corporation for federal income tax purposes, we would pay federal income tax on our taxable income at the
corporate tax rate and we would also likely pay additional state and local income taxes at varying rates.  Distributions to our
unitholders would generally be taxed again as corporate dividends, and no income, gains, losses or deductions would flow through
to our unitholders.  Because a tax would be imposed upon us as a corporation, the cash available for distribution to our unitholders
would be reduced.  Thus, treatment of us as a corporation could result in a reduction in the anticipated cash-flow and after-tax
return to our unitholders, which would cause a reduction in the value of our common units.
At the state level, several states have been evaluating ways to subject partnerships to entity-level taxation through the imposition of
state income, franchise, capital, and other forms of business taxes, as well as subjecting nonresident partners to taxation through the
imposition of withholding obligations and composite, combined, group, block, or similar filing obligations on nonresident partners
receiving a distributive share of state “sourced” income. We currently own property or do business in a substantial number of states.
Imposition on us of any of these taxes in jurisdictions in which we own assets or conduct business or an increase in the existing tax
rates could substantially reduce the cash available for distribution to our unitholders.
From 2013 through 2017, several publicly traded partnerships merged into their corporate general partner sponsors.  In 2018 and
continuing into 2019, the combination of a number of additional factors, including the passage of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of
2017 (which lowered the federal corporate tax rate from 35% to 21% and generally provides for the expensing of certain capital
expenditures and acquisitions), the FERC issuing its Revised Policy Statement on the Treatment of Income Taxes in March 2018,
and, generally, continued lower demand and related liquidity for midstream energy companies (including those structured as
publicly traded partnerships) led to additional publicly traded partnerships to either (i) merge into their corporate general partner
sponsors, (ii) merge into their general partner structured as a partnership and then elect for the combined entity to be taxed as a
corporation, or (iii) voluntarily elect to be taxed as a corporation.  These conversions have materially reduced the number of
publicly traded partnerships and the total market capitalization and the depth of capital available for the publicly traded partnership
sector.
While we currently believe that our classification as a partnership for federal income tax purposes continues to provide  a net
benefit for our unitholders, should we continue to see (i) additional publicly traded partnerships elect to be taxed as corporations,
which could result in a further decrease in the total market capitalization of the publicly traded partnership sector, (ii) lower demand
for equity capital in the publicly traded partnership sector, (iii) the absence of a historic premium in the market valuation of
publicly traded partnerships compared to midstream energy companies taxed as corporations  (or if we see any discount in the
valuation of our partnership compared to such companies), or (iv) a combination thereof that results in a material difference in our
cost of capital or limits our access to capital, the board of directors of our general partner may determine it is in our unitholders’
best interest to change our classification as a partnership for federal income tax purposes. Should the general partner recommend
that we change our tax classification, such change would be subject to the approval of our common unitholders.
The tax treatment of publicly traded partnerships or an investment in our common units could be subject to potential legislative,
judicial or administrative changes and differing interpretations, possibly on a retroactive basis.
The present federal income tax treatment of publicly traded partnerships, including us, or an investment in our common units, may
be modified by administrative, legislative or judicial interpretation.  For example, from time to time, members of Congress propose
and consider substantive changes to the existing federal income tax laws that affect publicly traded partnerships or an investment in
our common units.
Further, final Treasury Regulations under Section 7704(d)(1)(E) of the Internal Revenue Code recently published in the Federal
Register interpret the scope of qualifying income requirements for publicly traded partnerships by providing industry-specific
guidance.  We do not believe the final Treasury Regulations affect our ability to be treated as a partnership for federal income tax
purposes.
55
Table of Contents
In addition, the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (the “Tax Act”) enacted December 22, 2017, made significant changes to the federal income
tax rules applicable to both individuals and entities, including changes to the effective tax rate on an individual or other non-
corporate unitholder’s allocable share of certain income from a publicly traded partnership. The Tax Act is complex and the
Treasury Department and IRS continue to release regulations relating to and interpretive guidance of the legislation contained in the
Tax Act.  Thus, unitholders should consult their tax advisor regarding the Tax Act and its effect on an investment in our common
units.
Any changes to federal income tax laws and interpretations thereof (including administrative guidance relating to the Tax Act) may
or may not be applied retroactively and could make it more difficult or impossible for us to be treated as a partnership for federal
income tax purposes or otherwise adversely affect our business, financial condition or results of operations.  Any such changes or
interpretations thereof could adversely impact the value of an investment in our common units.
We prorate our items of income, gain, loss and deduction between transferors and transferees of our common units each month
based upon the ownership of our common units on the first day of each month, instead of on the basis of the date a particular
common unit is transferred.
We generally prorate our items of income, gain, loss and deduction between transferors and transferees of our common units each
month based upon the ownership of the units on the first day of each month, instead of on the basis of the date a particular unit is
transferred. Treasury Regulations allow a similar monthly simplifying convention, but such regulations do not specifically
authorize all aspects of our proration method.  If the IRS were to successfully challenge our proration method, we may be required
to change the allocation of items of income, gain, loss and deduction among our unitholders.
A successful IRS contest of the federal income tax positions we take may adversely impact the market for our common units and
the cost of any IRS contest will reduce our cash available for distribution to unitholders.
The IRS has made no determination as to our status as a partnership for U.S. federal income tax purposes.  The IRS may adopt
positions that differ from the positions we take, even positions taken with advice of counsel.  It may be necessary to resort to
administrative or court proceedings to sustain some or all of the positions we take and such positions may not ultimately be
sustained.  A court may not agree with some or all of the positions we take.  As a result, any such contest with the IRS may
materially and adversely impact the market for our common units and the price at which our common units trade.  In addition, our
costs of any contest with the IRS, principally legal, accounting and related fees, will be indirectly borne by our unitholders because
the costs will reduce our cash available for distribution.
If the IRS makes audit adjustments to our income tax returns for tax years beginning after December 31, 2017, it (and some
states) may assess and collect any taxes (including any applicable penalties and interest) resulting from such audit
adjustment directly from us, in which case we would pay the taxes directly to the IRS.  If we bear such payment our cash
available for distribution to our unitholders might be substantially reduced.
Pursuant to the Bipartisan Budget Act of 2015, for tax years beginning after December 31, 2017, if the IRS makes audit
adjustments to our income tax returns, it (and some states) may assess and collect any taxes (including any applicable penalties and
interest) resulting from such audit adjustment directly from us. Our general partner would cause us to pay the taxes (including any
applicable penalties and interest) directly to the IRS. As a result, our current unitholders may bear some or all of the tax liability
resulting from such audit adjustment, even if such unitholders did not own common units in us during the tax year under audit. If,
as a result of any such audit adjustment, we are required to make payments of taxes, penalties and interest, our cash available for
distribution to our unitholders might be substantially reduced.
56
Table of Contents
Our unitholders may be required to pay taxes on their share of our income even if they do not receive any cash distributions
from us.
Because our unitholders will be treated as partners to whom we will allocate taxable income which could be different in amount
from the cash that we distribute, our unitholders may be required to pay federal income taxes and, in some cases, state and local
income taxes on their share of our taxable income, whether or not they receive any cash distributions from us.  Our common
unitholders may not receive cash distributions from us equal to their share of our taxable income or even equal to the actual tax
liability resulting from their share of our taxable income.
Tax gains or losses on the disposition of our common units could be more or less than expected.
If our unitholders sell their common units, they will recognize a gain or loss equal to the difference between the amount realized
and their tax basis in those common units.  Because distributions in excess of a unitholder’s allocable share of our net taxable
income decrease the unitholder’s tax basis in the unitholder’s common units, the amount, if any, of such prior excess distributions
with respect to the common units a unitholder sells will, in effect, become taxable income to the unitholder if the unitholder sells
such common units at a price greater than the unitholder’s tax basis in those common units, even if the price received is less than
the unitholder’s original cost.  A substantial portion of the amount realized, whether or not representing gain, may be taxed as
ordinary income due to potential recapture items such as depreciation.  In addition, because the amount realized may include a
unitholder’s share of our nonrecourse liabilities, a unitholder that sells common units may incur a tax liability in excess of the
amount of the cash received from the sale.
Tax-exempt entities and non-U.S. persons face unique tax issues from owning our common units that may result in adverse tax
consequences to them.
Investments in our common units by tax-exempt entities, such as individual retirement accounts (“IRAs”) or other retirement plans,
and non-U.S. persons raise issues unique to them.  For example, virtually all of our income allocated to unitholders who are
organizations exempt from federal income tax, including IRAs and other retirement plans, will be unrelated business taxable
income and will be taxable to them.  Distributions to non-U.S. persons will be reduced by withholding taxes at the highest
applicable effective tax rate, and non-U.S. persons will be required to file U.S. federal income tax returns and pay tax on their share
of our taxable income.  Additionally, gain recognized by a non-U.S. person on the sale of common units occurring on or after
November 27, 2017, will generally be treated as effectively connected income and subject to U.S. federal income tax. Although
sales of common units by non-U.S. persons occurring after December 31, 2017, are also subject to withholding taxes under the Tax
Act, Notice 2018-08 provides that withholding is not required with respect to such sales until regulations or other guidance has
been issued by the IRS.  A unitholder that is a tax-exempt entity or a non-U.S. person should consult a tax advisor before investing
in our common units.
We treat each purchaser of our common units as having the same tax benefits without regard to the common units
purchased.  The IRS may challenge this treatment, which could adversely affect the value of our common units.
Because we cannot match transferors and transferees of common units, we adopt depreciation and amortization positions that may
not conform to all aspects of existing Treasury Regulations.  A successful IRS challenge to those positions could adversely affect
the amount of tax benefits available to a common unitholder.  It also could affect the timing of these tax benefits or the amount of
gain from a sale of common units and could have a negative impact on the value of our common units or result in audit adjustments
to the unitholder’s tax returns.
57
Table of Contents
Our common unitholders will likely be subject to state and local taxes and return filing requirements in states where they do not
live as a result of an investment in our common units.
In addition to federal income taxes, our common unitholders will likely be subject to other taxes, such as state and local income
taxes, unincorporated business taxes and estate, inheritance or intangible taxes imposed by the various jurisdictions in which we do
business or own property now or in the future, even if the unitholder does not live in any of those jurisdictions.  Our common
unitholders will likely be required to file state and local income tax returns and pay state and local income taxes in some or all of
these various jurisdictions.  Further, our unitholders may be subject to penalties for failure to comply with those requirements.  We
currently own property or conduct business in a substantial number of states, many of which impose an income tax on individuals,
corporations and other entities.  As we make acquisitions or expand our business, we may control assets or conduct business in
additional states that impose a personal or corporate income tax.  It is the responsibility of each unitholder to file its own federal,
state and local tax returns, as applicable.
A unitholder whose common units are the subject of a securities loan (e.g., a loan to a “short seller” to cover a short sale of
common units) may be considered as having disposed of those common units.  If so, the unitholder would no longer be treated
for tax purposes as a partner with respect to those common units during the period of the loan and may recognize gain or loss
from the disposition.
Because there are no specific rules governing the U.S. federal income tax consequence of loaning a partnership interest, a
unitholder whose common units are the subject of a securities loan may be considered to have disposed of the loaned units.  In that
case, the unitholder may no longer be treated for tax purposes as a partner with respect to those common units during the period of
the loan and the unitholder may recognize gain or loss from such disposition.  Moreover, during the period of the loan, any of our
income, gain, loss or deduction with respect to those common units may not be reportable by the unitholder and any cash
distributions received by the unitholder as to those common units could be fully taxable as ordinary income.  Unitholders desiring
to assure their status as partners and avoid the risk of gain recognition from a securities loan are urged to consult a tax advisor to
determine whether it is advisable to modify any applicable brokerage account agreements to prohibit their brokers from lending
their common units.
We have adopted certain valuation methodologies in determining a unitholder’s allocations of income, gain, loss and
deduction.  The IRS may challenge these methods or the resulting allocations and such a challenge could adversely affect the
value of our common units.
In determining the items of income, gain, loss and deduction allocable to our unitholders, we must routinely determine the fair
market value of our respective assets.  Although we may from time to time consult with professional appraisers regarding valuation
matters, we make fair market value estimates using a methodology based on the market value of our common units as a means to
measure the fair market value of our respective assets.  The IRS may challenge these valuation methods and the resulting
allocations of income, gain, loss and deduction.
A successful IRS challenge to these methods or allocations could adversely affect the amount, character, and timing of taxable
income or loss being allocated to our unitholders.  It also could affect the amount of gain from our unitholders’ sale of common
units and could have a negative impact on the value of the common units or result in audit adjustments to our unitholders’ tax
returns without the benefit of additional deductions.
ITEM 1B.  UNRESOLVED SEC STAFF COMMENTS.
None.
58
Table of Contents
ITEM 3.  LEGAL PROCEEDINGS.
As part of our normal business activities, we may be named as defendants in legal proceedings, including those arising from
regulatory and environmental matters.  Although we are insured against various risks to the extent we believe it is prudent, there is
no assurance that the nature and amount of such insurance will be adequate, in every case, to fully indemnify us against losses
arising from future legal proceedings.  We will vigorously defend the partnership in litigation matters.  Except as set forth below,
we are not aware of any material pending legal proceedings as of the filing date of this annual report to which we are a party, other
than routine litigation incidental to our business.
Energy Transfer Matter
In connection with a proposed pipeline project, we and ETP signed a non-binding letter of intent in April 2011 that disclaimed any
partnership or joint venture related to such project absent executed definitive documents and board approvals of the respective
companies.  Definitive agreements were never executed and board approval was never obtained for the potential pipeline
project.  In August 2011, the proposed pipeline project was cancelled due to a lack of customer support.
In September 2011, ETP filed suit against us and a third party in connection with the cancelled project alleging, among other things,
that we and ETP had formed a “partnership.”  The case was tried in the District Court of Dallas County, Texas, 298th Judicial
District.  While we firmly believe, and argued during our defense, that no agreement was ever executed forming a legal joint
venture or partnership between the parties, the jury found that the actions of the two companies, nevertheless, constituted a legal
partnership.  As a result, the jury found that ETP was wrongfully excluded from a subsequent pipeline project involving a third
party, and awarded ETP $319.4 million in actual damages on March 4, 2014.  On July 29, 2014, the trial court entered judgment
against us in an aggregate amount of $535.8 million, which included (i) $319.4 million as the amount of actual damages awarded
by the jury, (ii) an additional $150.0 million in disgorgement for the alleged benefit we received due to a breach of fiduciary duties
by us against ETP and (iii) prejudgment interest in the amount of $66.4 million.  The trial court also awarded post-judgment interest
on such aggregate amount, to accrue at a rate of 5%, compounded annually.
We filed our Brief of the Appellant in the Court of Appeals for the Fifth District of Dallas, Texas on March 30, 2015 and ETP filed
its Brief of Appellees on June 29, 2015.  We filed our Reply Brief of Appellant on September 18, 2015.  Oral argument was
conducted on April 20, 2016, and the case was then submitted to the Court of Appeals for its consideration.  On July 18, 2017, a
panel of the Court of Appeals issued a unanimous opinion reversing the trial court’s judgment as to all of ETP’s claims against
Enterprise, rendering judgment that ETP take nothing on those claims, and affirming Enterprise’s counterclaim against ETP of $0.8
million, plus interest.
On August 31, 2017, ETP filed a motion for rehearing before the Dallas Court of Appeals, which was denied on September 13,
2017.  On December 27, 2017, ETP filed its Petition for Review with the Supreme Court of Texas and we filed our Response to the
Petition for Review on February 26, 2018.  On June 8, 2018, the Supreme Court of Texas requested that the parties file briefs on the
merits, and the parties have filed their respective submittals.  As of December 31, 2018, we have not recorded a provision for this
matter as management continues to believe that payment of damages by us in this case is not probable. We continue to monitor
developments involving this matter.
PDH Litigation
In July 2013, we executed a contract with Foster Wheeler USA Corporation (“Foster Wheeler”) pursuant to which Foster Wheeler
was to serve as the general contractor responsible for the engineering, procurement, construction and installation of our PDH
facility.  In November 2014, Foster Wheeler was acquired by an affiliate of AMEC plc to form Amec Foster Wheeler plc, and
Foster Wheeler is now known as Amec Foster Wheeler USA Corporation (“AFW”).  In December 2015, Enterprise and AFW
entered into a transition services agreement under which AFW was partially terminated from the PDH project.  In December 2015,
Enterprise engaged a second contractor, Optimized Process Designs LLC (“OPD”), to complete the construction and installation of
the PDH facility.
59
Table of Contents
On September 2, 2016, we terminated AFW for cause and filed a lawsuit in the 151st Judicial Civil District Court of Harris County,
Texas against AFW and its parent company, Amec Foster Wheeler plc, asserting claims for breach of contract, breach of warranty,
fraudulent inducement, string-along fraud, gross negligence, professional negligence, negligent misrepresentation and attorneys’
fees.  We intend to diligently prosecute these claims and seek all direct, consequential, and exemplary damages to which we may be
entitled.
Environmental Matters
On occasion, we are assessed monetary penalties by governmental authorities related to administrative or judicial proceedings
involving environmental matters.  In December 2017, we received a Notice of Enforcement from the Texas Commission on
Environmental Quality associated with historical self-disclosed violations that occurred at our Mont Belvieu complex. The eventual
resolution of these matters may result in monetary sanctions in excess of $0.1 million.  We do not expect such expenditures to be
material to our consolidated financial statements.
ITEM 4.  MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES.
Not applicable.
60
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 5.  MARKET FOR REGISTRANT’S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED UNITHOLDER MATTERS
AND ISSUER PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
Our common units are listed on the NYSE under the ticker symbol “EPD.”  As of January 31, 2019, there were 2,445 unitholders of
record of our common units.  For information regarding our quarterly cash distributions to partners, see Note 8 of the Notes to
Consolidated Financial Statements included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report.
Recent Issuance of Unregistered Securities
On April 5, 2018, we issued 1,223,242 common units to an unaffiliated third party in a private placement exempt from the
registration requirements of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (pursuant to Section 4(a)(2) thereof), in connection with our
acquisition of land in the Houston, Texas area.  The agreement pursuant to which we issued these common units contained
customary representations, warranties and covenants, including the certification of facts relating to the availability of the exemption
described above.
Other than as described above, there were no issuances of unregistered equity securities during 2018.
Common Units Authorized for Issuance Under Equity Compensation Plan
See “Securities Authorized for Issuance Under Equity Compensation Plans” included under Part III, Item 12 of this annual report,
which is incorporated by reference into this Item 5.
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
The following table summarizes our equity repurchase activity during the fourth quarter of 2018:
Period  Total Number
of Units
Purchased  Average
Price Paid
per Unit  Total Number
of
Units
Purchased
as Part of
Publicly
Announced
Programs  Maximum
Number of
Units
That May Yet
Be Purchased
Under the
Programs 
Vesting of phantom unit awards:         --   -- 
   October 2018   --   --   --   -- 
   November 2018 (1)   11,161  $ 26.98   --   -- 
   December 2018   --   --   --   -- 
Common Unit Buyback Program:                 
   October 2018   --   --   --   1,236,800 
   November 2018   --   --   --   1,236,800 
   December 2018 (2)   1,236,800  $ 24.92   1,236,800   -- 
  
(1) Of the 42,290 phantom unit awards that vested in November 2018 and converted to common units, 11,161 units were sold back to us by employees to
cover related withholding tax requirements. We cancelled these treasury units immediately upon acquisition.
(2) In December 1998, we announced a common unit buyback, or repurchase, program whereby we, together with certain affiliates, could repurchase up to
4,000,000 of our common units on the open market. We purchased the remaining authorized amount of 1,236,800 common units in December 2018. We
cancelled these treasury units immediately upon acquisition.  
In January 2019, we announced that the Board of Enterprise GP had approved a $2.0 billion multi-year unit buyback program,
which provides the partnership with an additional method to return capital to investors. The program authorizes the partnership to
repurchase its common units from time to time, including through open market purchases and negotiated transactions.  The timing
and pace of buy backs under the program will be determined by a number of factors including (i) our financial performance and
flexibility, (ii) organic growth and acquisition opportunities with higher potential returns on investment, (iii) our unit price and
implied distributable cash flow yield and (iv) maintaining targeted financial leverage with a debt-to-normalized EBITDA, or
earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, ratio in the 3.5 times area.  No time limit has been set for completion
of the buyback program, and the program may be suspended or discontinued at any time.
61
Table of Contents
ITEM 6.  SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA.
The following table presents selected historical consolidated financial data of our partnership.  This information has been derived
from and should be read in conjunction with our audited financial statements included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report. 
As presented in the table, amounts are in millions (except per unit data).
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016   2015   2014  
Statement of operations data:                
Total revenues  $ 36,534.2  $ 29,241.5  $ 23,022.3  $ 27,027.9  $ 47,951.2 
Cost of sales   26,789.8   21,487.0   15,710.9   19,612.9   40,464.1 
Other costs and expenses   4,815.8   4,251.6   4,092.7   4,248.4   3,970.9 
Operating income   5,408.6   3,928.9   3,580.7   3,540.2   3,775.7 
Net income   4,238.5   2,855.6   2,553.0   2,558.4   2,833.5 
Net income attributable to limited partners   4,172.4   2,799.3   2,513.1   2,521.2   2,787.4 
Earnings per unit:                     
Basic ($/unit)   1.91   1.30   1.20   1.28   1.51 
Diluted ($/unit)   1.91   1.30   1.20   1.26   1.47 
                     
Cash distributions per unit with respect to year   1.7250   1.6825   1.6100   1.5300   1.4500 
                     
  At December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016   2015   2014  
Balance sheet data:                     
Property, plant and equipment, net  $ 38,737.6  $ 35,620.4  $ 33,292.5  $ 32,034.7  $ 29,881.6 
Total assets   56,969.8   54,418.1   52,194.0   48,802.2   47,057.7 
Long-term debt, including current maturities   26,178.2   24,568.7   23,697.7   22,540.8   21,220.5 
Total liabilities   32,677.6   31,645.7   29,928.0   28,301.1   27,365.5 
Total equity   24,292.2   22,772.4   22,266.0   20,501.1   19,692.2 
                     
Limited partner units outstanding (millions)   2,184.9   2,161.1   2,117.6   2,012.6   1,937.3 
Fluctuations in our consolidated revenues and cost of sales amounts are explained in large part by changes in energy commodity
prices.  Energy commodity prices fluctuate for a variety of reasons, including supply and demand imbalances and geopolitical
tensions.  For additional information regarding energy commodity prices, see “Selected Energy Commodity Price Data” included
under Part II, Item 7 of this annual report.  General information regarding our results of operations can also be found under Part II,
Item 7 of this annual report.
Our property, plant and equipment amounts increased over the last five years primarily due to investments in growth capital
projects.   For information regarding our capital investment program, see “Capital Investments” included under Part II, Item 7 of
this annual report.
Debt increased over the last five years primarily due to the funding of a portion of our capital investments using borrowings under
bank credit agreements and the issuance of short- and long-term notes.  For information regarding our debt, see Note 7 of the Notes
to Consolidated Financial Statements included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report.
Our equity balances, along with the number of common units outstanding, increased in each of the years presented due to the
issuance of units in connection with our at-the-market program, distribution reinvestment plan and employee unit purchase plan.
Net proceeds generated from the sale of common units were used to fund a portion of our capital investments.
62
Table of Contents
ITEM 7.  MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF
OPERATIONS.
For the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016
The following information should be read in conjunction with our Consolidated Financial Statements and accompanying notes
included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report.  Our financial statements have been prepared in accordance with generally
accepted accounting principles (“GAAP”) in the United States (“U.S.”).
Key References Used in this Management’s Discussion and Analysis
Unless the context requires otherwise, references to “we,” “us,” “our,” “Enterprise” or “Enterprise Products Partners” are intended
to mean the business and operations of Enterprise Products Partners L.P. and its consolidated subsidiaries.  References to “EPO”
mean Enterprise Products Operating LLC, which is a wholly owned subsidiary of Enterprise, and its consolidated subsidiaries,
through which Enterprise Products Partners L.P. conducts its business.  Enterprise is managed by its general partner, Enterprise
Products Holdings LLC (“Enterprise GP”), which is a wholly owned subsidiary of Dan Duncan LLC, a privately held Texas limited
liability company.
The membership interests of Dan Duncan LLC are owned by a voting trust, the current trustees (“DD LLC Trustees”) of which are:
(i) Randa Duncan Williams, who is also a director and Chairman of the Board of Directors (the “Board”) of Enterprise GP; (ii)
Richard H. Bachmann, who is also a director and Vice Chairman of the Board of Enterprise GP; and (iii) Dr. Ralph S. Cunningham,
who is also an advisory director of Enterprise GP.  Ms. Duncan Williams and Mr. Bachmann also currently serve as managers of
Dan Duncan LLC along with W. Randall Fowler, who is also a director and the President and Chief Financial Officer of Enterprise
GP.
References to “EPCO” mean Enterprise Products Company, a privately held Texas corporation, and its privately held affiliates.  A
majority of the outstanding voting capital stock of EPCO is owned by a voting trust, the current trustees (“EPCO Trustees”) of
which are:  (i) Ms. Duncan Williams, who serves as Chairman of EPCO; (ii) Dr. Cunningham, who serves as Vice Chairman of
EPCO; and (iii) Mr. Bachmann, who serves as the President and Chief Executive Officer of EPCO.  Ms. Duncan Williams and Mr.
Bachmann also currently serve as directors of EPCO along with Mr. Fowler, who is also the Executive Vice President and Chief
Financial Officer of EPCO. EPCO, together with its privately held affiliates, owned approximately 31.9% of our limited partner
interests at December 31, 2018.
As generally used in the energy industry and in this annual report, the acronyms below have the following meanings:
/d =per day MMBbls=million barrels
BBtus=billion British thermal unitsMMBPD=million barrels per day
Bcf =billion cubic feet MMBtus=million British thermal units
BPD =barrels per day MMcf =million cubic feet
MBPD=thousand barrels per day TBtus =trillion British thermal units
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT REGARDING FORWARD-LOOKING INFORMATION
This annual report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2018 (our “annual report”) contains various forward-looking
statements and information that are based on our beliefs and those of our general partner, as well as assumptions made by us and
information currently available to us.  When used in this document, words such as “anticipate,” “project,” “expect,” “plan,”
“seek,” “goal,” “estimate,” “forecast,” “intend,” “could,” “should,” “would,” “will,” “believe,” “may,” “potential” and
similar expressions and statements regarding our plans and objectives for future operations are intended to identify forward-
looking statements.  Although we and our general partner believe that our expectations reflected in such forward-looking
statements are reasonable, neither we nor our general partner can give any assurances that such expectations will prove to be
correct.  Forward-looking statements are subject to a variety of risks, uncertainties and assumptions as described in more detail
under Part I, Item 1A of this annual report.  If one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or if underlying assumptions
prove incorrect, our actual results may vary materially from those anticipated, estimated, projected or expected.  You should not put
undue reliance on any forward-looking statements.  The forward-looking statements in this annual report speak only as of the date
hereof.  Except as required by federal and state securities laws, we undertake no obligation
63
Table of Contents
to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or any other
reason.
Overview of Business
We are a publicly traded Delaware limited partnership, the common units of which are listed on the New York Stock Exchange
(“NYSE”) under the ticker symbol “EPD.”  We were formed in April 1998 to own and operate certain natural gas liquids (“NGLs”)
related businesses of EPCO and are a leading North American provider of midstream energy services to producers and consumers
of natural gas, NGLs, crude oil, petrochemicals and refined products. 
Our integrated midstream energy asset network links producers of natural gas, NGLs and crude oil from some of the largest supply
basins in the U.S., Canada and the Gulf of Mexico with domestic consumers and international markets.  Our midstream energy
operations currently include: natural gas gathering, treating, processing, transportation and storage; NGL transportation,
fractionation, storage, and export and import terminals (including those used to export liquefied petroleum gases, or “LPG,” and
ethane); crude oil gathering, transportation, storage, and export and import terminals; petrochemical and refined products
transportation, storage, export and import terminals, and related services; and a marine transportation business that operates
primarily on the U.S. inland and Intracoastal Waterway systems. Our assets currently include approximately 49,200 miles of
pipelines; 260 MMBbls of storage capacity for NGLs, crude oil, petrochemicals and refined products; and 14 Bcf of natural gas
storage capacity.    
The safe operation of our assets is a top priority.  We are committed to protecting the environment and the health and safety of the
public and those working on our behalf by conducting our business activities in a safe and environmentally responsible manner. 
For additional information, see “Environmental, Safety and Conservation” within the Regulatory Matters section of Part I, Items 1
and 2 of this annual report.
We conduct substantially all of our business through EPO and are owned 100% by our limited partners from an economic
perspective.  Enterprise GP manages our partnership and owns a non-economic general partner interest in us.  We, Enterprise GP,
EPCO and Dan Duncan LLC are affiliates under the collective common control of the DD LLC Trustees and the EPCO Trustees. 
Like many publicly traded partnerships, we have no employees.  All of our management, administrative and operating functions are
performed by employees of EPCO pursuant to an administrative services agreement (the “ASA”) or by other service providers.
Our operations are reported under four business segments:  (i) NGL Pipelines & Services, (ii) Crude Oil Pipelines & Services, (iii)
Natural Gas Pipelines & Services, and (iv) Petrochemical & Refined Products Services.  Our business segments are generally
organized and managed according to the types of services rendered (or technologies employed) and products produced and/or sold.
Each of our business segments benefits from the supporting role of our related marketing activities.  The main purpose of our
marketing activities is to support the utilization and expansion of assets across our midstream energy asset network by increasing
the volumes handled by such assets, which results in additional fee-based earnings for each business segment.  In performing these
support roles, our marketing activities also seek to participate in supply and demand opportunities as a supplemental source of gross
operating margin, a non-generally accepted accounting principle (“non-GAAP”) financial measure, for the partnership.  The
financial results of our marketing efforts fluctuate due to changes in volumes handled and overall market conditions, which are
influenced by current and forward market prices for the products bought and sold.
Our results of operations and financial condition are subject to certain significant risks.  Factors that can affect the demand for our
products and services include domestic and international economic conditions, the market price and demand for energy, the cost to
develop natural gas and crude oil reserves in the U.S., federal and state regulation, the cost and availability of capital to energy
companies to invest in upstream exploration and production activities and the credit quality of our customers.  For information
regarding such risks, see Part I, Item 1A of this annual report.
In addition, our business activities are subject to various federal, state and local laws and regulations governing a wide variety of
topics, including commercial, operational, environmental and other matters.  For a discussion of the principal effects of such laws
and regulations on our business activities, see “Regulatory Matters” included under Part I, Items 1 and 2 of this annual report.
64
Table of Contents
Significant Recent Developments
Enterprise Begins Service on the Shin Oak NGL Pipeline
In April 2017, we announced plans to build the 658-mile Shin Oak NGL Pipeline to transport growing NGL production from the
Permian Basin to our NGL fractionation and storage complex located at the Mont Belvieu hub.  The Mont Belvieu area in
Chambers County, Texas, with its significant energy-related infrastructure, is a key hub of the global NGL industry (the “Mont
Belvieu hub”). In February 2019, the 24-inch diameter mainline segment of the Shin Oak NGL Pipeline from Orla, Texas to Mont
Belvieu was placed into limited commercial service with an initial transportation capacity of 250 MBPD.  Completion of the related
20-inch diameter Waha lateral is scheduled for the second quarter of 2019.  Supported by long-term customer commitments, the
Shin Oak NGL Pipeline will ultimately provide up to 550 MBPD of transportation capacity, which is expected to be available in the
fourth quarter of 2019.
In May 2018, Apache Corporation (“Apache”) executed a long-term supply agreement to sell all of its NGL production from the
Alpine High discovery to us. Alpine High is a major hydrocarbon resource located in the Delaware Basin that encompasses rich and
dry natural gas and oil-bearing horizons.  Apache holds approximately 336,000 net acres in the Alpine High discovery.  Enterprise
has committed to purchase up to 205 MBPD of NGLs from Apache over the initial ten-year term of the supply agreement, the term
of which may be extended at the consent of the parties.
In conjunction with the long-term NGL supply agreement, we granted Apache an option to acquire up to a 33% equity interest in
our subsidiary that owns the Shin Oak NGL Pipeline.  In November 2018, Apache contributed this option to Altus Midstream
Company, which is a majority-owned subsidiary of Apache. The option is exercisable within sixty days after certain completion
milestones are met (as defined in the underlying agreements), which we expect to occur in the second quarter of 2019.
Enterprise Announces $2 Billion Unit Buyback Program; Provides 2019 Distribution Guidance
In January 2019, we announced that the Board of Enterprise GP had approved a $2.0 billion multi-year unit buyback program,
which provides the partnership with an additional method to return capital to investors. The program authorizes the partnership to
repurchase its common units from time to time, including through open market purchases and negotiated transactions.  The timing
and pace of buy backs under the program will be determined by a number of factors including (i) our financial performance and
flexibility, (ii) organic growth and acquisition opportunities with higher potential returns on investment, (iii) our unit price and
implied distributable cash flow yield and (iv) maintaining targeted financial leverage with a debt-to-normalized adjusted EBITDA,
or earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, ratio in the 3.5 times area.  No time limit has been set for
completion of the buyback program, and the program may be suspended or discontinued at any time.
Also, based on current expectations, management announced its plans to continue to recommend to the Board an increase of
$0.0025 per unit per quarter to our cash distribution rate with respect to 2019. The anticipated rate of increase would result in
distributions for 2019 (of $1.7650 per unit) being 2.3% higher than those paid for 2018 (of $1.7250 per unit).  The payment of any
quarterly cash distribution is subject to Board approval and management’s evaluation of our financial condition, results of
operations and cash flows in connection with such payment.
Service Begins on the Midland-to-ECHO 2 Pipeline System
The Midland-to-ECHO 2 Pipeline System, which began limited commercial service in February 2019, provides us with
approximately 200 MBPD of incremental crude oil transportation capacity from the Permian Basin to markets in the Houston area. 
The pipeline is expected to enter full commercial service in April 2019.  The pipeline originates at our Midland terminal and
extends 440 miles to our Sealy terminal, with volumes arriving at Sealy transported to our ECHO terminal using the Rancho II
pipeline, which is a component of our South Texas Crude Oil Pipeline System.
We converted a portion of our Seminole NGL Pipeline system from NGL service to crude oil service to create the Midland-to-Sealy
segment of this pipeline system.  The conversion is supported by a 10.75-year transportation contract with firm demand fees.  The
conversion does not reduce our NGL transportation capacity since displaced NGLs are transported using our other NGL pipelines,
including our Shin Oak NGL Pipeline. Furthermore, we have the ability to convert this pipeline back to NGL service should market
and physical takeaway conditions warrant.
65
Table of Contents
Enterprise Increasing NGL Fractionation Capacity in Texas and Louisiana
The demand for NGL fractionation capacity continues to expand as producers in domestic shale plays like the Permian Basin, Eagle
Ford and Denver-Julesburg (“DJ”) Basin seek market access and end users require supply assurance.  In light of this ongoing trend,
we are constructing a new NGL fractionation facility in Chambers County, Texas adjacent to our existing Mont Belvieu NGL
fractionation complex.  The new facility will consist of two fractionation trains capable of processing a combined 300 MBPD of
NGLs.  The first of the two fractionation trains will have a nameplate capacity of 150 MBPD and is scheduled to be completed and
begin service in the fourth quarter of 2019. The second of these fractionation trains will also have a nameplate capacity of 150
MBPD, and is scheduled to begin service in the first half of 2020.
In November 2018, we announced a project to optimize our Shoup NGL fractionator located in Nueces County, Texas by
expanding and repurposing a portion of our South Texas pipelines.  This project would entail the construction of approximately 21
miles of new pipeline along with the conversion of approximately 65 miles of existing natural gas pipelines to NGL service, which
will allow us to supply Shoup with an additional 25 MBPD of NGL volumes.  The expanded pipeline capacity is expected to be
available in the third quarter of 2019.
We restarted our Tebone NGL fractionator located in Ascension Parish, Louisiana in February 2019. Tebone has a fractionation
capacity of 30 MBPD and is connected by pipeline to each of our Louisiana natural gas processing plants, as well as our Mont
Belvieu storage complex.  The resumption of service at Tebone complements our operations at the Norco and Promix NGL
fractionators and provides us with another processing option for NGLs delivered to the Mont Belvieu hub.
The construction of our new 300 MBPD NGL fractionation facility at our Mont Belvieu NGL fractionation complex, the
optimization of our Shoup facility and restart of our Tebone fractionator highlights the flexibility of our integrated midstream
network and provides a timely, efficient and cost-effective solution for accommodating growing production from domestic shale
basins.  Once these projects are fully complete, total NGL fractionation capacity across our network would increase to
approximately 1.1 MMBPD in the Mont Belvieu area, and approximately 1.5 MMBPD company-wide.
Enterprise Begins Construction of Seventh Natural Gas Processing Plant in Delaware Basin;
   Second Train at Orla Natural Gas Processing Plant Begins Service
In October 2018, we announced that construction of our Mentone cryogenic natural gas processing plant had commenced.  The
Mentone plant, which is located in Loving County, Texas, is expected to have the capacity to process 300 MMcf/d of natural gas
and extract in excess of 40 MBPD of NGLs.  The project is scheduled to be completed in the first quarter of 2020 and is supported
by a long-term acreage dedication agreement.  The Mentone plant further extends our presence in the growing Delaware Basin and
provides access to our fully integrated midstream asset network serving domestic and international markets. To support
development of the Mentone plant, we are constructing approximately 70 miles of gathering and residue pipelines and expanding
compression capabilities.  These projects will allow the Mentone plant to link to our NGL system, including the Shin Oak NGL
Pipeline which entered limited commercial service in February 2019, as well as our Texas Intrastate System.  We will own and
operate the Mentone facility and related infrastructure.
The Mentone plant will complement our existing cryogenic natural gas processing plant located near Orla, Texas in Reeves
County.   In May 2018 and October 2018, we commenced operations of the first and second processing trains (Orla I and Orla II),
respectively, at the facility.  A third processing train (Orla III) is scheduled to be completed in the second quarter of 2019.  We own
and operate the Orla facility.  In conjunction with the start-up of Orla I, we placed into service approximately 70 miles of natural
gas pipelines that connect the Orla facility to our Texas Intrastate System.   We also placed into service a 30-mile extension of our
NGL system that provides producers at the Orla facility with NGL takeaway capacity and direct access to our integrated network of
downstream NGL assets.
When the Mentone plant is completed and placed into service, we expect to have an aggregate 1.6 Bcf/d of natural gas processing
capacity and 250 MBPD of NGL production from our processing plants in the Delaware Basin.
66
Table of Contents
CME Group Launches Physical West Texas Intermediate (“WTI”) Houston Crude Oil Futures Contract
In September 2018, the CME Group, a leading derivatives marketplace, announced that suppliers, refiners and end users of U.S.
crude oil have a new way to price and hedge WTI in Houston, Texas.  Participants will have the flexibility to make or take delivery
of WTI at our ECHO terminal, Enterprise Hydrocarbons Terminal (“EHT”) or pipeline interconnect at Genoa Junction. The new
futures contracts received regulatory approval in October 2018 and are listed with and subject to the rules of the New York
Mercantile Exchange (“NYMEX”), beginning with the January 2019 contract month.
Enterprise Expanding LPG Capacity at Houston Ship Channel Terminal
In September 2018, we announced a project to increase LPG loading capacity at EHT by 175 MBPD, or approximately 5 MMBbls
per month.  The expansion will bring our total LPG export capacity at EHT to 720 MBPD, or approximately 21 MMBbls per
month. Upon completion of this expansion project, EHT will have the capability to load up to six Very Large Gas Carrier
(“VLGC”) vessels simultaneously, while maintaining the option to switch between loading propane and butane. Once operational,
the expansion will allow EHT to load a single VLGC in less than 24 hours, creating greater efficiencies and cost savings for our
customers. The incremental loading capacity is expected to be available in the third quarter of 2019.
Enterprise to Develop Offshore Texas Crude Oil Export Terminal
In July 2018, management announced that we are in the planning stage to develop a crude oil export terminal located offshore
along the Texas Gulf Coast.  The terminal would be capable of fully loading Very Large Crude Carrier (“VLCC”) marine tankers,
which have capacities of approximately 2 MMBbls and provide the most efficient and cost-effective solution to export crude oil to
the largest international markets in Asia and Europe.   We started front-end engineering and design work for the terminal in 2018
and filed our application for regulatory permitting with the Maritime Administration (“MARAD”) in January 2019.   Based on
initial designs, the project could include pipelines extending from onshore facilities to an offshore terminal loading crude oil for
export at approximately 85,000 barrels per hour.   A final investment decision for the project will be subject to receiving state and
federal permits and customer demand.
Seaway Commences Loading Services for VLCC Tankers
In June 2018, we commenced the loading of VLCC tankers using a combination of our jointly owned Seaway marine terminal
located in Texas City, Texas and lightering operations in the Gulf of Mexico.  Approximately 1.1 MMBbls of crude oil were loaded
onto the FPMC C Melody at the Texas City marine terminal and the remainder of the crude oil shipment was loaded on the VLCC
in a lightering zone in the Gulf of Mexico.  The FPMC C Melody, chartered by Vitol, Inc., was the first VLCC to be loaded at a
Texas port.  The Seaway marine terminal features two docks, a 45-foot draft, an overall length of 1,125 feet, a 200-foot beam
(width) and the capacity to load crude oil at a rate of 35,000 barrels per hour.
Affiliate of Western Gas Acquires 20% Ownership Interest in Portion of Midland-to-ECHO 1 Pipeline System
In June 2018, an affiliate of Western Gas Partners, LP (“Western”) acquired a noncontrolling 20% equity interest in our subsidiary,
Whitethorn Pipeline Company LLC (“Whitethorn”), for $189.6 million in cash. Whitethorn owns the majority of our Midland-to-
ECHO 1 Pipeline System, which originates at our Midland terminal and extends 418 miles to our Sealy terminal. Volumes arriving
at Sealy are then transported to our ECHO terminal using our Rancho II pipeline. The Midland-to-ECHO 1 Pipeline System
provides Permian Basin producers with the ability to transport multiple grades of crude oil, including WTI, Light WTI, West Texas
Sour, and condensate, to Gulf Coast markets. As a result of operating enhancements and supplementary infrastructure, the
pipeline’s transportation capacity is expected to increase to 620 MBPD beginning in March 2019.  We report the pipeline’s
transportation volumes on a net basis that reflects our 80% interest.
Upon closing of the transaction whereby Western acquired its 20% equity interest in Whitethorn, we credited Western for 20% of
the pipeline’s earnings since it was placed into service in November 2017.  We paid Western $45.7 million in June 2018 to settle
this obligation.
67
Table of Contents
Construction Begins on Ethylene Export Dock
In May 2018, we announced that construction of our ethylene export terminal located at Morgan’s Point on the Houston Ship
Channel had commenced. When completed, the terminal, which we will operate, is expected to have an export capacity of
approximately 2.2 billion pounds of ethylene per year, with loading rates of 2.2 million pounds per hour, and feature on-site
refrigerated storage for 66 million pounds of ethylene. The project, which is underwritten by long-term customer commitments, is
expected to begin limited commercial service in the fourth quarter of 2019, with full operations expected in the fourth quarter of
2020 once certain refrigeration assets are complete.  We own a 50% equity interest in Enterprise Navigator Ethylene Terminal LLC,
which owns the export terminal.
Enterprise and Energy Transfer form Joint Venture to Restore Service on Old Ocean Pipeline
In May 2018, we announced the formation of a 50/50 joint venture with Energy Transfer Partners, L.P. (“ETP”) to resume full
service on the Old Ocean natural gas pipeline owned by ETP.  The 24-inch diameter Old Ocean Pipeline originates in Maypearl,
Texas in Ellis County and extends south approximately 240 miles to Sweeny, Texas in Brazoria County.  ETP serves as operator of
the pipeline, which has a natural gas transportation capacity of 160 MMcf/d.  Repairs were completed on the pipeline and it entered
full service in January 2019.  In addition, both parties expanded their jointly owned North Texas 36-inch diameter natural gas
pipeline, which is a component of our Texas Intrastate System. The expansion project was completed in January 2019 and provides
us with additional natural gas takeaway capacity of 150 MMcf/d from West Texas, including deliveries into the Old Ocean
Pipeline.  The resumption of full service on the Old Ocean Pipeline and expansion of the North Texas Pipeline provide producers
with additional takeaway capacity to accommodate growing natural gas production from the Delaware and Midland Basins.
Expansions of our Front Range and Texas Express Pipelines
In May 2018, we conducted open commitment periods to determine shipper interest in expansions of the Front Range Pipeline
(“Front Range”) and Texas Express Pipeline (“Texas Express”).  Given the positive responses we received from shippers, we are
proceeding with the expansion projects.  We own a 33.3% equity interest in Front Range and a 35% equity interest in Texas
Express.  We operate both pipelines.
The expansions are designed to facilitate growing production of NGLs from domestic shale basins, including the DJ Basin in
Colorado, by providing DJ Basin producers with flow assurance and greater access to the Gulf Coast markets.  The expansions are
expected to increase the transportation capacity of Front Range and Texas Express by 100 MBPD and 90 MBPD, respectively.  We
anticipate the expansion projects will be placed into service during the third quarter of 2019.
Acquisition of Remaining 50% Ownership Interest in Delaware Processing
In March 2018, we acquired the remaining 50% member interest in our Delaware Basin Gas Processing LLC (“Delaware
Processing”) joint venture for $150.6 million in cash, net of $3.9 million of cash held by the former joint venture.  Delaware
Processing owns a cryogenic natural gas processing facility (our “Waha” gas plant) having a capacity of 150 MMcf/d.  The Waha
plant is located in Reeves County, Texas and entered service in August 2016. The acquired business serves growing production of
NGL-rich natural gas from the Delaware Basin in West Texas and southern New Mexico. For information regarding this
acquisition, see Note 12 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report.
Enterprise to Expand Butane Isomerization Facility
In January 2018, we announced plans to expand our butane isomerization facility by up to 30 MBPD of incremental capacity.   The
expansion is supported by long-term agreements to provide butane isomerization, storage and related pipeline services.  We
currently expect this project to be completed during the fourth quarter of 2021.
68
Table of Contents
General Outlook for 2019
We provide midstream energy services to producers and consumers of natural gas, NGLs, crude oil, petrochemicals and refined
products. Our financial position, results of operations and cash flows are contingent on the supply of and demand for the energy
commodities we handle across our integrated midstream energy asset network.  The following information presents our views on
key midstream energy supply and demand fundamentals as they impact our operations going into 2019.
Supply Side Observations
The upstream energy industry, including major oil companies, continues to shift resources to shale supply basins.  We believe that
U.S. shale resources provide attractive economic benefits to producers due to their low risk and short lead time production profiles. 
Domestic shale resources will continue to play a key role in both U.S. and global markets, further supporting that the U.S. is a
major oil supplier on par with the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries (“OPEC”) and Russia.
During most of 2018, international energy commodity markets were supported as demand for crude oil was strong due to
expanding global economic activity, while crude oil supplies were viewed as balanced and maintained through a regime of
prescriptive supply cuts by OPEC and Russia.  As a result crude oil prices improved significantly: WTI averaged $50.86 per barrel
in 2017 and rose to $76.41 by early October 2018. Meanwhile, U.S. oil production rose steadily during that period averaging 9.4
MMBPD in 2017 and reached a record 11.8 MMBPD by December 2018.  Likewise, U.S. production of NGLs averaged 3.8
MMBPD in 2017 and increased to 4.7 MMBPD by November 2018, a new record as well.  U.S. crude oil and NGL production was
expected to average 10.9 MMBPD and 4.4 MBPD, respectively, in 2018.
However, beginning in October 2018, signs of weakness began emerging in global energy markets due to perceived overproduction
of crude oil and NGLs in the U.S. The impact of trade wars between the U.S., China and other developed economies, along with
potential signs of economic slowdown in many developing economies, started eroding confidence in global demand. Also, there
was uncertainty regarding how U.S. sanctions on Iran would be administered and their effect on Iranian oil exports.  As a result,
WTI oil prices tumbled from the high of $76.41 per barrel in early October 2018 to end the year at $45.41 per barrel, a decline of
41%.  WTI prices averaged $64.90 per barrel for all of 2018.
In response to the rapid decline in crude oil prices, OPEC and Russia agreed to cut their overall production by 1.2 MMBPD during
the first half of 2019, with 800 MBPD shouldered by OPEC and the remainder by Russia and other non-OPEC countries. All in all,
OPEC and Russia reduced their production in 2017, 2018 and into 2019 as they adjust to the new reality. The U.S. has now secured
its place as a major global oil supplier with production levels that match, if not surpass, Russia and Saudi Arabia. As such, the new
imperative for non-U.S. producers is the delicate balancing of U.S., OPEC (primarily Saudi Arabia) and Russian production, while
attempting to maintain crude oil prices at a level that ensures production doesn’t grow too fast, but not too low as to cause massive
fiscal deficits in oil producing nations that could threaten their political stability.
With the growth in domestic shale resources, U.S. natural gas production has increased significantly over the past few years with
production estimates of 89 Bcf/d at the end of 2018.  As a result, natural gas prices have been suppressed in recent years as a result
of strong domestic supplies exceeding demand, particularly for heating needs as recent average winter temperatures have been
warmer. As measured by the New York Mercantile Exchange (“NYMEX”) at Henry Hub, natural gas prices for 2018 ranged from a
high of $4.84 per MMBtu to a low of $2.55 per MMBtu, while averaging $3.07 per MMBtu.  We believe that natural gas prices for
2019 will continue in a similar range.  Natural gas production should be sufficient to meet both domestic and export demand,
regardless of periodic fluctuations in demand and prices attributable to weather events.
U.S. exploration and production companies have shown that they can grow shale production at crude oil prices approximating $50
per barrel and higher. Drilling technology continues to improve, which enables producers to drill and complete non-conventional
wells more efficiently.  These improvements include faster drilling techniques, longer horizontal well laterals, higher density
fracture treatments, and increased proppant concentration.  Given that crude oil prices in 2018 were supportive of production
growth, rig counts in the U.S. increased 17% during the year to 1,083
69
Table of Contents
at December 31, 2018.   However, not all regions have reacted equally to the recovery in rig counts, with the largest increases seen
in the Permian Basin (22% increase in 2018) and Eagle Ford Shale (14% increase in 2018).
As more wells were drilled in 2018, most shale basins experienced a shortage of completion equipment and crews, which forced
producers to defer completions and build their inventory of drilled but uncompleted wells (“DUCs”).  Rig counts plateaued during
the second half of 2018, whereas the DUC count increased by 17% during the same period.  The DUC count reached approximately
8,600 in December 2018 as reported by the U.S. Energy Information Administration (“EIA”), a 31% increase over the comparable
December 2017 amount.  More specifically, the Permian basin saw its DUC count increase 77% during 2018 as infrastructure
constraints persisted, especially during the third quarter of 2018.  The overall increase in DUCs represents a significant potential
volume that we believe could be brought into production starting in 2019.  We believe that NGL production will benefit
disproportionately as these wells are brought online as producers seek greater returns from pursuing rich natural gas at the expense
of dry gas wells, and from associated natural gas and NGLs produced in connection with higher crude oil production.
We operate in a number of major supply basins, including the Permian, Eagle Ford Shale, Haynesville Shale and Rockies.   The
following information represents our outlook for each of these basins:
§The Permian Basin in West Texas and southeastern New Mexico has experienced the largest increase in drilling activity in the
country, with 486 active rigs in December 2018.  The basin continues to have many advantages relative to other producing
regions, including stacked pay zones, light sweet crude oil and significant infrastructure.  Based on producer feedback and
forecasts, we believe that there is significant support for the construction of incremental midstream infrastructure in the basin.
An area of focus for us has been the development of midstream infrastructure serving producers in the Delaware Basin, which
is part of the overall Permian Basin. Historically, the Delaware Basin has been a relatively lightly drilled area due to a lack of
conventional targets.  However, with the introduction of horizontal drilling and identification of stacked targets of tight-rock
and shales, drilling in the Delaware Basin has accelerated over the past five years. These drilling targets have proven to
produce not only crude oil but condensate and NGLs, which present us a significant number of opportunities to provide
midstream services to producers. We are actively working with producers to identify those midstream infrastructure projects
that will best serve their needs and also complement our integrated asset network.
Two examples of our initiatives in the Delaware Basin are the Orla and Mentone natural gas processing plants.   During 2018,
we placed two processing trains (Orla I and II) into service at Orla with a third (Orla III) expected to be completed in the
second quarter of 2019. Once Orla III is completed, the Orla facility will have 900 MMcf/d of total processing capacity and
allow us to extract up to 120 MBPD of mixed NGLs.  Our Mentone facility was announced in October 2018 and is scheduled
to enter service during the first quarter of 2020. When the Mentone plant is completed and placed into service, we expect to
have an aggregate 1.6 Bcf/d of natural gas processing capacity and 250 MBPD of NGL production from our processing plants
in the Delaware Basin.
Our Midland-to-ECHO 1 Pipeline System, which became fully operational in the second quarter of 2018, provides Permian
Basin producers with the ability to transport multiple grades of crude oil on a segregated basis to Gulf Coast and international
markets, thus maintaining and assuring the quality and grade of the final product.  As a result of operating enhancements and
supplementary infrastructure, the transportation capacity of the Midland-to-ECHO 1 Pipeline System is expected to increase to
620 MBPD beginning in March 2019.  In addition, we placed our Midland-to-ECHO 2 Pipeline System into limited
commercial service in February 2019, with full service expected in April 2019.  The Midland-to-ECHO 2 Pipeline System
provides us with approximately 200 MBPD of incremental crude oil transportation capacity from the Permian Basin to markets
in the Houston area.
We are also evaluating several other natural gas, NGL and crude oil projects in the Permian Basin.
§Crude oil and natural gas production in the Eagle Ford Shale is increasing due to higher rig counts and improved drilling
efficiencies.  The number of drilling rigs in the Eagle Ford Shale increased to 81 active rigs in December 2018 compared to a
low of 29 rigs during the downturn in 2016.  According to the EIA Drilling Productivity Report, the most recent data
(December 2018) for production in the Eagle Ford Region was 1.4 MMBPD of crude oil and 7.0 Bcf/d of natural gas.
70
Table of Contents
Production acreage continues to change ownership in the Eagle Ford Shale, with over 1.5 million acres changing hands in 2018
and we expect this trend to continue. We believe that additional rigs will be brought to the basin as a result of the ownership
changes, which could result in higher volumes for our midstream network; however, until volumes for the basin exceed
historical peak production, there will likely be excess capacity of midstream infrastructure available in the region.  The
historical peak for Eagle Ford Region crude oil and natural gas production occurred in March 2015 and was 1.7 MMBPD and
7.4 Bcf/d, respectively.  We also believe that the Eagle Ford Shale offers producers some of the best returns on capital of any
region in the country due to its proximity to major consumption and export markets along the U.S. Gulf Coast and that
midstream companies like us, with deep integrated networks, will enjoy the greatest operating leverage as production
increases.
§Natural gas production in the Haynesville Shale is also increasing due to higher rig counts and improved drilling efficiencies.
The number of drilling rigs in the basin has increased from a low of 11 rigs in 2016 to 52 rigs in December 2018.  Like the
Eagle Ford Shale, we have seen several significant changes in the ownership of producing properties over the past year, which
has contributed to increased drilling activity in the region by the new owners.  The historical peak for natural gas production in
the Haynesville region occurred in 2011 and was over 10.5 Bcf/d. According to the December 2018 EIA Drilling Productivity
Report, Haynesville Region natural gas production was 9.8 Bcf/d.
The U.S. Geological Survey estimated in its 2017 assessment that the Haynesville Shale and the associated Bossier shale plays
hold a combined 304 trillion cubic feet of technically recoverable shale gas resources, the second highest level in the U.S. after
the Appalachia region.   The Haynesville Shale benefits from its close proximity to Gulf Coast markets where substantial
petrochemical and liquefied natural gas, or LNG, export projects are being constructed.  At expected natural gas price levels,
we estimate that natural gas production from the Haynesville Shale will continue to increase; however, until volumes for the
basin exceed historical peak production, there will likely be excess capacity of midstream infrastructure available in the region.
§With respect to oil and gas production in the Rocky Mountain region, rig counts have declined slightly in the Jonah and
Pinedale fields and are flat in the Piceance and San Juan basins.  Producers plan to continue horizontal drilling in the Jonah
field; however, horizontal drilling in the Pinedale field has generally been put on hold pending further study.  Drilling has
continued steadily in the Piceance field, with operators permitting the horizontal Williams Fork locations.  Additional resources
exist in the Piceance field in the deeper Mancos play, but it is currently not being developed.  There were several changes in
the ownership of producing properties in the San Juan basin this past year that are expected to lead to a modest increase in
drilling activity by the new owners.
The Rockies benefit from sufficient natural gas and NGL pipeline infrastructure, which helps the region compete with other
North American regions where production takeaway capacity may be constrained.  We believe that our Rocky Mountain assets
will continue to benefit regional producers by giving them access to major downstream markets such as the U.S. Gulf Coast
and export destinations.
With stable to higher energy commodity prices and continued improvements in drilling and completion technologies, we expect
continued strong investments, including both drilling and well completion activities, by producers during 2019 in and around our
assets in the Permian Basin, Eagle Ford Shale, Haynesville Shale and Rocky Mountain regions. Furthermore, we believe that our
assets in these areas are very competitive in providing midstream services. We also believe that production basins, along with
supporting midstream infrastructure such as our integrated network, located closest to prime markets on the U.S. Gulf Coast will
continue to be preferred by producers due to more favorable economics as compared to other more distant areas (mostly due to
lower transportation costs).
Demand Side Observations
Global economic growth continues to drive increasing demand for petroleum-based products.  In December 2018, the International
Energy Agency (“IEA”) reported that global demand for crude oil and NGLs grew by a combined 1.3 MMBPD in 2018 and expects
demand to grow by 1.4 MMBPD in 2019.  The IEA anticipates that overall demand for crude oil and NGLs by the countries
represented by the Organization for Economic Co-operation and Development (“OECD”) would decline by approximately 0.7
MMBPD between 2019 and 2023, while non-OECD demand would increase by 5 MMBPD over the same period.  The IEA expects
that petrochemicals will account for approximately 40% of the increase in global demand for crude oil and NGLs over this period.
71
Table of Contents
The North American “shale revolution” has made the U.S. the global, low-cost supplier of NGLs.  We expect this trend to continue
into 2019 and beyond supported by, among other things, the ability of U.S. shale producers to improve productivity and reduce
development costs, higher demand in developing economies for crude oil and related hydrocarbons, and regulatory changes
favoring the use of clean-burning fuels and low-sulfur hydrocarbons such as those found in domestic shale oil basins. We continue
to foresee a variety of long-term demand-side opportunities from these developments, including higher demand from a resurgent
U.S. petrochemical industry and increased exports of hydrocarbons (e.g., ethane, LPG and crude oil) to growing international
markets.
With respect to the domestic petrochemical industry, abundant supplies of shale-sourced ethane provides the U.S. with one of the
cheapest feedstocks available for ethylene production.  The American Chemistry Council estimates that over $200 billion is being
invested in domestic chemical production, with most of those investments tied directly to producing ethylene from cost-advantaged
U.S. ethane.  We believe that domestic demand for ethane is expected to continue growing as several new world-scale ethylene
plants begin operations in 2019 and on through the early 2020s.  Furthermore, virtually every ethane-consuming chemical plant in
the U.S. is in close proximity to our existing assets.
Of the new domestic chemical plants, four are currently operational and have a combined ethylene production capacity of 11.1
billion pounds per year and ethane consumption rate of approximately 310 MBPD.   An additional five plants are expected to enter
service in 2019, with a combined ethylene production capacity of 10.5 billion pounds per year and an ethane consumption rate of
approximately 295 MBPD, and another four in the early 2020s. The plants expected to enter service in the early 2020s are expected
to have a combined ethylene production capacity of 10.8 billion pounds per year and an ethane consumption rate of approximately
295 MBPD.  We also anticipate demand growth for ethane as a feedstock resulting from modifications made to other existing
domestic facilities (e.g., debottlenecking, furnace modifications, etc.).  As a result of the expected growth in U.S. ethylene
production capacity, we are constructing an ethylene export terminal located at Morgan’s Point on the Houston Ship Channel.  The
project, which is underwritten by long-term customer commitments, is expected to begin limited commercial service in the fourth
quarter of 2019, with full operations expected in the fourth quarter of 2020 once certain refrigeration assets are complete.
International demand for U.S. ethane is expected to remain robust in 2019, as ethane from domestic shale basins also offers the
global petrochemical industry a low-cost feedstock option plus supply diversification. Our Morgan’s Point Ethane Export Terminal,
the largest of its kind in the world, enables us to meet this demand and has an aggregate loading rate (nameplate capacity) of
approximately 10,000 barrels per hour of fully refrigerated ethane.
Ethane prices were volatile in 2018 primarily due to supply and demand imbalances attributable to infrastructure gaps (e.g., NGL
pipeline and fractionation capacity constraints). We, along with others in the midstream industry, are actively working to resolve
these constraints.  Overall, the industry expects to place over 1.8 MMBPD of pipeline capacity and 1.7 MMBPD of fractionation
capacity into service between 2019 through 2021. However, due to uncertainty regarding the exact start-up dates for several ethane-
oriented petrochemical plants, additional volatility in ethane prices cannot be ruled out in 2019.
We believe that U.S. exports of LPG to Asia, particularly China and India, and markets in Northwest Europe and Central and South
America will continue to be strong.  Per the EIA, U.S. LPG exports increased 9% in 2018 to 1,147 MBPD, based on data available
through November 2018, with volumes headed to Asian markets accounting for approximately 50% of this amount (substantially
all of which originated from our marine terminals).  Our outlook for LPG exports to Asia is supported by a number of factors
including: (i) continued economic expansion in emerging Asian markets; (ii) the widening of the Panama Canal, which was
completed in 2016; and (iii) favorable domestic policies in countries like India and Indonesia where the governments are
subsidizing the switch to LPG for domestic use as a means for reducing pollution and protecting against deforestation.  Due to our
expectation of continued growth in LPG exports, we announced a project to increase LPG loading capacity at EHT by 175 MBPD,
or approximately 5 MMBbls per month.  The incremental LPG loading capacity at EHT is expected to be available in the third
quarter of 2019.
72
Table of Contents
Finally, as crude oil production in the U.S. has increased, these new domestic barrels continue to supplant more of the U.S.’s crude
oil imports, while the remainder is exported to international markets in Central and South America, Asia and Western Europe where
the lighter U.S. crudes are used as feedstock in their refining facilities. We also expect U.S. refiners to continue to operate at high
rates as a result of steady U.S. demand and growing exports of refined products. We believe that our marine terminals and related
storage and pipeline infrastructure that handle crude oil and refined products are strategically located to meet the concurrent needs
of export and import customers. We have significant export capabilities on the Houston Ship Channel at EHT and at Beaumont,
Freeport and Texas City, Texas.
Selected Energy Commodity Price Data
The following table presents selected index prices for natural gas and selected NGL and petrochemical products for the periods
indicated:
                    Polymer  Refinery 
  Natural        Normal     Natural  Grade  Grade 
  Gas,  Ethane,  Propane,  Butane,  Isobutane,  Gasoline,  Propylene,  Propylene, 
  $/MMBtu  $/gallon  $/gallon  $/gallon  $/gallon  $/gallon  $/pound  $/pound 
  (1)  (2)  (2)  (2)  (2)  (2)  (3)  (3)
                                 
2016 Averages  $ 2.46  $ 0.20  $ 0.48  $ 0.65  $ 0.68  $ 0.94  $ 0.34  $ 0.21 
                                 
2017 by quarter:                                 
1st Quarter  $ 3.32  $ 0.23  $ 0.71  $ 0.98  $ 0.94  $ 1.10  $ 0.47  $ 0.32 
2nd Quarter  $ 3.19  $ 0.25  $ 0.63  $ 0.76  $ 0.75  $ 1.07  $ 0.41  $ 0.28 
3rd Quarter  $ 2.99  $ 0.26  $ 0.77  $ 0.91  $ 0.92  $ 1.10  $ 0.42  $ 0.28 
4th Quarter  $ 2.93  $ 0.25  $ 0.96  $ 1.04  $ 1.04  $ 1.32  $ 0.49  $ 0.35 
2017 Averages  $ 3.11  $ 0.25  $ 0.77  $ 0.92  $ 0.91  $ 1.15  $ 0.45  $ 0.31 
                                 
2018 by quarter:                                 
1st Quarter  $ 3.01  $ 0.25  $ 0.85  $ 0.96  $ 1.00  $ 1.41  $ 0.53  $ 0.33 
2nd Quarter  $ 2.80  $ 0.29  $ 0.87  $ 1.00  $ 1.20  $ 1.53  $ 0.52  $ 0.37 
3rd Quarter  $ 2.91  $ 0.43  $ 0.99  $ 1.21  $ 1.25  $ 1.54  $ 0.60  $ 0.45 
4th Quarter  $ 3.65  $ 0.35  $ 0.79  $ 0.91  $ 0.94  $ 1.22  $ 0.51  $ 0.35 
2018 Averages  $ 3.09  $ 0.33  $ 0.88  $ 1.02  $ 1.10  $ 1.43  $ 0.54  $ 0.38 
                                 
(1)       Natural gas prices are based on Henry-Hub Inside FERC commercial index prices as reported by Platts, which is a division of McGraw Hill Financial, Inc.
(2)      NGL prices for ethane, propane, normal butane, isobutane and natural gasoline are based on Mont Belvieu Non-TET commercial index prices as reported by
Oil Price Information Service.
(3)      Polymer grade propylene prices represent average contract pricing for such product as reported by IHS Chemical, a division of IHS Inc. (“IHS Chemical”).
Refinery grade propylene prices represent weighted-average spot prices for such product as reported by IHS Chemical.  
73
Table of Contents
The following table presents selected average index prices for crude oil for the periods indicated:
  WTI   Midland  Houston  LLS  
  Crude Oil,  Crude Oil,  Crude Oil  Crude Oil, 
  $/barrel  $/barrel  $/barrel  $/barrel 
  (1)  (2)  (2)  (3)
2016 Averages  $ 43.32  $ 43.25  $ 44.74  $ 44.88 
                 
2017 by quarter:                 
1st Quarter  $ 51.91  $ 51.72  $ 53.27  $ 53.52 
2nd Quarter  $ 48.28  $ 47.29  $ 49.77  $ 50.31 
3rd Quarter  $ 48.20  $ 47.37  $ 50.84  $ 51.62 
4th Quarter  $ 55.40  $ 55.47  $ 59.84  $ 61.07 
2017 Averages  $ 50.95  $ 50.44  $ 53.41  $ 54.13 
                 
2018 by quarter:                 
1st Quarter  $ 62.87  $ 62.51  $ 65.47  $ 65.79 
2nd Quarter  $ 67.88  $ 59.93  $ 72.38  $ 72.97 
3rd Quarter  $ 69.50  $ 55.28  $ 73.67  $ 74.28 
4th Quarter  $ 58.81  $ 53.64  $ 66.34  $ 66.20 
2018 Averages  $ 64.77  $ 57.84  $ 69.47  $ 69.81 
                 
(1) WTI prices are based on commercial index prices at Cushing, Oklahoma as measured by the NYMEX.
(2) Midland and Houston crude oil prices are based on commercial index prices as reported by Argus.
(3) Light Louisiana Sweet (“LLS”) prices are based on commercial index prices as reported by Platts.  
Fluctuations in our consolidated revenues and cost of sales amounts are explained in large part by changes in energy commodity
prices.  Energy commodity prices fluctuate for a variety of reasons, including supply and demand imbalances and geopolitical
tensions.  The weighted-average indicative market price for NGLs was $0.82 per gallon in 2018 compared to $0.69 per gallon in
2017 and $0.50 per gallon in 2016.
An increase in our consolidated marketing revenues due to higher energy commodity sales prices may not result in an increase in
gross operating margin or cash available for distribution, since our consolidated cost of sales amounts would also be higher due to
comparable increases in the purchase prices of the underlying energy commodities.  The same relationship would be true in the case
of lower energy commodity sales prices and purchase costs.
We attempt to mitigate commodity price exposure through our hedging activities and the use of fee-based arrangements.  See Note
14 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report for information regarding
our commodity hedging activities.
74
Table of Contents
Income Statement Highlights
The following table summarizes the key components of our consolidated results of operations for the years indicated (dollars in
millions):
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Revenues  $ 36,534.2  $ 29,241.5  $ 23,022.3 
Costs and expenses:             
Operating costs and expenses:             
Cost of sales   26,789.8   21,487.0   15,710.9 
Other operating costs and expenses   2,898.7   2,500.1   2,425.6 
Depreciation, amortization and accretion expenses   1,687.0   1,531.3   1,456.7 
Net gains attributable to asset sales   (28.7)  (10.7)  (2.5)
Asset impairment and related charges   50.5   49.8   52.8 
Total operating costs and expenses   31,397.3   25,557.5   19,643.5 
General and administrative costs   208.3   181.1   160.1 
Total costs and expenses   31,605.6   25,738.6   19,803.6 
Equity in income of unconsolidated affiliates   480.0   426.0   362.0 
Operating income   5,408.6   3,928.9   3,580.7 
Interest expense   (1,096.7)  (984.6)  (982.6)
Change in fair value of Liquidity Option Agreement   (56.1)  (64.3)  (24.5)
Other, net   43.0   1.3   2.8 
Provision for income taxes   (60.3)  (25.7)  (23.4)
Net income   4,238.5   2,855.6   2,553.0 
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests   (66.1)  (56.3)  (39.9)
Net income attributable to limited partners  $ 4,172.4  $ 2,799.3  $ 2,513.1 
Revenues
The following table presents each business segment’s contribution to consolidated revenues for the years indicated (dollars in
millions):
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
NGL Pipelines & Services:          
Sales of NGLs and related products  $ 12,920.9  $ 10,521.3  $ 8,380.5 
Midstream services   2,728.0   1,946.7   1,862.0 
Total   15,648.9   12,468.0   10,242.5 
Crude Oil Pipelines & Services:             
    Sales of crude oil   10,001.2   7,365.2   5,802.5 
    Midstream services   1,041.4   791.6   712.5 
        Total   11,042.6   8,156.8   6,515.0 
Natural Gas Pipelines & Services:             
    Sales of natural gas   2,411.7   2,238.5   1,591.9 
    Midstream services   1,042.7   907.1   951.1 
       Total   3,454.4   3,145.6   2,543.0 
Petrochemical & Refined Products Services:             
    Sales of petrochemicals and refined products   5,535.4   4,696.3   2,921.9 
    Midstream services   852.9   774.8   799.9 
       Total   6,388.3   5,471.1   3,721.8 
Total revenues  $ 36,534.2  $ 29,241.5  $ 23,022.3 
For periods through December 31, 2017, we accounted for our revenue streams using Financial Accounting Standards Board
(“FASB”) Accounting Standards Codification (“ASC”) 605, Revenue Recognition.  Effective January 1, 2018, we adopted FASB
ASC 606, Revenue from Contracts with Customers, using a modified retrospective approach that applied the new revenue
recognition standard to existing contracts at the implementation date and any future revenue contracts.
For additional information regarding our consolidated revenues, including the adoption of ASC 606, see Note 9 of the Notes to
Consolidated Financial Statements included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report.
75
Table of Contents
Comparison of 2018 with 2017
Total revenues for 2018 increased $7.29 billion when compared to 2017 primarily due to a $6.05 billion increase in marketing
revenues.  Revenues from the marketing of crude oil increased $2.64 billion year-to-year primarily due to higher sales prices, which
accounted for a $1.99 billion increase, and higher sales volumes, which accounted for an additional $646.3 million increase. 
Revenues from the marketing of NGLs, petrochemicals and refined products increased a net $3.24 billion year-to-year primarily
due to higher sales prices, which accounted for a $3.39 billion increase, partially offset by a $149.2 million decrease due to lower
sales volumes.
Revenues from midstream services for 2018 increased $1.24 billion when compared to 2017.  As a result of adopting ASC 606, we
recognized $621.7 million in connection with the receipt of non-cash consideration for providing natural gas processing services
during 2018. Midstream service revenues from our pipeline assets increased $481.4 million year-to-year primarily due to strong
demand for transportation services in Texas and on the ATEX Pipeline.
Comparison of 2017 with 2016
Total revenues for 2017 increased $6.22 billion when compared to total revenues for 2016.  Revenues from the marketing of crude
oil, natural gas, petrochemicals, refined products and octane additives increased $3.98 billion year-to-year primarily due to higher
sales prices, which accounted for a $2.75 billion increase, and higher sales volumes, which accounted for an additional $1.23
billion increase.  Revenues from the marketing of NGLs increased $2.14 billion year-to-year primarily due to higher sales prices,
which accounted for a $3.19 billion increase, partially offset by a $1.05 billion decrease due to lower sales volumes.
Revenues from midstream services increased $94.7 million year-to-year primarily due to the ongoing expansion of our operations,
including a $54.6 million increase attributable to our Morgan’s Point Ethane Export Terminal that was placed into service in
September 2016.
Largest customer information
Substantially all of our consolidated revenues are earned in the U.S. and derived from a wide customer base.  Our largest non-
affiliated customer for 2018, 2017 and 2016 was Vitol Holding B.V. and its affiliates (collectively, “Vitol”), which accounted for
7.8%, 11.2% and 9.9%, respectively, of our consolidated revenues.  Vitol is a global energy and commodity trading company.
Operating costs and expenses
Comparison of 2018 with 2017
Total operating costs and expenses for 2018 increased $5.84 billion when compared to 2017 primarily due to a $5.3 billion increase
in cost of sales.  The cost of sales associated with our marketing of crude oil increased $2.16 billion year-to-year primarily due to
higher purchase prices, which accounted for a $1.59 billion increase, and higher sales volumes, which accounted for an additional
$562.4 million increase. The cost of sales associated with our NGL marketing activities increased $3.09 billion year-to-year
primarily due to higher sales prices, which accounted for a $2.51 billion increase.  In addition, the cost of sales attributable to our
NGL marketing activities for 2018 includes $621.7 million resulting from the adoption of ASC 606 and attributable to the sale and
delivery of equity NGL products to customers.
Other operating costs and expenses for 2018 increased $398.6 million when compared to 2017 primarily due to higher
maintenance, power and employee compensation costs.  Depreciation, amortization and accretion expense increased $155.7 million
year-to-year primarily due to assets we constructed and placed into service since 2017.  Gains related to the sale of assets increased
$18.0 million year-to-year primarily due to the sale of our Red River System in October 2018.  Operating costs and expenses also
include $50.5 million and $49.8 million of non-cash asset impairment and related charges for the years ended December 31, 2018
and 2017, respectively. See Note 14 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual
report for information regarding our nonrecurring fair value measurements.
76
Table of Contents
Comparison of 2017 with 2016
Total operating costs and expenses for 2017 increased $5.91 billion when compared to total operating costs and expenses for 2016. 
The cost of sales associated with our marketing of crude oil, natural gas, petrochemicals and refined products increased $3.59
billion year-to-year primarily due to higher purchase prices, which accounted for a $2.52 billion increase, and higher sales volumes,
which accounted for an additional $1.06 billion increase. The cost of sales associated with our marketing of NGLs increased a net
$2.19 billion year-to-year primarily due to higher purchase prices, which accounted for a $3.06 billion increase, partially offset by
an $873.9 million decrease due to lower sales volumes.
Other operating costs and expenses for 2017 increased a net $74.5 million when compared to 2016 primarily due to higher
employee compensation, power, ad valorem tax and maintenance costs.  Depreciation, amortization and accretion expense in
operating costs and expenses for 2017 increased a net $74.6 million when compared to 2016 primarily due to assets we constructed
and placed into service since 2016.  Operating costs and expenses also include $49.8 million and $52.8 million of non-cash asset
impairment and related charges for the years ended December 31, 2017 and 2016, respectively.
General and administrative costs
General and administrative costs for 2018 increased $27.2 million when compared to 2017 primarily due to higher employee
compensation and legal costs.  General and administrative costs for 2017 increased $21.0 million when compared to 2016 primarily
due to higher legal, regulatory and employee compensation costs.
Equity in income of unconsolidated affiliates
Equity income from our unconsolidated affiliates for 2018 increased $54.0 million when compared to 2017 primarily due to an
increase in earnings from our investments in NGL pipelines.  Equity income from our unconsolidated affiliates for 2017 increased a
net $64.0 million when compared to 2016 primarily due to an increase in earnings from our investments in crude oil pipeline
ventures.
Operating income
Operating income for 2018 increased $1.48 billion when compared 2017 due to the previously described year-to-year changes in
revenues, operating costs and expenses, general and administrative costs and equity in income of unconsolidated affiliates. 
Likewise, operating income for 2017 increased $348.2 million when compared to 2016.
Interest expense
The following table presents the components of our consolidated interest expense for the years indicated (dollars in millions):
  For the Year Ended December 31  
  2018   2017   2016  
Interest charged on debt principal outstanding  $ 1,195.4  $ 1,110.4  $ 1,088.9 
Impact of interest rate hedging program, including related amortization (1)   8.1   38.2   30.5 
Interest costs capitalized in connection with construction projects (2)   (147.9)  (192.1)  (168.2)
Other (3)   41.1   28.1   31.4 
      Total interest expense  $ 1,096.7  $ 984.6  $ 982.6 
             
(1) Amount presented for 2018 is net of $29.4 million of swaption premium income, which reduces interest expense.
(2) We capitalize interest costs incurred on funds used to construct property, plant and equipment while the asset is in its construction phase. Capitalized
interest amounts become part of the historical cost of an asset and are charged to earnings (as a component of depreciation expense) on a straight-line basis
over the estimated useful life of the asset once the asset enters its intended service. When capitalized interest is recorded, it reduces interest expense from
what it would be otherwise. Capitalized interest amounts fluctuate based on the timing of when projects are placed into service, our capital investment
levels and the interest rates charged on borrowings.
(3) Primarily reflects facility commitment fees charged in connection with our revolving credit facilities and amortization and write-off of debt issuance costs.
Amount presented for 2018 includes $14.2 million of debt issuance costs that were written off in connection with the redemption of junior subordinated
notes.  
77
Table of Contents
Comparison of 2018 with 2017
Interest expense for 2018 increased $112.1 million when compared to 2017.  Interest charged on debt principal outstanding, which
is the primary driver of interest expense, increased a net $85.0 million year-to-year primarily due to increased debt principal
amounts outstanding during 2018, which accounted for an $85.6 million increase.  Our weighted-average debt principal balance for
2018 was $25.94 billion compared to $24.13 billion for 2017.  In general, our debt principal balances have increased over time due
to the partial debt financing of our capital investments.  For a discussion of our consolidated debt obligations and capital
investments, see “Liquidity and Capital Resources” and “Capital Investments,” respectively, within this Part II, Item 7 of this
annual report.
Comparison of 2017 with 2016
Interest expense for 2017 increased $2.0 million when compared to 2016.  Interest charged on debt principal outstanding, which is
the primary driver of interest expense, increased a net $21.5 million year-to-year primarily due to increased debt principal amounts
outstanding during 2017, which accounted for a $31.6 million increase, partially offset by the effect of lower overall interest rates
in 2017, which accounted for a $10.1 million decrease.  Our weighted-average debt principal balance for 2017 was $24.13 billion
compared to $23.41 billion for 2016.
Change in fair value of Liquidity Option Agreement
We recognize non-cash expense associated with accretion and changes in management estimates that affect our valuation of the
Liquidity Option Agreement. For information regarding the Liquidity Option Agreement, see Note 17 of the Notes to Consolidated
Financial Statements included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report.
Comparison of 2018 with 2017
Liquidity option expense decreased $8.2 million in 2018 when compared to 2017 due to the effect of changes in management
estimates, which accounted for a $13.6 million decrease, partially offset by accretion expense, which accounted for a $5.4 million
increase.
Comparison of 2017 with 2016
Liquidity option expense increased $39.8 million in 2017 when compared to 2016 also due to the effect of changes in management
estimates, which accounted for a $37.6 million increase, and accretion expense, which accounted for an additional $2.2 million
increase.  The unfavorable adjustment attributable to changes in management estimates was due to revising the valuation model to
reflect applicable provisions of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 (i.e., the limitation of interest expense deductibility, partially
offset by a lower federal corporate tax rate).
Gain on step acquisition of unconsolidated affiliate
We recognized a non-cash gain of $39.4 million during 2018 related to the step acquisition of Delaware Processing.  For
information regarding this acquisition, see Note 12 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included under Part II, Item 8
of this annual report.
Income taxes
Provision for income taxes primarily reflects our state tax obligations under the Revised Texas Franchise Tax (the “Texas Margin
Tax”).  We are not subject to federal income tax.  Our provision for income taxes for 2018 increased $34.6 million when compared
to 2017 primarily due to increases in taxable margin and the Texas apportionment factor.   Our provision for income taxes for 2017
increased $2.3 million when compared to 2016.
Business Segment Highlights
We evaluate segment performance based on our financial measure of gross operating margin.  Gross operating margin is an
important performance measure of the core profitability of our operations and forms the basis of our internal financial reporting. 
We believe that investors benefit from having access to the same financial measures that our management uses in evaluating
segment results. 
78
Table of Contents
The following table presents gross operating margin by segment and non-GAAP total gross operating margin for the years indicated
(dollars in millions):
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Gross operating margin by segment:          
NGL Pipelines & Services  $ 3,830.7  $ 3,258.3  $ 2,990.6 
Crude Oil Pipelines & Services   1,511.3   987.2   854.6 
Natural Gas Pipelines & Services   891.2   714.5   734.9 
Petrochemical & Refined Products Services   1,057.8   714.6   650.6 
Total segment gross operating margin (1)   7,291.0   5,674.6   5,230.7 
Net adjustment for shipper make-up rights   34.7   5.8   17.1 
Total gross operating margin (non-GAAP)  $ 7,325.7  $ 5,680.4  $ 5,247.8 
             
(1)          Within the context of this table, total segment gross operating margin represents a subtotal and corresponds to measures similarly titled within our
business segment disclosures found under Note 10 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual
report.  
Total gross operating margin includes equity in the earnings of unconsolidated affiliates, but is exclusive of other income and
expense transactions, income taxes, the cumulative effect of changes in accounting principles and extraordinary charges.  Total
gross operating margin is presented on a 100% basis before any allocation of earnings to noncontrolling interests.  Our calculation
of gross operating margin may or may not be comparable to similarly titled measures used by other companies.  Segment gross
operating margin for NGL Pipelines & Services and Crude Oil Pipelines & Services reflect adjustments for shipper make-up rights
that are included in management’s evaluation of segment results.  However, these adjustments are excluded from non-GAAP total
gross operating margin.
The GAAP financial measure most directly comparable to total gross operating margin is operating income.  For a discussion of
operating income and its components, see the previous section titled “Consolidated Income Statement Highlights” within this Part
II, Item 7.  The following table presents a reconciliation of operating income to total gross operating margin for the years indicated
(dollars in millions):
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Operating income (GAAP)  $ 5,408.6  $ 3,928.9  $ 3,580.7 
Adjustments to reconcile operating income to total gross operating margin:             
   Add depreciation, amortization and accretion expense in
operating costs and expenses   1,687.0   1,531.3   1,456.7 
   Add asset impairment and related charges in operating costs and expenses   50.5   49.8   52.8 
   Subtract net gains attributable to asset sales in operating costs and expenses   (28.7)  (10.7)  (2.5)
   Add general and administrative costs   208.3   181.1   160.1 
Total gross operating margin (non-GAAP)  $ 7,325.7  $ 5,680.4  $ 5,247.8 
Each of our business segments benefits from the supporting role of our marketing activities.  The main purpose of our marketing
activities is to support the utilization and expansion of assets across our midstream energy asset network by increasing the volumes
handled by such assets, which results in additional fee-based earnings for each business segment.  In performing these support
roles, our marketing activities also seek to participate in supply and demand opportunities as a supplemental source of gross
operating margin for the partnership.  The financial results of our marketing efforts fluctuate due to changes in volumes handled
and overall market conditions, which are influenced by current and forward market prices for the products bought and sold.
Estimated Impact of Hurricane Harvey on Results for 2017
The Gulf Coast region of Texas, including its critical energy infrastructure, was impacted by the cumulative effects of Hurricane
Harvey during the third quarter of 2017.  Impacts on the energy industry included, but were not limited to, severe flooding and
limited access to facilities, disruptions to energy demand from area refineries and petrochemical facilities and the closure of all
ports on the Texas Gulf Coast, which limited access to export markets.  Although operating at reduced rates, many of our plant,
pipeline and storage assets along the Texas Gulf Coast remained operational during the storm.
79
Table of Contents
We estimate that Hurricane Harvey reduced our gross operating margin for 2017 by $46 million.  Of this amount, $30 million
represents the combined net impact of lower-than-anticipated volumes and lost business opportunities. The remaining $16 million
represents expenses we incurred in connection with hurricane-related repair and recovery costs. The following table summarizes
the estimated reduction in gross operating margin by business segment for 2017 due to the hurricane (dollars in millions):
Reduction in total gross operating margin by segment:    
Petrochemical & Refined Products Services  $ 30.9 
NGL Pipelines & Services   8.1 
Crude Oil Pipelines & Services   6.0 
Natural Gas Pipelines & Services   1.0 
Total estimated reduction due to the effects of Hurricane Harvey  $ 46.0 
NGL Pipelines & Services
The following table presents segment gross operating margin and selected volumetric data for the NGL Pipelines & Services
segment for the years indicated (dollars in millions, volumes as noted):
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Segment gross operating margin:          
Natural gas processing and related NGL marketing activities  $ 1,240.1  $ 911.2  $ 846.6 
NGL pipelines, storage and terminals   2,048.3   1,821.0   1,625.4 
NGL fractionation   542.3   526.1   518.6 
    Total  $ 3,830.7  $ 3,258.3  $ 2,990.6 
             
Selected volumetric data:             
NGL pipeline transportation volumes (MBPD)   3,461   3,168   2,965 
NGL marine terminal volumes (MBPD)   593   516   436 
NGL fractionation volumes (MBPD)   945   831   828 
Equity NGL production (MBPD) (1)   155   158   141 
Fee-based natural gas processing (MMcf/d) (2)   4,831   4,572   4,736 
  
(1) Represents the NGL volumes we earn and take title to in connection with our processing activities.
(2) Volumes reported correspond to the revenue streams earned by our natural gas processing plants.  
Natural gas processing and related NGL marketing activities
Comparison of 2018 with 2017. Gross operating margin from natural gas processing and related NGL marketing activities for 2018
increased a net $328.9 million when compared to 2017.  Gross operating margin from our Meeker, Pioneer and Chaco natural gas
processing plants increased $135.4 million year-to-year primarily due to higher average processing margins, including the impact
of our related hedging activities.  On a combined net basis for these plants, fee-based natural gas processing volumes and equity
NGL production increased 126 MMcf/d and decreased 6 MBPD, respectively, year-to-year.
Gross operating margin from our South Texas natural gas processing plants increased a net $71.1 million year-to-year primarily due
to higher average processing margins, including the impact of related hedging activities.  Fee-based natural gas processing volumes
for our South Texas gas plants decreased 130 MMcf/d year-to-year.  Gross operating margin from our Permian Basin natural gas
processing plants increased a combined $60.8 million year-to-year primarily due to gross operating margin from our Orla gas plant,
which commenced operations in May 2018 and generated $41.7 million of the increase, and our acquisition in March 2018 of the
remaining 50% ownership interest in our Waha gas plant, which resulted in an incremental $27.9 million of gross operating margin
from this plant following the acquisition date. Fee-based natural gas processing volumes and equity NGL production from our
Permian Basin natural gas processing plants increased a combined net 273 MMcf/d and 5 MBPD, respectively, year-to-year.  Of
these amounts, fee-based natural gas processing volumes and equity NGL production at Orla represented 195 MMcf/d and 5
MBPD, respectively.
80
Table of Contents
On a combined basis, gross operating margin from our natural gas processing plants in Louisiana and Mississippi decreased a net
$11.7 million year-to-year primarily due to a one-time $19.1 million benefit recorded in the fourth quarter of 2017 in connection
with proceeds from a business interruption insurance claim at our Pascagoula gas plant, partially offset by higher combined equity
NGL production volumes of 7 MBPD, which accounted for an $11.3 million increase.  The Pascagoula gas plant experienced a fire
in June 2016 and several months of resulting downtime.  The plant was repaired and placed back into commercial service in
December 2016.
Gross operating margin from our NGL marketing activities increased a net $73.4 million year-to-year primarily due to higher
average sales margins, which accounted for a $236.7 million increase, partially offset by a $164.2 million decrease due to lower
sales volumes. As noted previously, the main purpose of our marketing activities in each business segment is to support the
utilization and expansion of assets across our midstream energy asset network.  Results from marketing strategies that optimize our
transportation and plant assets increased $172.3 million and $28.9 million, respectively, year-to-year, partially offset by decreases
in earnings related to the optimization of our storage and export assets, which accounted for $99.4 million and $48.7 million,
respectively, of decreases year-to-year.   In addition, gross operating margin from NGL marketing activities reflects $9.3 million of
non-cash, mark-to-market gains for 2018 compared to non-cash, mark-to-market losses of $11.0 million for 2017.
Comparison of 2017 with 2016. Gross operating margin from natural gas processing and related NGL marketing activities for 2017
increased a net $64.6 million when compared to 2016.
Gross operating margin from our natural gas processing plants in Louisiana and Mississippi increased a combined $54.1 million
year-to-year primarily due to (i) lower repair and operating costs, which accounted for $19.4 million of the increase and were
mainly attributable to fire-related repairs completed at the Pascagoula plant in 2016, (ii) a one-time $19.1 million benefit recorded
in the fourth quarter of 2017 in connection with proceeds from the business interruption insurance claim at our Pascagoula gas plant
and (iii) higher average processing margins, which accounted for an additional $9.8 million increase. Fee-based natural gas
processing volumes at our Louisiana and Mississippi plants increased a combined 138 MMcf/d year-to-year.
Gross operating margin from our Meeker, Pioneer and Chaco natural gas processing plants increased a net $31.5 million year-to-
year primarily due to higher average processing margins, which accounted for $41.9 million of the increase and reflect the impact
of hedging activities, partially offset by lower average processing fees, which accounted for a $7.3 million decrease.  On a
combined basis for these three plants, fee-based natural gas processing volumes and equity NGL production decreased 61 MMcf/d
and increased 16 MBPD, respectively, year-to-year.
Gross operating margin from our NGL marketing activities decreased a net $10.4 million year-to-year primarily due to lower
average sales margins, which accounted for a $37.9 million decrease, partially offset by higher sales volumes, which accounted for
a $20.1 million increase, and lower railcar leasing costs, which accounted for an additional $7.4 million increase.  Results from
NGL marketing’s activities decreased $11.4 million year-to-year due to non-cash, mark-to-market activity.
Gross operating margin from our natural gas processing plants in South Texas decreased a net $9.9 million year-to-year primarily
due to lower fee-based processing volumes, which accounted for a $21.7 million decrease, higher maintenance costs, which
accounted for an additional $7.3 million decrease, partially offset by higher average processing margins, which accounted for an
$18.6 million increase including the impact of hedging activities.  Lower producer drilling activity in South Texas in 2017
contributed to a 352 MMcf/d decrease in fee-based natural gas processing volumes for these plants.
Gross operating margin from our Permian Basin natural gas processing plants increased $2.0 million year-to-year, primarily due to
gross operating margin from our South Eddy gas plant, which commenced operations in May 2016 and generated $3.9 million of
the increase.  Fee-based natural gas processing volumes and equity NGL production for our Permian Basin natural gas processing
plants increased a combined 73 MMcf/d and 3 MBPD, respectively, year-to-year.
NGL pipelines, storage and terminals
Comparison of 2018 with 2017.  Gross operating margin from NGL pipelines, storage and terminal assets for 2018 increased a net
$227.3 million when compared to 2017.
81
Table of Contents
Gross operating margin from our Seminole, Chaparral and affiliated NGL pipelines increased a combined net $77.9 million year-to-
year primarily due to higher transportation volumes of 123 MBPD, which accounted for a $72.7 million increase, and higher
average transportation fees, which accounted for an additional $46.0 million increase, partially offset by higher pipeline offloading
and capacity reservation costs paid to our other pipelines of $31.5 million.  Gross operating margin from our Mid-America Pipeline
System and related terminals increased a net $9.1 million primarily due to (i) higher transportation volumes of 50 MBPD, which
accounted for a $26.8 million increase, (ii) higher blending, terminal and offloading revenues, which accounted for a $13.5 million
increase, partially offset by (iii) lower average transportation fees, which accounted for an $18.5 million decrease, and (iv) higher
pipeline offloading costs paid to affiliate pipelines, which accounted for an additional $16.3 million decrease. Gross operating
margin from our equity investment in the Texas Express Pipeline increased $15.0 million year-to-year primarily due to higher
transportation volumes of 15 MBPD (net to our interest) in 2018 attributable to contractual increases in committed shipper volumes
and volumes offloaded from affiliate pipelines.  Due to pipeline infrastructure constraints in the Permian Basin region, we have
been using offloading arrangements to optimize available capacity on the Mid-American Pipeline System, Seminole Pipeline and
Texas Express Pipelines to transport NGLs to our Mont Belvieu complex.
Gross operating margin from our Appalachia-to-Texas Express, or “ATEX,” pipeline increased $45.6 million year-to-year primarily
due to contractual increases in committed shipper volumes.   NGL transportation volumes on ATEX increased 22 MBPD year-to-
year.
Gross operating margin from our underground storage facilities at the Mont Belvieu hub and in south Louisiana increased a
combined $43.0 million year-to-year primarily due to higher storage fees.  Gross operating margin from our Morgan’s Point Ethane
Export Terminal increased $31.6 million year-to-year primarily due to higher loading volumes of 56 MBPD.  Likewise, gross
operating margin from our Houston Ship Channel Pipeline System increased $8.6 million year-to-year primarily due to higher
transportation volumes, which accounted for $15.7 million of the increase, partially offset by higher maintenance and other
operating costs, which accounted for a $7.1 million decrease.  Transportation volumes along our Houston Ship Channel Pipeline
System increased 84 MBPD, which in turn is attributable to shipments of ethane from Mont Belvieu to the Morgan’s Point export
terminal.
Gross operating margin from our Dixie Pipeline and related terminals decreased $10.6 million year-to-year primarily due to higher
costs attributable to periodic pipeline integrity testing.
Comparison of 2017 with 2016.  Gross operating margin from NGL pipelines, storage and terminal assets for 2017 increased a net
$195.6 million when compared to 2016.  Gross operating margin from ATEX increased $57.2 million year-to-year primarily due to
higher walk-up shipper volumes and contractual increases in committed shipper volumes.  NGL transportation volumes for ATEX
increased 18 MBPD year-to-year.
Gross operating margin from our Morgan’s Point Ethane Export Terminal and Houston Ship Channel Pipeline System increased a
combined $52.9 million year-to-year primarily due to higher volumes.  Ethane loading volumes at our Morgan’s Point Ethane
Export Terminal, which was placed into service in September 2016, increased 75 MBPD year-to-year.  In addition, transportation
volumes on our Houston Ship Channel Pipeline System increased 105 MBPD year-to-year primarily due to shipments of ethane
from Mont Belvieu to the Morgan’s Point export terminal.
Gross operating margin from our underground storage facility at the Mont Belvieu hub for NGLs and related products increased
$50.7 million year-to-year primarily due to higher average storage fees in 2017.
Gross operating margin from our Seminole, Chaparral and affiliated NGL pipelines increased a combined net $23.1 million year-to-
year primarily due to higher average transportation fees, which accounted for a $15.9 million increase, and higher transportation
volumes, which accounted for an additional $14.8 million increase, partially offset by higher operating costs of $6.6 million.  On a
combined basis, NGL transportation volumes on these pipelines increased 33 MBPD primarily due to increased production from
natural gas processing plants located in the Permian Basin and Rocky Mountains.
82
Table of Contents
Gross operating margin from our equity investments in the Texas Express Gathering System and the Texas Express Pipeline
increased a combined $18.3 million year-to-year primarily due to contractual increases in committed shipper volumes.  Gross
operating margin from our Dixie Pipeline and related terminals increased a $9.9 million year-to-year primarily due to higher
transportation volumes, which increased 19 MBPD year-to-year. Gross operating margin from our Tri-States NGL Pipeline
increased $8.7 million year-to-year primarily due to a 10 MBPD (net to our interest) increase in transportation volumes.
Gross operating margin from our South Texas NGL Pipeline System decreased a net $25.6 million year-to-year primarily due to
lower average transportation fees, which accounted for a $13.7 million decrease, lower transportation volumes, which accounted
for a $7.0 million of the decrease, and higher maintenance costs, which accounted for an additional $4.1 million decrease. 
Transportation volumes for the South Texas NGL Pipeline System decreased 21 MBPD year-to-year.
NGL fractionation
Comparison of 2018 with 2017.  Gross operating margin from NGL fractionation for 2018 increased $16.2 million when compared
to 2017.  Gross operating margin from our Hobbs NGL fractionator increased $10.2 million year-to-year primarily due to higher
product blending revenues, which accounted for a $3.2 million increase, and lower maintenance and other operating costs, which
accounted for an additional $4.5 million increase.  NGL fractionation volumes increased 4 MBPD year-to-year.
Gross operating margin from our Mont Belvieu NGL fractionation complex increased $7.5 million year-to-year primarily due to
higher fractionation volumes of 97 MBPD (net to our interest) resulting from the start-up of our ninth NGL fractionator in May
2018.  The new fractionator, which is located in Chambers County, Texas, has a capacity of 90 MBPD, which increased total NGL
fractionation capacity at our Mont Belvieu complex to 760 MBPD.
Comparison of 2017 with 2016.  Gross operating margin from NGL fractionation for 2017 increased a net $7.5 million when
compared to 2016.  Gross operating margin from our Mont Belvieu NGL fractionation complex increased a net $4.1 million
primarily due to higher average fractionation fees and blending revenues, which accounted for a $50.8 million increase, partially
offset by higher storage, maintenance and power expenses of $47.3 million.  NGL fractionation volumes increased 9 MBPD year-
to-year, net to our interest.
Crude Oil Pipelines & Services
The following table presents segment gross operating margin and selected volumetric data for the Crude Oil Pipelines & Services
segment for the years indicated (dollars in millions, volumes as noted):
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Segment gross operating margin:          
Midland-to-ECHO 1 Pipeline System and related business activities,
excluding associated non-cash mark-to-market results  $ 349.3  $ 45.8    
Mark-to-market loss attributable to the Midland-to-ECHO 1 Pipeline System   (44.6)  (20.5)   
Total Midland-to-ECHO 1 Pipeline System and related business activities   304.7   25.3    
Other crude oil pipelines, terminals and related marketing results   1,206.6   961.9  $ 854.6 
Total  $ 1,511.3  $ 987.2  $ 854.6 
             
Selected volumetric data:             
Crude oil pipeline transportation volumes (MBPD)   2,000   1,820   1,388 
Crude oil marine terminal volumes (MBPD)   684   531   495 
Midland-to-ECHO 1 Pipeline System and related business activities
Gross operating margin from our Midland-to-ECHO 1 Pipeline System and related business activities was a combined $304.7
million for 2018 compared to a combined $25.3 million in 2017. Transportation volumes for the Midland-to-ECHO 1 Pipeline
System, which entered limited service in November 2017 and full service in April 2018, averaged 437 MBPD and 333 MBPD
during 2018 and 2017, respectively (net to our interest).
Gross operating margin for this business for 2018 reflects a non-cash mark-to-market loss of $44.6 million associated with the
hedging of crude oil market price differentials (basis spreads) between the Midland and Houston area markets.
83
Table of Contents
These hedges, which were primarily entered into during 2017, serve to lock in a positive margin on our anticipated purchases of
crude oil at Midland and subsequent anticipated sales to customers in the Houston area for periods extending predominantly into
2019 and minimally through 2020. At December 31, 2018, these hedges represented a weighted average of approximately 22% of
the pipeline’s expected uncommitted capacity through 2020 at an average positive margin of $2.76 per barrel. The mark-to-market
loss reflects a widening of the basis spread between the Midland and Houston markets to an average of $8.48 per barrel through
2020 relative to our average hedged amount of $2.76 per barrel across these same periods (as of December 31, 2018).
Basis swaps, in all but very limited circumstances, do not qualify for cash flow hedge accounting despite being highly effective at
hedging the price risk inherent in the underlying physical transactions.  The volume hedged through 2020 varies from quarter-to-
quarter and year-to-year; however, the hedge levels generally correspond to pipeline capacity currently expected to be available to
us during the first three years of the pipeline’s operations as customer commitment volumes ramp up to peak levels.
If the basis spreads underlying these hedges widen from the levels at December 31, 2018, we would be exposed to additional
temporary non-cash mark-to-market losses.  Conversely, if basis spreads narrow in the future reverting back towards or below the
average $2.76 per barrel spread we have locked in at December 31, 2018, then we would recognize temporary non-cash mark-to-
market gains in future periods.  When the forecasted physical receipts and deliveries of crude oil ultimately occur in the future, we
will realize a physical gross margin at then prevailing commodity price spreads; however the realized settlement of the associated
financial hedges would convert that physical margin to the average $2.76 per barrel spread of the financial hedges.  At that time, the
unrealized mark-to-market loss recognized for 2018 and in future periods until the physical deliveries occur will be reversed, thus
eliminating their impact to cumulative earnings recognized over the entire life-to-date period of the hedge.
The basis spread between the Midland and Houston markets continues to fluctuate.  We also have uncommitted capacity on the
pipeline that could provide us with potential upside to widening or downside to narrowing market spreads.  For information
regarding our crude oil marketing hedging portfolio, see Part II, Item 7A, Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market
Risk.
Gross operating margin for 2018 was also reduced by $33.9 million in connection with the allocation of pipeline earnings to
Western upon closing of their acquisition of a noncontrolling 20% equity interest in the pipeline on June 1, 2018.
Other crude oil pipelines, terminals and related marketing results
Comparison of 2018 with 2017.  Gross operating margin from our other crude oil pipelines, terminals and related marketing
activities for 2018 increased a net $244.7 million when compared to 2017.  Gross operating margin from our South Texas Crude Oil
Pipeline System increased a net $71.1 million year-to-year primarily due to higher firm capacity reservation fees, which accounted
for $43.3 million of the increase, and higher deficiency fee revenues associated with producer volume commitments, which
accounted for a $22.9 million increase.  The increase in firm capacity reservation fees is attributable to use of the Rancho II
pipeline by the Midland-to-ECHO 1 Pipeline System. Crude oil transportation volumes for the South Texas Crude Oil Pipeline
System decreased 5 MBPD year-to-year.
Gross operating margin from crude oil export activities at EHT increased $49.6 million year-to-year primarily due to higher net
loading volumes, which increased 152 MBPD year-to-year.  Gross operating margin from our Midland and ECHO terminals
increased a combined $24.5 million year-to-year primarily due to higher throughput volumes attributable to movements on the
Midland-to-ECHO 1 Pipeline System.
Gross operating margin from our West Texas System and equity investment in the Eagle Ford Crude Oil Pipeline System increased
a combined $44.2 million year-to-year primarily due to higher transportation volumes, which increased 85 MBPD (net to our
interest).
84
Table of Contents
Gross operating margin from our EFS Midstream System increased $23.5 million year-to-year primarily due to higher deficiency
fee revenues.  Condensate and natural gas transportation volumes for this system decreased 2 MBPD and 39 MMcf/d, respectively,
year-to-year.  Although gross operating margin for this system decreased $15.9 million year-to-year attributable to lower throughput
volumes, the decrease was more than offset by a $34.3 million year-to-year increase in deficiency fee revenues associated with
producer volume commitments.  These volume commitments begin to expire in mid-2022.  Based on our forecast of drilling
activity in the region served by the EFS Midstream System, we expect that production volumes will increase in the coming years,
thus offsetting the decline in contractual producer volume commitments.
Gross operating margin from our equity investment in the Seaway Pipeline decreased $16.9 million year-to-year primarily due to
lower average transportation fees attributable to an increase in walk-up shipper volumes, which are charged a lower tariff. 
Transportation volumes for Seaway decreased 9 MBPD year-to-year (net to our interest).
Gross operating margin from our related crude oil marketing activities increased a net $55.9 million year-to-year primarily due to
higher average sales margins, which accounted for a $69.2 million increase, partially offset by lower non-cash mark-to-market
results, which accounted for a $15.2 million decrease.  Non-cash mark-to-market earnings for this business was a gain of $0.5
million for 2018 versus a gain of $15.7 million for 2017.  Average sales margins increased in 2018 primarily due to higher market
price differentials for crude oil between the Permian Basin region, Cushing hub and Gulf Coast markets. As crude oil production in
the Permian Basin region increased in 2018, pipeline infrastructure constraints led to pricing dislocations in the supply basins
(lower crude oil prices in West Texas) compared to the prices paid by end users and exporters along the Gulf Coast. As midstream
infrastructure constraints are alleviated in the coming years, we expect that these market price differentials will normalize.
Comparison of 2017 with 2016.  Gross operating margin from our other crude oil pipelines, terminals and related marketing
activities for 2017 increased a net $107.3 million when compared to 2016.  Gross operating margin from our West Texas System
and equity investment in the Eagle Ford Crude Oil Pipeline System increased a combined $54.7 million year-to-year primarily due
to an 89 MBPD increase in crude oil transportation volumes (net to our interest).
Gross operating margin from our EFS Midstream System increased $31.7 million year-to-year primarily due to increased
deficiency fee revenues. Condensate transportation volumes for this system decreased 18 MBPD year-to-year and associated
natural gas volumes decreased 101 MMcf/d year-to-year.  Gross operating margin for the system decreased $59.7 million year-to-
year primarily due to the lower throughput volumes; however, this decrease was more than offset by a $98.1 million year-to-year
increase in deficiency fee revenues associated with producer volume commitments.
Gross operating margin from our South Texas Crude Oil Pipeline System increased $25.0 million primarily due to higher firm
capacity reservation fees, which accounted for a $17.1 million increase and was attributable to use of the Rancho II pipeline by the
Midland-to-ECHO 1 Pipeline System. Crude oil transportation volumes for the South Texas Crude Oil Pipeline System decreased 9
MBPD year-to-year.
Gross operating margin from our related crude oil marketing activities decreased a net $5.3 million year-to-year primarily due to
lower average sales margins, which accounted for a $39.0 million decrease, lower sales volumes, which accounted for a $38.2
million decrease, partially offset by a $56.1 million benefit related to non-cash mark-to-market results, lower pipeline-related costs,
which accounted for a $7.8 million increase, and higher earnings from trucking activities, which accounted for an additional $7.5
million increase.  Non-cash mark-to-market earnings for this business was a gain of $15.7 million for 2017 versus a loss of $40.4
million for 2016.
85
Table of Contents
Natural Gas Pipelines & Services
The following table presents segment gross operating margin and selected volumetric data for the Natural Gas Pipelines & Services
segment for the years indicated (dollars in millions, volumes as noted):
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Segment gross operating margin  $ 891.2  $ 714.5  $ 734.9 
Selected volumetric data:             
Natural gas pipeline transportation volumes (BBtus/d)   13,727   12,305   11,874 
Comparison of 2018 with 2017.  Gross operating margin from our Natural Gas Pipelines & Services segment for 2018 increased a
net $176.7 million when compared to 2017.  Gross operating margin from our Texas Intrastate System increased $75.6 million
year-to-year primarily due to higher average firm capacity reservation fees, which accounted for a $62.6 million increase, and
higher average transportation fees, which accounted for an additional $19.3 million increase, partially offset by higher maintenance
and other operating costs, which accounted for a $14.8 million decrease. Due to market price differentials for natural gas between
the Permian Basin region and Gulf Coast markets, shippers were willing to pay higher prices for firm capacity and spot
transportation arrangements in 2018. Natural gas transportation volumes on our Texas Intrastate System increased 119 BBtus/d
year-to-year.
Gross operating margin from our natural gas marketing activities increased $41.1 million year-to-year primarily due to higher
average sales margins, which accounted for a $23.5 million increase, and higher non-cash mark-to-market earnings, which
accounted for an additional $13.2 million increase.  Average sales margins increased in 2018 primarily due to higher market price
differentials for natural gas between the Permian Basin region and Gulf Coast markets. As crude oil and associated natural gas
production in the Permian Basin region increased in 2018, pipeline infrastructure constraints led to pricing dislocations in the
supply basins (lower natural gas prices in West Texas) compared to the prices paid by end users and exporters along the Gulf Coast.
As midstream infrastructure constraints are alleviated in the coming years, we expect that these market price differentials will
normalize.
Gross operating margin from our Haynesville Gathering System increased a net $26.2 million year-to-year primarily due to higher
gathering volumes, which accounted for a $16.8 million increase, higher treating and other fee revenues, which accounted for an
additional $14.1 million increase, partially offset by higher maintenance and other operating costs, which accounted for a $4.7
million decrease. Natural gas gathering volumes on the Haynesville Gathering System increased 318 BBtus/d due to prolific
production from the Haynesville Shale region.  Gross operating margin from our Acadian Gas System decreased a net $11.7 million
year-to-year primarily due to a $17.4 million benefit recorded in the second quarter of 2017 for proceeds we received in a legal
settlement for lost revenues and damages associated with the Bayou Corne sinkhole incident caused by third parties in 2012,
partially offset by higher average firm capacity reservation fees on the Haynesville Extension pipeline, which accounted for an
$11.0 million increase.  Transportation volumes for the Acadian Gas System increased 420 BBtus/d year-to-year, with the
Haynesville Extension pipeline accounting for 379 BBtus/d of the increase.
Gross operating margin from our Permian Basin Gathering System increased $21.3 million year-to-year primarily due to a 287
BBtus/d increase in natural gas gathering volumes, which accounted for a $28.5 million increase, partially offset by higher costs at
our Waha facility during the fourth quarter of 2018, which accounted for a $6.1 million decrease.  Natural gas production in the
Permian Basin region continues to rise as a result of the significant increases in crude oil production across West Texas and
southeastern New Mexico.
Gross operating margin from our BTA Gathering System, which we acquired in April 2017, increased $14.4 million year-to-year
primarily due to higher gathering volumes of 91 BBtus/d.
Comparison of 2017 with 2016.  Gross operating margin from our Natural Gas Pipelines & Services segment for 2017 decreased a
net $20.4 million when compared to 2016.
86
Table of Contents
Gross operating margin from our Texas Intrastate System decreased $51.4 million year-to-year primarily due to lower firm capacity
reservation fees, which accounted for a $30.1 million decrease, lower natural gas transportation volumes, which accounted for an
$8.5 million decrease, lower average transportation fees, which accounted for a $7.1 million decrease, and increased operating
costs, which accounted for an additional $3.4 million decrease. The $30.1 million decrease in firm capacity reservation fees in 2017
is primarily due to the settlement of a customer contract in the fourth quarter of 2016. Natural gas transportation volumes for the
Texas Intrastate System decreased 324 BBtus/d year-to-year primarily due to reduced producer activity in the Eagle Ford and
Barnett Shale areas in 2017.
Gross operating margin from our Jonah Gathering System decreased $12.3 million year-to-year primarily due to lower average
gathering fees, which accounted for a $6.5 million decrease, a 32 BBtus/d decline in natural gas gathering volumes, which
accounted for a $3.4 million decrease, and higher operating costs, which accounted for an additional $3.2 million decrease.
Gross operating margin from our Permian Basin Gathering System increased $10.5 million year-to-year primarily due to a 60
BBtus/d increase in natural gas gathering volumes on the Carlsbad Pipeline, which accounted for a $7.0 million increase, and
higher condensate sales revenues, which accounted for an additional $2.4 million increase.
Gross operating margin from our BTA Gathering System, which we acquired in April 2017, was $9.0 million on gathering volumes
of 220 BBtus/d.  Gross operating margin from our Acadian Gas System increased a net $7.1 million year-to-year primarily due to
the $17.4 million benefit related to the Bayou Corne incident described previously, partially offset by lower firm capacity
reservation revenues on the Haynesville Extension pipeline, which accounted for a $6.4 million year-to-year decrease, and lower
average gathering fees, which accounted for an additional $1.8 million decrease.  Transportation volumes for the Acadian Gas
System increased 343 BBtus/d year-to-year, with the Haynesville Extension pipeline accounting for 308 BBtus/d of the increase.
Gross operating margin from our Haynesville Gathering System increased a net $8.4 million year-to-year primarily due to higher
gathering volumes, which accounted for an $11.7 million increase, partially offset by the effects of lower average gathering fees,
which accounted for a $2.8 million decrease. Natural gas gathering volumes for the Haynesville Gathering System increased 213
BBtus/d.
Gross operating margin from our natural gas marketing activities increased a net $8.8 million year-to-year primarily due to an
increase in average sales margins, which accounted for a $7.9 million increase, and higher sales volumes, which accounted for an
additional $4.8 million increase, partially offset by lower non-cash mark-to-market earnings, which accounted for a $3.9 million
decrease.
Petrochemical & Refined Products Services
The following table presents segment gross operating margin and selected volumetric data for the Petrochemical & Refined
Products Services segment for the years indicated (dollars in millions, volumes as noted):
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Segment gross operating margin:          
Propylene production and related activities  $ 462.6  $ 222.4  $ 212.1 
Butane isomerization and related operations   93.4   72.3   52.0 
Octane enhancement and related plant operations   154.1   122.6   42.2 
Refined products pipelines and related activities   320.3   280.1   305.6 
Marine transportation   27.4   17.2   38.7 
Total  $ 1,057.8  $ 714.6  $ 650.6 
             
Selected volumetric data:             
Propylene production volumes (MBPD)   98   80   73 
Butane isomerization volumes (MBPD)   107   107   108 
Standalone DIB processing volumes (MBPD)   89   82   89 
Octane additive and related plant production volumes (MBPD)   28   26   22 
Pipeline transportation volumes, primarily refined products & petrochemicals (MBPD)   821   792   837 
Refined products and petrochemical marine terminal volumes (MBPD)   353   406   389 
87
Table of Contents
Propylene production and related activities
Comparison of 2018 with 2017.  Gross operating margin from propylene production and related marketing activities for 2018
increased $240.2 million when compared to 2017.  Our PDH facility, which completed its commissioning (or start up) phase and
began full commercial operations in April 2018, contributed $104.4 million of gross operating margin in 2018. Plant production
volumes for the PDH facility, including by-products, averaged 20 MBPD during 2018.  Gross operating margin from our Mont
Belvieu propylene splitters increased $91.2 million year-to-year primarily due to higher average propylene sales margins, which
accounted for a $108.8 million increase, and higher average propylene fractionation fees, which accounted for an additional $14.6
million increase, partially offset by lower propylene sales volumes, which accounted for a $34.6 million decrease, and higher major
maintenance costs, which accounted for an additional $7.5 million decrease. Lastly, gross operating margin from our propylene
pipelines increased a net $16.5 million year-to-year primarily due to expansion projects in south Louisiana being placed into
service during the fourth quarter of 2017. Transportation volumes for our propylene pipelines increased an aggregate 20 MBPD
year-to-year.
Comparison of 2017 with 2016.  Gross operating margin from propylene production and related marketing activities for 2017
increased a net $10.3 million when compared to 2016. Gross operating margin from our Mont Belvieu propylene splitters increased
a net $33.0 million year-to-year primarily due to higher average propylene sales margins and volumes, which accounted for $24.4
million and $19.1 million, respectively, of increases, along with higher average propylene fractionation fees, which accounted for
an additional $13.8 million increase, partially offset by higher storage, major maintenance and other operating costs, which
accounted for a combined $23.9 million decrease.  The increase in gross operating margin from our Mont Belvieu propylene
splitters was partially offset by higher commissioning costs of the PDH facility in 2017, which increased $13.3 million year-to-year.
Butane isomerization and related DIB operations
Comparison of 2018 with 2017.  Gross operating margin from butane isomerization and related DIB operations for 2018 increased
$21.1 million when compared to 2017 primarily due to higher by-product sales volumes, which accounted for a $14.5 million
increase, and higher average isomerization fees, which accounted for an additional $5.0 million increase.
Comparison of 2017 with 2016.  Gross operating margin from butane isomerization and related DIB operations for 2017 increased
$20.3 million when compared to 2016 primarily due to lower major maintenance and other operating costs, which accounted for a
$15.5 million decrease, and higher by-product revenues.  By-product sales revenues increased a net $7.2 million year-to-year
primarily due to higher average sales prices, which accounted for a $21.7 million increase, partially offset by lower sales volumes,
which accounted for a $14.5 million decrease.
Octane enhancement and related operations
Comparison of 2018 with 2017.  Gross operating margin for 2018 from our octane enhancement facility and high purity isobutylene
plant (“HPIB”) increased a combined $31.5 million when compared to 2017.  Gross operating margin from our octane
enhancement facility increased $32.3 million year-to-year primarily due to higher sales volumes and average sales margins, which
accounted for increases of $20.0 million and $15.4 million, respectively.
Comparison of 2017 with 2016.  Gross operating margin from our octane enhancement facility and HPIB plant for 2017 increased
$80.4 million when compared to 2016.  Gross operating margin from our octane enhancement facility increased $80.7 million year-
to-year primarily due to lower major maintenance costs, which accounted for a $42.6 million increase, and higher sales volumes,
which accounted for an additional $30.5 million increase.  Historically, our octane enhancement plant experienced downtime
annually for major maintenance activities.  During 2016, we completed significant modifications to our octane enhancement plant
to alleviate the need for such yearly outages.  We now expect downtime for major maintenance activities at our octane enhancement
plant once every three years.
88
Table of Contents
Refined products pipelines and related activities
Comparison of 2018 with 2017.  Gross operating margin from refined products pipelines and related marketing activities for 2018
increased a net $40.2 million when compared to 2017. Gross operating margin from our TE Products Pipeline increased $34.8
million year-to-year primarily due to higher average transportation and other fees, which accounted for a combined $19.6 million
increase, and higher transportation volumes, which accounted for an additional $18.2 million increase.  Transportation volumes on
the TE Products Pipeline increased a net 6 MBPD year-to-year primarily due to higher NGL transportation volumes of 14 MBPD,
partially offset by lower petrochemical transportation volumes of 8 MBPD.
Gross operating margin from our refined products marketing activities increased $14.3 million primarily due to higher average
refined products sales margins.
Gross operating margin from our Houston Ship Channel refined products marine terminal decreased $6.9 million year-to-year
primarily due to lower storage revenues.
Comparison of 2017 with 2016.  Gross operating margin from refined products pipelines and related marketing activities for 2017
decreased a net $25.5 million when compared to 2016. Gross operating margin from refined products marketing decreased a net
$18.3 million year-to-year primarily due to lower average refined products sales margins, which accounted for a $30.0 million
decrease, partially offset by a $12.0 million year-to-year increase in non-cash mark-to-market income. Gross operating margin from
our Beaumont and Houston Ship Channel refined products marine terminals decreased a combined $14.2 million year-to-year
primarily due to higher operating costs.
Gross operating margin from our TE Products Pipeline increased a net $7.3 million year-to-year primarily due to higher average
transportation fees, which accounted for a $10.8 million increase, partially offset by lower transportation volumes, which accounted
for a $5.8 million decrease.  Transportation volumes for the TE Products Pipeline decreased 24 MBPD primarily due to lower
movements of refined products and petrochemicals during 2017.
Marine transportation
Comparison of 2018 with 2017.  Gross operating margin from marine transportation for 2018 increased $10.2 million when
compared to 2017 primarily due to higher marine vessel utilization rates year-to-year.
Comparison of 2017 with 2016.  Gross operating margin from marine transportation for 2017 decreased $21.5 million when
compared to 2016 primarily due to lower average fees.
Liquidity and Capital Resources
Based on current market conditions (as of the filing date of this annual report), we believe we will have sufficient liquidity, cash
flow from operations and access to capital markets to fund our capital expenditures and working capital needs for the reasonably
foreseeable future.  At December 31, 2018, we had $6.34 billion of consolidated liquidity, which was comprised of $6.0 billion of
available borrowing capacity under EPO’s revolving credit facilities and $344.8 million of unrestricted cash on hand.
We have a universal shelf registration statement (the “2016 Shelf”) on file with the SEC which allows Enterprise Products Partners
L.P. and EPO (each on a standalone basis) to issue an unlimited amount of equity and debt securities, respectively.  EPO issued
$5.7 billion aggregate principal amount of senior notes and junior subordinated notes using the 2016 Shelf during the year ended
December 31, 2018. The 2016 Shelf will expire in May 2019, and we expect to file a replacement universal shelf registration
statement at or before such time. We may issue additional equity and debt securities in the future to assist us in meeting our funding
and liquidity requirements, including those related to capital investments.
89
Table of Contents
Consolidated Debt
The following table presents scheduled maturities of our consolidated debt obligations outstanding at December 31, 2018 for the
years indicated (dollars in millions):
   Scheduled Maturities of Debt  
 Total  2019  2020  2021  2022  2023  Thereafter 
Senior Notes  $ 23,750.0  $ 1,500.0  $ 1,500.0  $ 1,325.0  $ 1,400.0  $ 1,250.0  $ 16,775.0 
Junior Subordinated
Notes   2,670.6   --   --   --   --   --   2,670.6 
Total  $ 26,420.6  $ 1,500.0  $ 1,500.0  $ 1,325.0  $ 1,400.0  $ 1,250.0  $ 19,445.6 
For additional information regarding our debt agreements, see Note 7 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included
under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report.
Issuance of $3.0 Billion of Senior Notes in October 2018
In October 2018, EPO issued $3.0 billion aggregate principal amount of senior notes comprised of (i) $750 million principal
amount of senior notes due February 2022 (“Senior Notes VV”), (ii) $1.0 billion principal amount of senior notes due October 2028
(“Senior Notes WW”) and (iii) $1.25 billion principal amount of senior notes due February 2049 (“Senior Notes XX”).  Net
proceeds from this offering were used by EPO for the temporary repayment of amounts outstanding under its commercial paper
program and general company purposes, including for growth capital expenditures.
Senior Notes VV were issued at 99.985% of their principal amount and have a fixed-rate interest rate of 3.50% per year.  Senior
Notes WW were issued at 99.764% of their principal amount and have a fixed-rate interest rate of 4.15% per year.  Senior Notes
XX were issued at 99.390% of their principal amount and have a fixed-rate interest rate of 4.80% per year.  Enterprise Products
Partners L.P. has guaranteed the senior notes through an unconditional guarantee on an unsecured and unsubordinated basis.
Issuance of $2.0 Billion of Senior Notes and $700 Million of Junior Subordinated Notes in February 2018
In February 2018, EPO issued $2.7 billion aggregate principal amount of notes comprised of (i) $750 million principal amount of
senior notes due February 2021 (“Senior Notes TT”), (ii) $1.25 billion principal amount of senior notes due February 2048 (“Senior
Notes UU”) and (iii) $700 million principal amount of junior subordinated notes due February 2078 (“Junior Subordinated Notes
F”). Net proceeds from these offerings were used by EPO for the temporary repayment of amounts outstanding under its
commercial paper program, general company purposes, and the redemption of all $682.7 million outstanding aggregate principal
amount of its Junior Subordinated Notes B.
Senior Notes TT were issued at 99.946% of their principal amount and have a fixed-rate interest rate of 2.80% per year.  Senior
Notes UU were issued at 99.865% of their principal amount and have a fixed-rate interest rate of 4.25% per year.  Enterprise
Products Partners L.P. has guaranteed the senior notes through an unconditional guarantee on an unsecured and unsubordinated
basis.
The Junior Subordinated Notes F are redeemable at EPO’s option, in whole or in part, on one or more occasions, on or after
February 15, 2028 at 100% of their principal amount, plus any accrued and unpaid interest thereon, and bear interest at a fixed rate
of 5.375% per year through February 14, 2028. Beginning February 15, 2028, the Junior Subordinated Notes F will bear interest at
a floating rate based on a three-month LIBOR plus 2.57%, reset quarterly.  Enterprise Products Partners L.P. has guaranteed the
Junior Subordinated Notes F through an unconditional guarantee on an unsecured and subordinated basis.
Redemption of Junior Subordinated Notes
In March 2018, EPO redeemed all of the $682.7 million outstanding aggregate principal amount of its Junior Subordinated Notes B
at a price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the notes being redeemed, plus all accrued and unpaid interest thereon to, but
not including, the redemption date.  This redemption was funded by EPO’s issuance of senior notes and junior subordinated notes
in February 2018.
90
Table of Contents
In August 2018, EPO redeemed all of the $521.1 million outstanding aggregate principal amount of its Junior Subordinated Notes
A at a price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the notes being redeemed, plus all accrued and unpaid interest thereon to, but
not including, the redemption date.  This redemption was funded by the issuance of short-term notes under EPO’s commercial
paper program.
364-Day Revolving Credit Agreement
In September 2018, EPO entered into a 364-Day Revolving Credit Agreement that replaced its prior 364-day credit facility.  The
new 364-Day Revolving Credit Agreement matures in September 2019. There are currently no principal amounts outstanding under
this revolving credit agreement.
Under the terms of the new 364-Day Revolving Credit Agreement, EPO may borrow up to $2.0 billion (which may be increased by
up to $200 million to $2.2 billion at EPO’s election, provided certain conditions are met) at a variable interest rate for a term of up
to 364 days, subject to the terms and conditions set forth therein.  To the extent that principal amounts are outstanding at the
maturity date, EPO may elect to have the entire principal balance then outstanding continued as a non-revolving term loan for a
period of one additional year, payable in September 2020. Borrowings under this revolving credit agreement may be used for
working capital, capital expenditures, acquisitions and general company purposes.
The new 364-Day Revolving Credit Agreement contains customary representations, warranties, covenants (affirmative and
negative) and events of default, the occurrence of which would permit the lenders to accelerate the maturity date of any amounts
borrowed under this credit agreement.  The credit agreement also restricts EPO’s ability to pay cash distributions to its parent,
Enterprise Products Partners L.P., if an event of default (as defined in the credit agreement) has occurred and is continuing at the
time such distribution is scheduled to be paid or would result therefrom.
EPO’s obligations under the new 364-Day Revolving Credit Agreement are not secured by any collateral; however, they are
guaranteed by Enterprise Products Partners L.P.
Increase in Amount Authorized under Commercial Paper Program
In June 2018, EPO increased the aggregate principal amount of short-term notes that it could issue (and have outstanding at any
time) under its commercial paper program from $2.5 billion to $3.0 billion.  The commercial paper program enables us to access
typically lower short-term interest rates, which allows us to manage working capital and our overall cost of capital. As a back-stop
to the commercial paper program, we intend to maintain a minimum available borrowing capacity under EPO’s Multi-Year
Revolving Credit Facility equal to the outstanding aggregate principal amount of EPO’s commercial paper notes.  All commercial
paper notes issued under the program are senior unsecured obligations of EPO that are unconditionally guaranteed by Enterprise
Products Partners L.P.   At December 31, 2018, we had no commercial paper notes outstanding.
Credit Ratings
At March 1, 2019, the investment-grade credit ratings of EPO’s long-term senior unsecured debt securities were BBB+ from
Standard and Poor’s, Baa1 from Moody’s and BBB+ from Fitch Ratings.  In addition, the credit ratings of EPO’s short-term senior
unsecured debt securities were A-2 from Standard and Poor’s, P-2 from Moody’s and F-2 from Fitch Ratings.
EPO’s credit ratings reflect only the view of a rating agency and should not be interpreted as a recommendation to buy, sell or hold
any of our securities.  A credit rating can be revised upward or downward or withdrawn at any time by a rating agency, if it
determines that circumstances warrant such a change.  A credit rating from one rating agency should be evaluated independently of
credit ratings from other rating agencies.
Common Unit Buyback Program
In December 1998, we announced a common unit buyback program whereby we, together with certain affiliates, could repurchase
up to 4,000,000 of our common units on the open market.  We purchased the remaining authorized amount of 1,236,800 common
units in late December 2018 for $30.8 million at an average price of $24.92 per unit.
91
Table of Contents
In January 2019, we announced that the Board of Enterprise GP had approved a $2.0 billion multi-year common unit buyback
program, which provides the partnership with an additional method to return capital to investors.  See “Significant Recent
Developments” within this Part II, Item 7 for additional information.
Issuance of Common Units
The following table summarizes the issuance of common units in connection with our at-the-market (“ATM”) program, distribution
reinvestment plan (“DRIP”) and employee unit purchase plan (“EUPP”) for the years indicated (dollars in millions, number of units
issued as shown):
  Number of
Common
Units Issued  Net Cash
Proceeds
Received 
Year Ended December 31, 2016:       
   Common units issued in connection with ATM program   87,867,037  $ 2,156.1 
   Common units issued in connection with DRIP and EUPP   16,316,534   386.7 
   Total   104,183,571  $ 2,542.8 
         
Year Ended December 31, 2017:         
   Common units issued in connection with ATM program   21,807,726  $ 597.0 
   Common units issued in connection with DRIP and EUPP   19,046,019   476.4 
   Total   40,853,745  $ 1,073.4 
         
Year Ended December 31, 2018:         
   Common units issued in connection with DRIP and EUPP (1)   19,861,951  $ 538.4 
         
(1)          The net cash proceeds we received from the issuance of common units during 2018 were used to temporarily reduce amounts outstanding under EPO’s
commercial paper program and for general company purposes.  
ATM Program
We have a registration statement on file with the SEC covering the issuance of up to $2.54 billion of our common units in amounts,
at prices and on terms to be determined by market conditions and other factors at the time of such offerings in connection with our
ATM program.  Pursuant to this program, we may sell common units from time-to-time under an equity distribution agreement
between Enterprise Products Partners L.P. and certain broker-dealers by means of ordinary brokers’ transactions through the NYSE
at market prices, in block transactions or as otherwise agreed to with the broker-dealer parties to the agreement.  After taking into
account the aggregate sales price of common units sold under the ATM program through December 31, 2018, we have the capacity
to issue additional common units under the ATM program up to an aggregate sales price of $2.54 billion.  We did not issue any
common units under the ATM program during the year ended December 31, 2018.
DRIP and EUPP
We have a registration statement on file with the SEC in connection with our DRIP.  The DRIP provides unitholders of record and
beneficial owners of our common units a voluntary means by which they can increase the number of our common units they own
by reinvesting the quarterly cash distributions they receive from us into the purchase of additional common units at a discount
ranging from 0% to 5%. Beginning with the distribution declared with respect to the fourth quarter of 2017 and paid in February
2018, the discount was reduced from 5% to 2.5%.  Likewise, beginning with the distribution declared with respect to the fourth
quarter of 2018 and paid in February 2019, the discount was reduced from 2.5% to 0%. We have the sole discretion to determine
whether common units purchased under the DRIP will come from our authorized but unissued common units or from common
units purchased on the open market by the DRIP administrator.
We issued 19,316,781 new common units, which generated net cash proceeds of $523.3 million, under the DRIP in 2018. After
taking into account the number of common units issued under the DRIP through December 31, 2018, we have the capacity to
deliver an additional 61,400,359 common units under this plan.
92
Table of Contents
In addition to the DRIP, we have registration statements on file with the SEC in connection with our EUPP.  We issued 545,170
new common units, which generated net cash proceeds of $15.1 million, under the EUPP in 2018. After taking into account the
number of common units issued under the EUPP through December 31, 2018, we have the capacity to deliver an additional
5,215,641 common units under this plan.
For additional information regarding our consolidated equity, see Note 8 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report.
Cash Flow Statement Highlights
The following table summarizes our consolidated cash flows from operating, investing and financing activities for the years
indicated (dollars in millions).  For additional information regarding our cash flow amounts, please refer to the Statements of
Consolidated Cash Flows included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report.
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Net cash flows provided by operating activities  $ 6,126.3  $ 4,666.3  $ 4,066.8 
Cash used in investing activities   4,281.6   3,286.1   4,005.8 
Cash provided by (used in) financing activities   (1,504.9)  (1,727.5)  321.7 
Net cash flows provided by operating activities are largely dependent on earnings from our consolidated business activities.
Changes in energy commodity prices may impact the demand for natural gas, NGLs, crude oil, petrochemical and refined products,
which could impact sales of our products and the demand for our midstream services. Changes in demand for our products and
services may be caused by other factors, including prevailing economic conditions, reduced demand by consumers for the end
products made with hydrocarbon products, increased competition, adverse weather conditions and government regulations affecting
prices and production levels.
We may also incur credit and price risk to the extent customers do not fulfill their obligations to us in connection with our
marketing activities and long-term take-or-pay agreements. Risks of nonpayment and nonperformance by customers are a major
consideration in our businesses, and our credit procedures and policies may not be adequate to sufficiently eliminate customer
credit risk.  We manage our exposure to credit risk through credit analysis, credit approvals, credit limits and monitoring
procedures, and for certain transactions may utilize letters of credit, prepayments, net out agreements and guarantees.  However,
these procedures and policies do not fully eliminate customer credit risk.  We have a concentration of trade receivable balances due
from independent and major integrated oil and gas companies and other pipelines and wholesalers.  These concentrations may
affect our overall credit risk in that these energy industry customers may be similarly affected by changes in economic, regulatory
or other factors.  For a more complete discussion of these and other risk factors pertinent to our business, see Part I, Item 1A of this
annual report.
The following information highlights significant year-to-year fluctuations in our consolidated cash flow amounts:
Operating activities
Comparison of 2018 with 2017.  Net cash flows provided by operating activities in 2018 increased $1.46 billion when compared to
2017.  The increase in cash provided by operating activities was primarily due to:
§a $1.43 billion increase in cash resulting from higher partnership earnings in 2018 compared to 2017 (after adjusting our $1.38
billion year-to-year increase in net income for changes in the non-cash items identified on our Statements of Consolidated Cash
Flows); and
§a $45.7 million year-to-year increase in cash distributions received on earnings from unconsolidated affiliates primarily due to
our investments in NGL pipeline businesses.
For information regarding significant year-to-year changes in our consolidated net income and underlying segment results, see
“Results of Operations” within this Part II, Item 7.
93
Table of Contents
Comparison of 2017 with 2016.  Net cash flows provided by operating activities in 2017 increased $599.5 million when compared
to 2016.  The increase in cash provided by operating activities was primarily due to:
§a $333.2 million increase in cash resulting from higher partnership earnings in 2017 compared to 2016 (after adjusting our
$302.6 million year-to-year increase in net income for changes in the non-cash items identified on our Statements of
Consolidated Cash Flows);
§a $213.1 million year-to-year increase in cash primarily due to the timing of cash receipts and payments related to operations;
and
§a $53.2 million year-to-year increase in cash distributions received on earnings from unconsolidated affiliates primarily due to
our investments in crude oil pipeline businesses.
Investing activities
Comparison of 2018 with 2017. Cash used for investing activities in 2018 increased $995.5 million when compared to 2017
primarily due to:
§a $1.12 billion year-to-year increase in expenditures for consolidated property, plant and equipment (see “Capital Investments”
within this Part II, Item 7 for additional information); and
§a $63.1 million year-to-year increase in investments in unconsolidated affiliates primarily related to NGL and crude oil pipeline
projects; partially offset by
§a $121.1 million year-to-year increase in proceeds from assets sales primarily due to the sale of our former Red River System
in October 2018 for $134.9 million; and
§a $48.1 million year-to-year decrease in net cash used for business combinations.  We used $150.6 million in 2018 to acquire
the remaining 50% equity interest in Delaware Processing.   For 2017, we used $191.4 million to acquire the BTA Gathering
System and related assets.
Comparison of 2017 with 2016.  Cash used for investing activities in 2017 decreased $719.7 million when compared to 2016
primarily due to:
§an $801.3 million year-to-year decrease in cash used for business combinations, net of cash received.  In 2017, net cash used
for business combinations was $198.7 million, which was primarily attributable to our acquisition of the BTA Gathering
System and related assets. In 2016, we paid the second and final installment for the acquisition of the EFS Midstream System;
and
§an $88.3 million year-to-year decrease in investments in unconsolidated affiliates primarily due to the completion of various
NGL and crude oil projects; partially offset by
§a $117.7 million year-to-year increase in expenditures for consolidated property, plant and equipment.
Financing activities
Comparison of 2018 with 2017. Cash used in financing activities for 2018 decreased $222.6 million when compared to 2017
primarily due to:
§a $775.9 million year-to-year increase in net cash inflows attributable to our consolidated debt obligations.  EPO issued $5.7
billion and repaid or redeemed $2.3 billion in principal amount of senior and junior subordinated notes during 2018 compared
to the issuance of $1.7 billion in principal amount of junior subordinated notes and the repayment of $800.0 million in
principal amount of senior notes during 2017.  In addition, net repayments of short term notes under EPO’s commercial paper
program increased $1.71 billion year-to-year; and
94
Table of Contents
§a $237.7 million year-to-year increase in contributions from noncontrolling interests. In June 2018, Western acquired a
noncontrolling 20% equity interest in our consolidated subsidiary that owns the Midland-to-ECHO 1 Pipeline System for
$189.6 million in cash.  In addition, during 2018 we received $41.0 million of contributions for the construction of our jointly-
owned ethylene export facility; partially offset by
§a $535.0 million year-to-year decrease in net cash proceeds from the issuance of common units.  We issued an aggregate
19,861,951 common units, which generated $538.4 million of net cash proceeds, in connection with our DRIP and EUPP
during 2018.  This compares to an aggregate 40,853,745 common units we issued in connection with our ATM, DRIP and
EUPP during 2017, which collectively generated $1.07 billion of net cash proceeds;
§a $157.0 million year-to-year increase in cash distributions paid to limited partners during 2018 when compared to 2017. The
increase in cash distributions is due to increases in both the number of distribution-bearing common units outstanding and the
quarterly cash distribution rates per unit;
§a $32.4 million year-to-year increase in cash distributions paid to noncontrolling interests primarily related to the Midland-to-
ECHO 1 Pipeline System; and
§a $30.8 million repurchase of common units under a legacy buyback program in December 2018.
Comparison of 2017 with 2016.  Cash used in financing activities for 2017 was $1.73 billion compared to cash provided by
financing activities of $321.7 million for 2016.  The $2.05 billion year-to-year change in cash flow from financing activities was
primarily due to:
§a $1.47 billion year-to-year decrease in net cash proceeds from the issuance of common units.  We issued an aggregate
40,853,745 common units, which generated $1.07 billion of net cash proceeds, in connection with our ATM program, DRIP
and EUPP during 2017.  This compares to an aggregate 104,183,571 common units we issued in connection with these
programs and plans during 2016, which collectively generated $2.54 billion of net cash proceeds;
§a $285.6 million year-to-year decrease in net cash inflows attributable to our consolidated debt obligations.  EPO issued $1.7
billion in principal amount of junior subordinated notes and repaid $800.0 million in principal amount of senior notes during
2017 compared to the issuance of $1.25 billion and repayment of $750.0 million in principal amount of senior notes during
2016.  In addition, net repayments under EPO’s commercial paper program were $44.2 million during 2017 compared to net
issuances of $647.9 million during 2016; and
§a $269.4 million year-to-year increase in cash distributions paid to limited partners during 2017 when compared to 2016.
Restricted Cash
Restricted cash represents amounts held in segregated bank accounts by our clearing brokers as margin in support of our
commodity derivative instruments portfolio and related physical purchases and sales of natural gas, NGLs, crude oil and refined
products.  Additional cash may be restricted to maintain our commodity derivative instruments portfolio as prices fluctuate or
margin requirements change.  At December 31, 2018 and 2017, our restricted cash amounts were $65.3 million and $65.2 million,
respectively.
For information regarding our derivative instruments and hedging activities, see Note 14 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial
Statements included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report.  In addition, see Part II, Item 7A of this annual report.
95
Table of Contents
Non-GAAP Cash Flow Measures
Distributable Cash Flow
Our partnership agreement requires us to make quarterly distributions to our unitholders of all available cash, after any cash
reserves established by Enterprise GP in its sole discretion.  Cash reserves include those for the proper conduct of our business,
including those for capital expenditures, debt service, working capital, operating expenses, common unit repurchases, commitments
and contingencies and other amounts.  The retention of cash by the partnership allows us to reinvest in our growth and reduce our
future reliance on the equity and debt capital markets. 
In January 2019, the Board declared a cash distribution of $0.4350 per common unit with respect to the fourth quarter of 2018.  In
addition, our management announced plans to recommend to the Board additional quarterly cash distribution increases of $0.0025
per unit with respect to each of the four quarters of 2019.  For additional information regarding our expected distribution growth
rate, see “Significant Recent Developments” within this Item 7.
We measure available cash by reference to distributable cash flow (“DCF”), which is a non-GAAP cash flow measure.  DCF is an
important financial measure for our limited partners since it serves as an indicator of our success in providing a cash return on
investment.  Specifically, this financial measure indicates to investors whether or not we are generating cash flows at a level that
can sustain our declared quarterly cash distributions.  DCF is also a quantitative standard used by the investment community with
respect to publicly traded partnerships since the value of a partnership unit is, in part, measured by its yield, which is based on the
amount of cash distributions a partnership can pay to a unitholder.  Our management compares the DCF we generate to the cash
distributions we expect to pay our partners.  Using this metric, management computes our distribution coverage ratio.  For the year
ended December 31, 2018, our distribution coverage ratio was approximately 1.6 times when compared to the sum of our quarterly
cash distributions declared with respect to fiscal 2018. Our calculation of DCF may or may not be comparable to similarly titled
measures used by other companies.
Based on the level of available cash each quarter, management proposes a quarterly cash distribution rate to the Board of Enterprise
GP, which has sole authority in approving such matters.  Unlike several other master limited partnerships, our general partner has a
non-economic ownership interest in us and is not entitled to receive any cash distributions from us based on incentive distribution
rights or other equity interests.
Our use of DCF for the limited purposes described above and in this report is not a substitute for net cash flows provided by
operating activities, which is the most comparable GAAP measure. For a discussion of net cash flows provided by operating
activities, see “Cash Flows from Operating, Investing and Financing Activities” within this Part II, Item 7.
96
Table of Contents
The following table summarizes our calculation of DCF for the years indicated (dollars in millions):
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Net income attributable to limited partners (GAAP) (1)  $ 4,172.4  $ 2,799.3  $ 2,513.1 
Adjustments to GAAP net income attributable to limited partners to
   derive non-GAAP DCF:             
   Add non-cash depreciation, amortization and accretion expenses   1,791.6   1,644.0   1,552.0 
   Add non-cash asset impairment and related charges   50.5   49.8   53.5 
   Add non-cash expense or subtract benefit attributable to unrealized changes
      in fair value of derivative instruments   17.8   22.8   45.0 
   Add non-cash expense attributable to Liquidity Option Agreement   56.1   64.3   24.5 
   Subtract non-cash gain on step acquisition of unconsolidated affiliate   (39.4)  --   -- 
   Add cash distributions received from unconsolidated affiliates (2)   529.4   483.0   451.5 
   Subtract equity in income of unconsolidated affiliates   (480.0)  (426.0)  (362.0)
   Subtract net gains attributable to asset sales   (28.7)  (10.7)  (2.5)
   Add deferred income tax expense   21.4   6.1   6.6 
   Subtract sustaining capital expenditures (3)   (320.9)  (243.9)  (252.0)
   Other miscellaneous adjustments, net   35.9   42.9   20.5 
      Subtotal DCF, before proceeds from asset sales and monetization of
         interest rate derivative instruments accounted for as cash flow hedges  $ 5,806.1  $ 4,431.6  $ 4,050.2 
   Add cash proceeds from asset sales   161.2   40.1   46.5 
   Add cash proceeds from monetization of interest rate derivative instruments (4)   22.1   30.6   6.1 
Distributable cash flow (non-GAAP)  $ 5,989.4  $ 4,502.3  $ 4,102.8 
             
Total cash distributions paid to limited partners with respect to period  $ 3,777.1  $ 3,635.2  $ 3,394.0 
Cash distributions per unit declared by Enterprise GP with respect to period (5)  $ 1.7250  $ 1.6825  $ 1.6100 
Total distributable cash flow retained by partnership with respect to period (6)  $ 2,213.3  $ 867.1  $ 708.8 
Distribution coverage ratio (7)   1.6x  1.2x  1.2x
             
(1) For a discussion of significant changes in our comparative income statement amounts underlying net income attributable to limited partners, along with
the primary drivers of such changes, see “Income Statement Highlights” within this Part II, Item 7.
(2) Reflects both distributions received on earnings from unconsolidated affiliates and those attributable to a return of capital from unconsolidated affiliates.
(3) Sustaining capital expenditures include cash payments and accruals applicable to the period.
(4) For information regarding these gains, see “Interest Rate Hedging Activities” under Note 14 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included
under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report.
(5) See Note 8 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report for additional information regarding our
quarterly cash distributions declared with respect to the years indicated.
(6) At the sole discretion of Enterprise GP, cash retained by the partnership with respect to each of these years was primarily reinvested in growth capital
projects. This retainage of cash substantially reduced our reliance on the equity capital markets to fund such expenditures.
(7) Distribution coverage ratio is determined by dividing distributable cash flow by total cash distributions paid to limited partners and in connection with
distribution equivalent rights with respect to the period  
The following table presents a reconciliation of net cash flows provided by operating activities to DCF for the years indicated
(dollars in millions):
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Net cash flows provided by operating activities (GAAP)  $ 6,126.3  $ 4,666.3  $ 4,066.8 
Adjustments to reconcile GAAP net cash flows provided by operating
   activities to non-GAAP DCF:             
      Subtract sustaining capital expenditures   (320.9)  (243.9)  (252.0)
      Add cash proceeds from asset sales   161.2   40.1   46.5 
      Add cash proceeds from monetization of interest rate derivative instruments   22.1   30.6   6.1 
      Net effect of changes in operating accounts   (16.2)  (32.2)  180.9 
      Other miscellaneous adjustments, net   16.9   41.4   54.5 
Distributable cash flow (non-GAAP)  $ 5,989.4  $ 4,502.3  $ 4,102.8 
97
Table of Contents
Free Cash Flow
Beginning with this annual report, we provide below the non-GAAP financial measure of free cash flow (“FCF”).  FCF is a
traditional cash flow metric that is widely used by a variety of investors and other participants in the financial community, as
opposed to DCF, which is a cash flow measure primarily used by investors and others in evaluating master limited partnerships. In
general, FCF is a measure of how much cash flow a business generates during a specified time period after accounting for all
capital investments, including expenditures for growth and sustaining capital projects. By comparison, only sustaining capital
expenditures are reflected in DCF.
We believe that FCF is important to traditional investors since it reflects the amount of cash available for reducing debt, investing
in additional capital projects, paying distributions, common unit repurchases and similar matters.  Since business partners fund
certain capital projects of our consolidated subsidiaries, our determination of FCF reflects the amount of cash we receive from
noncontrolling interests, net of any distributions paid to such interests.  Our calculation of FCF may or may not be comparable to
similarly titled measures used by other companies.
Our use of FCF for the limited purposes described above and in this report is not a substitute for net cash flows provided by
operating activities, which is the most comparable GAAP measure.
The following table summarizes our calculation of FCF for the years indicated (dollars in millions):
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Net cash flows provided by operating activities (GAAP)  $ 6,126.3  $ 4,666.3  $ 4,066.8 
Adjustments to GAAP net cash flows provided by operating activities
   to derive non-GAAP Free Cash Flow:             
   Subtract cash used in investing activities   (4,281.6)  (3,286.1)  (4,005.8)
   Add cash contributions from noncontrolling interests   238.1   0.4   20.4 
   Subtract cash distributions paid to noncontrolling interests   (81.6)  (49.2)  (47.4)
Free cash flow (non-GAAP)  $ 2,001.2  $ 1,331.4  $ 34.0 
The elements used in calculating FCF are sourced directly from our statements of consolidated cash flows presented under Part II,
Item 8 of this annual report.  For a discussion of significant year-to-year changes in our cash flow statement amounts, see “Cash
Flows from Operating, Investing and Financing Activities” within this Part II, Item 7.
Capital Investments
An important part of our business strategy involves expansion through growth capital projects, business combinations, asset
acquisitions, and investments in joint ventures.  We believe that we are well positioned to continue to expand our network of assets
through the construction of new facilities and to capitalize on expected increases in natural gas, NGL and crude oil production
resulting from development activities in the Permian Basin, Eagle Ford, Haynesville and other domestic shale plays. Although our
focus in recent years has been on expansion through growth capital projects, management continues to analyze potential business
combinations, asset acquisitions, joint ventures and similar transactions with businesses that operate in complementary markets or
geographic regions.
We placed $1.9 billion of major growth capital projects into service during 2018, including our PDH facility, two processing trains
at our Orla natural gas processing plant (Orla I and II), and a ninth NGL fractionator located in Chambers County, Texas.  We
currently have $6.7 billion of growth capital projects scheduled to be completed by the end of 2020 including:
§the completion of joint venture-owned dock infrastructure in Corpus Christi designed to accommodate crude oil volumes
(second quarter of 2019),
§the Shin Oak NGL pipeline (first quarter of 2019 through fourth quarter of 2019),
§the third processing train at our Orla natural gas processing facility (second quarter of 2019),
§expansion of our Front Range and Texas Express NGL pipelines (third quarter of 2019),
98
Table of Contents
§our iBDH facility (fourth quarter of 2019),
§our ethylene export terminal (fourth quarter of 2019 through the fourth quarter of 2020),
§our Mentone cryogenic natural gas processing plant (first quarter of 2020), and
§a new NGL fractionation facility in Chambers County, Texas (fourth quarter of 2019 through the first half of 2020).
Based on information currently available, we expect our total capital investments for 2019 to approximate $3.5 billion to $3.9
billion, which reflects growth capital expenditures of $3.1 billion to $3.5 billion and $350 million for sustaining capital
expenditures. Our forecast of capital investments for 2019 is based on our announced strategic operating and growth plans (through
the filing date of this annual report), which are dependent upon our ability to generate the required funds from either operating cash
flows or other means, including borrowings under debt agreements, the issuance of additional equity and debt securities, and
potential divestitures.  We may revise our forecast of capital investments due to factors beyond our control, such as adverse
economic conditions, weather related issues and changes in supplier prices.  Furthermore, our forecast of capital investments may
change as a result of decisions made by management at a later date, which may include unforeseen acquisition opportunities.
Our success in raising capital, including partnering with other companies to share costs and risks, continues to be a significant
factor in determining how much capital we can invest.  We believe our access to capital resources is sufficient to meet the demands
of our current and future growth needs and, although we expect to make the forecast capital expenditures noted above, we may
adjust the timing and amounts of projected expenditures in response to changes in capital market conditions.
The following table summarizes our capital investments for the years indicated (dollars in millions):
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Capital investments for property, plant and equipment: (1)          
   Growth capital projects (2)  $ 3,902.3  $ 2,868.8  $ 2,722.7 
   Sustaining capital projects (3)   320.9   233.0   261.4 
   Total  $ 4,223.2  $ 3,101.8  $ 2,984.1 
             
Cash used for business combinations  $ 150.6  $ 198.7  $ 1,000.0 
             
Investments in unconsolidated affiliates  $ 113.6  $ 50.5  $ 138.8 
             
(1) Growth and sustaining capital amounts presented in the table above are presented on a cash basis.
(2) Growth capital projects either (a) result in new sources of cash flow due to enhancements of or additions to existing assets (e.g., additional revenue
streams, cost savings resulting from debottlenecking of a facility, etc.) or (b) expand our asset base through construction of new facilities that will generate
additional revenue streams and cash flows.
(3) Sustaining capital expenditures are capital expenditures (as defined by GAAP) resulting from improvements to existing assets. Such expenditures serve to
maintain existing operations but do not generate additional revenues or result in significant cost savings.  
Fluctuations in our expenditures for growth capital projects and investments in unconsolidated affiliates are explained in large part
by increases or decreases in spending on major expansion projects.  Our most significant growth capital expenditures for the year
ended December 31, 2018 involved projects at our Mont Belvieu complex, Houston and Beaumont terminals, as well as projects to
support crude oil, natural gas and NGL production from the Permian Basin.  Fluctuations in expenditures for sustaining capital
projects are explained in large part by the timing and cost of pipeline integrity and similar projects.
Comparison of 2018 with 2017
Investments in growth capital projects supporting Permian Basin production increased $773.0 million year-to-year primarily due to
increased expenditures for (i) the Shin Oak NGL Pipeline, which accounted for $839.1 million of the increase, (ii) conversion of a
portion of our Seminole NGL Pipeline system to crude oil service (the Midland-to-ECHO 2 Pipeline System), which accounted for
an additional $223.4 million increase, partially offset by (iii) a $520.1 million
99
Table of Contents
decrease in investment related to our Midland-to-ECHO 1 Pipeline System, which commenced limited service in November 2017
and full service in April 2018.
Investments in growth capital projects to expand and support export activities at EHT increased $161.9 million year-to-year. 
Additionally, investments in projects that expand our refined products handling capabilities at the Beaumont marine terminal
increased $93.9 million year-to-year.
Investments in growth capital projects at our Mont Belvieu complex decreased a net $168.6 million year-to-year, primarily due to
decreased expenditures of $529.3 million for our PDH facility and ninth NGL fractionator, which were both placed into commercial
service during the second quarter of 2018, partially offset by increased expenditures on our iBDH unit, which accounted for a
$224.1 million increase, and our new NGL fractionation facility, which accounted for an additional $123.6 million increase.
Investments in unconsolidated affiliates increased $63.1 million year-to-year primarily due to increased expenditures for certain
NGL and crude oil expansion projects.
Net cash used for business combinations decreased $48.1 million year-to-year.  We invested $150.6 million in 2018 to acquire the
remaining 50% equity interest in Delaware Processing compared to $191.4 million in 2017 to acquire the BTA Gathering System
and related assets.
Comparison of 2017 with 2016
Investments in growth capital projects supporting Permian Basin production increased $909.5 million year-to-year primarily due to
increased expenditures for the Midland-to-ECHO 1 Pipeline System, which accounted for a $480.2 million increase, construction
activities at our Orla natural gas processing plant and related infrastructure, which accounted for an additional $422.1 million
increase, partially offset by decreased expenditures on our South Eddy natural gas processing plant and related pipelines, which
accounted for a $131.2 million decrease. We completed construction and placed the South Eddy plant into service in May 2016.
Investments in our Morgan’s Point Ethane Export Terminal and our LPG export expansion project at EHT decreased a combined
$299.3 million.  Our Morgan’s Point Ethane Export Terminal was placed into service in September 2016.
Investments in growth capital projects at our Mont Belvieu complex decreased $271.9 million year-to-year, primarily due to
decreased expenditures at our PDH facility, which accounted for a $443.8 million decrease, partially offset by increased
expenditures on our ninth NGL fractionator, which accounted for a $141.9 million increase, and our iBDH unit, which accounted
for an additional $93.2 million increase.
Investments in our ECHO and Beaumont Marine West crude oil terminals decreased a combined $103.7 million year-to-year as
new storage tanks and related assets were placed into service at these facilities during 2016.
Net cash used for business combinations decreased $801.3 million year-to-year due to the second and final payment of $1.0 billion
made in July 2016 for the EFS Midstream System, partially offset by $191.4 million in net cash paid in connection with the
acquisition of the BTA Gathering System and related assets in April 2017.
Investments in unconsolidated affiliates decreased $88.3 million year-to-year primarily due to the completion of certain NGL and
crude oil expansion projects.
Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates
In our financial reporting processes, we employ methods, estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and
liabilities and disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities as of the date of our financial statements.  These methods, estimates and
assumptions also affect the reported amounts of revenues and expenses for each reporting period.  Investors should be aware that
actual results could differ from these estimates if the underlying assumptions prove to be incorrect.  The following sections discuss
the use of estimates within our critical accounting policies:
100
Table of Contents
Depreciation Methods and Estimated Useful Lives of Property, Plant and Equipment
In general, depreciation is the systematic and rational allocation of an asset’s cost, less its residual value (if any), to the periods it
benefits.  The majority of our property, plant and equipment is depreciated using the straight-line method, which results in
depreciation expense being incurred evenly over the life of an asset. Depreciation expense incorporates management estimates
regarding the useful economic lives and residual values of our assets.  At the time we place our assets into service, we believe such
assumptions are reasonable; however, circumstances may develop that cause us to change these assumptions, which would change
our depreciation amounts prospectively.  Examples of such circumstances include (i) changes in laws and regulations that limit the
estimated economic life of an asset, (ii) changes in technology that render an asset obsolete, (iii) changes in expected residual
values or (iv) significant changes in our forecast of the remaining life for the associated resource basins, if applicable.
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, the net carrying value of our property, plant and equipment was $38.74 billion and $35.62 billion,
respectively.  We recorded $1.44 billion, $1.30 billion and $1.22 billion of depreciation expense for the years ended December 31,
2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively.  For additional information regarding our property, plant and equipment, see Note 4 of the
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report.
Measuring Recoverability of Long-Lived Assets and Fair Value of Equity Method Investments
Long-lived assets (including property, plant and equipment and intangible assets with finite useful lives) are reviewed for
impairment whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of such assets may not be recoverable
through future cash flows.  Examples of such events or changes might be production declines that are not replaced by new
discoveries or long-term decreases in the demand or price of natural gas, NGLs, crude oil, petrochemicals or refined products.
The carrying value of a long-lived asset is deemed not recoverable if it exceeds the sum of undiscounted estimated cash flows
expected to result from the use and eventual disposition of the asset.  Estimates of undiscounted cash flows are based on a number
of assumptions including anticipated operating margins and volumes; estimated useful life of the asset or asset group; and estimated
residual values.  If the carrying value of a long-lived asset is not recoverable, an impairment charge would be recorded for the
excess of the asset’s carrying value over its estimated fair value, which is derived from an analysis of the asset’s estimated future
cash flows, the market value of similar assets and replacement cost of the asset less any applicable depreciation or amortization.  In
addition, fair value estimates also include the usage of probabilities when there is a range of possible outcomes.
An equity method investment is evaluated for impairment whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that there is a
possible permanent loss in value of the investment (i.e., an “other than a temporary” decline).  Examples of such events include
sustained operating losses of the investee or long-term negative changes in the investee’s industry.  When evidence of a loss in
value has occurred, we compare the estimated fair value of the investment to its carrying value to determine whether an impairment
has occurred.  We assess the fair value of our equity method investments using commonly accepted techniques, and may use more
than one method, including, but not limited to, recent third party sales and discounted estimated cash flow models.  Estimates of
discounted cash flows are based on a number of assumptions including discount rates; probabilities assigned to different cash flow
scenarios; anticipated margins and volumes and estimated useful lives of the investment’s underlying assets.
A significant change in the assumptions we use to measure recoverability of long-lived assets and the fair value of equity method
investments could result in our recording a non-cash impairment charge. Any write-down of the carrying values of such assets
would increase operating costs and expenses at that time.
During 2018, 2017 and 2016, we recognized non-cash asset impairment charges related to long-lived assets of $46.8 million, $37.8
million and $45.2 million, respectively, which are a component of costs and expenses.  For additional information regarding these
impairment charges, see Note 14 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual
report.   We did not recognize any impairment charges in connection with our equity-method investments during the three years
ended December 31, 2018.
101
Table of Contents
Valuation and Amortization Methods of Customer Relationships and Contract-Based Intangible Assets
The specific, identifiable intangible assets of an acquired business depend largely upon the nature of its operations and include
items such as customer relationships and contracts.  The method used to value such assets depends on a number of factors,
including the nature of the asset and the economic returns the asset is expected to generate.
Customer relationship intangible assets represent the estimated economic value assigned to commercial relationships acquired in
connection with business combinations. In certain instances, the acquisition of these intangible assets provides us with access to
customers in a defined resource basin and is analogous to having a franchise in a particular area. Efficient operation of the acquired
assets (e.g., a natural gas gathering system) helps to support the commercial relationships with existing producers and provides us
with opportunities to establish new ones within our existing asset footprint.  The duration of this type of customer relationship is
limited by the estimated economic life of the associated resource basin that supports the customer group.  When estimating the
economic life of a resource basin, we consider a number of factors, including reserve estimates and the economic viability of
production and exploration activities.
In other situations, the acquisition of a customer relationship intangible asset provides us with access to customers whose
hydrocarbon volumes are not attributable to specific resource basins.  As with basin-specific customer relationships, efficient
operation of the associated assets (e.g., a marine terminal that handles volumes originating from multiple sources) helps to support
the commercial relationships with existing customers and provides us with opportunities to establish new ones. The duration of this
type of customer relationship is typically limited to the term of the underlying service contracts, including assumed renewals.
The value we assign to customer relationships is amortized to earnings using methods that closely resemble the pattern in which the
estimated economic benefits will be consumed (i.e., the manner in which the intangible asset is expected to contribute directly or
indirectly to our cash flows). For example, the amortization period for a basin-specific customer relationship asset is limited by the
estimated finite economic life of the associated hydrocarbon resource basin.
Contract-based intangible assets represent specific commercial rights we own arising from discrete contractual agreements, such as
the third party customer storage and terminal contracts we acquired in connection with the Oiltanking transaction in October 2014.
A contract-based intangible asset with a finite life is amortized over its estimated economic life, which is the period over which the
contract is expected to contribute directly or indirectly to our cash flows.  Our estimates of the economic life of contract-based
intangible assets are based on a number of factors, including (i) the expected useful life of the related tangible assets (e.g., a marine
terminal, pipeline or other asset), (ii) any legal or regulatory developments that would impact such contractual rights and (iii) any
contractual provisions that enable us to renew or extend such arrangements.
If our assumptions regarding the estimated economic life of an intangible asset were to change, then the amortization period for
such asset would be adjusted accordingly.  Changes in the estimated useful life of an intangible asset would impact operating costs
and expenses prospectively from the date of change.  If we determine that an intangible asset’s carrying value is not recoverable
through its future cash flows, we would be required to reduce the asset’s carrying value to its estimated fair value through the
recording of a non-cash impairment charge.  Any such write-down of the value of an intangible asset would increase operating
costs and expenses at that time.
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, the carrying value of our customer relationship and contract-based intangible asset portfolio was
$3.61 billion and $3.69 billion, respectively.  We recorded $170.3 million, $166.9 million and $171.3 million of amortization
expense attributable to intangible assets for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively.  For additional
information regarding our intangible assets, see Note 6 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included under Part II,
Item 8 of this annual report.
102
Table of Contents
Methods We Employ to Measure the Fair Value of Goodwill and Related Assets
Goodwill represents the excess of the purchase price of an acquired business over the amounts assigned to assets acquired and
liabilities assumed in the transaction. Goodwill is not amortized; however, it is subject to annual impairment testing at the end of
each fiscal year, and more frequently, if circumstances indicate it is probable that the fair value of goodwill is below its carrying
amount.
Goodwill impairment testing involves estimating the fair value of the associated reporting unit.  The fair value of a reporting unit is
based on assumptions regarding the future economic prospects of the assets that comprise the reporting unit. These assumptions
include (i) discrete financial forecasts for the associated businesses, which, in turn, rely on management’s estimates of operating
margins, throughput volumes and similar inputs; (ii) long-term growth rates for cash flows beyond the discrete forecast periods;
and (iii) appropriate discount rates.  If the fair value of a reporting unit (including its inherent goodwill) is less than its carrying
value, a non-cash impairment charge to costs and expenses is required to reduce the carrying value of goodwill to its implied fair
value.  At December 31, 2018 and 2017, the carrying value of our goodwill was $5.75 billion.
We did not record any goodwill impairment charges during the three years ended December 31, 2018.  For additional information
regarding our goodwill, see Note 6 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual
report.
Use of Estimates for Revenues and Expenses
As noted previously, preparing our consolidated financial statements in conformity with GAAP requires us to make estimates that
affect amounts presented in the financial statements.  Due to the time required to compile actual billing information and receive
third party data needed to record transactions, we routinely employ estimates in connection with revenue and expense amounts in
order to meet our accelerated financial reporting deadlines.
Our most significant routine estimates involve certain natural gas processing plant revenues and costs, pipeline transportation
revenues, fractionation revenues, marketing revenues and related purchases, and power and utility costs.  These types of
transactions must be estimated since the actual amounts are generally unavailable at the time we complete our accounting close
process. The estimates subsequently reverse in the next accounting period when the corresponding actual customer billing or
vendor-invoiced amounts are recorded.
Changes in facts and circumstances may result in revised estimates, which could affect our reported financial statements and
accompanying disclosures.  Prior to issuing our financial statements, we review our revenue and expense estimates based on
currently available information to determine if adjustments are required.  Investors should be aware that actual results could differ
from these estimates if the underlying assumptions prove to be incorrect.
Other Matters
Recent Accounting Developments
For information regarding recent accounting developments involving revenue recognition and leases, see Note 2 of the Notes to
Consolidated Financial Statements included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report.
Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements
We have no off-balance sheet arrangements that have or are reasonably expected to have a material current or future effect on our
financial position, results of operations and cash flows.
Historically, operating leases were regarded as off-balance sheet arrangements. On January 1, 2019, we adopted Accounting
Standards Codification Topic 842, Leases, which requires long-term leases to be recorded on the balance sheet. Based on current
information, we expect to recognize an estimated $250 million of right-of-use assets and corresponding lease liabilities in
connection with operating leases.  These amounts would represent less than 1% of our total consolidated assets and liabilities,
respectively.
103
Table of Contents
Related Party Transactions
For information regarding our related party transactions, see Note 15 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included
under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report.
Insurance
For information regarding insurance matters, see Note 18 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included under Part II,
Item 8 of this annual report.
Contractual Obligations
The following table summarizes our significant contractual obligations at December 31, 2018 (dollars in millions):
     Payment or Settlement due by Period  
     In less than  In 1-3   In 4-5   More than 
Contractual Obligations  Total   1 year   years   years   5 years 
Scheduled maturities of debt obligations (1)  $ 26,420.6  $ 1,500.0  $ 2,825.0  $ 2,650.0  $ 19,445.6 
Estimated cash payments for interest (2)   25,520.2   1,190.4   2,195.4   1,980.0   20,154.4 
Operating lease obligations (3)   324.8   50.5   84.3   51.7   138.3 
Purchase obligations:                     
Product purchase commitments (4)   10,273.7   2,558.4   3,980.6   1,823.9   1,910.8 
Service payment commitments (5)   403.8   75.1   127.5   92.6   108.6 
Capital expenditure commitments (6)   171.8   171.8   --   --   -- 
Other long-term liabilities (7)   751.6   --   456.2   75.1   220.3 
Total contractual payment obligations  $ 63,866.5  $ 5,546.2  $ 9,669.0  $ 6,673.3  $ 41,978.0 
                     
(1) Represents scheduled future maturities of our current and long-term debt principal obligations. For information regarding our consolidated debt
obligations, see Note 7 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report.
(2) Estimated cash payments for interest are based on the principal amount of our consolidated debt obligations outstanding at December 31, 2018, the
contractually scheduled maturities of such balances, and the applicable interest rates. Our estimated cash payments for interest are significantly influenced
by the long-term maturities of our $2.67 billion in junior subordinated notes (due June 2067 through February 2078). Our estimated cash payments for
interest assume that these subordinated notes are not repaid prior to their respective maturity dates.  Our estimated cash payments for interest with respect
to each junior subordinated note are based on either the current fixed interest rate charged or the weighted-average variable rate paid in 2018, as
applicable, for each note applied to the remaining term through the respective maturity date.
(3) Primarily represents land held pursuant to property leases, leases of underground salt dome caverns for the storage of natural gas and NGLs, the lease of
transportation equipment used in our operations and office space with affiliates of EPCO.
(4) Represents enforceable and legally binding agreements to purchase goods or services as of December 31, 2018. The estimated payment obligations are
based on contractual prices in effect at December 31, 2018 applied to all future volume commitments. Actual future payment obligations may vary
depending on prices at the time of delivery.
(5) Primarily represents our unconditional payment obligations under firm pipeline transportation contracts.
(6) Represents unconditional payment obligations for services to be rendered or products to be delivered in connection with our capital investment program,
including our share of the capital expenditures of unconsolidated affiliates.
(7) As reflected on our consolidated balance sheet at December 31, 2018, “Other long-term liabilities” primarily represent the Liquidity Option Agreement,
the noncurrent portion of asset retirement obligations and deferred revenues.  
In connection with our acquisition of the EFS Midstream System in 2015, we are obligated to spend up to an aggregate of $270
million on specified midstream gathering assets for certain producers, over a ten-year period.  If constructed, these new assets
would be owned by us and be a component of the EFS Midstream System. As of December 31, 2018, we have spent $151 million
of the $270 million commitment. Due to the uncertain timing of the remaining potential capital expenditures, we have excluded this
amount from the preceding table.
For additional information regarding our significant contractual obligations, see Note 17 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial
Statements included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report.
104
Table of Contents
ITEM 7A.  QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES
ABOUT MARKET RISK.
General
In the normal course of our business operations, we are exposed to certain risks, including changes in interest rates and commodity
prices.  In order to manage risks associated with assets, liabilities and certain anticipated future transactions, we use derivative
instruments such as futures, forward contracts, swaps and other instruments with similar characteristics.  Substantially all of our
derivatives are used for non-trading activities.
We assess the risk associated with each of our derivative instrument portfolios using a sensitivity analysis model.  This approach
measures the change in fair value of the derivative instrument portfolio based on a hypothetical 10% change in the underlying
interest rates or quoted market prices on a particular day.  In addition to these variables, the fair value of each portfolio is
influenced by changes in the notional amounts of the instruments outstanding and the discount rates used to determine the present
values.  The sensitivity analysis approach does not reflect the impact that the same hypothetical price movement would have on the
hedged exposures to which they relate.  Therefore, the impact on the fair value of a derivative instrument resulting from a change in
interest rates or quoted market prices (as applicable) would normally be offset by a corresponding gain or loss on the hedged debt
instrument, inventory value or forecasted transaction assuming:
§the derivative instrument functions effectively as a hedge of the underlying risk;
§the derivative instrument is not closed out in advance of its expected term; and
§the hedged forecasted transaction occurs within the expected time period.
We routinely review the effectiveness of our derivative instrument portfolios in light of current market conditions.  Accordingly, the
nature and volume of our derivative instruments may change depending on the specific exposure being managed.
See Note 14 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report for additional
information regarding our derivative instruments and commodity and interest rate hedging activities.
105
Table of Contents
Commodity Hedging Activities
The prices of natural gas, NGLs, crude oil, petrochemicals and refined products are subject to fluctuations in response to changes in
supply and demand, market conditions and a variety of additional factors that are beyond our control.  In order to manage such
price risks, we enter into commodity derivative instruments such as physical forward contracts, futures contracts, fixed-for-float
swaps, basis swaps and option contracts.
The following table summarizes our portfolio of commodity derivative instruments outstanding at December 31, 2018 (volume
measures as noted):
 Volume (1)  Accounting
Derivative Purpose Current (2) Long-Term (2) Treatment
Derivatives designated as hedging instruments:      
Natural gas processing:        
Forecasted natural gas purchases for plant thermal reduction (Bcf)  4.9   n/a  Cash flow hedge
Forecasted sales of NGLs (MMBbls)  1.0   n/a  Cash flow hedge
Octane enhancement:        
Forecasted purchase of NGLs (MMBbls)  1.8   n/a  Cash flow hedge
Forecasted sales of octane enhancement products (MMBbls)  3.1   0.1  Cash flow hedge
Natural gas marketing:        
Natural gas storage inventory management activities (Bcf)  3.3   n/a  Fair value hedge
NGL marketing:        
Forecasted purchases of NGLs and related hydrocarbon products (MMBbls)  33.6   4.3  Cash flow hedge
Forecasted sales of NGLs and related hydrocarbon products (MMBbls)  45.0   1.7  Cash flow hedge
NGLs inventory management activities (MMBbls)  0.3   n/a  Fair value hedge
Refined products marketing:        
Forecasted purchases of refined products (MMBbls)  1.0   n/a  Cash flow hedge
Forecasted sales of refined products (MMBbls)  2.0   n/a  Cash flow hedge
Refined products inventory management activities (MMBbls)  0.5   n/a  Fair value hedge
Crude oil marketing:        
Forecasted purchases of crude oil (MMBbls)  18.4   1.9  Cash flow hedge
Forecasted sales of crude oil (MMBbls)  28.5   1.9  Cash flow hedge
Derivatives not designated as hedging instruments:        
Natural gas risk management activities (Bcf) (3,4)  77.5   0.9  Mark-to-market
NGL risk management activities (MMBbls) (4)  3.3   n/a  Mark-to-market
Refined products risk management activities (MMBbls) (4)  2.6   n/a  Mark-to-market
Crude oil risk management activities (MMBbls) (4)  26.3   3.2  Mark-to-market
 
(1) Volume for derivatives designated as hedging instruments reflects the total amount of volumes hedged whereas volume for derivatives not designated as
hedging instruments reflects the absolute value of derivative notional volumes.
(2) The maximum term for derivatives designated as cash flow hedges, derivatives designated as fair value hedges and derivatives not designated as hedging
instruments is December 2020, June 2019 and December 2020, respectively.
(3) Current volume includes 29.8 Bcf of physical derivative instruments that are predominantly priced at a marked-based index plus a premium or minus a
discount related to location differences.
(4) Reflects the use of derivative instruments to manage risks associated with transportation, processing and storage assets.
At December 31, 2018, our predominant commodity hedging strategies consisted of (i) hedging anticipated future purchases and
sales of commodity products associated with transportation, storage and blending activities, (ii) hedging natural gas processing
margins and (iii) hedging the fair value of commodity products held in inventory.  
§The objective of our anticipated future commodity purchases and sales hedging program is to hedge the margins of certain
transportation, storage, blending and operational activities by locking in purchase and sale prices through the use of derivative
instruments and related contracts.
§The objective of our natural gas processing hedging program is to hedge an amount of earnings associated with these
activities.  We achieve this objective by executing fixed-price sales for a portion of our expected equity NGL production using
derivative instruments and related contracts.  For certain natural gas processing contracts, the hedging of expected equity NGL
production also involves the purchase of natural gas for shrinkage, which is hedged using derivative instruments and related
contracts.
106
Table of Contents
§The objective of our inventory hedging program is to hedge the fair value of commodity products currently held in inventory
by locking in the sales price of the inventory through the use of derivative instruments and related contracts.
Sensitivity Analysis
The following tables show the effect of hypothetical price movements on the estimated fair values of our principal commodity
derivative instrument portfolios at the dates indicated (dollars in millions).
The fair value information presented in the sensitivity analysis tables excludes the impact of applying Chicago Mercantile
Exchange (“CME”) Rule 814, which deems that financial instruments cleared by the CME are settled daily in connection with
variation margin payments.  As a result of this exchange rule, CME-related derivatives are considered to have no fair value at the
balance sheet date for financial reporting purposes; however, the derivatives remain outstanding and subject to future commodity
price fluctuations until they are settled in accordance with their contractual terms. Derivative transactions cleared on exchanges
other than the CME (e.g., the Intercontinental Exchange or ICE) continue to be reported on a gross basis.
Natural gas marketing portfolio
   Portfolio Fair Value at  
ScenarioResulting
ClassificationDecember 31,
2017  December 31,
2018  January 31,
2019  
Fair value assuming no change in underlying commodity prices Asset (Liability)  $ (13.9) $ 7.8  $ 0.6 
Fair value assuming 10% increase in underlying commodity
prices Asset (Liability)   (16.9)  8.0   (0.3)
Fair value assuming 10% decrease in underlying commodity
prices Asset (Liability)   (10.8)  7.7   1.5 
NGL and refined products marketing, natural gas processing and octane enhancement portfolio
   Portfolio Fair Value at  
ScenarioResulting
ClassificationDecember 31,
2017  December 31,
2018  January 31,
2019  
Fair value assuming no change in underlying commodity prices Asset (Liability)  $ (76.4) $ 77.5  $ 37.0 
Fair value assuming 10% increase in underlying commodity
prices Asset (Liability)   (126.1)  56.2   35.5 
Fair value assuming 10% decrease in underlying commodity
prices Asset (Liability)   (26.8)  98.9   38.6 
Crude oil marketing portfolio
   Portfolio Fair Value at  
ScenarioResulting
ClassificationDecember 31,
2017  December 31,
2018  January 31,
2019  
Fair value assuming no change in underlying commodity prices Asset (Liability)  $ (65.5) $ (26.5) $ 22.1 
Fair value assuming 10% increase in underlying commodity
prices Asset (Liability)   (109.4)  (88.6)  (8.9)
Fair value assuming 10% decrease in underlying commodity
prices Asset (Liability)   (21.6)  35.6   53.2 
Supplemental Information regarding Unrealized Gains (Losses)
In the aggregate, the fair value of our commodity hedging portfolios at December 31, 2018 was a net derivative asset of $58.8
million prior to the impact of CME Rule 814. This amount is comprised of $118.8 million of net deferred hedge gains attributable
to cash flow hedges partially offset by aggregate net unrealized losses of $60.0 million attributable to fair value hedges and mark-
to-market derivative instruments. The following table reflects how the net unrealized loss at December 31, 2018 will impact future
earnings in the periods indicated (dollars in millions):
Net unrealized loss at December 31, 2018  $ (60.0)
Reversal of net unrealized loss (recognized as net unrealized mark-to-market gains) by period:     
   Calendar year 2019:     
      First quarter   11.1 
      Second quarter   22.1 
      Third quarter   19.8 
      Fourth quarter   4.9 
      Total 2019   57.9 
   Calendar year 2020   2.1 
   Total net unrealized mark-to-market gains   60.0 
   Total impact on earnings  $ -- 
107
Table of Contents
As the unrealized mark-to-market gains attributable to the financial hedges are recognized in earnings, the corresponding actual
losses on the financial hedges and related gains on the physical transactions will be simultaneously realized.
Interest Rate Hedging Activities
We may utilize interest rate swaps, forward starting swaps and similar derivative instruments to manage our exposure to changes in
interest rates charged on borrowings under certain consolidated debt agreements.  This strategy may be used in controlling our
overall cost of capital associated with such borrowings.  The composition of our derivative instrument portfolios may change
depending on our hedging requirements. We have no interest rate hedging instruments outstanding as of the filing date of this
annual report.
Product Purchase Obligations
We have long-term purchase commitments for natural gas, NGLs, crude oil, petrochemicals and refined products.  For additional
information regarding these commitments, see Note 17 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included under Part II,
Item 8 of this annual report.
ITEM 8.  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA.
Our audited consolidated financial statements begin on page F-1 of this annual report.
ITEM 9.  CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON
ACCOUNTING AND FINANCIAL DISCLOSURE.
None.
108
Table of Contents
ITEM 9A.  CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES.
Disclosure Controls and Procedures
As of the end of the period covered by this annual report, our management carried out an evaluation, with the participation of (i) A.
James Teague, our general partner’s Chief Executive Officer and (ii) W. Randall Fowler, our general partner’s President and Chief
Financial Officer, of the effectiveness of our disclosure controls and procedures pursuant to Rule 13a-15 of the Securities Exchange
Act of 1934.  Mr. Teague is our principal executive officer and Mr. Fowler is our principal financial officer.  Based on this
evaluation, as of the end of the period covered by this annual report, Messrs. Teague and Fowler concluded:
(i)that our disclosure controls and procedures are designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by us in the reports
that we file or submit under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the
time periods specified in the SEC’s rules and forms, and that such information is accumulated and communicated to our
management, including our principal executive and financial officers, as appropriate to allow for timely decisions regarding
required disclosures; and
(ii)that our disclosure controls and procedures are effective.
Changes in Internal Control over Financial Reporting
There were no changes in our internal controls over financial reporting (as defined in Rule 13a-15(f) under the Securities Exchange
Act of 1934) during the fourth quarter of 2018, that have materially affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect, our
internal controls over financial reporting.
Section 302 and 906 Certifications 
The required certifications of Messrs. Teague and Fowler under Sections 302 and 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 are
included as exhibits to this annual report (see Exhibits 31 and 32 under Part IV, Item 15 of this annual report).
109
Table of Contents
MANAGEMENT’S ANNUAL REPORT ON INTERNAL CONTROL
OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING AS OF DECEMBER 31, 2018
The management of Enterprise Products Partners L.P. and its consolidated subsidiaries, including its Chief Executive Officer and its
President and Chief Financial Officer, is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial
reporting, as defined in Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.  Our internal control
system was designed to provide reasonable assurance to the management of Enterprise Products Partners L.P. and the Board of
Directors of its general partner regarding the preparation and fair presentation of Enterprise Products Partners L.P.’s published
financial statements.
Our management assessed the effectiveness of Enterprise Products Partners L.P.’s internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2018.  In making this assessment, management used the criteria set forth by the Committee of Sponsoring
Organizations of the Treadway Commission (“COSO”) in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013).  This assessment
included a review of the design and operating effectiveness of internal controls over financial reporting as well as the safeguarding
of assets.  Based on our assessment, we believe that, as of December 31, 2018, Enterprise Products Partners L.P.’s internal control
over financial reporting is effective based on those criteria.
Our Audit and Conflicts Committee is comprised of independent directors who are not officers or employees of our general
partner.  This committee meets regularly with members of management, internal audit staff and representatives of Deloitte &
Touche LLP, which is our independent registered public accounting firm, to discuss the adequacy of Enterprise Products Partners
L.P.’s internal controls over financial reporting, consolidated financial statements and the nature, extent and results of the audit
effort.  Management reviews all of Enterprise Products Partners L.P.’s significant accounting policies and assumptions that affect its
results of operations with the Audit and Conflicts Committee.  Both the independent registered public accounting firm and our
internal auditors have direct access to the Audit and Conflicts Committee without the presence of management.
Deloitte & Touche LLP has issued its attestation report regarding our internal control over financial reporting.  That report is
included within this Part II, Item 9A (see “Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm”).
Pursuant to the requirements of Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, this annual
report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting has been signed below by the following persons on behalf of the registrant and
in their respective capacities indicated below on March 1, 2019.
/s/ A. James Teague  /s/ W. Randall Fowler
Name: A. James Teague  Name: W. Randall Fowler
Title: Chief Executive Officer  Title: President and Chief Financial Officer
   of Enterprise Products Holdings LLC     of Enterprise Products Holdings LLC
110
Table of Contents
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the Board of Directors of Enterprise Products Holdings LLC and
Unitholders of Enterprise Products Partners L.P.
Houston, Texas
Opinion on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the internal control over financial reporting of Enterprise Products Partners L.P. and subsidiaries (the “Company”)
as of December 31, 2018, based on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee
of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (“COSO”). In our opinion, the Company maintained, in all material
respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2018, based on the criteria established in Internal
Control—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by COSO.
 
We have also audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
(“PCAOB”), the consolidated financial statements as of and for the year ended December 31, 2018, of the Company and our report
dated March 1, 2019, expressed an unqualified opinion on those financial statements.
Basis for Opinion
The Company’s management is responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting and for its assessment
of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting included in the accompanying Management’s Annual Report on
Internal Control over Financial Reporting as of December 31, 2018.  Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company’s
internal control over financial reporting based on our audit.  We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are
required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules
and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB.  Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material
respects.  Our audit included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a
material weakness exists, testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed
risk, and performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances.  We believe that our audit provides a
reasonable basis for our opinion.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability
of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles.  A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain
to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of
the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial
statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are
being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable
assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s assets that
could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements.  Also,
projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because
of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
/s/ DELOITTE & TOUCHE LLP
Houston, Texas
March 1, 2019
111
Table of Contents
ITEM 9B.  OTHER INFORMATION.
On February 26, 2019, Enterprise GP executed Amendment No. 4 to our partnership agreement in response to changes to the
Internal Revenue Code enacted by the Bipartisan Budget Act of 2015 relating to partnership audit and adjustment procedures.  The
foregoing description of the Amendment No. 4 to the partnership agreement is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text
of the amendment, which is filed as Exhibit 3.7 hereto and incorporated by reference herein.
PART III
ITEM 10.  DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND PARTNERSHIP GOVERNANCE.
Partnership Management
General
The following individuals currently serve as members of the Board of Enterprise GP: Richard H. Bachmann, Carin M. Barth,
Murray E. Brasseux, W. Randall Fowler, James T. Hackett, Charles E. McMahen, William C. Montgomery, John R. Rutherford,
Richard S. Snell, A. James Teague, Harry P. Weitzel and Randa Duncan Williams. Ms. Duncan Williams serves as the non-
executive Chairman of the Board, and Mr. Bachmann serves as the non-executive Vice Chairman of the Board. Messrs. Brasseux
and Rutherford joined the Board in January 2019.
In addition, Dr. Ralph S. Cunningham, Larry J. Casey and Edwin C. Smith serve as “advisory directors” for Enterprise GP, and
O.S. Andras serves as an “honorary director.”  Dr. Cunningham joined as an advisory director in January 2019. Service as an
advisory or honorary director does not confer any of the rights, obligations, liabilities or responsibilities of a director of Enterprise
GP (including any power or authority to vote on any matters as a director).
As is commonly the case with publicly traded limited partnerships, we do not directly employ any of the persons responsible for
our management, administrative or operating functions.  Pursuant to the ASA with EPCO, these roles are performed by employees
of EPCO, which are under the direction of the Board and executive officers of Enterprise GP.  The executive officers of Enterprise
GP are elected for one-year terms and may be removed, with or without cause, only by the Board.  Our unitholders do not elect the
officers or directors of Enterprise GP.  The DD LLC Trustees, through their control of Enterprise GP, have the ability to elect,
remove and replace at any time, all of the officers and directors of our general partner.  Each member of the Board of Enterprise GP
serves until such member’s death, resignation or removal.  The employees of EPCO who served as directors of our general partner
during 2018 were Ms. Duncan Williams and Messrs. Bachmann, Fowler, Teague and Weitzel.
Notwithstanding any contractual limitation on its obligations or duties, Enterprise GP is liable for all debts we incur (to the extent
not paid by us), except to the extent that such indebtedness or other obligations are non-recourse to Enterprise GP.  Whenever
possible, Enterprise GP intends to make any such indebtedness or other obligations non-recourse to itself.
Under our limited partnership agreement and subject to specified limitations, we will indemnify to the fullest extent permitted by
Delaware law, from and against all losses, claims, damages or similar events, any director or officer, or while serving as director or
officer, any person who is or was serving as a tax matters member or as a director, officer, tax matters member, employee, partner,
manager, fiduciary or trustee of our partnership or any of our affiliates.  Additionally, we will indemnify to the fullest extent
permitted by law, from and against all losses, claims, damages or similar events, any person who is or was an employee (other than
an officer) or agent of our general partner.
112
Table of Contents
Office of the Chairman
The Office of the Chairman is a management oversight group comprised of four individuals: Ms. Duncan Williams (as Chairman of
the Board), Mr. Bachmann (as Vice Chairman of the Board), Mr. Teague (as Chief Executive Officer (“CEO”)) and Mr. Fowler (as
President and Chief Financial Officer (“CFO”)).  The purpose of the Office of the Chairman is for the group to serve collectively as
a liaison between the Board and senior management with respect to, and to provide the Chairman, Vice-Chairman, CEO, and
President/CFO a venue to discuss, certain matters including:
§the strategic direction of Enterprise (including business opportunities through organic growth and acquisitions);
§the vision, leadership and development of the management team;
§business goals and operational performance; and
§strategies to preserve our financial strength.
In addition, the Office of the Chairman assists the Board and its Governance Committee in identifying director education
opportunities and in determining the size and composition of the Board and recruitment of new members.  The Office of the
Chairman also oversees policies that (i) reflect our values and business goals and (ii) enhance the effectiveness of our governance
structure. The Office of the Chairman also collectively oversees and provides strategic direction for our legal and human resources
departments.
In her role as Chairman of the Board (a non-executive role), Ms. Duncan Williams is responsible for, among other things: (i)
presiding over and setting the agendas for meetings of the Board, with due consideration of our values and business goals and an
effective governance structure; (ii) overseeing the appropriate flow of information to the Board; (iii) acting as a liaison between the
Board and senior management; and (iv) meeting regularly with the Board to review our strategic direction.
In his role as Vice Chairman of the Board (a non-executive role), Mr. Bachmann is responsible for, among other things: (i) assisting
the Chairman of the Board in the execution of the Chairman of the Board’s functions and responsibilities, as requested from time to
time by the Chairman of the Board; and (ii) meeting regularly with the  Board to review our strategic direction.
In his role as CEO, Mr. Teague is our principal executive officer and is responsible for, among other things: (i) managing our
overall business strategy and day-to-day operations; (ii) overseeing and providing strategic direction for us, subject to Board
approval, in the areas of operations, commercial activities, business development, and health and safety; and (iii) providing the
required certifications as principal executive officer of Enterprise GP in connection with our disclosure controls and procedures and
internal control over financial reporting.
In his role as President and CFO, Mr. Fowler is our principal financial officer and is responsible for, among other things: (i)
managing our overall financial strategy; (ii) overseeing and providing strategic direction for us, subject to Board approval, in the
areas of accounting, risk management, finance, treasury and cash management, information technology, investor relations, and
public relations and (iii) providing the required certifications as principal financial officer of Enterprise GP in connection with our
disclosure controls and procedures and internal control over financial reporting.
113
Table of Contents
Directors and Executive Officers of Enterprise GP
The following table sets forth the name, age and position of each of the directors, excluding advisory or honorary directors, and
executive officers of Enterprise GP at March 1, 2019.  Each executive officer holds the same respective office shown below in the
managing member of EPO.
Name Age Position with Enterprise GP
Randa Duncan Williams  (1,2,6) 57 Director and Chairman of the Board
Richard H. Bachmann (1,6) 66 Director and Vice Chairman of the Board
A. James Teague (1,6,7,8) 73 Director and CEO
W. Randall Fowler (1,6,7,8) 62 Director, President and CFO
Carin M. Barth (2,6) 56 Director
Murray E. Brasseux (4) 69 Director
James T. Hackett (2,3,6) 65 Director
Charles E. McMahen (4,5) 79 Director
William C. Montgomery (4) 57 Director
John R. Rutherford (4) 58 Director
Richard S. Snell (4,6) 76 Director
Harry P. Weitzel (6,8) 54 Director and Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary
Graham W. Bacon (8) 55 Executive Vice President (Operations and Engineering)
William Ordemann (8) 59 Executive Vice President (Strategy Development and Implementation)
R. Daniel Boss (8) 43 Senior Vice President (Accounting and Risk Control)
Brent B. Secrest (8) 46 Senior Vice President (Commercial)
Michael W. Hanson (8) 51 Vice President and Principal Accounting Officer
   
(1)  Member of Office of the Chairman
(2)  Member of the Governance Committee
(3)  Chairman of the Governance Committee
(4)  Member of the Audit and Conflicts Committee
(5)  Chairman of the Audit and Conflicts Committee
(6)  Member of the Capital Projects Committee
(7)  Co-Chairman of the Capital Projects Committee
(8)  Executive officer
The following information presents a brief history of the business experience of our directors and executive officers:
Randa Duncan Williams
Ms. Duncan Williams was elected Chairman of the Board of Enterprise GP in February 2013 and a director of Enterprise GP in
November 2010.  She was elected Chairman of EPCO in May 2010, having previously served as Group Co-Chairman since 1994. 
Ms. Duncan Williams has served as a member of Enterprise GP’s Governance Committee since April 2014 and Capital Projects
Committee since November 2016.
Ms. Duncan Williams has served as a director of EPCO since February 1991.  She also served as a director of the general partner of
Enterprise GP Holdings L.P. (“Holdings GP”) from May 2007 to November 2010.
Prior to joining EPCO in 1994, Ms. Duncan Williams practiced law with the firms Butler & Binion and Brown, Sims, Wise &
White.  Ms. Duncan Williams previously served on the board of directors of Encore Bancshares from July 2007 until July 2012. 
She currently serves on the board of trustees for numerous charitable organizations.  Ms. Duncan Williams is the daughter of the
late Mr. Dan L Duncan, our founder.
114
Table of Contents
Richard H. Bachmann
Mr. Bachmann was elected a director and Vice Chairman of the Board of Enterprise GP in January 2016 and has served as a
member of its Capital Projects Committee since November 2016.  He previously served as a director of Enterprise GP from
November 2010 through April 2014.
Mr. Bachmann was elected President and CEO of EPCO in May 2010 and has served as a director since January 1999.  He
previously served as Secretary of EPCO from May 1999 to May 2010 and as a Group Vice Chairman of EPCO from December
2007 to May 2010.
Mr. Bachmann served as an Executive Vice President of Holdings GP from April 2005 to November 2010 and as a director of
Holdings GP from February 2006 to November 2010.  He served as Chief Legal Officer and Secretary of Holdings GP from April
2005 to May 2010.  Mr. Bachmann served as Executive Vice President and Chief Legal Officer of Enterprise Products GP, LLC
(“EPGP,” the former general partner of Enterprise) from February 1999 until November 2010 and as Secretary of EPGP from
November 1999 to November 2010.  He previously served as a director of EPGP from June 2000 to January 2004 and from
February 2006 to May 2010.  Mr. Bachmann served as a director of DEP Holdings, LLC (“DEP GP”), the general partner of
Duncan Energy Partners L.P., from October 2006 to May 2010 and as President and CEO of DEP GP from October 2006 to April
2010.
A. James Teague
Mr. Teague was elected CEO of Enterprise GP in January 2016 and has been a director of Enterprise GP since November 2010. 
Mr. Teague previously served as the Chief Operating Officer (“COO”) of Enterprise GP from November 2010 to December 2015
and served as an Executive Vice President of Enterprise GP from November 2010 until February 2013. He has served as Co-
Chairman of the Capital Projects Committee of Enterprise GP since November 2016.
Mr. Teague served as an Executive Vice President of EPGP from November 1999 to November 2010 and additionally as a director
from July 2008 to November 2010 and as COO from September 2010 to November 2010.  In addition, he served as Chief
Commercial Officer of EPGP from July 2008 until October 2010.  He served as Executive Vice President and Chief Commercial
Officer of DEP GP from July 2008 until September 2011.  He previously served as a director of DEP GP from July 2008 to May
2010 and as a director of Holdings GP from October 2009 to May 2010.
Mr. Teague joined Enterprise in connection with its purchase of certain midstream energy assets from affiliates of Shell Oil
Company in 1999.  From 1998 to 1999, Mr. Teague served as President of Tejas Natural Gas Liquids, LLC, then an affiliate of
Shell.  From 1997 to 1998, he was President of Marketing and Trading for MAPCO, Inc.  Mr. Teague also serves on the board of
directors of Solaris Oilfield Infrastructure, Inc.
W. Randall Fowler
Mr. Fowler was elected a director of Enterprise GP in September 2011 and has served as its President since January 2016, having
previously served as Chief Administrative Officer from April 2015 to January 2016. Mr. Fowler has served as CFO of Enterprise
GP since August 2018, having previously served as Executive Vice President and CFO of Enterprise GP from November 2010 to
March 2015 and as Executive Vice President and CFO of EPGP from August 2007 to November 2010. He has served as Co-
Chairman of the Capital Projects Committee of Enterprise GP since November 2016.
Mr. Fowler was elected Vice Chairman and CFO of EPCO in May 2010.  He previously served as President and CEO of EPCO
from December 2007 to May 2010 and as its CFO from April 2005 to December 2007.
Mr. Fowler also served as President and CEO of DEP GP from April 2010 until September 2011 and as Executive Vice President
and CFO of DEP GP from August 2007 to April 2010.  He served as a director of DEP GP from September 2006 until September
2011.  Mr. Fowler served as Senior Vice President and Treasurer of EPGP from February 2005 to August 2007 and of DEP GP from
October 2006 to August 2007.  Mr. Fowler also previously served as a director of EPGP and of Holdings GP from February 2006 to
May 2010.  Mr. Fowler also served as Senior Vice President and CFO of Holdings GP from August 2005 to August 2007.
115
Table of Contents
Mr. Fowler, a Certified Public Accountant (inactive), joined Enterprise as Director of Investor Relations in January 1999.  He also
serves as Chairman of the Board of the Master Limited Partnership Association (formerly National Association of Publicly Traded
Partnerships).  Mr. Fowler is on the Advisory Board of Alerian, an independent provider of market intelligence for master limited
partnerships (“MLPs”), which includes its benchmark Alerian MLP Index , or AMZ.  He also serves on the Advisory Board for the
College of Business at Louisiana Tech University.
Carin M. Barth
Ms. Barth was elected a director of Enterprise GP in October 2015.   She has served as a member of its Governance Committee
since October 2015 and its Capital Projects Committee since November 2016.
Ms. Barth is co-founder and President of LB Capital Inc., a private equity investment firm established in 1988.  She currently
serves on the following boards of directors: Black Stone Minerals, L.P., where she is Chair of the Audit Committee and Group 1
Automotive, Inc.  Additionally, she is Chairman of the Investment Advisory Committee for the Endowment at Texas Tech
University, Chairman of The Welch Foundation and a board member of the Ronald McDonald House of Houston.
Ms. Barth previously served on the Housing Commission at the Bi-Partisan Policy Center in Washington, DC from 2011 to 2014,
and was a Commissioner of the Texas Department of Public Safety from 2008 to 2014.  She also served as a board member of the
following: Bill Barrett Corporation from June 2012 to May 2016; Western Refining Inc., where she was Chair of the Audit
Committee from March 2006 to January 2016; Methodist Hospital Research Institute from 2007 to 2012; Encore Bancshares, Inc.
from 2009 to 2012; Amegy Bancorporation, Inc. from 2006 to 2009; the Texas Public Finance Authority from 2006 to 2008; and
the Texas Tech University System Board of Regents from 1999 to 2005.  She was appointed by President George W. Bush to serve
as CFO of the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development from 2004 to 2005.
Murray E. Brasseux
Mr. Brasseux was elected a director of Enterprise GP and a member of its Audit and Conflicts Committee in January 2019.
Mr. Brasseux is also a member of the board of directors of Adams Resources & Energy, Inc., a publicly-traded company primarily
engaged in the business of crude oil marketing and tank truck transportation of liquid and dry bulk chemicals.  Mr. Brasseux retired
from Compass Bank in December 2014 after 20 years of service, having most recently served as Managing Director of Oil & Gas
Finance.  Mr. Brasseux also served as a consultant to Compass Bank from January 2015 to June 2015 and as a consultant to
Loughlin Management Partners (a restructuring and advisory firm) from June 2015 to December 2017.  Mr. Brasseux also serves
on the board of the Rare Book School (an affiliate of the University of Virginia).
James T. Hackett
Mr. Hackett was elected a director of Enterprise GP in April 2014.  He has served as a member of its Governance Committee since
April 2014, including in the role of committee Chairman since November 2016. In addition, Mr. Hackett has served as a member of
Enterprise GP’s Capital Projects Committee since November 2016.
Mr. Hackett is a senior advisor with Riverstone Holdings LLC, a private energy investment firm. Mr. Hackett serves as Executive
Chairman and Interim CEO of Alta Mesa Resources, Inc. (formerly named Silver Run Acquisition Corporation II) and CEO and
President of Kingfisher Midstream, LLC, an affiliate of Alta Mesa engaged in providing certain midstream energy services,
including crude oil and gas gathering, processing and marketing to producers of natural gas, natural gas liquids, crude oil and
condensate.
Mr. Hackett served as Executive Chairman of the board of directors of Anadarko Petroleum Corporation (“Anadarko”), an
independent oil and natural gas exploration and production company, from 2012 to 2013 after serving as its CEO from 2003 to
2012 and Chairman of the Board from 2006 to 2012.  He also served as Anadarko’s President from 2003 to 2010.  Mr. Hackett is a
board member of Flour Corp. and NOV, Inc. as well as Sierra Oil & Gas and Talen Energy (portfolio companies of Riverstone).  He
is a former director of Bunge Ltd. and the former
116
Table of Contents
Chairman of the Board of the Federal Reserve Bank of Dallas. He is a past Chairman of the National Petroleum Council, a member
of the Society of Petroleum Engineers, a member of the Baylor College of Medicine Board of Trustees and a member of the Rice
University Board of Trustees.  Mr. Hackett also currently serves as a faculty member at The University of Texas (Austin).
Charles E. McMahen
Mr. McMahen was elected a director of Enterprise GP in November 2010 and has served as Chairman of its Audit and Conflicts
Committee since November 2010.
Mr. McMahen also serves as a director for BBVA Compass Bancshares, Inc. (a wholly owned subsidiary of BBVA and a bank
holding company for BBVA’s North American banking operations).  He serves on the Audit Committee for BBVA Compass
Bancshares, Inc. and as Chairman of its Risk Committee.
Mr. McMahen served as a director of Holdings GP from August 2005 to November 2010.  Mr. McMahen served as Vice Chairman
of Compass Bank from March 1999 until December 2003 and served as Vice Chairman of Compass Bancshares from April 2001
until his retirement in December 2003.  Mr. McMahen also served as Chairman and CEO of Compass Banks of Texas from March
1990 until March 1999.  Mr. McMahen has served as a director of Compass Bancshares, and its successor, BBVA Compass Bank (a
wholly owned subsidiary of BBVA), since 2001. Mr. McMahen served as Chairman of the Board of Regents of the University of
Houston from September 1998 to August 2000.
William C. Montgomery
Mr. Montgomery was elected a director of Enterprise GP and appointed a member of its Audit and Conflicts Committee in October
2015.
Mr. Montgomery has served as a Partner of Quantum Energy Partners since 2011 and is also a member of its Executive and
Investment Committees.  He is responsible for originating and overseeing investments in the oil and gas upstream and oilfield
service sectors.  Mr. Montgomery also serves on the board of Apache Corporation.
Prior to joining Quantum Energy Partners, Mr. Montgomery was a Partner in the Investment Banking Division of Goldman, Sachs
& Co. where, during his tenure, he headed the firm’s Americas Natural Resources Group as well as its Houston office.  His career
as a banker spanned 22 years and was focused on large cap energy companies primarily in the upstream and oil service sectors.  Mr.
Montgomery has been an active civic leader, chairing the boards of The Houston Museum of Natural Science and The St. Francis
Episcopal Day School and currently serves on the board of trustees of The Kinkaid School, The Episcopal Health Foundation and
the Board of Visitors of the MD Anderson Cancer Center.
John R. Rutherford
Mr. Rutherford was elected a director of Enterprise GP and appointed a member of its Audit and Conflicts Committee in January
2019.
Mr. Rutherford currently serves as the Executive Director of the Coalition for a Fair and Open Port, an ad hoc voluntary
unincorporated nonprofit association of energy industry entities whose business operations depend on open and fair access to the
Houston Ship Channel.  Mr. Rutherford also serves as a Senior Managing Director of NRI Energy Partners LLC, a firm that
evaluates and invests in private and public energy companies and provides financial and strategic consulting services to energy
companies and investment firms.
Mr. Rutherford previously served as Executive Vice President (Strategic Planning, M&A and Business Development) of the general
partner of Plains All American Pipeline, L.P. (“Plains”) and as a member of Plains’ executive committee from October 2010
through July 2015. Mr. Rutherford also served as a financial consultant to Plains from July 2015 through September 2018. His
career includes over 20 years of investment banking experience as a mergers and acquisitions and strategic advisor to public and
private energy companies, investment firms, management teams and boards of directors. Prior to joining Plains, Mr. Rutherford
served as Managing Director of the North American Energy
117
Table of Contents
Practice of Lazard Freres & Company from 2007 until 2010. Prior to joining Lazard, he was a partner at Simmons & Company for
over ten years.
Richard S. Snell
Mr. Snell was elected a director of Enterprise GP and appointed a member of its Audit and Conflicts Committee in September
2011.  He has served as a member of its Capital Projects Committee since November 2016.
Mr. Snell is a Certified Public Accountant and is of counsel with the law firm of Ytterberg Deery Knull LLP, having been with the
firm since January 2017.  He previously served as an attorney with the law firms of Thompson & Knight LLP (from 2000 to early
2017) and Snell & Smith, P.C. (from its founding in 1993 until 2000).
Mr. Snell served as a director of DEP GP from January 2010 to September 2011 and as a director of the general partner of TEPPCO
Partners, L.P. from January 2006 until October 2009.  From June 2000 until February 2006, he served as a director of EPGP.
Harry P. Weitzel
Mr. Weitzel was elected a director of Enterprise GP and appointed a member of its Capital Projects Committee in November 2016
and has served as Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary of Enterprise GP since April 2016.  He previously served
as Senior Vice President, Deputy General Counsel and Secretary of Enterprise GP from January 2015 to April 2016.  Mr. Weitzel is
responsible for all legal functions of Enterprise, including securities, litigation, employment, mergers and acquisitions, corporate
governance and commercial transactions.
Mr. Weitzel has extensive experience as a commercial litigator, having practiced over 24 years in Texas and California. He has
successfully represented individual, corporate and governmental clients as plaintiffs and defendants in a wide variety of business-
related matters. Mr. Weitzel has tried cases in state and federal courts, as well as arbitrations under the American Arbitration
Association, JAMS and the International Chamber of Commerce.  He has handled appeals in state and federal courts.  Prior to
joining Enterprise, Mr. Weitzel was a commercial litigation partner with Pepper Hamilton LLP in Irvine, California from October
2009 to December 2014.
Graham W. Bacon
Mr. Bacon was elected Executive Vice President (Operations and Engineering) of Enterprise GP in October 2015. He previously
served as Group Senior Vice President (Operations and Environmental, Health, Safety & Training) from February 2014 to October
2015; as Senior Vice President (Operations) from January 2012 to February 2014; as Vice President (Operations) from June 2006 to
January 2012, and as Vice President (Engineering) from September 2005 to May 2006. He joined Enterprise in 1991 and has held a
variety of operations and engineering roles. Prior to joining Enterprise, Mr. Bacon worked for Vista Chemical Company.
William Ordemann
Mr. Ordemann has served as Executive Vice President (Strategy Development and Implementation) of Enterprise GP since April
2018, having previously served as Executive Vice President (Commercial) from October 2015 to April 2018.  He served as Group
Senior Vice President (Unregulated Liquids, Crude and Natural Gas Services) from April 2012 to October 2015.  He served as
Executive Vice President of Enterprise GP from August 2007 to April 2012.
Mr. Ordemann served as COO of EPGP from August 2007 until September 2010 and as its Executive Vice President from August
2007 to November 2010.  Mr. Ordemann previously served as a Senior Vice President of EPGP from September 2001 to August
2007 and was a Vice President of EPGP from October 1999 to September 2001.  He also served as an Executive Vice President of
DEP GP from August 2007 until September 2011 and as a director of Oiltanking GP from October 2014 until February 2015.
Mr. Ordemann joined Enterprise in connection with its purchase of certain midstream energy assets from affiliates of Shell Oil
Company in 1999.  He is also a director of the GPA Midstream Association, where he serves on the Executive Committee currently
as Chairman.
118
Table of Contents
R. Daniel Boss
Mr. Boss, a Certified Public Accountant, was elected Senior Vice President (Accounting and Risk Control) of Enterprise GP in
August 2016.  He is responsible for the overall leadership of our Accounting and Risk Control organizations.
Mr. Boss served as a Senior Vice President of Enterprise GP from March 2015 to August 2016 with responsibility over our
regulated business.  He also served as Vice President (Risk Control) from April 2013 to March 2015 and as Senior Director (Risk
Control) from January 2010 to March 2013. While serving in these positions, Mr. Boss was Chairman of the Risk Management
Committee and had responsibilities for our marketing risk management policies, transaction controls and derivatives and hedging
strategies compliance. Mr. Boss also served as Director (Volume Accounting) from November 2008 until January 2010 where he
was responsible for gas marketing and commodity derivatives accounting, hedging and reporting.
Prior to joining Enterprise, Mr. Boss held leadership positions with Merrill Lynch Commodities and Dynegy Inc.
Brent B. Secrest
Mr. Secrest has served as Senior Vice President (Commercial) of Enterprise GP since July 2018.  He has commercial responsibility
for NGL, crude oil and refined products marketing, NGL assets and terminals, crude oil assets and terminals and Enterprise’s
trucking and marine businesses.
Mr. Secrest previously served as Senior Vice President (Liquid Hydrocarbons Marketing) of Enterprise GP from May 2016 to June
2018, as Vice President (Crude Oil and Refined Products Marketing) from October 2015 to May 2016 and as Vice President (Crude
Oil Pipelines and Terminals) from October 2012 to October 2015. He has also served Enterprise in various other leadership
positions, including in the areas of NGL marketing and supply, commercial development, distribution, and business analysis. Mr.
Secrest has over 20 years of experience in the energy industry and began his career at Basis Petroleum Inc. prior to joining
Enterprise in 1996.
Michael W. Hanson
Mr. Hanson was elected a Vice President of Enterprise GP in April 2011 and its Principal Accounting Officer in August 2016.  His
responsibilities include team leadership in financial and management reporting matters, including the preparation of Enterprise’s
quarterly and annual reports.  Mr. Hanson reports to Mr. Boss, who has overall leadership of the Accounting department.
Mr. Hanson has served Enterprise and its affiliates in various accounting roles since 1992, including as an Assistant Controller from
April 2007 to July 2016 and Director of Financial Reporting from November 2004 to March 2007.
119
Table of Contents
Director Experience, Qualifications, Attributes and Skills
The following is a brief discussion of the experience, qualifications, attributes or skills that led to the conclusion that each of the
following persons should serve as a director of our general partner.
Five of our directors are current employees of EPCO and officers of our general partner or its affiliates.  Each of these directors has
significant experience in our industry as executive officers as well as other qualifications, attributes and skills.  These include:
§for Ms. Duncan Williams, legal and community involvement with numerous charitable organizations, and active involvement
in EPCO’s businesses, including ownership in and management of our businesses;
§for Mr. Teague, over 40 years of commercial management of midstream assets and marketing and trading activities, both for
third parties and for us;
§for Mr. Fowler, 20 years of experience with our midstream assets, including finance, accounting and investor relations and, for
over the last ten years, as a member of our executive management team;
§for Mr. Bachmann, over 30 years of experience with our midstream assets, including legal, regulatory, contracts and mergers
and acquisitions and, for approximately 20 years, as a member of either EPCO’s or our executive management teams; and
§for Mr. Weitzel, over 25 years of experience in Texas and California as a commercial litigator, having successfully represented
individual, corporate and governmental clients as plaintiffs and defendants in a wide variety of business-related matters.
Our seven outside voting directors also have significant experience in a variety of capacities, as well as other qualifications,
attributes and skills.  These include:
§for Ms. Barth, executive management experience in various financial and governance roles;
§for Mr. Brasseux, executive management experience in banking and finance as well as governance roles;
§for Mr. Hackett, executive management of a major oil and gas exploration and production company;
§for Mr. McMahen, executive management experience in banking and finance;
§for Mr. Montgomery, executive management of both an investment banking firm and a private equity investment firm serving
the global energy industry;
§for Mr. Rutherford, executive management experience in the midstream energy industry (including in the areas of strategic
planning, mergers and acquisitions, investment banking and finance); and
§for Mr. Snell, professional experience involving complex legal and accounting matters.
As advisory directors, Dr. Cunningham has a long history with Enterprise and its operations, Mr. Casey has executive management
experience in NGL and petrochemicals trading and related storage businesses and Mr. Smith has experience in banking and
investment matters.  As an honorary director, Mr. Andras has a long history with Enterprise and its operations, including being a
former CEO.
Partnership Governance
We are committed to sound principles of governance.  Such principles are critical for us to achieve our performance goals and
maintain the trust and confidence of investors, employees, suppliers, business partners and other stakeholders.
120
Table of Contents
A key element of strong governance is having independent members of the Board.  Pursuant to the NYSE listing standards, a
director will be considered independent if the Board determines that he or she does not have a material relationship with Enterprise
GP or us (either directly or as a partner, unitholder or officer of an organization that has a material relationship with Enterprise GP
or us).  Based on the foregoing, the Board has affirmatively determined that Ms. Barth and Messrs. Brasseux, Hackett, McMahen,
Montgomery, Rutherford and Snell are independent directors under the NYSE rules.
Because we are a limited partnership and meet the definition of a “controlled company” under the listing standards of the NYSE,
we are not required to comply with certain NYSE rules.  In particular, we are not required to comply with Section 303A.01 of the
NYSE Listed Company Manual, which would require that the Board of Enterprise GP be comprised of a majority of independent
directors.  Currently, seven of the twelve Board members of Enterprise GP are independent under NYSE rules; however, this
composition may not always be in effect.  Also, we have elected to not comply with Sections 303A.04 and 303A.05 of the NYSE
Listed Company Manual, which would require that the Board of Enterprise GP maintain a Nominating Committee and a
Compensation Committee, each consisting entirely of independent directors.
Code of Conduct and Ethics and Corporate Governance Guidelines
Enterprise GP has adopted a “Code of Conduct” that applies to its directors, officers and employees.  This code sets forth our
requirements for compliance with legal and ethical standards in the conduct of our business, including general business principles,
legal and ethical obligations, compliance policies for specific subjects, obtaining guidance on complying with the code, the
reporting of compliance issues, and discipline for violations of the code.  The Code of Conduct also establishes policies applicable
to our CEO, President and CFO, Principal Accounting Officer and senior financial and other managers to prevent wrongdoing and
to promote honest and ethical conduct, including ethical handling of actual and apparent conflicts of interest, compliance with
applicable laws, rules and regulations, full, fair, accurate, timely and understandable disclosure in public communications, and
prompt internal reporting of violations of the code (and thus accountability for adherence to the code).  Employees are required to
certify their understanding and compliance with the Code of Conduct on an annual basis.  Training on Code of Conduct is also
provided to employees, where applicable.
Governance guidelines, together with applicable committee charters, provide the framework for effective governance of our
partnership.  The Board has adopted the “Governance Guidelines of Enterprise Products Partners,” which address several matters,
including qualifications for directors, responsibilities of directors, retirement of directors, the composition and responsibilities of
the Audit and Conflicts Committee and the Governance Committee, the conduct and frequency of Board and committee meetings,
management succession plans, director access to management and outside advisors, director compensation, director and executive
officer equity ownership, director orientation and continuing education, and annual self-evaluation of the Board.  The Board
recognizes that effective governance is an on-going process, and thus, it will review the Governance Guidelines of Enterprise
Products Partners annually or more often as deemed necessary.
Audit and Conflicts Committee
The purpose of the Board’s Audit and Conflicts Committee is to address audit and conflicts-related matters.  In accordance with
NYSE rules and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Board has named five of its members to serve on the Audit and Conflicts
Committee.  Members of the Audit and Conflicts Committee must have a basic understanding of finance and accounting matters
and be able to read and understand fundamental financial statements, and at least one member of the Audit and Conflicts
Committee shall have accounting or related financial management expertise.  The current members of the Audit and Conflicts
Committee are Messrs. Brasseux, McMahen, Montgomery, Rutherford and Snell, all of whom are independent directors, free from
any relationship with us or any of our subsidiaries that would interfere with the exercise of independent judgment.  The Board has
affirmatively determined that Mr. McMahen satisfies the definition of “Audit Committee Financial Expert” as that term is defined
in Item 407(d)(5) of Regulation S-K promulgated by the SEC.
121
Table of Contents
The primary responsibilities of the Audit and Conflicts Committee include (i) reviewing potential conflicts of interest, including
related party transactions, (ii) monitoring the integrity of our financial reporting process and related systems of internal control, (iii)
ensuring our legal and regulatory compliance and that of Enterprise GP, (iv) overseeing the independence and performance of our
independent public accountant, (v) approving all services performed by our independent public accountant, (vi) providing for an
avenue of communication among the independent public accountant, management, internal audit function and the Board, (vii)
encouraging adherence to and continuous improvement of our policies, procedures and practices at all levels, (viii) reviewing areas
of potential significant financial risk to our businesses and (ix) approving awards granted under long-term incentive plans.
If the Board believes that a particular matter presents a conflict of interest and proposes a resolution, the Audit and Conflicts
Committee has the authority to review such matter to determine if the proposed resolution is fair and reasonable to us.  Any matters
approved by the Audit and Conflicts Committee are conclusively deemed to be fair and reasonable to us, approved by all of our
partners and not a breach by Enterprise GP or the Board of any duties they may owe us or our unitholders.
Pursuant to its formal written charter, the Audit and Conflicts Committee has the authority to conduct any investigation appropriate
to fulfilling its responsibilities, and it has direct access to our independent public accountants as well as any EPCO personnel whom
it deems necessary in fulfilling its responsibilities.  The Audit and Conflicts Committee has the ability to retain, at our expense,
special legal, accounting or other consultants or experts it deems necessary in the performance of its duties.
Governance Committee
The primary purpose of the Governance Committee is to develop and recommend to the Board a set of governance guidelines
applicable to our partnership, to review such guidelines from time to time and to oversee governance matters related to our
business, including Board and Committee composition, qualifications of Board candidates, director independence, succession
planning and related matters.  The Governance Committee also assists in Board oversight of management’s establishment and
administration of our environmental, safety and transportation compliance policies, procedures, programs and initiatives, and
related matters.  In accordance with its charter, the Governance Committee shall be composed of not less than three members, at
least a majority of whom shall be independent directors.  Currently, the Governance Committee is comprised of Ms. Duncan
Williams and two independent directors (Ms. Barth and Mr. Hackett).
Like the Audit and Conflicts Committee, the Governance Committee has the authority to conduct any investigation appropriate to
fulfilling its responsibilities, and it has direct access to our independent public accountants as well as any EPCO personnel whom it
deems necessary in fulfilling its responsibilities.  In addition, the Governance Committee has the ability to retain, at our expense,
special legal, accounting or other consultants or experts it deems necessary in the performance of its duties.
Capital Projects Committee
The primary purpose of the Capital Projects Committee is to review and approve certain expenditures by Enterprise GP, Enterprise
and/or their respective consolidated subsidiaries in connection with proposed capital projects.  Currently, the Capital Projects
Committee is comprised of Ms. Duncan Williams, Ms. Barth and Messrs. Bachmann, Fowler, Hackett, Snell, Teague and Weitzel. 
Messrs. Teague and Fowler are co-chairmen of the Capital Projects Committee.
Investor Access to Corporate Governance Information
We provide investors access to information relating to our governance procedures and principles, including the Code of Conduct,
Governance Guidelines, the charters of the Audit and Conflicts Committee, the Governance Committee and the Capital Projects
Committee, along with other information, through our website, www.enterpriseproducts.com.  You may also contact our Investor
Relations department at (866) 230-0745 for printed copies of these documents free of charge.
122
Table of Contents
NYSE Corporate Governance Listing Standards
On March 6, 2018, Mr. Teague certified to the NYSE (as required by Section 303A.12(a) of the NYSE Listed Company Manual)
that he was not aware of any violation by us of the NYSE’s Corporate Governance listing standards as of that date.
Executive Sessions of Non-Management Directors
The Board holds regular executive sessions in which non-management directors meet without any members of management
present.  The purpose of these executive sessions is to promote open and candid discussion among the non-management directors. 
During such executive sessions, one director is designated as the “presiding director,” who is responsible for leading and
facilitating such executive sessions.  Currently, the presiding director is Mr. McMahen.
Confidential Telephone Hotline
In accordance with NYSE rules, we have established a toll-free, confidential telephone hotline (the “Hotline”) so that interested
parties may communicate with the presiding director or with all the non-management directors as a group.  All calls to this Hotline
are reported to the chairman of the Audit and Conflicts Committee, who is responsible for communicating any necessary
information to the other non-management directors.  The number of our confidential Hotline is (844) 693-4318.
Section 16(a) Beneficial Ownership Reporting Compliance
Under federal securities laws, directors and executive officers of Enterprise GP and any persons holding more than 10% of our
common units are required to report their beneficial ownership of common units and any changes in their beneficial ownership
levels to us and the SEC.  Specific due dates for these reports have been established by regulation, and we are required to disclose
in this annual report any failure to file this information within the specified timeframes.  All such reporting was done in a timely
manner in 2018.
123
Table of Contents
ITEM 11.  EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION.
Executive Officer Compensation
We do not directly employ any of the persons responsible for managing our business.  Instead, we are managed by our general
partner, the executive officers of which are employees of EPCO.  Our management, administrative and operating functions are
primarily performed by employees of EPCO in accordance with the ASA.  Pursuant to the ASA, we reimburse EPCO for its
compensation costs related to the employment of personnel working on our behalf.  For information regarding the ASA, see Note
15 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report.
Summary Compensation Table
The following table presents total compensation amounts paid, accrued or otherwise expensed by us with respect to (i) our principal
executive officer, (ii) our principal financial officer, (iii) our former principal financial officer and (iv) the three highest paid
officers of our general partner, other than our principal executive and financial officers, for the year ended December 31, 2018. 
Collectively, these individuals were our “named executive officers” for 2018.  To the extent such individuals were named executive
officers in the prior two years, their total compensation for those years is presented as well.
         Equity-       
   Cash      Based   All Other    
Name and   Salary   Bonus   Awards  Compensation  Total  
Principal Position Year  ($)   ($)   ($) (1)   ($) (2)   ($)  
A. James Teague 2018  $ 837,500  $ 2,716,250  $ 4,359,306  $ 706,531  $ 8,619,587 
CEO, 2017   800,000   2,205,000   4,041,800   651,138   7,697,938 
   (Principal Executive Officer) 2016   800,000   2,100,000   3,989,926   606,309   7,496,235 
                      
W. Randall Fowler 2018   567,188   1,845,000   2,736,631   430,337   5,579,156 
President and CFO, 2017   525,000   1,181,250   2,425,080   374,191   4,505,521 
   (Principal Financial Officer) 2016   521,178   984,375   2,701,298   328,999   4,535,850 
                      
Bryan F. Bulawa (3) 2018   234,357   --   1,002,694   4,227,971   5,465,022 
former Senior Vice President and CFO, 2017   314,500   267,750   922,685   182,157   1,687,092 
   (former Principal Financial Officer) 2016   314,500   245,438   1,292,173   143,905   1,996,016 
                      
Graham W. Bacon 2018   418,750   411,000   3,159,310   315,136   4,304,196 
   Executive Vice President, 2017   393,750   315,000   1,674,460   263,501   2,646,711 
   Operations and Engineering 2016   375,000   294,000   1,958,576   206,541   2,834,117 
                      
William Ordemann 2018   460,150   308,500   1,823,080   318,608   2,910,338 
   Executive Vice President, 2017   451,150   367,500   1,674,460   302,070   2,795,180 
   Strategy Development and 
Implementation 2016   451,150   357,000   1,891,366   230,291   2,929,807 
                      
Brent B. Secrest 2018   332,500   359,750   2,007,334   168,921   2,868,505 
   Senior Vice President, 2017   306,750   262,500   1,154,800   378,084   2,102,134 
   Commercial                      
                      
(1) Amounts represent our estimated share of the aggregate grant date fair value of equity-based awards granted during each year presented.
(2) Amounts include (i) contributions in connection with funded, qualified, defined contribution retirement plans, (ii) quarterly distributions paid on equity-
based awards, (iii) the imputed value of life insurance premiums paid on behalf of the officer, (iv) employee retention payments and (v) other amounts.
(3) Mr. Bulawa served as our CFO, and one of our principal financial officers, until his resignation on August 24, 2018. The amount presented under the
column labeled “Other” includes our share of a separation payment, or $4,080,000. The separation payment was based on a number of factors, including,
among other things, his tenure at the partnership and the number of equity awards he surrendered upon resignation.  
124
Table of Contents
Bonus amounts shown in the preceding table represent discretionary annual awards earned by each named executive officer with
respect to the year presented.  For the years ended December 31, 2017 and 2016, the dollar value of each officer’s discretionary
bonus (less any retirement plan deductions and withholding taxes) was remitted through the issuance of an equivalent value of
newly issued Enterprise common units in February of the respective following year.   For the year ended December 31, 2018, the
dollar value of each officer’s bonus (less applicable deductions and taxes) was remitted half in cash and half in newly issued
Enterprise common units, with both amounts provided to the employee in February 2019.
The following table presents the components of “All Other Compensation” for each named executive officer for the year ended
December 31, 2018:
Named Executive Officer  Contributions
Under
Funded,
Qualified,
Defined
Contribution
Retirement
Plans   Quarterly
Distributions
Paid On
Equity-
Based
Awards  Life
Insurance
Premiums  Other   Total
All Other
Compensation 
A. James Teague  $ 33,000  $ 659,663  $ 7,663  $ 6,205  $ 706,531 
W. Randall Fowler   22,687   398,213   3,267   6,170   430,337 
Bryan F. Bulawa (2)   25,712   118,904   561   4,082,794   4,227,971 
Graham W. Bacon   33,000   273,588   2,838   5,710   315,136 
William Ordemann   33,000   276,433   2,838   6,337   318,608 
Brent B. Secrest   30,250   132,731   990   4,950   168,921 
                     
(1) Reflects aggregate cash payments made to the named executive officer in connection with (i) distribution equivalent rights
(“DERs”) issued in tandem with phantom unit awards and (ii) distributions paid in connection with profits interest awards. With respect to DER amounts
allocated to us, the following cash payments were made to the named executive officers during the year ended December 31, 2018: Mr. Teague, $639,530;
Mr. Fowler, $378,233; Mr. Bulawa, $106,334; Mr. Bacon, $250,579; Mr. Ordemann, $256,300; and Mr. Secrest, $119,628.
(2) Mr. Bulawa served as our CFO, and one of our principal financial officers, until his resignation on August 24, 2018. The amount presented under the
column labeled “Other” includes our share of a separation payment, or $4,080,000. The separation payment was based on a number of factors, including,
among other things, his tenure at the partnership and the number of equity awards he surrendered upon resignation.  
Compensation Discussion and Analysis
Elements of Compensation
With respect to our named executive officers, compensation paid or awarded by us reflects only that portion of compensation paid
by EPCO and allocated to us pursuant to the ASA, including an allocation of a portion of the cost of long-term incentive plans of
EPCO. The elements of EPCO’s compensation program, along with EPCO’s other incentives (e.g., benefits, work environment and
career development), are intended to provide a total rewards package to employees.  The objective of EPCO’s compensation
program is to provide competitive compensation opportunities that will align and drive employee performance toward the creation
of sustained long-term unitholder value. We believe that our compensation program allows us to attract, motivate and retain high
quality talent with the skills and competencies we require. Our compensation packages are designed to reward contributions by
employees in support of the business strategies of EPCO and its affiliates at both our partnership and individual levels and to avoid
risks that are likely to conflict with our risk management policies.
For the three years ended December 31, 2018, the primary elements of compensation for the named executive officers consisted of
annual cash base salary, discretionary annual bonus (satisfied in whole or part through the issuance of Enterprise common units),
equity awards under long-term incentive arrangements and other compensation, including very limited perquisites.  With respect to
the annual periods presented in the Summary Compensation Table, EPCO’s compensation package for the named executive officers
did not include any compensation elements based on targeted performance-based criteria. We believe that the absence of targeted
performance-based criteria has the effect of discouraging excessive risk taking by our named executive officers.
125
Table of Contents
Changes in the base salaries of our named executive officers during the three years ending December 31, 2018 were largely budget-
driven and made consistent relative to increases in the base salaries of our other executive officers.
The bonus awards are discretionary and, in combination with annual base salaries, are intended to yield competitive total
compensation levels for the named executive officers and drive performance in support of our business strategies, as well as the
performance of other EPCO affiliates for which the named executive officer may perform services.  The annual bonus amount
presented for each named executive officer reflects a general consideration of our overall financial results for those periods. This
consideration takes into account a number of our financial measures (e.g., non-GAAP gross operating margin and distributable cash
flow metrics) and our 5-year equity total return performance relative to peers, without any weight or formula given to any specific
financial performance measure.  In addition, a subjective judgment of each named executive officer’s performance for those periods
is taken into account and reflected in the annual bonus amounts.  The bonus amounts are also based on the level and position of
such named executive officers and the relative compensation paid to our other executive officers.
Each of our named executive officers has been granted equity-based compensation. The amount of equity-based compensation
granted to our named executive officers reflects a general consideration of our overall financial performance, along with a
subjective judgment of each named executive officer’s contribution in support of that performance, without any weight or formula
given to any specific financial performance measure.  The values of equity-based awards granted to the named executive officers
are also based on the level and position of such named executive officers and the relative compensation paid to our other executive
officers.  Each of the named executive officers received grants of phantom unit awards for the periods presented in the summary
compensation table.
In addition, each of our named executive officers was granted a “profits interest” in one or more of the Employee Partnerships,
which serve as long-term incentive arrangements for key employees of EPCO. The names of the Employee Partnerships in which
one or more of our named executive officers participate are: EPD PubCo Unit I L.P. (“PubCo I”); EPD PubCo Unit II L.P. (“PubCo
II”); EPD PrivCo Unit I L.P. (“PrivCo I”); and EPD 2018 Unit IV L.P. (“EPD IV”).  If certain conditions are met, the employee
participants in each Employee Partnership will be entitled to (i) a residual profits interest in the assets of the Employee Partnership
at liquidation, along with (ii) quarterly cash distributions.  For a brief description of the profits interest awards, see Note 13 of the
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report.
EPCO expects to continue its policy of paying for limited perquisites attributable to our named executive officers.  EPCO also
makes matching contributions under its defined contribution plans for the benefit of our named executive officers in the same
manner as it does for other EPCO employees.
EPCO does not offer our named executive officers a defined benefit pension plan.  Also, none of our named executive officers had
nonqualified deferred compensation during the three years ended December 31, 2018.
Overview of Decision-Making Process regarding Compensation of Named Executive Officers
The Audit and Conflicts Committee of our general partner, with input from the EPCO Trustees and EPCO’s human resources
department, has ultimate decision-making authority with respect to the compensation of our CEO and our President.  The
compensation of our other named executive officers (other than any equity-based awards granted under EPCO’s long-term
incentive plans) is determined by our CEO and our President.  Neither EPCO nor our general partner has a separate compensation
committee; however, grants of equity-based compensation under EPCO’s long-term incentive plans (e.g., phantom unit awards) to
our named executive officers, including our CEO and our President, must be approved by the Audit and Conflicts Committee.  The
issuance of profits interest awards was approved by EPCO’s Board of Directors.
The overall compensation of each named executive officer is not based on any formula or specific performance criteria; rather, the
Audit and Conflicts Committee, our President, our CEO and EPCO (as applicable) determine an appropriate level and mix of
compensation for each officer on a case-by-case basis.  Further, there is no established policy or target for the allocation between
either cash and non-cash or short-term and long-term incentive compensation.  However, some considerations that the Audit and
Conflicts Committee or our President and our CEO (as applicable) may take into account in making the case-by-case compensation
determinations include the total value of all elements of compensation and the appropriate balance of internal pay equity among our
executive officers. The Audit and Conflicts Committee, our President, our CEO and EPCO (as applicable) also consider individual
126
Table of Contents
performance, levels of responsibility and value to the organization.  All compensation determinations are subjective and
discretionary.
In making compensation decisions, EPCO considers market data for determining relevant compensation levels and compensation
program elements through the review of and, in certain cases, participation in, relevant compensation surveys and reports.  These
surveys and reports are conducted and prepared by third party compensation consultants. In 2017, EPCO engaged Meridian
Compensation Partners, LLC (the “Consultant”) to complete a detailed review of executive compensation relative to our industry. 
In connection with this review, the Consultant provided comparative market data on compensation practices and programs for
executive level positions based on an analysis of industry competitors.  The market data for industry competitors included
information from CenterPoint Energy, Inc.; Dominion Energy, Inc.; Enbridge Inc.; ETP; Kinder Morgan Inc.; Magellan Midstream
Partners, L.P.; ONEOK, Inc.; Plains All American Pipeline, L.P.; Spectra Energy Corp.; Sunoco Logistics Partners L.P.; Targa
Resources Corporation; The Williams Companies, Inc.; and TransCanada Corporation. 
Neither we, nor EPCO, which engages the Consultant, are aware of the specific data of the companies included in the Consultant’s
proprietary database for specific positions.  EPCO uses the information provided in the Consultant’s analysis to gauge whether
compensation levels reported by the Consultant and the general ranges of compensation for EPCO employees in similar positions
are comparable, but that comparison is only a factor taken into consideration and may or may not impact compensation of our
named executive officers, for which our Audit and Conflicts Committee (in the case of our President’s and our CEO’s
compensation) or our President and our CEO (in the case of compensation to be paid to our other named executive officers) have
the ultimate decision-making authority.  EPCO does not otherwise engage in benchmarking for the named executive officers’
positions.
Allocation of Compensation between Us and EPCO and its other affiliates
Under the ASA, the compensation costs of our named executive officers, including those costs related to equity-based awards, are
allocated between us and other affiliates of EPCO based on the estimated amount of time that each officer spends on our
consolidated businesses in any fiscal year.  These percentages are reassessed at least quarterly.  The following table presents the
average approximate amount of time devoted by each of our named executive officers to our consolidated businesses and to EPCO
and its other privately held affiliates during each of the years indicated.
  Enterprise EPCO and Total
  Products its other Time
Named Executive Officer Year Partners affiliates Allocated
A. James Teague 2018 100% -- 100%
 2017 100% -- 100%
 2016 100% -- 100%
     
W. Randall Fowler 2018 75% 25% 100%
 2017 75% 25% 100%
 2016 75% 25% 100%
     
Bryan F. Bulawa 2018 85% 15% 100%
 2017 85% 15% 100%
 2016 85% 15% 100%
     
William Ordemann 2018 100% -- 100%
 2017 100% -- 100%
 2016 100% -- 100%
     
Graham W. Bacon 2018 100% -- 100%
 2017 100% -- 100%
 2016 100% -- 100%
     
Brent B. Secrest 2018 100% -- 100%
 2017 100% -- 100%
127
Table of Contents
Grants of Equity-Based Awards in Fiscal Year 2018
The following table presents information concerning each grant of an equity-based award in 2018 to a named executive officer for
which we will be allocated our pro rata share of the related cost under the ASA.
            Grant 
            Date Fair 
      Value of 
    Estimated Future Payouts Under   Equity- 
    Equity Incentive Plan Awards   Based 
Grant  Threshold  Target  Maximum  Awards 
Award Type/Named Executive Officer Date  (#)  (#)  (#)  ($) (1) 
Phantom unit awards: (2)                 
   A. James Teague 2/12/18   --   162,600   --  $ 4,359,306 
   W. Randall Fowler 2/12/18   --   136,100   --   2,736,631 
   Graham W. Bacon 2/12/18   --   68,000   --   1,823,080 
   William Ordemann 2/12/18   --   68,000   --   1,823,080 
   Brent B. Secrest 2/12/18   --   35,000   --   938,350 
Profits interest awards:                  
   Graham W. Bacon (3) 12/3/18   --   --   --  $ 1,603,475 
   Brent B. Secrest (3) 12/3/18   --   --   --   1,068,984 
                  
(1) Amounts presented reflect that portion of grant date fair value allocable to us based on the estimated percentage of time each named executive officer
spent on our consolidated business activities during 2018. Based on current allocations, we estimate that the compensation expense we record for each
named executive officer with respect to these awards will equal these amounts over time.
(2) The grant date fair value presented for the phantom unit awards is based, in part, on the closing price of our common units on February 12, 2018 of $26.81
per unit. For information about assumptions utilized in the valuation of these awards, see Note 13 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report, the applicable disclosures of which are incorporated by reference into this Item 11.
(3) Profits interest awards based on Class B limited partner interests in EPD IV. Mr. Bacon’s and Mr. Secrest’s share of the profits interest in EPD IV was
5.00% and 4.00%, respectively, at December 31, 2018  
Awards granted to Mr. Bulawa in February 2018 were cancelled in connection with his cash separation payment paid in September
2018.
Phantom unit awards
The phantom unit awards noted in the preceding table were granted under the 2008 Enterprise Products Long-Term Incentive Plan
(Third Amendment and Restatement) (the “2008 Plan”). Phantom unit awards allow recipients to acquire our common units (at no
cost to the recipient apart from fulfilling service and other conditions) once a defined vesting period expires, subject to customary
forfeiture provisions.  Phantom unit awards generally vest at a rate of 25% per year beginning one year after the grant date and are
non-vested until the required service periods expire. At December 31, 2018, substantially all of our phantom unit awards are
expected to result in the issuance of common units upon vesting; therefore, the applicable awards are accounted for as equity-
classified awards.
Each phantom unit award includes a tandem DER, which entitles the holder to nonforfeitable cash payments equal to the product of
the number of phantom unit awards outstanding for the participant and the cash distribution per common unit paid to our common
unitholders.
The 2008 Plan provides for incentive awards to EPCO’s key employees and non-employee directors and consultants who perform
management, administrative or operational functions for us or our affiliates. Awards granted under the 2008 Plan may be in the
form of phantom units, DERs, restricted common units, unit options, unit appreciation rights and other unit-based awards or
substitute awards.  For information regarding the number of our common units authorized for issuance under the 2008 Plan, see
“Securities Authorized for Issuance Under Equity Compensation Plans” under Part III, Item 13 of this annual report.
128
Table of Contents
Profits interest awards
In December 2018, EPCO Holdings Inc. (“EPCO Holdings”), a privately held affiliate of EPCO, contributed 6,400,000 Enterprise
common units that it owned to EPD IV. In exchange for this contribution, EPCO Holdings was admitted as the Class A limited
partner of EPD IV. Also on the applicable contribution date, certain key EPCO employees, including two named executive officers,
were issued Class B limited partner interests (i.e., profits interest awards) and admitted as Class B limited partners of EPD IV, all
without any capital contribution by such employees.  EPCO serves as the general partner of EPD IV.  The profits interest awards
were not issued under the 2008 Plan.
As the Class A limited partner of EPD IV, EPCO Holdings earns a quarterly preferred return equal to $0.4325 per unit on the
6,400,000 common units it contributed, with any residual cash amount remaining in EPD IV being paid to the Class B limited
partners on a quarterly basis as a distribution.  Upon liquidation of EPD IV, assets having a then current fair market value equal to
the Class A limited partner’s capital base will be distributed to EPCO Holdings. Any remaining assets of EPD IV will be distributed
to its Class B limited partners as a residual profits interest, which represents the appreciation in value of EPD IV’s assets since the
date of EPCO Holdings’ contribution to it, as described above.
Unless otherwise agreed to by EPCO and a majority in interest of the limited partners of EPD IV, this Employee Partnership will
terminate at the earliest to occur of (i) 30 days following its vesting date, (ii) a change of control or (iii) a dissolution of such
Employee Partnership.  The Class B limited partner interests in EPD IV vest five years from December 3, 2018.
Individually, each Class B limited partner interest is subject to forfeiture if the participating employee’s employment with EPCO is
terminated prior to vesting, with customary exceptions for death, disability and certain retirements. The risk of forfeiture will also
lapse upon certain change of control events. Forfeited individual Class B limited partner interests are allocated to the remaining
Class B limited partners.
Vesting of Equity-Based Awards in 2018
The following table presents the vesting of phantom unit awards to our named executive officers during the year ended December
31, 2018.  These amounts are presented on a gross basis and do not reflect any allocation of compensation to affiliates under the
ASA.
  Unit Awards  
  Number of    
  Units   Value  
  Acquired on  Realized on 
  Vesting  Vesting 
Named Executive Officer  (#) (1)  ($) (2)  
A. James Teague   140,925  $ 3,711,321 
W. Randall Fowler   101,738   2,680,101 
Bryan F. Bulawa   34,474   908,167 
Graham W. Bacon   46,250   1,218,983 
William Ordemann   49,875   1,318,965 
Brent B. Secrest   18,875   497,569 
         
(1) Represents the gross number of common units acquired upon vesting of restricted common unit and phantom unit awards, as applicable, before
adjustments for associated tax withholdings.
(2) Amount determined by multiplying the gross number of vested phantom unit awards by the closing price of our common units on the date of vesting.  
129
Table of Contents
Equity-Based Awards Outstanding at December 31, 2018
The following information summarizes each named executive officer’s long-term incentive awards outstanding at December 31,
2018.  These amounts are presented on a gross basis and do not reflect any allocation of compensation to affiliates under the ASA.
    Unit Awards  
      Market 
    Number  Value  
    of Units  of Units 
    That Have  That Have 
Vesting  Not Vested  Not Vested 
Award Type/Named Executive Officer Date  (#) (1)  ($) (2,3) 
Phantom unit awards: (4)         
   A. James Teague Various   378,275  $ 9,301,782 
   W. Randall Fowler Various   302,574   7,440,295 
   Graham W. Bacon Various   151,500   3,725,385 
   William Ordemann Various   153,125   3,765,344 
   Brent B. Secrest Various   73,750   1,813,513 
          
Profits interest awards:          
   A. James Teague:          
      PubCo I (5) 2/22/20   --  $ 159,521 
   W. Randall Fowler:          
      PrivCo I (6) 2/22/21   --   202,809 
   Graham W. Bacon:          
      PubCo I (5) 2/22/20   --   182,309 
      EPD IV (8) 12/03/23   --  0 
   William Ordemann:          
      PubCo I (5) 2/22/20   --   159,521 
   Brent B. Secrest          
      PubCo II (7) 2/22/21   --   107,191 
      EPD IV (8) 12/03/23      0 
          
(1)      Represents the total number of phantom unit awards outstanding for each named executive officer.
(2)      With respect to amounts presented for phantom unit awards, the market values were derived by multiplying the total number of each award type outstanding
for the named executive officer by the closing price of our common units on December 31, 2018 (the last trading day of 2018) of $24.59 per unit.
(3)      With respect to amounts presented for the profits interest awards, amount represents the estimated liquidation value to be received by the named executive
officer based on the closing price of our common units on December 31, 2018 and the terms of liquidation outlined in the applicable Employee
Partnership agreement. There was no residual profits interest for EPD IV due to a decrease in the market value of the common units it owns since the
formation date of such Employee Partnership.
(4)      Of the 1,059,224 phantom unit awards presented in the table, the vesting schedule is as follows: 395,837 in 2019; 326,537 in 2020; 219,425 in 2021 and
117,425 in 2022.
(5)      With respect to PubCo I, the profit interest share held by Messrs. Teague, Bacon and Ordemann at December 31, 2018 was approximately 4.96%, 5.67%
and 4.96%, respectively.
(6)      Mr. Fowler’s share of the profits interest in PrivCo I was approximately 15.46% at December 31, 2018.
(7)      Mr. Secrest’s share of the profits interest in PubCo II was approximately 3.21% at December 31, 2018.
(8)      Mr. Graham’s and Mr. Secrest’s share of the profits interests in EPD IV was approximately 5.00% and 4.00%, respectively, at December 31, 2018.  
Phantom unit awards
For a brief description of phantom unit awards, see “Grants of Equity-Based Awards in Fiscal Year 2018” within this Item 11.
Profits interest awards
For a brief description of the profits interest awards, see Note 13 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included under
Part II, Item 8 of this annual report.
130
Table of Contents
Potential Payments Upon Termination or Change-in-Control
None of the named executive officers have any employment agreements that call for the payment of termination or severance
benefits or provide for any payments in the event of a change in control of our general partner.
The vesting of profits interest awards under the Employee Partnerships is subject to acceleration upon a change of control (as
defined below).  In addition, vesting of equity-based awards under EPCO’s long-term incentive plans is subject to acceleration
upon a qualifying termination, including termination after a change of control of our general partner. Qualifying termination under
such awards generally means a termination as an employee of EPCO or an affiliated group member (i) upon death, (ii) a qualifying
long-term disability, (iii) a qualifying retirement, or (iv) within one year after a change of control (as defined), other than a
termination for cause (as defined) or termination by such person that is not a qualifying termination for good reason (as defined).
A “change of control” under these awards is generally defined to mean that the descendants, heirs and/or legatees of Dan L Duncan,
and/or trusts (including, without limitation, one or more voting trusts) established for their benefit, collectively, cease, directly or
indirectly, to control our general partner.  Mr. Duncan passed away in March 2010.
Compensation Committee Report
We do not have a separate compensation committee.  In addition, we do not directly employ or compensate our named executive
officers.  Rather, under the ASA, we reimburse EPCO for the compensation of our executive officers.  As described in
Compensation Discussion and Analysis, decisions regarding the compensation of our named executive officers are made, as
applicable, by EPCO and Enterprise GP’s CEO, President and Audit and Conflicts Committee.
In light of the foregoing, the Board has reviewed and discussed with management the Compensation Discussion and Analysis set
forth above and determined that it be included in this annual report for the year ended December 31, 2018.
Submitted by:       Randa Duncan Williams
Richard H. Bachmann
A. James Teague
W. Randall Fowler
Carin M. Barth
Murray E. Brasseux
James T. Hackett
Charles E. McMahen
William C. Montgomery
John R. Rutherford
Richard S. Snell
Harry P. Weitzel
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary set forth in any previous filings under the Securities Act, as amended, or the Securities
Exchange Act, as amended, that incorporate future filings, including this annual report, in whole or in part, the foregoing
Compensation Committee Report shall not be incorporated by reference into any such filings.
131
Table of Contents
Compensation Committee Interlocks and Insider Participation
None of the directors or executive officers of Enterprise GP served as members of the compensation committee of another entity
that has or had an executive officer who served as a member of our Board during the year ended December 31, 2018.  As
previously noted, we do not have a separate compensation committee.  As described in Compensation Discussion and Analysis,
decisions regarding the compensation of our named executive officers with respect to 2018 were made, as applicable, by EPCO and
Enterprise GP’s CEO, President and Audit and Conflicts Committee.
Pay Ratio Disclosure
Pursuant to a mandate of the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act, the SEC requires annual disclosure of
the ratio of (i) the median of the total annual compensation of all employees of a registrant to (ii) the total annual compensation of
the registrant’s principal executive officer.   Our principal executive officer is Mr. Teague (who serves as CEO of our general
partner).  The following table summarizes the information used to derive the required pay ratio for the year ended December 31,
2018:
Median total annual compensation  $ 134,951 
Total annual compensation of Mr. Teague (CEO)  $ 8,619,587 
Ratio of CEO compensation to median compensation  64 : 1 
The median total annual compensation was determined as follows:
§First, a list was prepared of all active EPCO employees, excluding Mr. Teague and those on long-term disability, that devote all
or a substantial portion of their time to our consolidated businesses and affairs.   This list was based on employee information
as of December 31, 2018. There are approximately 7,000 EPCO personnel who spend all or a substantial portion of their time
engaged in our business.
§Second, basic wage data for each employee was extracted from Form W-2 information provided to the Internal Revenue
Service for calendar year 2018. This information was then sorted and the employees who earned closest to the median
compensation (the “median employees”) were selected from the list.
§Third, once the median employees were selected, their respective total annual compensation for 2018 was determined using the
same method used to determine Mr. Teague’s total annual compensation for 2018 as presented in the Summary Compensation
Table within this Part III, Item 11.  The total annual compensation for each median employee was then averaged to derive our
median total annual compensation amount.
132
Table of Contents
Director Compensation
Neither we nor our general partner provide additional compensation to employees of EPCO for their services as directors of
Enterprise GP.  For calendar year 2018, the independent voting directors of our general partner were compensated as follows:
§each received an $85,000 annual cash retainer and an annual grant of our common units having a fair market value, based on
the closing price of such security on the trading day immediately preceding the date of grant, of $85,000;
§if the individual served as a chairman of the Audit and Conflicts Committee, then he received an additional $20,000 annual
cash retainer;
§if the individual served as a chairman of the Governance Committee, then he received an additional $15,000 annual cash
retainer; and,
§for those independent voting directors that serve on the Capital Projects Committee, a $2,500 per meeting cash fee for
attendance at meetings of this committee.
Our advisory directors, Messrs. Casey and Smith, each received a $150,000 annual cash retainer in 2018. As an honorary director,
O.S. Andras received a $20,000 annual cash retainer.
The director compensation program for calendar year 2019 is expected to be the same as 2018.
We bear all costs attributable to the compensation of directors of our general partner. The following table summarizes compensation
paid to the non-employee directors of our general partner in 2018:
  Fees Earned  Value of    
  or Paid  Equity-Based    
  in Cash  Awards  Total  
Non-Employee Director  ($)   ($)   ($)  
Carin M. Barth  $ 85,000  $ 85,000  $ 170,000 
Larry J. Casey (1)   150,000   --   150,000 
James T. Hackett (2)   100,000   85,000   185,000 
Charles E. McMahen (3)   105,000   85,000   190,000 
William C. Montgomery   85,000   85,000   170,000 
Edwin E. Smith (1)   150,000   --   150,000 
Richard S. Snell   85,000   85,000   170,000 
O.S. Andras (4)   20,000   --   20,000 
             
(1)       Messrs. Casey and Smith serve as advisory directors.
(2)       Mr. Hackett serves as chairman of the Governance Committee.
(3)       Mr. McMahen serves as chairman of the Audit and Conflicts Committee.
(4)       Mr. Andras serves as an honorary director.  
133
Table of Contents
ITEM 12.  SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND
MANAGEMENT AND RELATED UNITHOLDER MATTERS.
Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners
The following table sets forth certain information as of February 15, 2019, regarding each person known by Enterprise GP to
beneficially own more than 5% of our limited partner units:
  Amount and  
  Nature of  
Title of Name and Address Beneficial Percent
Class of Beneficial Owner Ownership of Class
Common units Randa Duncan Williams (1) 697,780,395 31.9%
 1100 Louisiana Street, 10th Floor   
 Houston, Texas 77002   
    
(1) For a detailed listing of the ownership amounts that comprise Ms. Duncan Williams’ total beneficial ownership of our common units, see the table presented
in the following section, “Security Ownership of Management,” within this Part III, Item 12.
As noted previously, Ms. Duncan Williams is a DD LLC Trustee and an EPCO Trustee.  Ms. Duncan Williams is also currently
Chairman and a director of EPCO and Chairman of the Board and a director of Enterprise GP.  Ms. Duncan Williams disclaims
beneficial ownership of the limited partner units beneficially owned by the EPCO Trustees and the DD LLC Trustees, except to the
extent of her voting and dispositive interests in such units.
Security Ownership of Management
The following tables set forth certain information regarding the beneficial ownership of our common units, as of February 15, 2019
by (i) our named executive officers for 2018; (ii) the current directors of Enterprise GP; and (iii) the current directors and executive
officers (including named executive officers) of Enterprise GP as a group.  All beneficial ownership information has been furnished
by the respective directors and executive officers.  Each person has sole voting and dispositive power over the securities shown
unless indicated otherwise.
    Amount and   
  Positions with  Nature Of   
  Enterprise GP  Beneficial  Percent of
  at February 15, 2019  Ownership  Class
Randa Duncan Williams:  Director and Chairman of the Board     
   Units controlled by EPCO Voting Trust:       
       Through EPCO    66,408,549 3.0%
       Through EPCO Investments L.P.    8,346,154 *
       Through EPCO Holdings, Inc.    590,944,499 27.0%
       Through Employee Partnerships    14,773,688 *
   Units controlled by Alkek and Williams, Ltd.    389,021 *
   Units controlled by Chaswil, Ltd.    10,000 *
   Units controlled by family trusts (1)    16,895,354 *
   Units owned personally (2)    13,130 *
        Total for Randa Duncan Williams    697,780,395 31.9%
       
* Represents a beneficial ownership of less than 1% of class     
(1) The number of common units presented for Ms. Duncan Williams includes common units held by family trusts for which she serves as a director of an
entity trustee but has disclaimed beneficial ownership (except to the extent of her pecuniary interest therein).
(2) The number of common units presented for Ms. Duncan Williams includes 9,090 common units held by her spouse and 4,040 common units held jointly
with her spouse.
134
Table of Contents
EPCO and its privately held affiliates have pledged 108,222,618 of our common units that they own as security under their credit
facilities.  These credit facilities include customary provisions regarding potential events of default.  As a result, a change in
ownership of these units could result if an event of default ultimately occurred.
    Amount and   
  Positions with  Nature Of   
  Enterprise GP  Beneficial  Percent of
  at February 15, 2019  Ownership  Class
Richard H. Bachmann (1)  Director and Vice Chairman of the Board  1,530,926 *
A. James Teague (2,3)  Director and CEO  1,916,429 *
W. Randall Fowler (2,4)  Director and President and CFO  1,550,760 *
Carin M. Barth  Director  44,420 *
Murray E. Brasseux (5)  Director  15,767 *
James T. Hackett (6)  Director  272,578 *
Charles E. McMahen  Director  110,974 *
William C. Montgomery  Director  49,920 *
John R. Rutherford  Director  21,085 *
Richard S. Snell (7)  Director  69,286 *
Harry P. Weitzel (8)  Director and Senior Vice President,
General Counsel and Secretary   
71,035 *
William Ordemann (2,9)  Executive Vice President  1,018,321 *
Graham W. Bacon (2,10)  Executive Vice President  261,363 *
Brent B. Secrest (2,11)  Senior Vice President  77,397 *
Bryan F. Bulawa (2,12)  Former Senior Vice President and CFO  163,787 *
All directors and executive officers (including all named
executive officers) of Enterprise GP, as a group (18
individuals in total) (13)     
 
705,134,366 32.2%
       
* Represents a beneficial ownership of less than 1% of class     
(1) The number of common units presented for Mr. Bachmann includes 9,588 common units held by his spouse.  In addition, the number of common units
presented for Mr. Bachmann includes an aggregate 150,000 phantom units that vested in late February 2019, which resulted in the issuance of an equal
number of common units before adjustment for any withholding taxes.
(2) These individuals are named executive officers for the year ended December 31, 2018.
(3) The number of common units presented for Mr. Teague includes (i) 56,390 common units held by a trust and (ii) 37,175 common units held by his spouse. 
In addition, the number of common units presented for Mr. Teague includes an aggregate 146,075 phantom units that vested in late February 2019, which
resulted in the issuance of an equal number of common units before adjustment for any withholding taxes.
(4) The number of common units presented for Mr. Fowler includes 510,000 common units held by a family limited partnership (for which he has disclaimed
beneficial ownership except to the extent of his pecuniary interest).  In addition, the number of common units presented for Mr. Fowler includes an
aggregate 113,262 phantom units that vested in late February 2019, which resulted in the issuance of an equal number of common units before adjustment
for any withholding taxes.
(5) The number of common units presented for Mr. Brasseux includes 2,882 common units held by his spouse.
(6) The number of common units presented for Mr. Hackett includes (i) 9,661 common units held by family trusts and (ii) 33,000 common units held by a
family limited partnership.
(7) The number of common units presented for Mr. Snell includes 2,956 common units held by his spouse.
(8) The number of common units presented for Mr. Weitzel includes an aggregate 23,400 phantom units that vested in late February 2019, which resulted in the
issuance of an equal number of common units before adjustment for any withholding taxes.
(9)        The number of common units presented for Mr. Ordemann includes an aggregate 55,250 phantom units that vested in late February 2019, which resulted in
the issuance of an equal number of common units before adjustment for any withholding taxes.
(10)      The number of common units presented for Mr. Bacon includes an aggregate 55,250 phantom units that vested in late February 2019, which resulted in the
issuance of an equal number of common units before adjustment for any withholding taxes.
(11)      The number of common units presented for Mr. Secrest includes an aggregate 24,375 phantom units that vested in late February 2019, which resulted in the
issuance of an equal number of common units before adjustment for any withholding taxes.
(12)      The ownership information presented is based on Mr. Bulawa’s reported holdings of our common units immediately prior to his resignation. Mr. Bulawa
resigned effective August 24, 2018.
(13)      Cumulatively, this group’s beneficial ownership amount includes an aggregate 601,916 phantom units that vested in late February 2019, which resulted in
the issuance of an equal number of common units before adjustment for any withholding taxes.
135
Table of Contents
Equity Ownership Guidelines
In order to further align the interests and actions of our general partner’s directors and executive officers with our long-term
interests and those of our general partner and other unitholders, the Board has adopted and approved certain equity ownership
guidelines for our general partner’s directors and executive officers.  Under these guidelines:
§each non-management director of our general partner is required to own Enterprise common units having an aggregate value
(as defined in the guidelines) of three times the dollar amount of such non-management director’s aggregate annual cash
retainer for service on the Board for the most recently completed calendar year; and
§each executive officer of our general partner is required to own Enterprise common units having an aggregate value (as defined
in the guidelines) of three times the dollar amount of such executive officer’s aggregate annual base salary for the most
recently completed calendar year.
Securities Authorized for Issuance Under Equity Compensation Plans
Currently, the 2008 Plan is EPCO’s only long-term incentive plan under which our common units have been authorized for
issuance.  The 2008 Plan provides for awards of our common units and other rights to our non-management directors and to
consultants and employees of EPCO and its affiliates providing services to us.  Awards under the 2008 Plan may be granted in the
form of unit options, restricted common units, phantom units, UARs, DERs, unit awards and other unit-based awards or substitute
awards. The following table sets forth certain information regarding the 2008 Plan as of January 1, 2019.
    Number of
    Units
    Remaining
   Available For
 Number of  Future Issuance
 Units to Weighted- Under Equity
 Be Issued Average Compensation
 Upon Exercise Exercise Price Plans (excluding
 of Outstanding of Outstanding securities
 Common Unit Common Unit reflected in
Plan Category Options Options column (a))
 (a) (b) (c)
Equity compensation plans approved by unitholders:    
2008 Plan (1) -- -- 24,116,132
Equity compensation plans not approved by unitholders:    
None -- -- --
Total for equity compensation plans -- -- 24,116,132
    
(1) At December 31, 2018, the total number of common units authorized for issuance under the 2008 Plan was 45,000,000 common units.  This amount
increased by 5,000,000 common units on January 1, 2019 and will increase by an additional 5,000,000 common units subsequently on each January 1
thereafter during the term of the 2008 Plan; provided, however, that in no event shall the maximum aggregate amount available for issuance under the 2008
Plan exceed 70,000,000 common units.
136
Table of Contents
ITEM 13.  CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS,
AND DIRECTOR INDEPENDENCE.
Certain Relationships and Related Transactions
We believe that the terms and provisions of our related party agreements are fair to us; however, such agreements and transactions
may not be as favorable to us as we could have obtained from unaffiliated third parties.
Additional information regarding our related party transactions is set forth in Note 15 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial
Statements included under Part II, Item 8 of this annual report and is incorporated by reference into this Part III, Item 13.
Review and Approval of Transactions with Related Parties
We consider transactions between us and our subsidiaries and unconsolidated affiliates, on the one hand, and our executive officers
and directors (or their immediate family members), our general partner or its affiliates (including other companies owned or
controlled by the DD LLC Trustees or the EPCO Trustees), on the other hand, to be related party transactions.  As further described
below, our partnership agreement sets forth general procedures by which related party transactions and conflicts of interest may be
approved or resolved by Enterprise GP or its Audit and Conflicts Committee.  In addition, the Audit and Conflicts Committee
charter, Enterprise GP’s written internal review and approval policies and procedures (referred to as its “management authorization
policy”) and the amended and restated ASA with EPCO address specific types of related party transactions, as further described
below.
Our Audit and Conflicts Committee is comprised of five independent directors:  Messrs. Brasseux, McMahen, Montgomery,
Rutherford and Snell.  In accordance with its charter, the Audit and Conflicts Committee reviews and approves related party
transactions:
§pursuant to our partnership agreement or the limited liability company agreement of Enterprise GP, as such agreements may be
amended from time to time;
§in which an officer or director of Enterprise GP or any of our subsidiaries, or an immediate family member of such an officer
or director, has a material financial interest or is otherwise a party;
§when requested to do so by management or the Board;
§with a value of $5 million or more (unless such transaction is equivalent to an arm’s length or third party transaction); or
§that it may otherwise deem appropriate from time to time.
The Audit and Conflicts Committee did not review or approve any related party transactions during the year ended December 31,
2018.
Enterprise GP’s management authorization policy generally requires Board approval for asset purchase or sales transactions and
capital expenditures to the extent such transactions have a value in excess of $250 million.  Any such transaction would typically
also require Audit and Conflicts Committee review under its charter if such transaction is also a related party transaction.
As noted previously, all of our management, administrative and operating functions are performed by employees of EPCO
(pursuant to an administrative services agreement, or ASA) or by other service providers.  The ASA governs numerous day-to-day
transactions between us, Enterprise GP and EPCO and its affiliates, including the provision by EPCO of administrative and other
services to us and our reimbursement to EPCO of costs, without markup or discount, for those services.  The ASA was reviewed,
approved and recommended to the Board by our Audit and Conflicts Committee, and the Board also approved it upon receiving
such recommendation.
137
Table of Contents
Related party transactions that are outside the scope of the ASA and not reviewed by the Audit and Conflicts Committee are subject
to Enterprise GP’s management authorization policy.  This policy, which applies to related party transactions as well as transactions
with third parties, specifies thresholds for our general partner’s officers and Board to authorize various categories of transactions,
including purchases and sales of assets, commercial and financial transactions and legal agreements.
Partnership Agreement Standards for Audit and Conflicts Committee Review
Under our partnership agreement, whenever a potential conflict of interest exists or arises between Enterprise GP or any of its
affiliates, on the one hand, and us, any of our subsidiaries or any partner, on the other hand, any resolution or course of action by
Enterprise GP or its affiliates in respect of such conflict of interest is permitted and deemed approved by our limited partners, and
will not constitute a breach of our partnership agreement or any agreement contemplated by such agreement, or of any duty stated
or implied by law or equity, if the resolution or course of action is or, by operation of the partnership agreement is deemed to be,
fair and reasonable to us; provided that, any conflict of interest and any resolution of such conflict of interest will be conclusively
deemed fair and reasonable to us if such conflict of interest or resolution is (i) approved by a majority of the members of the Audit
and Conflicts Committee (i.e., a “Special Approval” is granted) or (ii) on terms objectively demonstrable to be no less favorable to
us than those generally being provided to or available from third parties.
The Audit and Conflicts Committee (in connection with its Special Approval process) may consider the following when resolving
conflicts of interest:
§the relative interests of any party to such conflict, agreement, transaction or situation and the benefits and burdens relating to
such interest;
§the totality of the relationships between the parties involved (including other transactions that may be particularly favorable or
advantageous to us);
§any customary or accepted industry practices and any customary or historical dealings with a particular party;
§any applicable generally accepted accounting or engineering practices or principles;
§the relative cost of capital of the parties involved and the consequent rates of return to the equity holders of such parties; and
§such additional factors as the Audit and Conflicts Committee determines in its sole discretion to be relevant, reasonable or
appropriate under the circumstances.
The level of review and work performed by the Audit and Conflicts Committee with respect to a given transaction varies depending
upon the nature of the transaction and the scope of the Audit and Conflicts Committee’s obligation.  Examples of functions the
Audit and Conflicts Committee may, as it deems appropriate, perform in the course of reviewing a transaction include, but are not
limited to:
§assessing the business rationale for the transaction;
§reviewing the terms and conditions of the proposed transaction, including consideration and financing requirements, if any;
§assessing the effect of the transaction on our results of operations, financial condition, cash available for distribution,
properties or prospects;
§conducting due diligence, including interviews and discussions with management and other representatives and reviewing
transaction materials and findings of management and other representatives;
§considering the relative advantages and disadvantages of the transactions to the parties involved;
138
Table of Contents
§engaging third party financial advisors to provide financial advice and assistance, including fairness opinions if requested;
§engaging legal advisors; and
§evaluating and negotiating the transaction and recommending for approval or approving the transaction, as the case may be.
Nothing contained in our partnership agreement requires the Audit and Conflicts Committee to consider the interests of any party
other than us.  In the absence of the Audit and Conflicts Committee or our general partner acting in bad faith, the resolution, action
or terms so made, taken or provided (including granting Special Approval) by the Audit and Conflicts Committee or our general
partner with respect to such matter are deemed conclusive and binding on all persons (including all of our limited partners) and do
not constitute a breach of partnership agreement, or any other agreement contemplated thereby, or a breach of any standard of care
or duty imposed in our partnership agreement or under the Delaware Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act or any other law,
rule or regulation.  Our partnership agreement provides that it is presumed that the resolution, action or terms made, taken or
provided by the Audit and Conflicts Committee or our general partner were not made, taken or provided in bad faith, and in any
proceeding brought by any limited partner or by or on behalf of such limited partner or any other limited partner or us challenging
such resolution, action or terms, the person bringing or prosecuting such proceeding will have the burden of overcoming such
presumption.
Director Independence
Each of the current members of the Audit and Conflicts Committee, namely Messrs. Brasseux, McMahen, Montgomery, Rutherford
and Snell, and two members of the Governance Committee, namely Ms. Barth and Mr. Hackett, have been determined to be
independent under the applicable NYSE listing standards and rules of the SEC.  For a discussion of independence standards
applicable to our Board and factors considered by our Board in making its independence determinations, please refer to
“Partnership Governance” included under Part III, Item 10 of this annual report.
Other Matters
An immediate family member of Mr. Teague and two immediate family members of Mr. Ordemann are employees of EPCO who
perform services on our behalf.  None of these individuals serves as an executive officer of Enterprise GP, EPCO or any of their
respective affiliates, and each such individual’s compensation and other terms of employment are determined on a basis consistent
with EPCO’s human resources policies.  For 2018, (i) the immediate family member of Mr. Teague earned total compensation from
EPCO of $550 thousand and (ii) the two immediate family members of Mr. Ordemann earned total compensation from EPCO of
$180 thousand and $175 thousand, respectively.
During 2018, an immediate family member of Ms. Duncan Williams was an employee of EPCO who performed services on our
behalf.  This individual did not serve as an executive officer of Enterprise GP, EPCO or any of their respective affiliates, and such
individual’s compensation and other terms of employment were determined on a basis consistent with EPCO’s human resources
policies.  For 2018, this individual earned total compensation from EPCO of $140 thousand.
Mr. Brasseux owns a minority equity interest in Worldwide Power Products, LLC (“Worldwide”), a privately-owned company in
the business of buying, selling, renting and servicing generators and buying and selling generator parts. Mr. Brasseux’s son-in-law
is the Chief Executive Officer and majority equity owner of Worldwide. From time to time, we engage in business transactions with
Worldwide. Although the aggregate dollar amount involved in these transactions has not exceeded $120,000 historically, the annual
aggregate dollar amount involved in such transactions may exceed $120,000 in the future. The terms of these transactions are
determined on an arms-length basis, and Mr. Brasseux (who does not serve as an employee or director of Worldwide) does not
participate in the negotiation or approval of any such transactions.
139
Table of Contents
ITEM 14.  PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTANT FEES AND SERVICES.
With the approval of the Audit and Conflicts Committee of our general partner, we have engaged Deloitte & Touche LLP, the
member firms of Deloitte Touche Tohmatsu, and their respective affiliates (collectively, “Deloitte & Touche”) as our independent
registered public accounting firm and principal accountants.  The following table summarizes amounts billed to us by Deloitte &
Touche for each of the years presented, as applicable:
  For the Year Ended December 31, 
  2018   2017  
Audit fees (1)  $ 5,253,365  $ 5,047,700 
         
(1) Audit fees for 2018 and 2017 include $50,000 and $135,000, respectively, of charges for audit-related projects that were reimbursed by business partners. 
As presented in the preceding table, “Audit Fees” represent amounts billed for each year in connection with (i) the annual audit of
our consolidated financial statements filed on Form 10-K and related internal controls over financial reporting, (ii) the quarterly
review of our consolidated financial statements filed on Form 10-Q, (iii) standalone annual audits of our consolidated subsidiaries
and (iv) those services normally provided by Deloitte & Touche in connection with our statutory and regulatory filings or
engagements, including comfort letters, consents and other services related to SEC matters.  We did not engage Deloitte & Touche
to perform any other services for us during the last two years. We are prohibited from using Deloitte & Touche to perform general
bookkeeping, human resources or management functions for us, and any other service not permitted by the PCAOB.
In connection with its oversight responsibilities, the Audit and Conflicts Committee has adopted a pre-approval policy regarding
any services to be performed by Deloitte & Touche.  The pre-approval policy includes four primary service categories: Audit,
Audit-related, Tax and Other. When Deloitte & Touche’s services are required, management and Deloitte & Touche discuss the
proposed work with the Audit and Conflicts Committee.  These discussions typically address the reasons for the project, the scope
of the work to be performed and an estimate of the fee to be charged by Deloitte & Touche for such work.  The Audit and Conflicts
Committee discusses the request with management and Deloitte & Touche and, if the work is deemed necessary and appropriate for
Deloitte & Touche to perform, approves the request subject to the fee estimate presented (the initial “pre-approved” fee amount).  If
at a later date, it appears that the initial pre-approved fee amount is insufficient to complete the work, management and Deloitte &
Touche must present a supplemental request to the Audit and Conflicts Committee to increase the approved amount along with
reasons for the increase.  Under the pre-approval policy, management cannot act upon its own to authorize an expenditure for
Deloitte & Touche services outside of the pre-approved amounts.  On a quarterly basis, the Audit and Conflicts Committee is
provided a schedule that compares the pre-approved amounts for each primary service category with the actual fees billed for each
type of service.  We believe the Audit and Conflicts Committee’s pre-approval process helps to ensure the independence of Deloitte
& Touche from management.
140
Table of Contents
PART IV
ITEM 15.  EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES.
The following documents are filed as a part of this annual report:
(1)Financial Statements:  See “Index to Consolidated Financial Statements” beginning on page F-1 of this annual report for
the financial statements included herein.
(2)Financial Statement Schedules:  The separate filing of financial statement schedules has been omitted because such
schedules are either not applicable or the information called for therein appears in the footnotes of our Consolidated
Financial Statements.
(3)Exhibits:
Exhibit
Number Exhibit*
2.1 Merger Agreement, dated as of December 15, 2003, by and among Enterprise Products Partners L.P., Enterprise
Products GP, LLC, Enterprise Products Management LLC, GulfTerra Energy Partners, L.P. and GulfTerra Energy
Company, L.L.C. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2.1 to Form 8-K filed December 15, 2003).
2.2 Amendment No. 1 to Merger Agreement, dated as of August 31, 2004, by and among Enterprise Products Partners
L.P., Enterprise Products GP, LLC, Enterprise Products Management LLC, GulfTerra Energy Partners, L.P. and
GulfTerra Energy Company, L.L.C. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2.1 to Form 8-K filed September 7, 2004).
2.3 Parent Company Agreement, dated as of December 15, 2003, by and among Enterprise Products Partners L.P.,
Enterprise Products GP, LLC, Enterprise Products GTM, LLC, El Paso Corporation, Sabine River Investors I,
L.L.C., Sabine River Investors II, L.L.C., El Paso EPN Investments, L.L.C. and GulfTerra GP Holding Company
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2.2 to Form 8-K filed December 15, 2003).
2.4 Amendment No. 1 to Parent Company Agreement, dated as of April 19, 2004, by and among Enterprise Products
Partners L.P., Enterprise Products GP, LLC, Enterprise Products GTM, LLC, El Paso Corporation, Sabine River
Investors I, L.L.C., Sabine River Investors II, L.L.C., El Paso EPN Investments, L.L.C. and GulfTerra GP Holding
Company (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2.1 to Form 8-K filed April 21, 2004).
2.5 Purchase and Sale Agreement (Gas Plants), dated as of December 15, 2003, by and between El Paso Corporation, El
Paso Field Services Management, Inc., El Paso Transmission, L.L.C., El Paso Field Services Holding Company and
Enterprise Products Operating L.P. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2.4 to Form 8-K filed December 15,
2003). 
2.6 Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of June 28, 2009, by and among Enterprise Products Partners L.P.,
Enterprise Products GP, LLC, Enterprise Sub B LLC, TEPPCO Partners, L.P. and Texas Eastern Products Pipeline
Company, LLC (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2.1 to Form 8-K filed June 29, 2009).
2.7 Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of June 28, 2009, by and among Enterprise Products Partners L.P.,
Enterprise Products GP, LLC, Enterprise Sub A LLC, TEPPCO Partners, L.P. and Texas Eastern Products Pipeline
Company, LLC (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2.2 to Form 8-K filed June 29, 2009).
2.8 Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of September 3, 2010, by and among Enterprise Products Partners L.P.,
Enterprise Products GP, LLC, Enterprise ETE LLC, Enterprise GP Holdings L.P. and EPE Holdings, LLC
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2.1 to Form 8-K filed September 7, 2010).
2.9 Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of September 3, 2010, by and among Enterprise Products GP, LLC,
Enterprise GP Holdings L.P. and EPE Holdings, LLC (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2.2 to Form 8-K filed
September 7, 2010).
141
Table of Contents
2.10 Contribution Agreement, dated as of September 30, 2010, by and between Enterprise Products Company and
Enterprise Products Partners L.P. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2.1 to Form 8-K filed October 1, 2010).
2.11 Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of April 28, 2011, by and among Enterprise Products Partners L.P.,
Enterprise Products Holdings LLC, EPD MergerCo LLC, Duncan Energy Partners L.P. and DEP Holdings, LLC
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2.1 to Form 8-K filed April 29, 2011).
2.12 Contribution and Purchase Agreement, dated as of October 1, 2014, by and among Enterprise Products Partners
L.P., Oiltanking Holding Americas, Inc. and OTB Holdco, LLC (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2.1 to Form 8-
K filed October 1, 2014).
2.13 Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of November 11, 2014, by and among Enterprise Products Partners L.P.,
Enterprise Products Holdings LLC, EPOT MergerCo LLC, Oiltanking Partners, L.P. and OTLP GP, LLC
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2.1 to Form 8-K filed November 12, 2014).
2.14 Amendment No. 1 dated as of June 6, 2018 to Contribution and Purchase Agreement, by and among Enterprise
Products Partners L.P., Oiltanking Holding Americas, Inc., Enterprise Products Holdings LLC and Marquard &
Bahls, AG (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2.2 to Form 8-K filed June 12, 2018).
3.1 Certificate of Limited Partnership of Enterprise Products Partners L.P. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.6 to
Form 10-Q filed November 9, 2007).
3.2 Certificate of Amendment to Certificate of Limited Partnership of Enterprise Products Partners L.P., filed on
November 22, 2010 with the Delaware Secretary of State (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.6 to Form 8-K
filed November 23, 2010).
3.3 Sixth Amended and Restated Agreement of Limited Partnership of Enterprise Products Partners L.P., dated
November 22, 2010 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.2 to Form 8-K filed November 23, 2010).
3.4 Amendment No. 1 to Sixth Amended and Restated Agreement of Limited Partnership of Enterprise Products
Partners L.P., dated effective as of August 11, 2011 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Form 8-K filed
August 16, 2011).
3.5 Amendment No. 2 to Sixth Amended and Restated Agreement of Limited Partnership of Enterprise Products
Partners L.P., dated effective as of August 21, 2014 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Form 8-K filed
August 26, 2014).
3.6 Amendment No. 3 to the Sixth Amended and Restated Agreement of Limited Partnership of Enterprise Products
Partners L.P., dated as of November 28, 2017 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Form 8-K filed December
1, 2017).
3.7# Amendment No. 4 to the Sixth Amended and Restated Agreement of Limited Partnership of Enterprise Products
Partners L.P., dated as of February 26, 2019.
3.8 Certificate of Formation of Enterprise Products Holdings LLC (formerly named EPE Holdings, LLC) (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 3.3 to Form S-1/A Registration Statement, Reg. No. 333-124320, filed by Enterprise GP
Holdings L.P. on July 22, 2005).
3.9 Certificate of Amendment to Certificate of Formation of Enterprise Products Holdings LLC (formerly named EPE
Holdings, LLC), filed on November 22, 2010 with the Delaware Secretary of State (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 3.5 to Form 8-K filed November 23, 2010).
3.10 Fifth Amended and Restated Limited Liability Company Agreement of Enterprise Products Holdings LLC dated
effective as of September 7, 2011 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Form 8-K filed September 8, 2011).
3.11 Amendment No. 1 to Fifth Amended and Restated Limited Liability Company Agreement of Enterprise Products
Holdings LLC, dated effective as of April 26, 2017 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Form 8-K filed May
2, 2017).
3.12 Company Agreement of Enterprise Products Operating LLC dated June 30, 2007 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 3.3 to Form 10-Q filed August 8, 2007).
3.13 Certificate of Incorporation of Enterprise Products OLPGP, Inc., dated December 3, 2003 (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 3.5 to Form S-4 Registration Statement, Reg. No. 333-121665, filed December 27, 2004).
3.14 Bylaws of Enterprise Products OLPGP, Inc., dated December 8, 2003 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.6 to
Form S-4 Registration Statement, Reg. No. 333-121665, filed December 27, 2004).
142
Table of Contents
4.1 Form of Common Unit certificate (incorporated by reference to Exhibit A to Exhibit 3.1 to Form 8-K filed August
16, 2011).
4.2 Indenture, dated as of March 15, 2000, among Enterprise Products Operating L.P., as Issuer, Enterprise Products
Partners L.P., as Guarantor, and First Union National Bank, as Trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
Form 8-K filed March 14, 2000).
4.3 Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of February 14, 2003, among Enterprise Products Operating L.P., as
Issuer, Enterprise Products Partners L.P., as Guarantor, and Wachovia Bank, National Association, as Trustee
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 10-K filed March 31, 2003).
4.4 Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 30, 2007, among Enterprise Products Operating L.P., as Original
Issuer, Enterprise Products Partners L.P., as Parent Guarantor, Enterprise Products Operating LLC, as New Issuer,
and U.S. Bank National Association, as successor Trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.55 to Form 10-Q
filed August 8, 2007).
4.5 Indenture, dated as of October 4, 2004, among Enterprise Products Operating L.P., as Issuer, Enterprise Products
Partners L.P., as Parent Guarantor, and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Form 8-K filed October 6, 2004).
4.6 Fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of October 4, 2004, among Enterprise Products Operating L.P., as Issuer,
Enterprise Products Partners L.P., as Parent Guarantor, and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to Form 8-K filed October 6, 2004).
4.7 Sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March 2, 2005, among Enterprise Products Operating L.P., as Issuer,
Enterprise Products Partners L.P., as Parent Guarantor, and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed March 3, 2005).
4.8 Amended and Restated Eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August 25, 2006, among Enterprise Products
Operating L.P., as Issuer, Enterprise Products Partners L.P., as Parent Guarantor, and Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as Trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Form 8-K filed August 25, 2006).
4.9 Ninth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of May 24, 2007, among Enterprise Products Operating L.P., as Issuer,
Enterprise Products Partners L.P., as Parent Guarantor, and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Form 8-K filed May 24, 2007).
4.10 Tenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 30, 2007, among Enterprise Products Operating L.P., as Original
Issuer, Enterprise Products Partners L.P., as Parent Guarantor, Enterprise Products Operating LLC, as New Issuer,
and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.54 to Form 10-Q
filed August 8, 2007).
4.11 Thirteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 3, 2008, among Enterprise Products Operating LLC, as Issuer,
Enterprise Products Partners L.P., as Parent Guarantor, and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to Form 8-K filed April 3, 2008).
4.12 Sixteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of October 5, 2009, among Enterprise Products Operating LLC, as
Issuer, Enterprise Products Partners L.P., as Parent Guarantor, and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as
Trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed October 5, 2009).
4.13 Seventeenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of October 27, 2009, among Enterprise Products Operating LLC, as
Issuer, Enterprise Products Partners L.P., as Parent Guarantor, and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as
Trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Form 8-K filed October 28, 2009).
4.14
 Eighteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of October 27, 2009, among Enterprise Products Operating LLC, as
Issuer, Enterprise Products Partners L.P., as Parent Guarantor, and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as
Trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Form 8-K filed October 28, 2009).
4.15 Nineteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of May 20, 2010, among Enterprise Products Operating LLC, as
Issuer, Enterprise Products Partners L.P., as Parent Guarantor, and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as
Trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed May 20, 2010).
143
Table of Contents
4.16 Twentieth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of January 13, 2011, among Enterprise Products Operating LLC, as
Issuer, Enterprise Products Partners L.P., as Parent Guarantor, and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as
Trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed January 13, 2011).
4.17 Twenty-First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August 24, 2011, among Enterprise Products Operating LLC, as
Issuer, Enterprise Products Partners L.P., as Parent Guarantor, and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as
Trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed August 24, 2011).
4.18 Twenty-Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of February 15, 2012, among Enterprise Products Operating LLC,
as Issuer, Enterprise Products Partners L.P., as Parent Guarantor, and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as
Trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.25 to Form 10-Q filed May 10, 2012).
4.19 Twenty-Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August 13, 2012, among Enterprise Products Operating LLC, as
Issuer, Enterprise Products Partners L.P., as Parent Guarantor, and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as
Trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed August 13, 2012).
4.20 Twenty-Fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March 18, 2013, among Enterprise Products Operating LLC, as
Issuer, Enterprise Products Partners L.P., as Guarantor, and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed March 18, 2013).
4.21 Twenty-Fifth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of February 12, 2014, among Enterprise Products Operating LLC, as
Issuer, Enterprise Products Partners L.P., as Guarantor, and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed February 12, 2014).
4.22 Twenty-Sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of October 14, 2014, among Enterprise Products Operating LLC, as
Issuer, Enterprise Products Partners L.P., as Guarantor, and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to Form 8-K filed October 14, 2014).
4.23 Twenty-Seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of May 7, 2015, among Enterprise Products Operating LLC, as
Issuer, Enterprise Products Partners L.P., as Parent Guarantor, and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as
Trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed May 7, 2015).
4.24 Twenty-Eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 13, 2016, among Enterprise Products Operating LLC, as
Issuer, Enterprise Products Partners L.P., as Guarantor, and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to Form 8-K filed April 13, 2016).
4.25 Twenty-Ninth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August 16, 2017, among Enterprise Products Operating LLC, as
Issuer, Enterprise Products Partners L.P., as Guarantor, and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed August 16, 2017).
4.26 Thirtieth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of February 15, 2018, among Enterprise Products Operating LLC, as
Issuer, Enterprise Products Partners L.P., as Guarantor, and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to Form 8-K filed February 15, 2018).
4.27 Thirty-First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of February 15, 2018, among Enterprise Products Operating LLC, as
Issuer, Enterprise Products Partners L.P., as Guarantor, and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed February 15, 2018).
4.28 Thirty-Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of October 11, 2018, among Enterprise Products Operating LLC,
as Issuer, Enterprise Products Partners L.P., as Guarantor, and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed October 11, 2018).
144
Table of Contents
4.29 Form of Global Note representing $499.2 million principal amount of 6.875% Series B Senior Notes due 2033 with
attached Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit A to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 10-K filed March 31, 2003).
4.30 Form of Global Note representing $350.0 million principal amount of 6.65% Series B Senior Notes due 2034 with
attached Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.19 to Form S-3 Registration Statement, Reg. No. 333-
123150, filed March 4, 2005).
4.31 Form of Global Note representing $250.0 million principal amount of 5.75% Series B Senior Notes due 2035 with
attached Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.32 to Form 10-Q filed November 4, 2005).
4.32 Form of Global Note representing an aggregate of $550.0 million principal amount of Junior Subordinated Notes
due 2066 with attached Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit A to Exhibit 4.2 to Form 8-K filed August
25, 2006).
4.33 Form of Global Note representing $700.0 million principal amount of 6.50% Senior Notes due 2019 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit A to Exhibit 4.4 to Form 8-K filed April 3, 2008).
4.34 Form of Global Note representing $500.0 million principal amount of 5.25% Senior Notes due 2020 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit A to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed October 5, 2009).
4.35 Form of Global Note representing $600.0 million principal amount of 6.125% Senior Notes due 2039 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit B to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed October 5, 2009).
4.36 Form of Global Note representing $349.7 million principal amount of 6.65% Senior Notes due 2018 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit D to Exhibit 4.1 to Form 8-K filed October 28, 2009).
4.37 Form of Global Note representing $399.6 million principal amount of 7.55% Senior Notes due 2038 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit E to Exhibit 4.1 to Form 8-K filed October 28, 2009).
4.38 Form of Global Note representing $285.8 million principal amount of Junior Subordinated Notes due 2067 with
attached Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit A to Exhibit 4.2 to Form 8-K filed October 28, 2009).
4.39 Form of Global Note representing $1.0 billion principal amount of 5.20% Senior Notes due 2020 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit B to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed May 20, 2010).
4.40 Form of Global Note representing $600.0 million principal amount of 6.45% Senior Notes due 2040 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit C to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed May 20, 2010).
4.41 Form of Global Note representing $750.0 million principal amount of 5.95% Senior Notes due 2041 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit B to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed January 13, 2011).
4.42 Form of Global Note representing $650.0 million principal amount of 4.05% Senior Notes due 2022 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit A to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed August 24, 2011).
4.43 Form of Global Note representing $600.0 million principal amount of 5.70% Senior Notes due 2042 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit B to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed August 24, 2011).
4.44 Form of Global Note representing $750.0 million principal amount of 4.85% Senior Notes due 2042 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit A to Exhibit 4.25 to Form 10-Q filed May 10, 2012).
4.45 Form of Global Note representing $1.1 billion principal amount of 4.45% Senior Notes due 2043 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit B to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed August 13, 2012).
4.46 Form of Global Note representing $1.25 billion principal amount of 3.35% Senior Notes due 2023 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit A to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed March 18, 2013).
145
Table of Contents
4.47 Form of Global Note representing $1.0 billion principal amount of 4.85% Senior Notes due 2044 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit B to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed March 18, 2013).
4.48 Form of Global Note representing $850.0 million principal amount of 3.90% Senior Notes due 2024 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit A to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed February 12, 2014).
4.49 Form of Global Note representing $1.15 billion principal amount of 5.10% Senior Notes due 2045 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit B to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed February 12, 2014).
4.50 Form of Global Note representing $800.0 million principal amount of 2.55% Senior Notes due 2019 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit A to Exhibit 4.4 to Form 8-K filed October 14, 2014).
4.51 Form of Global Note representing $1.15 billion principal amount of 3.75% Senior Notes due 2025 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit B to Exhibit 4.4 to Form 8-K filed October 14, 2014).
4.52 Form of Global Note representing $400.0 million principal amount of 4.95% Senior Notes due 2054 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit C to Exhibit 4.4 to Form 8-K filed October 14, 2014).
4.53 Form of Global Note representing $400.0 million principal amount of 4.85% Senior Notes due 2044 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit B to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed March 18, 2013).
4.54 Form of Global Note representing $750.0 million principal amount of 1.65% Senior Notes due 2018 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit A to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed May 7, 2015).
4.55 Form of Global Note representing $875.0 million principal amount of 3.70% Senior Notes due 2026 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit B to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed May 7, 2015).
4.56 Form of Global Note representing $875.0 million principal amount of 4.90% Senior Notes due 2046 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit C to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed May 7, 2015).
4.57 Form of Global Note representing $575.0 million principal amount of 2.85% Senior Notes due 2021 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit A to Exhibit 4.4 to Form 8-K filed April 13, 2016).
4.58 Form of Global Note representing $575.0 million principal amount of 3.95% Senior Notes due 2027 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit B to Exhibit 4.4 to Form 8-K filed April 13, 2016).
4.59 Form of Global Note representing $100.0 million principal amount of 4.90% Senior Notes due 2046 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit C to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed May 7, 2015).
4.60 Form of Global Note representing $700 million principal amount of Junior Subordinated Notes D due 2077 with
attached Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit A to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed August 16, 2017).
4.61 Form of Global Note representing $1.0 billion principal amount of Junior Subordinated Notes E due 2077 with
attached Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit B to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed August 16, 2017).
4.62 Form of Global Note representing $750.0 million principal amount of 2.80% Senior Notes due 2021 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit A to Exhibit 4.4 to Form 8-K filed February 15, 2018).
4.63 Form of Global Note representing $1.25 billion principal amount of 4.25% Senior Notes due 2048 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit B to Exhibit 4.4 to Form 8-K filed February 15, 2018).
4.64 Form of Global Note representing $700 million principal amount of Junior Subordinated Notes F due 2078 with
attached Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit A to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed February 15, 2018).
146
Table of Contents
4.65 Form of Global Note representing $750.0 million principal amount of 3.50% Senior Notes due 2022 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit A to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed October 11, 2018).
4.66 Form of Global Note representing $1,000.0 million principal amount of 4.15% Senior Notes due 2028 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit B to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed October 11, 2018).
4.67 Form of Global Note representing $1,250.0 million principal amount of 4.80% Senior Notes due 2049 with attached
Guarantee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit C to Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed October 11, 2018).
4.68 Replacement Capital Covenant, dated July 18, 2006, executed by Enterprise Products Operating L.P. in favor of the
covered debtholders described therein (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 99.1 to Form 8-K filed July 19, 2006).
4.69 First Amendment to Replacement Capital Covenant dated August 25, 2006, executed by Enterprise Products
Operating L.P. in favor of the covered debtholders described therein (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 99.2 to
Form 8-K filed August 25, 2006).
4.70 Replacement Capital Covenant, dated May 24, 2007, executed by Enterprise Products Operating L.P. and Enterprise
Products Partners L.P. in favor of the covered debtholders described therein (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 99.1 to Form 8-K filed May 24, 2007).
4.71 Replacement Capital Covenant, dated October 27, 2009, executed by Enterprise Products Operating LLC and
Enterprise Products Partners L.P. in favor of the covered debtholders described therein (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.9 to Form 8-K filed October 28, 2009).
4.72 Amendment to Replacement Capital Covenants, dated May 6, 2015, executed by Enterprise Products Operating
LLC and Enterprise Products Partners L.P. in favor of the covered debtholders described therein (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.59 to Form 10-Q filed May 8, 2015).
4.73 Indenture, dated February 20, 2002, by and among TEPPCO Partners, L.P., as Issuer, TE Products Pipeline
Company, Limited Partnership, TCTM, L.P., TEPPCO Midstream Companies, L.P. and Jonah Gas Gathering
Company, as Subsidiary Guarantors, and First Union National Bank, NA, as Trustee (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 99.2 to the Form 8-K filed by TEPPCO Partners, L.P. on February 20, 2002).
4.74 Supplemental Indenture, dated June 27, 2002, by and among TEPPCO Partners, L.P., as Issuer, TE Products
Pipeline Company, Limited Partnership, TCTM, L.P., TEPPCO Midstream Companies, L.P. and Jonah Gas
Gathering Company, as Initial Subsidiary Guarantors, Val Verde Gas Gathering Company, L.P., as New Subsidiary
Guarantor, and Wachovia Bank, National Association, formerly known as First Union National Bank, as Trustee
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.6 to the Form 10-Q filed by TEPPCO Partners, L.P. on August 14, 2002).
4.75 Full Release of Guarantee, dated July 31, 2006, by Wachovia Bank, National Association, as Trustee, in favor of
Jonah Gas Gathering Company (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.8 to the Form 10-Q filed by TEPPCO
Partners, L.P. on November 7, 2006).
4.76 Fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated June 30, 2007, by and among TEPPCO Partners, L.P., as Issuer, TE Products
Pipeline Company, Limited Partnership, TCTM, L.P., TEPPCO Midstream Companies, L.P., Val Verde Gas
Gathering Company, L.P., TE Products Pipeline Company, LLC and TEPPCO Midstream Companies, LLC, as
Subsidiary Guarantors, and U.S. Bank National Association, as Trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
the Form 8-K filed by TE Products Pipeline Company, LLC on July 6, 2007).
4.77 Sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated March 27, 2008, by and among TEPPCO Partners, L.P., as Issuer, TE Products
Pipeline Company, LLC, TCTM, L.P., TEPPCO Midstream Companies, LLC and Val Verde Gas Gathering
Company, L.P., as Subsidiary Guarantors, and U.S. Bank National Association, as Trustee (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.12 to the Form 10-Q filed by TEPPCO Partners, L.P. on May 8, 2008).
4.78 Seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated March 27, 2008, by and among TEPPCO Partners, L.P., as Issuer, TE
Products Pipeline Company, LLC, TCTM, L.P., TEPPCO Midstream Companies, LLC and Val Verde Gas Gathering
Company, L.P., as Subsidiary Guarantors, and U.S. Bank National Association, as Trustee (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.13 to the Form 10-Q filed by TEPPCO Partners, L.P. on May 8, 2008).
4.79 Eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated October 27, 2009, by and among TEPPCO Partners, L.P., as Issuer, TE
Products Pipeline Company, LLC, TCTM, L.P., TEPPCO Midstream Companies, LLC and Val Verde Gas Gathering
Company, L.P., as Subsidiary Guarantors, and U.S. Bank National Association, as Trustee (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.1 to the Form 8-K filed by TEPPCO Partners, L.P. on October 28, 2009).
147
Table of Contents
4.80 Full Release of Guarantee, dated November 23, 2009, of TE Products Pipeline Company, LLC, TCTM, L.P.,
TEPPCO Midstream Companies, LLC and Val Verde Gas Gathering Company, L.P. by U.S. Bank National
Association, as Trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.64 to Form 10-K filed March 1, 2010).
4.81 Indenture, dated May 14, 2007, by and among TEPPCO Partners, L.P., as Issuer, TE Products Pipeline Company,
Limited Partnership, TCTM, L.P., TEPPCO Midstream Companies, L.P. and Val Verde Gas Gathering Company,
L.P., as Subsidiary Guarantors, and The Bank of New York Trust Company, N.A., as Trustee (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 99.1 of the Form 8-K filed by TEPPCO Partners, L.P. on May 15, 2007).
4.82 First Supplemental Indenture, dated May 18, 2007, by and among TEPPCO Partners, L.P., as Issuer, TE Products
Pipeline Company, Limited Partnership, TCTM, L.P., TEPPCO Midstream Companies, L.P. and Val Verde Gas
Gathering Company, L.P., as Subsidiary Guarantors, and The Bank of New York Trust Company, N.A., as Trustee
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to the Form 8-K filed by TEPPCO Partners, L.P. on May 18, 2007).
4.83 Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 30, 2007, by and among TEPPCO Partners, L.P., as Issuer, TE
Products Pipeline Company, Limited Partnership, TCTM, L.P., TEPPCO Midstream Companies, L.P. and Val Verde
Gas Gathering Company, L.P., as Existing Subsidiary Guarantors, TE Products Pipeline Company, LLC and
TEPPCO Midstream Companies, LLC, as New Subsidiary Guarantors, and The Bank of New York Trust Company,
N.A., as Trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to the Form 8-K filed by TE Products Pipeline Company,
LLC on July 6, 2007).
4.84 Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of October 27, 2009, by and among TEPPCO Partners, L.P., as Issuer, TE
Products Pipeline Company, LLC, TCTM, L.P., TEPPCO Midstream Companies, LLC and Val Verde Gas Gathering
Company, L.P., as Subsidiary Guarantors, and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as Trustee
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to the Form 8-K filed by TEPPCO Partners, L.P. on October 28, 2009).
4.85 Full Release of Guarantee, dated as of November 23, 2009, of TE Products Pipeline Company, LLC, TCTM, L.P.,
TEPPCO Midstream Companies, LLC and Val Verde Gas Gathering Company, L.P. by The Bank of New York
Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as Trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.70 to Form 10-K filed March 1,
2010).
4.86 Registration Rights Agreement by and between Enterprise Products Partners L.P. and Oiltanking Holding Americas,
Inc. dated as of October 1, 2014 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Form 8-K filed October 1, 2014).
10.1*** Enterprise Products 1998 Long-Term Incentive Plan (Amended and Restated as of February 23, 2010) (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Form 8-K filed February 26, 2010).
10.2*** Form of Employee Restricted Unit Grant Award under the Enterprise Products 1998 Long-Term Incentive Plan
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.5 to Form 10-Q filed August 9, 2010).
10.3*** 2008 Enterprise Products Long-Term Incentive Plan (Third Amendment and Restatement) (incorporated by
reference to Annex A to Definitive Proxy Statement filed August 26, 2013).
10.4*** Form of Employee Phantom Unit Grant Award under the 2008 Enterprise Products Long-Term Incentive Plan
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.4 to Form 10-K filed February 24, 2017).
10.5 Eighth Amended and Restated Administrative Services Agreement, effective as of February 13, 2015, by and among
Enterprise Products Company, EPCO Holdings, Inc., Enterprise Products Holdings LLC, Enterprise Products
Partners L.P., Enterprise Products OLPGP, Inc., Enterprise Products Operating LLC and the Oiltanking Parties
named therein (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Form 8-K filed February 13, 2015).
10.6 364-Day Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as of September 12, 2018, among Enterprise Products Operating LLC,
the Lenders party thereto, and Citibank, N.A. as Administrative Agent (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to
Form 8-K filed September 12, 2018).
10.7 Guaranty Agreement, dated as of September 12, 2018, by Enterprise Products Partners L.P. in favor of Citibank,
N.A., as Administrative Agent (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Form 8-K filed September 12, 2018).
148
Table of Contents
10.8 Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as of September 13, 2017, among Enterprise Products Operating LLC, the
Lenders party thereto, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent, Citibank, N.A., DNB Bank
ASA, New York Branch, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., Mizuho Bank, Ltd. and The Bank of Tokyo-Mitsubishi UFJ,
Ltd., as Co-Syndication Agents, and Barclays Bank PLC, Royal Bank of Canada, Sumitomo Mitsui Banking
Corporation, SunTrust Bank, The Bank of Nova Scotia and The Toronto-Dominion Bank, New York Branch, as Co-
Documentation Agents (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to Form 8-K filed September 15, 2017).
10.9 Guaranty Agreement, dated as of September 13, 2017, by Enterprise Products Partners L.P. in favor of Wells Fargo
Bank, National Association, as administrative agent (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.4 to Form 8-K filed
September 15, 2017).
10.10 Liquidity Option Agreement, dated as of October 1, 2014, between Enterprise Products Partners, L.P., Oiltanking
Holding Americas, Inc., and Marquard & Bahls AG (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to Form 8-K filed
October 1, 2014).
10.11 Support Agreement, dated as of November 11, 2014, by and among Enterprise Products Partners L.P., Enterprise
Products Operating LLC and Oiltanking Partners, L.P. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Form 8-K filed
November 12, 2014).
10.12*** EPD PubCo Unit I L.P. Amended and Restated Agreement of Limited Partnership dated November 3, 2016
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.17 to Form 10-K filed February 24, 2017).
10.13*** EPD PubCo Unit II L.P. Amended and Restated Agreement of Limited Partnership dated November 3, 2016
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.18 to Form 10-K filed February 24, 2017).
10.14*** EPD PrivCo Unit I L.P. Amended and Restated Agreement of Limited Partnership dated November 3, 2016
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.19 to Form 10-K filed February 24, 2017).
10.15*** EPD PubCo Unit III L.P. Amended and Restated Agreement of Limited Partnership dated November 3, 2016
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.20 to Form 10-K filed February 24, 2017).
10.16*** EPD 2018 Unit IV L.P. Agreement of Limited Partnership dated December 3, 2018 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 to Form 8-K filed December 6, 2018).
10.17*** EPCO Unit II L.P. Agreement of Limited Partnership dated December 3, 2018 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.2 to Form 8-K filed December 6, 2018).
10.16 Equity Distribution Agreement, dated December  1, 2017, by and among Enterprise Products Partners L.P.,
Enterprise Products OLPGP, Inc., Enterprise Products Operating LLC and Citigroup Global Markets Inc., Merrill
Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, Barclays Capital Inc., Credit Suisse Securities (USA) LLC, Deutsche
Bank Securities Inc., DNB Markets, Inc., Jefferies LLC, J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, Mizuho Securities USA Inc.,
Morgan Stanley & Co. LLC, MUFG Securities Americas Inc., Raymond James & Associates, Inc., RBC Capital
Markets, LLC, Scotia Capital (USA)  Inc., SG Americas Securities, LLC, SMBC Nikko Securities America, Inc.,
SunTrust Robinson Humphrey, Inc., TD Securities (USA) LLC, UBS Securities LLC, USCA Securities LLC and
Wells Fargo Securities, LLC. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 1.1 to Form 8-K filed December 1, 2017).
10.17*** Separation Agreement dated effective as of September 11, 2018 by and between Enterprise Products Company and
Bryan F. Bulawa (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to Form 8-K filed September 12, 2018).
21.1# List of consolidated subsidiaries as of February 1, 2019.
23.1# Consent of Deloitte & Touche LLP.
31.1# Sarbanes-Oxley Section 302 certification of A. James Teague for Enterprise Products Partners L.P.’s annual report
on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2018.
31.2# Sarbanes-Oxley Section 302 certification of W. Randall Fowler for Enterprise Products Partners L.P.’s annual report
on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2018.
32.1# Sarbanes-Oxley Section 906 certification of A. James Teague for Enterprise Products Partners L.P.’s annual report
on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2018.
32.2# Sarbanes-Oxley Section 906 certification of W. Randall Fowler for Enterprise Products Partners L.P.’s annual report
on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2018.
149
Table of Contents
101.CAL# XBRL Calculation Linkbase Document
101.DEF# XBRL Definition Linkbase Document
101.INS# XBRL Instance Document
101.LAB# XBRL Labels Linkbase Document
101.PRE# XBRL Presentation Linkbase Document
101.SCH# XBRL Schema Document
* With respect to any exhibits incorporated by reference to any Exchange Act filings, the Commission file numbers
for Enterprise Products Partners L.P., Enterprise GP Holdings L.P, TEPPCO Partners, L.P. and TE Products
Pipeline Company, LLC are 1-14323, 1-32610, 1-10403 and 1-13603, respectively.
*** Identifies management contract and compensatory plan arrangements.
# Filed with this report.
ITEM 16.  FORM 10-K SUMMARY.
Not included.
150
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
(A Delaware Limited Partnership)
  
By: Enterprise Products Holdings LLC, as General Partner
 
 
By: /s/ R. Daniel Boss
Name:R. Daniel Boss
Title:Senior Vice President – Accounting and Risk Control
   of the General Partner
 
 
By: /s/ Michael W. Hanson
Name:Michael W. Hanson
Title:Vice President and Principal Accounting Officer
   of the General PartnerTable of Contents
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this
report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized on March 1, 2019.
151
Table of Contents
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities indicated below on March 1, 2019.
Signature  Title (Position with Enterprise Products Holdings LLC)
/s/ Randa Duncan Williams  Director and Chairman of the Board
   Randa Duncan Williams   
/s/ Richard H. Bachmann  Director and Vice-Chairman of the Board
   Richard H. Bachmann   
/s/ A. James Teague  Director and Chief Executive Officer
   A. James Teague   
/s/ W. Randall Fowler  Director, President and Chief Financial Officer
   W. Randall Fowler   
/s/ Harry P. Weitzel  Director and Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary
   Harry P. Weitzel   
/s/ Carin M. Barth  Director
   Carin M. Barth   
/s/ Murray E. Brasseux  Director
   Murray E. Brasseux   
/s/ James T. Hackett  Director
   James T. Hackett   
/s/ Charles E. McMahen  Director
   Charles E. McMahen   
/s/ William C. Montgomery  Director
   William C. Montgomery   
/s/ John R. Rutherford  Director
   John R. Rutherford   
/s/ Richard S. Snell  Director
   Richard S. Snell   
/s/ R. Daniel Boss  Senior Vice President – Accounting and Risk Control
   R. Daniel Boss   
/s/ Michael W. Hanson  Vice President and Principal Accounting Officer
   Michael W. Hanson   
152
Table of Contents
Item 8.  Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
INDEX TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
  Page No.
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm F-2
   
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2018 and 2017 F-3
   
Statements of Consolidated Operations
for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016 F-4
   
Statements of Consolidated Comprehensive Income
for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016 F-5
   
Statements of Consolidated Cash Flows
for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016 F-6
   
Statements of Consolidated Equity
for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016 F-7
   
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements  
 Note 1   – Partnership Organization and Operations F-8
 Note 2   – Summary of Significant Accounting Policies F-9
 Note 3   – Inventories F-18
 Note 4   – Property, Plant and Equipment F-19
 Note 5   – Investments in Unconsolidated Affiliates F-21
 Note 6   – Intangible Assets and Goodwill F-24
 Note 7   – Debt Obligations F-28
 Note 8   – Equity and Distributions F-32
 Note 9   – Revenues F-37
 Note 10 – Business Segments and Related Information F-42
 Note 11 – Earnings Per Unit F-47
 Note 12 – Business Combinations F-47
 Note 13 – Equity-Based Awards F-49
 Note 14 – Derivative Instruments, Hedging Activities and Fair Value Measurements F-53
 Note 15 – Related Party Transactions F-62
 Note 16 – Provision for Income Taxes F-65
 Note 17 – Commitments and Contingencies F-66
 Note 18 – Significant Risks and Uncertainties F-71
 Note 19 – Supplemental Cash Flow Information F-73
 Note 20 – Quarterly Financial Information (Unaudited) F-74
 Note 21 – Condensed Consolidating Financial Information F-75
 Note 22 – Subsequent Events F-83
F-1
Table of Contents
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the Board of Directors of Enterprise Products Holdings LLC and
Unitholders of Enterprise Products Partners L.P.
Houston, Texas
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Enterprise Products Partners L.P. and subsidiaries (the
“Company”) as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, the related statements of consolidated operations, comprehensive income, cash
flows, and equity for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2018, and the related notes (collectively referred to
as the “financial statements”). In our opinion, the financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position
of the Company as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in
the period ended December 31, 2018, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
We have also audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
(“PCAOB”), the Company's internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2018, based on criteria established in
Internal Control — Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway
Commission and our report dated March 1, 2019, expressed an unqualified opinion on the Company's internal control over
financial reporting.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company’s management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the
Company's financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required
to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and
regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error
or fraud. Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements,
whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test
basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the
accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the
financial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
/s/ DELOITTE & TOUCHE LLP
Houston, Texas
March 1, 2019
We have served as the Company’s auditor since 1997.
F-2
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
(Dollars in millions)
  December  31,  
  2018   2017  
ASSETS       
Curr ent assets:       
Cash and cash equivalents  $ 344.8   $ 5.1 
Restricted cash   65.3   65.2 
Accounts receivable – trade, net of allowance for doubtful accounts
of $1 1.5 at December 31, 2018 and $12.1 at December 31, 2017   3,659.1    4,358.4  
Accounts receivable – related parties   3.5   1.8 
Inventories   1,522.1    1,609.8  
Derivative assets (see Note 14)   154.4    153.4  
Prepaid and other current assets   311.5   312.7  
Total current assets   6,060.7    6,506.4  
Property , plant and equipment, net   38,737.6    35,620.4  
Investments in unconsolidated affiliates   2,615.1    2,659.4  
Intangible assets, net of accumulated amortization of $1,735.1 at
December  31, 2018 and $1,564.8 at December  31, 2017 (see Note 6)   3,608.4    3,690.3  
Goodwill (see Note 6)   5,745.2    5,745.2  
Other  assets   202.8    196.4  
Total assets  $ 56,969.8   $ 54,418.1  
         
LIABILITIES AND EQUITY         
Curr ent liabilities:         
Current maturities of debt (see Note 7)  $ 1,500.1   $ 2,855.0  
Accounts payable – trade   1,102.8    801.7  
Accounts payable – related parties   140.2    127.3  
Accrued product payables   3,475.8    4,566.3  
Accrued interest   395.6    358.0  
Derivative liabilities (see Note 14)   148.2    168.2  
Other current liabilities   404.8    418.6  
Total current liabilities   7,167.5    9,295.1  
Long-term debt (see Note 7)   24,678.1    21,713.7  
Deferr ed tax liabilities   80.4   58.5 
Other  long-term liabilities   751.6    578.4  
Commitments and contingencies (see Note 17)         
Equity:  (see Note 8)         
Partners’  equity:         
Limited partners:         
Common units (2,184,869,029 units outstanding at December 31, 2018
and 2,161,089,479 units outstanding at December 31, 2017)   23,802.6    22,718.9  
Accumulated other comprehensive income (loss)   50.9   (171.7 )
Total  partners’  equity   23,853.5    22,547.2  
Noncontrolling interests   438.7    225.2  
Total equity   24,292.2    22,772.4  
Total liabilities and equity  $ 56,969.8   $ 54,418.1  
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
F-3
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
STATEMENTS OF CONSOLIDATED OPERATIONS
(Dollars in millions, except per unit amounts)
  For the Year Ended December  31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Revenues:          
Third parties  $ 36,426.5   $ 29,196.5   $ 22,965.6  
Related parties   107.7    45.0   56.7 
Total revenues (see Note 9)   36,534.2    29,241.5    23,022.3  
Costs and expenses:             
Operating costs and expenses:             
Third parties   29,991.2    24,444.7    18,539.5  
Related parties   1,406.1    1,112.8   1,104.0  
Total operating costs and expenses   31,397.3    25,557.5    19,643.5  
General and administrative costs:             
Third parties   77.4   59.6   47.0 
Related parties   130.9    121.5    113.1 
Total general and administrative costs   208.3    181.1    160.1  
Total costs and expenses (see Note 10)   31,605.6    25,738.6    19,803.6  
Equity in income of unconsolidated affiliates   480.0    426.0    362.0  
Operating income   5,408.6    3,928.9    3,580.7  
Other  income (expense):             
Interest expense   (1,096.7 )  (984.6 )  (982.6 )
Change in fair market value of Liquidity Option Agreement (see Note 17)   (56.1 )  (64.3 )  (24.5 )
Gain on step acquisition of unconsolidated af filiate (see Note 12)   39.4   --   -- 
Other , net   3.6   1.3   2.8 
Total other expense, net   (1,109.8 )  (1,047.6 )  (1,004.3 )
Income befor e income taxes   4,298.8    2,881.3    2,576.4  
Provision for income taxes (see Note 16)   (60.3 )  (25.7 )  (23.4 )
Net income   4,238.5    2,855.6    2,553.0  
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests (see Note 8)   (66.1 )  (56.3 )  (39.9 )
Net income attributable to limited partners  $ 4,172.4   $ 2,799.3   $ 2,513.1  
             
Earnings per  unit: (see Note 1 1)             
Basic earnings per unit  $ 1.91  $ 1.30  $ 1.20 
Diluted earnings per unit  $ 1.91  $ 1.30  $ 1.20 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
F-4
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
STATEMENTS OF CONSOLIDATED COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
(Dollars in millions)
  For the Year Ended December  31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Net income  $ 4,238.5   $ 2,855.6   $ 2,553.0  
Other  compr ehensive income (loss):             
Cash flow hedges:             
Commodity derivative instruments:             
Changes in fair value of cash flow hedges   293.2    (38.5 )  (193.8 )
Reclassification of losses (gains) to net income   (130.4 )  112.2   53.4 
Interest rate derivative instruments:             
Changes in fair value of cash flow hedges   22.2   (5.7)  42.3 
Reclassification of losses to net income   38.1   40.4   37.4 
Total cash flow hedges   223.1    108.4    (60.7 )
Other   (0.5)  (0.1)  (0.1)
Total other comprehensive income (loss)   222.6    108.3    (60.8 )
Compr ehensive income   4,461.1    2,963.9    2,492.2  
Comprehensive income attributable to noncontrolling interests   (66.1 )  (56.3 )  (39.9 )
Compr ehensive income attributable to limited partners  $ 4,395.0   $ 2,907.6   $ 2,452.3  
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
F-5
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
STATEMENTS OF CONSOLIDATED CASH FLOWS
(Dollars in millions)
  For the Year Ended December  31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Operating activities:          
Net income  $ 4,238.5   $ 2,855.6   $ 2,553.0  
Reconciliation of net income to net cash flows pr ovided by operating activities:             
Depreciation, amortization and accretion   1,791.6    1,644.0    1,552.0  
Asset impairment and related char ges   50.5   49.8   53.5 
Equity in income of unconsolidated af filiates   (480.0 )  (426.0 )  (362.0 )
Distributions received on earnings from unconsolidated af filiates   479.4    433.7    380.5  
Net gains attributable to asset sales (see Note 19)   (28.7 )  (10.7 )  (2.5)
Deferred income tax expense   21.4   6.1   6.6 
Change in fair market value of derivative instruments   17.8   22.8   45.0 
Change in fair market value of Liquidity Option Agreement   56.1   64.3   24.5 
Gain on step acquisition of unconsolidated af filiate   (39.4 )  --   -- 
Net ef fect of changes in operating accounts (see Note 19)   16.2   32.2   (180.9 )
Other operating activities   2.9   (5.5)  (2.9)
Net cash flows provided by operating activities   6,126.3    4,666.3    4,066.8  
Investing activities:             
Capital expenditures   (4,223.2 )  (3,101.8 )  (2,984.1 )
Cash used for business combinations, net of cash received (see Note 12)   (150.6 )  (198.7 )  (1,000.0 )
Investments in unconsolidated af filiates   (113.6)  (50.5 )  (138.8 )
Distributions received for return of capital from unconsolidated af filiates   50.0   49.3   71.0 
Proceeds from asset sales (see Note 19)   161.2    40.1   46.5 
Other investing activities   (5.4)  (24.5 )  (0.4)
Cash used in investing activities   (4,281.6 )  (3,286.1 )  (4,005.8 )
Financing activities:             
Borrowings under debt agreements   79,588.7    69,315.3    62,813.9  
Repayments of debt   (77,957.1 )  (68,459.6 )  (61,672.6 )
Debt issuance costs   (49.1 )  (24.1 )  (10.6 )
Monetization of interest rate derivative instruments (see Note 14)   22.1   30.6   6.1 
Cash distributions paid to limited partners (see Note 8)   (3,726.9 )  (3,569.9 )  (3,300.5 )
Cash payments made in connection with distribution equivalent rights   (17.7 )  (15.1 )  (11.7)
Cash distributions paid to noncontrolling interests (see Note 8)   (81.6 )  (49.2 )  (47.4 )
Cash contributions from noncontrolling interests (see Note 8)   238.1    0.4   20.4 
Net cash proceeds from the issuance of common units   538.4    1,073.4    2,542.8  
Common units acquired in connection with buyback program (see Note 8)   (30.8 )  --   -- 
Other financing activities   (29.0 )  (29.3 )  (18.7 )
Cash provided by (used in) financing activities   (1,504.9 )  (1,727.5 )  321.7  
Net change in cash and cash equivalents, including r estricted cash   339.8    (347.3 )  382.7  
Cash and cash equivalents, including r estricted cash, January 1   70.3   417.6    34.9 
Cash and cash equivalents, including r estricted cash, December  31  $ 410.1   $ 70.3  $ 417.6  
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
F-6
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
STATEMENTS OF CONSOLIDATED EQUITY
(See Note 8 for Unit History, Accumulated Other Comprehensive
Income (Loss) and Noncontrolling Interests)
(Dollars in millions)
  Partners’ Equity        
  Limited
Partners  Accumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss)  Noncontrolling
Interests  Total  
Balance, December 31, 2015  $ 20,514.3  $ (219.2) $ 206.0  $ 20,501.1 
Net income   2,513.1   --   39.9   2,553.0 
Cash distributions paid to limited partners   (3,300.5)  --   --   (3,300.5)
Cash payments made in connection with distribution equivalent rights   (11.7)  --   --   (11.7)
Cash distributions paid to noncontrolling interests   --   --   (47.4)  (47.4)
Cash contributions from noncontrolling interests   --   --   20.4   20.4 
Net cash proceeds from the issuance of common units   2,542.8   --   --   2,542.8 
Amortization of fair value of equity-based awards   90.2   --   --   90.2 
Cash flow hedges   --   (60.7)  --   (60.7)
Other   (21.2)  (0.1)  0.1   (21.2)
Balance, December 31, 2016   22,327.0   (280.0)  219.0   22,266.0 
Net income   2,799.3   --   56.3   2,855.6 
Cash distributions paid to limited partners   (3,569.9)  --   --   (3,569.9)
Cash payments made in connection with distribution equivalent rights   (15.1)  --   --   (15.1)
Cash distributions paid to noncontrolling interests   --   --   (49.2)  (49.2)
Cash contributions from noncontrolling interests   --   --   0.4   0.4 
Net cash proceeds from the issuance of common units   1,073.4   --   --   1,073.4 
Common units issued in connection with employee compensation   33.7   --   --   33.7 
Amortization of fair value of equity-based awards   99.0   --   --   99.0 
Cash flow hedges   --   108.4   --   108.4 
Other   (28.5)  (0.1)  (1.3)  (29.9)
Balance, December 31, 2017   22,718.9   (171.7)  225.2   22,772.4 
Net income   4,172.4   --   66.1   4,238.5 
Cash distributions paid to limited partners   (3,726.9)  --   --   (3,726.9)
Cash payments made in connection with distribution equivalent rights   (17.7)  --   --   (17.7)
Cash distributions paid to noncontrolling interests   --   --   (81.6)  (81.6)
Cash contributions from noncontrolling interests   --   --   238.1   238.1 
Net cash proceeds from the issuance of common units   538.4   --   --   538.4 
Common units issued in connection with employee compensation   39.1   --   --   39.1 
Common units issued in connection with land acquisition   30.0   --   --   30.0 
Common units acquired in connection with buyback program   (30.8)  --   --   (30.8)
Amortization of fair value of equity-based awards   104.7   --   --   104.7 
Cash flow hedges   --   223.1   --   223.1 
Other   (25.5)  (0.5)  (9.1)  (35.1)
Balance, December 31, 2018  $ 23,802.6  $ 50.9  $ 438.7  $ 24,292.2 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
F-7
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
With the exception of per unit amounts, or as noted within the context of each disclosure,
 the dollar amounts presented in the tabular data within these disclosures are
stated in millions of dollars.
KEY REFERENCES USED IN THESE
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Unless the context requires otherwise, references to “we,” “us,” “our,” “Enterprise” or “Enterprise Products Partners” are intended
to mean the business and operations of Enterprise Products Partners L.P. and its consolidated subsidiaries.  References to “EPO”
mean Enterprise Products Operating LLC, which is a wholly owned subsidiary of Enterprise, and its consolidated subsidiaries,
through which Enterprise Products Partners L.P. conducts its business.  Enterprise is managed by its general partner, Enterprise
Products Holdings LLC (“Enterprise GP”), which is a wholly owned subsidiary of Dan Duncan LLC, a privately held Texas limited
liability company.
The membership interests of Dan Duncan LLC are owned by a voting trust, the current trustees (“DD LLC Trustees”) of which are:
(i) Randa Duncan Williams, who is also a director and Chairman of the Board of Directors (the “Board”) of Enterprise GP; (ii)
Richard H. Bachmann, who is also a director and Vice Chairman of the Board of Enterprise GP; and (iii) Dr. Ralph S. Cunningham,
who is also an advisory director of Enterprise GP.  Ms. Duncan Williams and Mr. Bachmann also currently serve as managers of
Dan Duncan LLC along with W. Randall Fowler, who is also a director and the President and Chief Financial Officer of Enterprise
GP.
References to “EPCO” mean Enterprise Products Company, a privately held Texas corporation, and its privately held affiliates.  A
majority of the outstanding voting capital stock of EPCO is owned by a voting trust, the current trustees (“EPCO Trustees”) of
which are:  (i) Ms. Duncan Williams, who serves as Chairman of EPCO; (ii) Dr. Cunningham, who serves as Vice Chairman of
EPCO; and (iii) Mr. Bachmann, who serves as the President and Chief Executive Officer of EPCO.  Ms. Duncan Williams and Mr.
Bachmann also currently serve as directors of EPCO along with Mr. Fowler, who is also the Executive Vice President and Chief
Financial Officer of EPCO.  EPCO, together with its privately held affiliates, owned approximately 31.9% of our limited partner
interests at December 31, 2018.
Note 1.  Partnership Organization and Operations
We are a publicly traded Delaware limited partnership, the common units of which are listed on the New York Stock Exchange
(“NYSE”) under the ticker symbol “EPD.”  We were formed in April 1998 to own and operate certain natural gas liquids (“NGLs”)
related businesses of EPCO and are a leading North American provider of midstream energy services to producers and consumers
of natural gas, NGLs, crude oil, petrochemicals and refined products.
Our integrated midstream energy asset network links producers of natural gas, NGLs and crude oil from some of the largest supply
basins in the United States (“U.S.”), Canada and the Gulf of Mexico with domestic consumers and international markets.  Our
midstream energy operations currently include: natural gas gathering, treating, processing, transportation and storage; NGL
transportation, fractionation, storage, and export and import terminals (including those used to export liquefied petroleum gases, or
“LPG,” and ethane); crude oil gathering, transportation, storage, and export and import terminals; petrochemical and refined
products transportation, storage, export and import terminals, and related services; and a marine transportation business that
operates primarily on the U.S. inland and Intracoastal Waterway systems.  Our assets currently include approximately 49,200 miles
of pipelines; 260 million barrels (“MMBbls”) of storage capacity for NGLs, crude oil, petrochemicals and refined products; and 14
billion cubic feet (“Bcf”) of natural gas storage capacity.  All statistical data (e.g., pipeline mileage, processing capacity and similar
operating metrics) in these notes to consolidated financial statements are unaudited.
F-8
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
We conduct substantially all of our business through EPO and are owned 100% by our limited partners from an economic
perspective.  Enterprise GP manages our partnership and owns a non-economic general partner interest in us.  We, Enterprise GP,
EPCO and Dan Duncan LLC are affiliates under the collective common control of the DD LLC Trustees and the EPCO
Trustees.  Like many publicly traded partnerships, we have no employees.  All of our management, administrative and operating
functions are performed by employees of EPCO pursuant to an administrative services agreement (the “ASA”) or by other service
providers.  See Note 15 for information regarding related party matters.
Our operations are reported under four business segments: (i) NGL Pipelines & Services, (ii) Crude Oil Pipelines & Services, (iii)
Natural Gas Pipelines & Services and (iv) Petrochemical & Refined Products Services.  See Note 10 for additional information
regarding our business segments.
Note 2.  Summary of Significant Accounting Policies
Allowance for Doubtful Accounts
Our allowance for doubtful accounts is determined based on specific identification and estimates of future uncollectible accounts,
including those related to natural gas imbalances.  Our procedure for estimating the allowance for doubtful accounts is based on: (i)
historical experience with customers, (ii) the perceived financial stability of customers based on our research and (iii) the levels of
credit we grant to customers.  In addition, we may increase the allowance for doubtful accounts in response to the specific
identification of customers involved in bankruptcy proceedings and similar financial difficulties.  On a routine basis, we review
estimates associated with the allowance for doubtful accounts to ensure that we have recorded sufficient reserves to cover potential
losses. The following table presents our allowance for doubtful accounts activity for the years indicated:
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Balance at beginning of period  $ 12.1  $ 11.3  $ 12.1 
Charged to costs and expenses   0.7   2.7   2.3 
Deductions   (1.3)  (1.9)  (3.1)
Balance at end of period  $ 11.5  $ 12.1  $ 11.3 
 
See “Credit Risk” in Note 18 for additional information.
Cash, Cash Equivalents and Restricted Cash
Cash and cash equivalents represent unrestricted cash on hand and highly liquid investments with original maturities of less than
three months from the date of purchase. Restricted cash represents amounts held in segregated bank accounts by our clearing
brokers as margin in support of our commodity derivative instruments portfolio and related physical purchases and sales of natural
gas, NGLs, crude oil and refined products.  Additional cash may be restricted to maintain our commodity derivative instruments
portfolio as prices fluctuate or margin requirements change.  The following table provides a reconciliation of cash and cash
equivalents, and restricted cash reported within the Consolidated Balance Sheets that sum to the total of the amounts shown in the
Statements of Consolidated Cash Flows.
  December 31,  
  2018   2017  
Cash and cash equivalents  $ 344.8  $ 5.1 
Restricted cash   65.3   65.2 
Total cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash shown in the
   Statements of Consolidated Cash Flows  $ 410.1  $ 70.3 
The balance of restricted cash at December 31, 2018 consisted of initial margin requirements of $69.6 million partially offset by
positive variation margin of $4.3 million. The initial margin requirements will be returned to us as the related derivative
instruments are settled.  See Note 14 for information regarding our derivative instruments and hedging activities.
F-9
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Consolidation Policy
Our consolidated financial statements include our accounts and those of our majority-owned subsidiaries in which we have a
controlling interest, after the elimination of all intercompany accounts and transactions.  We also consolidate other entities and
ventures in which we possess a controlling financial interest as well as partnership interests where we are the sole general partner of
the partnership.  We evaluate our financial interests in business enterprises to determine if they represent variable interest entities
where we are the primary beneficiary.  If such criteria are met, we consolidate the financial statements of such businesses with
those of our own.  Third party or affiliate ownership interests in our controlled subsidiaries are presented as noncontrolling
interests.  See Note 8 for information regarding noncontrolling interests.
If the entity is organized as a limited partnership or limited liability company and maintains separate ownership accounts, we
account for our investment using the equity method if our ownership interest is between 3% and 50%, unless our interest is so
minor that we have virtually no influence over the investee’s operating and financial policies.  For all other types of investments,
we apply the equity method of accounting if our ownership interest is between 20% and 50% and we exercise significant influence
over the investee’s operating and financial policies.  In consolidation, we eliminate our proportionate share of profits and losses
from transactions with equity method unconsolidated affiliates to the extent such amounts remain on our Consolidated Balance
Sheets (or those of our equity method investments) in inventory or similar accounts.
Contingencies
Certain conditions may exist as of the date our consolidated financial statements are issued, which may result in a loss to us but
which will only be resolved when one or more future events occur or fail to occur.  Management has regular quarterly litigation
reviews, including updates from legal counsel, to assess the need for accounting recognition or disclosure of these contingencies,
and such assessment inherently involves an exercise in judgment.  In assessing loss contingencies related to legal proceedings that
are pending against us or unasserted claims that may result in such proceedings, our management and legal counsel evaluate the
perceived merits of any legal proceedings or unasserted claims as well as the perceived merits of the amount of relief sought or
expected to be sought therein.
We accrue an undiscounted liability for those contingencies where the incurrence of a loss is probable and the amount can be
reasonably estimated.  If a range of amounts can be reasonably estimated and no amount within the range is a better estimate than
any other amount, then the minimum of the range is accrued.  We do not record a contingent liability when the likelihood of loss is
probable but the amount cannot be reasonably estimated or when the likelihood of loss is believed to be only reasonably possible or
remote.  For contingencies where an unfavorable outcome is reasonably possible and the impact would be material to our
consolidated financial statements, we disclose the nature of the contingency and, where feasible, an estimate of the possible loss or
range of loss.
Loss contingencies considered remote are generally not disclosed unless they involve guarantees, in which case the guarantees
would be disclosed.  See Note 17 for additional information regarding our contingencies.
Current Assets and Current Liabilities
We present, as individual captions in our Consolidated Balance Sheets, all components of current assets and current liabilities that
exceed 5% of total current assets and current liabilities, respectively.
F-10
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Derivative Instruments
We use derivative instruments such as futures, swaps, forward contracts and other arrangements to manage price risks associated
with inventories, firm commitments, interest rates and certain anticipated future commodity transactions.  To qualify for hedge
accounting, the hedged item must expose us to risk and the related derivative instrument must reduce the exposure to that risk and
meet specific hedge documentation requirements related to designation dates, expectations for hedge effectiveness and the
probability that hedged future transactions will occur as forecasted.  We formally designate derivative instruments as hedges and
document and assess their effectiveness at inception of the hedge and on a monthly basis thereafter.  Forecasted transactions are
evaluated for the probability of occurrence and are periodically back-tested once the forecasted period has passed to determine
whether similarly forecasted transactions are probable of occurring in the future.
We are required to recognize derivative instruments at fair value as either assets or liabilities on our Consolidated Balance Sheets
unless such instruments meet certain normal purchase/normal sale criteria.  While all derivatives are required to be reported at fair
value on the balance sheet, changes in fair value of derivative instruments are reported in different ways, depending on the nature
and effectiveness of the hedging activities to which they relate.  After meeting specified conditions, a qualified derivative may be
designated as a total or partial hedge of:
§Changes in the fair value of a recognized asset or liability, or an unrecognized firm commitment – In a fair value hedge, gains
and losses for both the derivative instrument and the hedged item are recognized in income during the period of change.
§Variable cash flows of a forecasted transaction – In a cash flow hedge, the change in the fair value of the hedge is reported in
other comprehensive income (loss) and is reclassified to earnings when the forecasted transaction affects earnings.
An effective hedge relationship is one in which the change in fair value of a derivative instrument can be expected to offset 80% to
125% of the changes in fair value of a hedged item at inception and throughout the life of the hedging relationship.  The effective
portion of a hedge relationship is the amount by which the derivative instrument exactly offsets the change in fair value of the
hedged item during the reporting period.  Conversely, ineffectiveness represents the change in the fair value of the derivative
instrument that does not exactly offset the change in the fair value of the hedged item.  Any ineffectiveness associated with a fair
value hedge is recognized in earnings immediately.  Ineffectiveness can be caused by, among other things, changes in the timing of
forecasted transactions or a mismatch of terms between the derivative instrument and the hedged item.
A contract designated as a cash flow hedge of an anticipated transaction that is not probable of occurring is immediately recognized
in earnings.
Certain of our derivative instruments do not qualify for hedge accounting treatment; therefore, these instruments are accounted for
using mark-to-market accounting.
For certain physical forward commodity derivative contracts, we apply the normal purchase/normal sale exception, whereby
changes in the mark-to-market values of such contracts are not recognized in income.  As a result, the revenues and expenses
associated with such physical transactions are recognized during the period when volumes are physically delivered or
received.  Physical forward commodity contracts subject to this exception are evaluated for the probability of future delivery and
are periodically back-tested once the forecasted period has passed to determine whether similar forward contracts are probable of
physical delivery in the future.  See Note 14 for additional information regarding our derivative instruments.
F-11
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Environmental Costs
Environmental costs for remediation are accrued based on estimates of known remediation requirements.  Such accruals are based
on management’s best estimate of the ultimate cost to remediate a site and are adjusted as further information and circumstances
develop.  Those estimates may change substantially depending on information about the nature and extent of contamination,
appropriate remediation technologies and regulatory approvals.  Expenditures to mitigate or prevent future environmental
contamination are capitalized.  Ongoing environmental compliance costs are charged to expense as incurred.  In accruing for
environmental remediation liabilities, costs of future expenditures for environmental remediation are not discounted to their present
value, unless the amount and timing of the expenditures are fixed or reliably determinable.  At December 31, 2018, none of our
estimated environmental remediation liabilities were discounted to present value since the ultimate amount and timing of cash
payments for such liabilities were not readily determinable.
The following table presents the activity of our environmental reserves for the years indicated:
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Balance at beginning of period  $ 11.6  $ 11.9  $ 13.0 
Charged to costs and expenses   8.2   12.1   7.0 
Acquisition-related additions and other   1.7   1.7   0.5 
Deductions   (14.6)  (14.1)  (8.6)
Balance at end of period  $ 6.9  $ 11.6  $ 11.9 
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, $3.2 million and $5.6 million, respectively, of our environmental reserves were classified as
current liabilities.
Estimates
Preparing our consolidated financial statements in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (“GAAP”)
requires us to make estimates that affect amounts presented in the financial statements.  Our most significant estimates relate to (i)
the useful lives and depreciation/amortization methods used for fixed and identifiable intangible assets; (ii) measurement of fair
value and projections used in impairment testing of fixed and intangible assets (including goodwill); (iii) contingencies; and (iv)
revenue and expense accruals.
Actual results could differ materially from our estimates.  On an ongoing basis, we review our estimates based on currently
available information.  Any changes in the facts and circumstances underlying our estimates may require us to update such
estimates, which could have a material impact on our consolidated financial statements.
Fair Value Measurements
Our fair value estimates are based on either (i) actual market data or (ii) assumptions that other market participants would use in
pricing an asset or liability, including estimates of risk, in the principal market of the asset or liability at a specified measurement
date.  Recognized valuation techniques employ inputs such as contractual prices, quoted market prices or rates, operating costs,
discount factors and business growth rates.  These inputs may be either readily observable, corroborated by market data or
generally unobservable.  In developing our estimates of fair value, we endeavor to utilize the best information available and apply
market-based data to the highest extent possible.  Accordingly, we utilize valuation techniques (such as the market approach) that
maximize the use of observable inputs and minimize the use of unobservable inputs.
A three-tier hierarchy has been established that classifies fair value amounts recognized in the financial statements based on the
observability of inputs used to estimate such fair values.  The hierarchy considers fair value amounts based on observable inputs
(Levels 1 and 2) to be more reliable and predictable than those based primarily on unobservable inputs (Level 3).  At each balance
sheet reporting date, we categorize our financial assets and liabilities using this hierarchy.
F-12
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The characteristics of fair value amounts classified within each level of the hierarchy are described as follows:
§Level 1 fair values are based on quoted prices, which are available in active markets for identical assets or liabilities as of the
measurement date.  Active markets are defined as those in which transactions for identical assets or liabilities occur with
sufficient frequency so as to provide pricing information on an ongoing basis (e.g., the New York Mercantile Exchange
(“NYMEX”)).  Our Level 1 fair values consist of financial assets and liabilities such as exchange-traded commodity derivative
instruments.
§Level 2 fair values are based on pricing inputs other than quoted prices in active markets (as reflected in Level 1 fair values)
and are either directly or indirectly observable as of the measurement date.  Level 2 fair values include instruments that are
valued using financial models or other appropriate valuation methodologies.  Such financial models are primarily industry-
standard models that consider various assumptions, including quoted forward prices for commodities, the time value of money,
volatility factors, current market and contractual prices for the underlying instruments and other relevant economic
measures.  Substantially all of these assumptions (i) are observable in the marketplace throughout the full term of the
instrument; (ii) can be derived from observable data; or (iii) are validated by inputs other than quoted prices (e.g., interest rate
and yield curves at commonly quoted intervals).  Our Level 2 fair values primarily consist of commodity derivative
instruments such as forwards, swaps and other instruments transacted on an exchange or over-the-counter and interest rate
derivative instruments.  The fair values of these derivative instruments are based on observable price quotes for similar
products and locations.  The fair value of our interest rate derivatives are determined using financial models that incorporate
the implied forward LIBOR yield curve for the same period as the future interest rate swap settlements.
§Level 3 fair values are based on unobservable inputs.  Unobservable inputs are used to measure fair value to the extent that
observable inputs are not available, thereby allowing for situations in which there is little, if any, market activity for the asset
or liability at the measurement date.  Unobservable inputs reflect management’s ideas about the assumptions that market
participants would use in pricing an asset or liability (including assumptions about risk).  Unobservable inputs are based on the
best information available to us in the circumstances, which might include our internally developed data.  Level 3 inputs are
typically used in connection with internally developed valuation methodologies where we make our best estimate of an
instrument’s fair value.  With regards to commodity derivatives, our Level 3 fair values primarily consist of the following
commodity derivative instruments which are used to hedge our various inventories and transportation capacities: (i) NGL-
based contracts with terms greater than one year; (ii) crude, natural gas and refined products-based contracts with terms greater
than 36 months; (iii) over-the-counter options; and (iv) exchange traded options with terms greater than one year.  In addition,
we often rely on price quotes from reputable brokers who publish price quotes on certain products and compare these prices to
other reputable brokers for the same products in the same markets whenever possible.  These prices, when combined with data
from our commodity derivative instruments, are used in our models to determine the fair value of such instruments.
Transfers within the fair value hierarchy routinely occur for certain term contracts as prices and other inputs used for the valuation
of future delivery periods become more observable with the passage of time.  Other transfers are made periodically in response to
changing market conditions that affect liquidity, price observability and other inputs used in determining valuations.  We deem any
such transfers to have occurred at the end of the quarter in which they transpired.  There were no transfers between Level 1 and 2
during the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017.
We have a risk management policy that covers our Level 3 commodity derivatives.  Governance and oversight of risk management
activities for these commodities are provided by our Chief Executive Officer with guidance and support from a risk management
committee (“RMC”) that meets quarterly (or on a more frequent basis, if needed).  Members of executive management attend the
RMC meetings, which are chaired by the head of our commodities risk control group.  This group is responsible for preparing and
distributing daily reports and risk analysis to members of the RMC and other appropriate members of management.  These reports
include mark-to-market valuations with the one-day and month-to-date changes in fair values.  This group also develops and
validates the forward commodity price curves used to estimate the fair values of our Level 3 commodity derivatives.  These
forward curves incorporate published indexes, market quotes and other observable inputs to the extent available.
F-13
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Impairment Testing for Goodwill
Our goodwill amounts are assessed for impairment on a routine annual basis or when impairment indicators are present.  If such
indicators occur (e.g., the loss of a significant customer or technological obsolescence of assets), the estimated fair value of the
reporting unit to which the goodwill is assigned is determined and compared to its carrying value.  If the fair value of the reporting
unit is less than its carrying value including associated goodwill amounts, a non-cash impairment charge to earnings is recorded to
reduce the carrying value of the goodwill to its implied fair value.  
Our reporting unit estimated fair values are based on assumptions regarding the future economic prospects of the businesses that
comprise each reporting unit.  Such assumptions include: (i) discrete financial forecasts for the assets classified within the reporting
unit, which, in turn, rely on management’s estimates of operating margins, throughput volumes and similar factors; (ii) long-term
growth rates for cash flows beyond the discrete forecast period; and (iii) appropriate discount rates.  We believe the assumptions we
use in estimating reporting unit fair values are consistent with those that would be employed by market participants in their fair
value estimation process.  Based on our most recent goodwill impairment test at December 31, 2018, each reporting unit’s fair
value was substantially in excess of its carrying value (i.e., by at least 10%).
See Note 6 for additional information regarding goodwill.
Impairment Testing for Long-Lived Assets
Long-lived assets (including intangible assets with finite useful lives and property, plant and equipment) are reviewed for
impairment when events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of such assets may not be
recoverable.  Long-lived assets with carrying values that are not expected to be recovered through future cash flows are written-
down to their estimated fair values.  The carrying value of a long-lived asset is deemed not recoverable if it exceeds the sum of
undiscounted cash flows expected to result from the use and eventual disposition of the asset.  If the asset’s carrying value exceeds
the sum of its undiscounted cash flows, a non-cash asset impairment charge equal to the excess of the asset’s carrying value over its
estimated fair value is recorded.  Fair value is defined as the price that would be received to sell an asset or be paid to transfer a
liability in an orderly transaction between market participants at a specified measurement date.  We measure fair value using market
price indicators or, in the absence of such data, appropriate valuation techniques.  See Note 14 for information regarding non-cash
impairment charges related to long-lived assets.
Impairment Testing for Unconsolidated Affiliates
We evaluate our equity method investments for impairment to determine whether there are events or changes in circumstances that
indicate there is a loss in value of the investment attributable to an other than temporary decline.  Examples of such events or
changes in circumstances include continuing operating losses of the entity and/or long-term negative changes in the entity’s
industry.  In the event we determine that the loss in value of an investment is an other than temporary decline, we record a non-cash
impairment charge to equity earnings to adjust the carrying value of the investment to its estimated fair value.  There were not any
non-cash impairment charges related to our equity method investments during the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and
2016.  See Note 5 for information regarding our equity method investments.
Inventories
Inventories primarily consist of NGLs, petrochemicals, refined products, crude oil and natural gas volumes that are valued at the
lower of cost or net realizable value.  We capitalize, as a cost of inventory, shipping and handling charges (e.g., pipeline
transportation and storage fees) and other related costs associated with purchased volumes.  As volumes are sold and delivered out
of inventory, the cost of these volumes (including freight-in charges that have been capitalized as part of inventory cost) are
charged to operating costs and expenses.  Shipping and handling fees associated with products we sell and deliver to customers are
charged to operating costs and expenses as incurred.  See Note 3 for additional information regarding our inventories.
F-14
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Property, Plant and Equipment
Property, plant and equipment is recorded at cost.  Expenditures for additions, improvements and other enhancements to property,
plant and equipment are capitalized, and minor replacements, maintenance, and repairs that do not extend asset life or add value are
charged to expense as incurred.  When property, plant and equipment assets are retired or otherwise disposed of, the related cost
and accumulated depreciation is removed from the accounts and any resulting gain or loss is included in results of operations for
the respective period.
We capitalize interest costs incurred on funds used to construct property, plant and equipment while the asset is in its construction
phase.  The capitalized interest is recorded as part of the asset to which it relates and is amortized over the asset’s estimated useful
life as a component of depreciation expense.  When capitalized interest is recorded, it reduces interest expense from what it would
be otherwise.
In general, depreciation is the systematic and rational allocation of an asset’s cost, less its residual value (if any), to the periods it
benefits.  The majority of our property, plant and equipment is depreciated using the straight-line method, which results in
depreciation expense being incurred evenly over the life of an asset.  Our estimate of depreciation expense incorporates
management assumptions regarding the useful economic lives and residual values of our assets.  With respect to midstream energy
assets such as natural gas gathering systems that are reliant upon a specific natural resource basin for throughput volumes, the
anticipated useful economic life of such assets may be limited by the estimated life of the associated natural resource basin from
which the assets derive benefit.  Our forecast of the remaining life for the applicable resource basins is based on several factors,
including information published by the U.S. Energy Information Administration.  Where appropriate, we use other depreciation
methods (generally accelerated) for tax purposes.
Leasehold improvements are recorded as a component of property, plant and equipment.  The cost of leasehold improvements is
charged to earnings using the straight-line method over the shorter of (i) the remaining lease term or (ii) the estimated useful lives
of the improvements.  We consider renewal terms that are deemed reasonably assured when estimating remaining lease terms.
Our assumptions regarding the useful economic lives and residual values of our assets may change in response to new facts and
circumstances, which would prospectively impact our depreciation expense amounts.  Examples of such circumstances include, but
are not limited to: (i) changes in laws and regulations that limit the estimated economic life of an asset; (ii) changes in technology
that render an asset obsolete; (iii) changes in expected salvage values or (iv) significant changes in the forecast life of the applicable
resource basins, if any.  
Certain of our plant operations entail periodic planned outages for major maintenance activities.  These planned shutdowns
typically result in significant expenditures, which are principally comprised of amounts paid to third parties for materials, contract
services and related items.  We use the expense-as-incurred method for our planned major maintenance activities for plant
operations; however, the cost of annual planned major maintenance projects for such plants are deferred and recognized on a
straight-line basis over the remaining portion of the fiscal year in which the maintenance occurred.  With regard to the planned
major maintenance activities on our marine transportation assets and underground storage caverns, we use the deferral method to
account for such costs.  Under this method, major maintenance costs are capitalized and amortized over the period until the next
major overhaul or cavern integrity project.
Asset retirement obligations (“AROs”) are legal obligations associated with the retirement of tangible long-lived assets that result
from their acquisition, construction, development and/or normal operation.  When an ARO is incurred, we record a liability for the
ARO and capitalize an equal amount as an increase in the carrying value of the related long-lived asset.  ARO amounts are
measured at their estimated fair value using expected present value techniques.  Over time, the ARO liability is accreted to its
present value (through accretion expense) and the capitalized amount is depreciated over the remaining useful life of the related
long-lived asset.  We will incur a gain or loss to the extent that our ARO liabilities are not settled at their recorded amounts.
See Note 4 for additional information regarding our property, plant and equipment and AROs.
F-15
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Recent Accounting Developments
Adoption of New Revenue Recognition Policies on January 1, 2018
For periods through December 31, 2017, we accounted for our revenue streams using Financial Accounting Standards Board
(“FASB”) Accounting Standards Codification (“ASC”) 605, Revenue Recognition.  Under ASC 605, we recognized revenue when
all of the following criteria were met: (i) persuasive evidence of an exchange arrangement existed between us and the counterparty
(e.g., published tariffs), (ii) delivery of products or the rendering of services had occurred, (iii) the price of the products or the fee
for services was fixed or determinable and (iv) collectibility of the amount owed by the counterparty was reasonably assured.
We adopted ASC 606, Revenue from Contracts with Customers, on January 1, 2018 using a modified retrospective approach that
applied the new revenue recognition standard to existing contracts at the implementation date and any future revenue contracts.   As
such, our consolidated revenues and related financial information for periods prior to January 1, 2018 were not adjusted and
continue to be reported in accordance with ASC 605.  We did not record a cumulative effect adjustment upon initially applying
ASC 606 since there was no impact on partners’ equity upon adoption; however, the extent of our revenue-related disclosures has
increased under the new standard.
Due to the large number of individual contracts that were in effect at the implementation date of ASC 606, we evaluated our
contracts using a portfolio approach based on the types of products sold or services rendered within our business segments.  There
are no material differences in the amount or timing of revenues recognized under ASC 606 when compared to ASC 605.
The core principle of ASC 606 is that a company should recognize revenue in a manner that fairly depicts the transfer of goods or
services to customers in amounts that reflect the consideration the company expects to receive for those goods or services.  We
apply this core principle by following five key steps outlined in ASC 606: (i) identify the contract; (ii) identify the performance
obligations in the contract; (iii) determine the transaction price; (iv) allocate the transaction price to the performance obligations in
the contract; and (v) recognize revenue when (or as) the performance obligation is satisfied. Each of these steps involves
management judgment and an analysis of the contract’s material terms and conditions.
Substantially all of our revenues are accounted for under ASC 606; however, to a limited extent, some revenues are accounted for
under other guidance such as ASC 840, Leases, ASC 845, Nonmonetary Transactions, or ASC 815, Derivatives and Hedging
Activities.
Under ASC 606, we recognize revenue when or as we satisfy our performance obligation to the customer.  In situations where we
have recognized revenue, but have a conditional right to consideration (based on something other than the passage of time) from
the customer, we recognize unbilled revenue (a contract asset) on our consolidated balance sheet.  Unbilled revenue is reclassified
to accounts receivable when we have an unconditional right of payment from the customer. Payments received from customers in
advance of the period in which we satisfy a performance obligation are recorded as deferred revenue (a contract liability) on our
consolidated balance sheet.
Our revenue streams are derived from the sale of products and providing midstream services.  Revenues from the sale of products
are recognized at a point in time, which represents the transfer of control (and the satisfaction of our performance obligation under
the contract) to the customer.  From that point forward, the customer is able to direct the use of, and obtain substantially all the
benefits from, its use of the products.  With respect to midstream services (e.g., interruptible transportation), we satisfy our
performance obligations over time and recognize revenues when the services are provided and the customer receives the benefits
based on an output measure of volumes redelivered.  We believe this measure is a faithful depiction of the transfer of control for
midstream services since there is (i) an insignificant period of time between the receipt of customers’ volumes and their subsequent
redelivery, and (ii) it is not possible to individually track and differentiate customers’ inventories as they traverse our facilities.  For
stand-ready performance obligations (e.g., a storage capacity reservation contract), we recognize revenues over time on a straight-
line basis as time elapses over the term of the contract. We believe that these approaches accurately depict the transfer of benefits to
the customer.
F-16
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Customers are invoiced for products purchased or services rendered when we have an unconditional right to consideration under
the associated contract. The consideration we are entitled to invoice may be either fixed, variable or a combination of both. 
Examples of fixed consideration would be fixed payments from customers under take-or-pay arrangements, storage capacity
reservation agreements and firm transportation contracts. Variable consideration represents payments from customers that are based
on factors that fluctuate (or vary) based on volumes, prices or both. Examples of variable consideration include interruptible
transportation agreements, market-indexed product sales contracts and the value of NGLs we retain under natural gas processing
agreements.  The terms of our billings are typical of the industry for the products we sell.
Under certain midstream service agreements, customers are required to provide a minimum volume over an agreed-upon period
with a provision that allows the customer to make-up any volume shortfalls over an agreed-upon period (referred to as “make-up
rights”).  Revenue pursuant to such agreements is initially deferred and subsequently recognized when either the make-up rights are
exercised, the likelihood of the customer exercising the rights becomes remote, or we are otherwise released from the performance
obligation.
Customers may contribute funds to us to help offset the construction costs related to pipeline construction activities and production
well tie-ins.   Under ASC 605, these amounts were accounted for as contributions in aid of construction costs (“CIACs”) and netted
against property, plant and equipment.   Under ASC 606, these receipts are recognized as additional service revenues over the term
of the associated midstream services provided to the customer.
As a practical expedient, for those contracts under which we have the ability to invoice the customer in an amount that corresponds
directly with the value of the performance obligation completed to date, we recognize revenue as we have the right to invoice.
See Note 9 regarding our new revenue disclosures.
Lease accounting standard
In February 2016, the FASB issued ASC 842, Leases, which requires substantially all leases to be recorded on the balance sheet.
We adopted the new standard on January 1, 2019 and applied it to (i) all new leases entered into after January 1, 2019 and (ii) all
existing lease contracts as of January 1, 2019.  ASC 842 supersedes existing lease accounting guidance found under ASC 840.
The new standard introduces two lessee accounting models, which result in a lease being classified as either a “finance” or
“operating” lease on the basis of whether the lessee effectively obtains control of the underlying asset during the lease term.  A
lease would be classified as a finance lease if it meets one of five classification criteria, four of which are generally consistent with
ASC 840 lease accounting guidance.  By default, a lease that does not meet the criteria to be classified as a finance lease will be
deemed an operating lease.  Regardless of classification, the initial measurement of both lease types will result in the balance sheet
recognition of a right-of-use (“ROU”) asset (representing a company’s right to use the underlying asset for a specified period of
time) and a corresponding lease liability.  The lease liability will be recognized at the present value of the future lease payments,
and the ROU asset will equal the lease liability adjusted for any prepaid rent, lease incentives provided by the lessor, and any
indirect costs.
The subsequent measurement of each type of lease varies. For finance leases, a lessee will amortize the ROU asset (generally on a
straight-line basis in a manner similar to depreciation) and accrete lease liability (as a component of interest expense).  Operating
leases will result in the recognition of a single lease expense amount that is recorded on a straight-line basis (or another systematic
basis, as appropriate).
ASC 842 will result in changes to the way our operating leases are recorded, presented and disclosed in our consolidated financial
statements. Upon adoption of ASC 842 on January 1, 2019, we recognized a ROU asset and a corresponding lease liability based on
the present value of then existing operating lease obligations. In addition, there are several key accounting policy elections that we
made upon adoption of ASC 842 including:
§We will not recognize ROU assets and lease liabilities for short-term leases and instead record them in a manner similar to
operating leases under legacy lease accounting guidelines.  A short term lease is one with a maximum lease term of 12 months
or less and does not include a purchase option the lessee is reasonably certain to exercise.
F-17
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
§We will not reassess whether any expired or existing contracts are or contain leases or the lease classification for any existing
or expired leases.
§The impact of adopting ASC 842 will be prospective beginning January 1, 2019.  We will not recast prior periods presented in
our consolidated financial statements to reflect the new lease accounting guidance.
Based on current information, we expect to recognize at adoption of ASC 842 an estimated $250 million in ROU assets and $250
million in lease liabilities on our consolidated balance sheet at January 1, 2019 based on discounted amounts.  These amounts
would represent less than 1% of our total consolidated assets and liabilities, respectively.
Fair value measurements
In August 2018, the FASB issued ASU 2018-13, Fair Value Measurements (Topic 820): Disclosure Framework – Changes to the
Disclosure Requirements for Fair Value Measurement, which amends certain disclosure requirements related to fair value
measurements.   The amendments will require incremental disclosures regarding uncertainties surrounding fair value
measurements, including discussions of any interrelationships between significant unobservable inputs used to estimate Level 3 fair
value measurements, and changes in unrealized gains and losses.  The amendments in this ASU are effective January 1, 2020,
which is when we expect to apply the new requirements.  We are currently reviewing the effect of this ASU on our consolidated
financial statements.
Credit losses
In June 2016, the FASB issued ASU 2016-13, “Financial Instruments – Credit Losses (Topic 326): Measurement of Credit Losses
on Financial Instruments.”  This ASU modifies the impairment model to utilize an expected loss methodology in place of the
currently used incurred loss methodology.   These changes are expected to result in the more timely recognition of losses.  The
amendments in this ASU are effective January 1, 2020, which is when we expect to apply the new requirements to how the
allowance for doubtful accounts is determined.  We are currently reviewing the effect of this ASU on our consolidated financial
statements.
Note 3.  Inventories
Our inventory amounts by product type were as follows at the dates indicated:
  December 31,  
  2018   2017  
NGLs  $ 647.7  $ 917.4 
Petrochemicals and refined products   264.7   161.5 
Crude oil   593.4   516.3 
Natural gas   16.3   14.6 
Total  $ 1,522.1  $ 1,609.8 
In those instances where we take ownership of inventory volumes through percent-of-liquids contracts and similar arrangements (as
opposed to outright purchases from third parties for cash), these volumes are valued at market-based prices during the month in
which they are acquired.
The following table presents our total cost of sales amounts and lower of cost or net realizable value adjustments for the years
indicated:
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Cost of sales (1)  $ 26,789.8  $ 21,487.0  $ 15,710.9 
Lower of cost or net realizable value adjustments within cost of sales   11.5   9.1   11.5 
             
(1)   Cost of sales is a component of “Operating costs and expenses,” as presented on our Statements of Consolidated Operations. Fluctuations in these amounts
are primarily due to changes in energy commodity prices and sales volumes associated with our marketing activities.  
F-18
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Due to fluctuating commodity prices, we recognize lower of cost or net realizable value adjustments when the carrying value of our
available-for-sale inventories exceeds their net realizable value.  These non-cash charges are a component of cost of sales in the
period they are recognized.  To the extent our commodity hedging strategies address inventory-related price risks and are
successful, these inventory valuation adjustments are mitigated or offset.  See Note 14 for a description of our commodity hedging
activities.
Note 4.  Property, Plant and Equipment
The historical costs of our property, plant and equipment and related accumulated depreciation balances were as follows at the dates
indicated:
  Estimated
Useful Life  December 31,  
  in Years  2018   2017  
Plants, pipelines and facilities (1)  3-45 (5)  $ 42,371.0  $ 37,132.2 
Underground and other storage facilities (2)  5-40 (6)   3,624.2   3,460.9 
Transportation equipment (3)  3-10    187.1   177.1 
Marine vessels (4)  15-30    828.6   803.8 
Land       359.5   273.1 
Construction in progress       3,526.8   4,698.1 
Total       50,897.2   46,545.2 
Less accumulated depreciation       12,159.6   10,924.8 
Property, plant and equipment, net      $ 38,737.6  $ 35,620.4 
             
(1)   Plants, pipelines and facilities include processing plants; NGL, natural gas, crude oil and petrochemical and refined products pipelines; terminal loading and
unloading facilities; buildings; office furniture and equipment; laboratory and shop equipment and related assets. We placed a number of growth projects into
service since December 31, 2017 including a propane dehydrogenation facility at our Mont Belvieu complex, the first two processing trains at our Orla
natural gas processing facility, and a ninth NGL fractionator in Chambers County, Texas at our Mont Belvieu NGL fractionation complex.
(2)   Underground and other storage facilities include underground product storage caverns; above ground storage tanks; water wells and related assets.
(3)   Transportation equipment includes tractor-trailer tank trucks and other vehicles and similar assets used in our operations.
(4)   Marine vessels include tow boats, barges and related equipment used in our marine transportation business.
(5)   In general, the estimated useful lives of major assets within this category are: processing plants, 20-35 years; pipelines and related equipment, 5-45 years;
terminal facilities, 10-35 years; buildings, 20-40 years; office furniture and equipment, 3-20 years; and laboratory and shop equipment, 5-35 years.
(6)   In general, the estimated useful lives of assets within this category are: underground storage facilities, 5-35 years; storage tanks, 10-40 years; and water wells,
5-35 years.  
In March 2018, we acquired the remaining 50% member interest of our Delaware Processing joint venture, which resulted in the
consolidation of $200 million of property, plant and equipment.  See Note 12 for information regarding this recent acquisition.
In April 2018, we acquired land in the Houston, Texas area for $85.2 million.  The consideration paid consisted of $55.2 million in
cash with the balance funded by the issuance of 1,223,242 Enterprise common units.
In October 2018, we sold our Red River System and associated crude oil linefill for $134.9 million and recorded a gain of $20.6
million. The Red River System gathers and transports crude oil from North Texas and southern Oklahoma for delivery to local
refineries and pipeline interconnects for further transportation to the Cushing hub and Gulf Coast.
F-19
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The following table summarizes our depreciation expense and capitalized interest amounts for the years indicated:
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Depreciation expense (1)  $ 1,436.2  $ 1,296.1  $ 1,215.7 
Capitalized interest (2)   147.9   192.1   168.2 
(1) Depreciation expense is a component of “Costs and expenses” as presented on our Statements of Consolidated Operations.
(2) Capitalized interest is a component of “Interest expense” as presented on our Statements of Consolidated Operations.  
Asset Retirement Obligations
We record AROs in connection with legal requirements to perform specified retirement activities under contractual arrangements
and/or governmental regulations.  Our contractual AROs primarily result from right-of-way agreements associated with our
pipeline operations and real estate leases associated with our plant sites.  In addition, we record AROs in connection with
governmental regulations associated with the abandonment or retirement of above-ground brine storage pits and certain marine
vessels.  We also record AROs in connection with regulatory requirements associated with the renovation or demolition of certain
assets containing hazardous substances such as asbestos.  We typically fund our AROs using cash flow from operations.
Property, plant and equipment at December 31, 2018 and 2017 includes $72.5 million and $39.9 million, respectively, of asset
retirement costs capitalized as an increase in the associated long-lived asset.
The following table presents information regarding our AROs for the years indicated:
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
ARO liability beginning balance  $ 86.7  $ 85.4  $ 58.5 
Liabilities incurred   24.4   4.7   4.2 
Liabilities settled   (2.5)  (2.2)  (5.7)
Revisions in estimated cash flows   11.5   (6.7)  24.6 
Accretion expense   6.2   5.5   3.8 
ARO liability ending balance  $ 126.3  $ 86.7  $ 85.4 
The following table presents our forecast of ARO-related accretion expense for the years indicated:
2019   2020   2021   2022   2023  
$ 8.1  $ 8.6  $ 9.0  $ 9.6  $ 10.3 
F-20
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Note 5.  Investments in Unconsolidated Affiliates
The following table presents our investments in unconsolidated affiliates by business segment at the dates indicated. We account for
these investments using the equity method.
 
  Ownership
Interest at
December 31,  December 31,  
  2018   2018   2017  
NGL Pipelines & Services:          
Venice Energy Service Company, L.L.C. (“VESCO”)  13.1%  $ 24.1  $ 25.7 
K/D/S Promix, L.L.C. (“Promix”)  50%   28.9   30.9 
Baton Rouge Fractionators LLC (“BRF”)  32.2%   16.3   17.0 
Skelly-Belvieu Pipeline Company, L.L.C. (“Skelly-Belvieu”)  50%   35.6   37.0 
Texas Express Pipeline LLC (“Texas Express”)  35%   337.6   314.4 
Texas Express Gathering LLC (“TEG”)  45%   43.6   35.9 
Front Range Pipeline LLC (“Front Range”)  33.3%   175.9   165.7 
Delaware Basin Gas Processing LLC (“Delaware Processing”) (1)  100%   --   107.3 
Crude Oil Pipelines & Services:             
Seaway Crude Pipeline Company LLC (“Seaway”)  50%   1,369.7   1,378.9 
Eagle Ford Pipeline LLC (“Eagle Ford Crude Oil Pipeline”)  50%   388.7   385.2 
Eagle Ford Terminals Corpus Christi LLC (“Eagle Ford Corpus Christi”)  50%   109.1   75.1 
Natural Gas Pipelines & Services:             
White River Hub, LLC (“White River Hub”)  50%   20.1   20.8 
Old Ocean Pipeline, LLC (“Old Ocean”)  50%   2.7   -- 
Petrochemical & Refined Products Services:             
Centennial Pipeline LLC (“Centennial”)  50%   59.1   60.8 
 Baton Rouge Propylene Concentrator LLC (“BRPC”)  30%   3.2   4.1 
 Transport 4, LLC (“Transport 4”)  25%   0.5   0.6 
Total      $ 2,615.1  $ 2,659.4 
             
(1) In March 2018, we acquired the remaining 50% membership interest in our Delaware Processing joint venture. See Note 12 for information regarding this
acquisition.  
NGL Pipelines & Services
The principal business activity of each investee included in our NGL Pipelines & Services segment is described as follows:
§VESCO owns a natural gas processing facility in south Louisiana and a related gathering system that gathers natural gas from
certain offshore developments for delivery to its natural gas processing facility.
§Promix owns an NGL fractionation facility located in south Louisiana.  The facility receives mixed NGLs via pipeline from
natural gas processing plants located in southern Louisiana and along the Mississippi Gulf Coast.  In addition, Promix owns an
NGL gathering system that gathers mixed NGLs from processing plants in southern Louisiana for its fractionator.
§BRF owns an NGL fractionation facility located in south Louisiana that receives mixed NGLs from natural gas processing
plants located in Alabama, Mississippi and southern Louisiana.  In addition, BRF leases an NGL storage cavern.
§Skelly-Belvieu owns a pipeline that transports mixed NGLs from Skellytown, Texas to Mont Belvieu, Texas.  The Skelly-
Belvieu Pipeline receives NGLs through a pipeline interconnect with our Mid-America Pipeline System in Skellytown.
§Texas Express owns an NGL pipeline that extends from Skellytown to our Mont Belvieu NGL fractionation and storage
complex.  Mixed NGLs from the Rocky Mountains, Permian Basin and Mid-Continent regions are delivered to the Texas
Express Pipeline via an interconnect with our Mid-America Pipeline System near Skellytown.  The pipeline also transports
mixed NGLs from two gathering systems owned by TEG to Mont Belvieu.  In addition, mixed NGLs from the Denver-
Julesburg Basin in Colorado are transported to the Texas Express Pipeline using the Front Range Pipeline.
F-21
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
§TEG owns two NGL gathering systems that deliver mixed NGLs to the Texas Express Pipeline.  The Elk City gathering system
gathers mixed NGLs from natural gas processing plants in the Anadarko/Granite Wash production area located in the Texas
Panhandle and western Oklahoma.  The North Texas gathering system gathers mixed NGLs from natural gas processing plants
in the Barnett Shale production area in North Texas.  
§Front Range owns an NGL pipeline that transports mixed NGLs from natural gas processing plants located in the Denver-
Julesburg Basin to an interconnect with our Texas Express Pipeline and Mid-America Pipeline System and other third party
facilities in Skellytown.  
Crude Oil Pipelines & Services
The principal business activity of each investee included in our Crude Oil Pipelines & Services segment is described as follows:
§Seaway owns a pipeline system that connects the Cushing, Oklahoma crude oil hub with markets in Southeast Texas.  The
Seaway Pipeline is comprised of the Longhaul System, the Freeport System and the Texas City System.  The Cushing hub is a
major industry trading hub and price settlement point for West Texas Intermediate on the NYMEX.
The Longhaul System, which consists of two pipelines, provides north-to-south transportation of crude oil from the Cushing
hub to Seaway’s Jones Creek terminal near Freeport, Texas and a terminal that we own located near Katy, Texas.  
The Freeport System consists of a marine import and export dock, three pipelines and other related facilities that transport
crude oil to and from Freeport and the Jones Creek terminal.  The Texas City System consists of a marine import and export
dock, storage tanks, various pipelines and other related facilities that transport crude oil to refineries in the Texas City, Texas
area and to and from terminals in the Galena Park area, our Enterprise Crude Houston (“ECHO”) terminal and locations along
the Houston Ship Channel.  The Texas City System also receives production from certain offshore Gulf of Mexico
developments.
§Eagle Ford Crude Oil Pipeline owns a crude oil pipeline that transports crude oil and condensate for producers in South
Texas.  The system consists of a crude oil and condensate pipeline system originating in Gardendale, Texas in LaSalle County
to Three Rivers, Texas in Live Oak County and extending to Corpus Christi, Texas.  The system also includes a pipeline
segment that interconnects with our South Texas Crude Oil Pipeline System in Wilson County.  This system includes a marine
terminal facility in Corpus Christi and storage capacity across the system.  
§Eagle Ford Corpus Christi is a joint venture formed in March 2015 to construct and operate a new deep-water marine crude oil
terminal that is designed to handle a variety of ocean-going vessels.  The new terminal is expected to be placed into service
during the second quarter of 2019.
Natural Gas Pipelines & Services
The principal business activity of each investee included in our Natural Gas Pipelines & Services segment is described as follows:
§White River Hub owns a natural gas hub facility serving producers in the Piceance Basin of northwest Colorado.  The facility
enables producers to access six interstate natural gas pipelines.
§Old Ocean was formed in May 2018 with Energy Transfer Partners, L.P. (“ETP”) to facilitate the resumption of full service on
the Old Ocean natural gas pipeline owned by ETP.  The 24-inch diameter Old Ocean Pipeline originates in Maypearl, Texas in
Ellis County and extends south approximately 240 miles to Sweeny, Texas in Brazoria County.  ETP serves as operator of the
pipeline.
F-22
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Petrochemical & Refined Products Services
The principal business activity of each investee included in our Petrochemical & Refined Products Services segment is described as
follows:
§Centennial owns an interstate refined products pipeline that extends from Beaumont, Texas, to Bourbon, Illinois.  Centennial
also owns a refined products storage terminal located near Creal Springs, Illinois.
§BRPC owns a propylene fractionation facility located in south Louisiana that fractionates refinery grade propylene into
chemical grade propylene.
§Transport 4 provides pipeline and terminal logistics services used by our refined products pipelines.
Equity Earnings
The following table presents our equity in income (loss) of unconsolidated affiliates by business segment for the years indicated:
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
NGL Pipelines & Services  $ 117.0  $ 73.4  $ 61.4 
Crude Oil Pipelines & Services   365.4   358.4   311.9 
Natural Gas Pipelines & Services   6.8   3.8   3.8 
Petrochemical & Refined Products Services (1)   (9.2)  (9.6)  (15.1)
Total  $ 480.0  $ 426.0  $ 362.0 
  
(1) Losses are primarily attributable to our investment in Centennial. As a result of a trend in declining earnings, we estimated the fair value of this equity-
method investment during each of the last three fiscal years. Our estimates, based on a combination of market and income approaches, indicate that the
fair value of this investment remains in excess of its carrying value.  
Excess Cost
On occasion, the price we pay to acquire an ownership interest in a company exceeds the underlying carrying value of the capital
accounts we acquire.  These excess cost amounts are attributable to the fair value of the underlying tangible assets of these entities
exceeding their respective book carrying values at the time of our acquisition of ownership interests in these entities.  We amortize
such excess cost amounts as a reduction to equity earnings in a manner similar to depreciation. The following table presents our
unamortized excess cost amounts by business segment at the dates indicated:
  December 31,  
  2018   2017  
NGL Pipelines & Services  $ 21.7  $ 22.9 
Crude Oil Pipelines & Services   17.4   18.2 
Petrochemical & Refined Products Services   1.7   1.8 
Total  $ 40.8  $ 42.9 
In total, amortization of excess cost amounts were $2.1 million for each of the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016. We
forecast that our amortization of excess cost amount will approximate $2.1 million in each of the next five years.
F-23
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Summarized Combined Financial Information of Unconsolidated Affiliates
Combined balance sheet information for the last two years and results of operations data for the last three years for our
unconsolidated affiliates are summarized in the following table (all data presented on a 100% basis):
  December 31,     
  2018   2017     
Balance Sheet Data:          
Current assets  $ 350.2  $ 288.8    
Property, plant and equipment, net   5,359.1   5,509.7    
Other assets   80.4   71.2    
Total assets  $ 5,789.7  $ 5,869.7    
            
Current liabilities  $ 220.6  $ 233.5    
Other liabilities   77.9   84.8    
Combined equity   5,491.2   5,551.4    
Total liabilities and combined equity  $ 5,789.7  $ 5,869.7    
            
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
2018  2017   2016  
Income Statement Data:             
Revenues  $ 1,721.3  $ 1,509.0  $ 1,342.0 
Operating income   1,074.6   925.9   786.7 
Net income   1,069.1   929.5   781.7 
Note 6.  Intangible Assets and Goodwill
Identifiable Intangible Assets
The following table summarizes our intangible assets by business segment at the dates indicated:
  December 31, 2018   December 31, 2017  
  Gross
Value   Accumulated
Amortization  Carrying
Value   Gross
Value   Accumulated
Amortization  Carrying
Value  
NGL Pipelines & Services:                   
Customer relationship intangibles  $ 457.3  $ (201.9) $ 255.4  $ 447.4  $ (187.5) $ 259.9 
Contract-based intangibles   363.4   (238.7)  124.7   280.8   (218.4)  62.4 
Segment total   820.7   (440.6)  380.1   728.2   (405.9)  322.3 
Crude Oil Pipelines & Services:                         
Customer relationship intangibles   2,203.5   (174.1)  2,029.4   2,203.5   (127.0)  2,076.5 
Contract-based intangibles   276.9   (211.7)  65.2   281.0   (171.0)  110.0 
Segment total   2,480.4   (385.8)  2,094.6   2,484.5   (298.0)  2,186.5 
Natural Gas Pipelines & Services:                         
Customer relationship intangibles   1,350.3   (447.8)  902.5   1,350.3   (417.1)  933.2 
Contract-based intangibles   464.7   (387.9)  76.8   464.7   (379.5)  85.2 
Segment total   1,815.0   (835.7)  979.3   1,815.0   (796.6)  1,018.4 
Petrochemical & Refined Products
Services:                         
Customer relationship intangibles   181.4   (51.8)  129.6   181.4   (45.9)  135.5 
Contract-based intangibles   46.0   (21.2)  24.8   46.0   (18.4)  27.6 
Segment total   227.4   (73.0)  154.4   227.4   (64.3)  163.1 
Total intangible assets  $ 5,343.5  $ (1,735.1) $ 3,608.4  $ 5,255.1  $ (1,564.8) $ 3,690.3 
F-24
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The following table presents the amortization expense of our intangible assets by business segment for the years indicated:
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
NGL Pipelines & Services  $ 34.7  $ 28.9  $ 30.6 
Crude Oil Pipelines & Services   87.8   92.5   98.4 
Natural Gas Pipelines & Services   39.1   36.2   33.2 
Petrochemical & Refined Products Services   8.7   9.3   9.1 
Total  $ 170.3  $ 166.9  $ 171.3 
The following table presents our forecast of amortization expense associated with existing intangible assets for the years indicated:
2019   2020   2021   2022   2023  
$ 167.1  $ 159.8  $ 162.1  $ 167.6  $ 167.8 
Customer relationship intangible assets
Customer relationship intangible assets represent the estimated economic value assigned to commercial relationships acquired in
connection with business combinations. Our customer relationship intangible assets are classified as either (i) basin-specific or (ii)
general. Basin-specific customer relationships represent access to customers associated with a defined resource basin (e.g.,
customers using a natural gas gathering system serving a specific production field) and is analogous to having a franchise in a
particular area. General customer relationships are associated with customers whose hydrocarbon volumes are not attributable to
specific resource basins (e.g. customers at a marine terminal that handles volumes originating from multiple sources).
The estimated fair value of each customer relationship intangible asset was determined at the time of acquisition using a discounted
cash flow analysis, which incorporates various assumptions regarding the acquired business. The assumptions may include Level 3
fair value inputs, including long-range cash flow forecasts that extend for the estimated economic life of the hydrocarbon resource
base served by the asset network, anticipated service contract renewals, resource base depletion rates and expected customer
attrition rates.
The recognition of customer relationships are supported by a variety of factors.  In general, midstream infrastructure requires a
significant investment, both in terms of initial construction costs and ongoing maintenance, and is generally supported by long-term
contracts that establish a customer base. The level of expenditures and regulatory requirements involved in constructing new
midstream asset networks can create significant economic barriers to entry that may limit potential competition. Furthermore,
efficient, continuous operation of the acquired fixed assets not only supports the commercial relationships existing at the time of the
acquisition, but it provides us with opportunities to establish new ones.  These factors support the long-term value attributed to our
customer relationship intangible assets.
With respect to amortization periods, the duration of a basin-specific customer relationship is limited to the estimated economic life
of the associated resource basin. The duration of our other customer relationships is typically limited to the term of the underlying
service contracts, including assumed renewals. Amortization expense attributable to customer relationships is recorded in a manner
that closely resembles the pattern in which we expect to benefit from such relationships.
F-25
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
At December 31, 2018, the carrying value of our portfolio of customer relationship intangible assets was $3.3 billion, the principal
components of which were as follows:
Weighted
Average
Remaining
Amortization
Period December 31, 2018  
 Gross
Value   Accumulated
Amortization  Carrying
Value  
Basin-specific customer relationships:           
   EFS Midstream 23.4 years  $ 1,409.8  $ (117.0) $ 1,292.8 
   State Line and Fairplay 28.2 years   895.0   (183.2)  711.8 
   San Juan Gathering 20.8 years   331.3   (227.7)  103.6 
   Encinal 8.0 years   132.9   (103.5)  29.4 
General customer relationships:              
   Oiltanking 25.0 years   1,192.5   (86.1)  1,106.4 
§The EFS Midstream customer relationships provide us with long-term access to natural gas, NGL and condensate producers
served by our EFS Midstream System, which we acquired in 2015.  The EFS Midstream System serves producers in the Eagle
Ford Shale, providing condensate gathering and processing services as well as gathering, treating and compression services for
associated natural gas.
§The State Line and Fairplay customer relationships provide us with long-term access to natural gas producers served by our
Haynesville and Fairplay Gathering Systems, which we acquired in 2010. The Haynesville Gathering System gathers and treats
natural gas produced from the Haynesville and Bossier Shale supply basins and the Cotton Valley and Taylor Sand formations
in Louisiana and eastern Texas for delivery to regional markets, including (through an interconnect with the Haynesville
Extension pipeline) markets served by our Acadian Gas System.  The Fairplay Gathering System gathers natural gas produced
from the Cotton Valley formation within Panola and Rusk Counties in East Texas for delivery to regional markets.
§The San Juan Gathering customer relationships provide us with long-term access to natural gas producers served by our San
Juan Gathering System, which we acquired in 2004.  The San Juan Gathering System gathers and treats natural gas produced
from the San Juan Basin in northern New Mexico and southern Colorado and delivers the natural gas either directly into
interstate pipelines (if dry natural gas) or to regional natural gas plants, including our Chaco facility, for further processing (if
rich natural gas) prior to being transported on interstate pipelines.
§The Encinal customer relationships provide us with long-term access to natural gas producers in the Olmos and Wilcox
formations in South Texas.  We acquired this intangible asset in 2006.
§The Oiltanking customer relationships provide us with long-term access to crude oil and refined products storage and terminal
customers served at our Houston Ship Channel and Beaumont, Texas terminals.   We acquired this intangible asset in 2014.
F-26
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Contract-based intangible assets
Contract-based intangible assets represent specific commercial rights we acquired in connection with business combinations. These
intangible assets are typically valued using an income approach that incorporate the terms of the agreements.  At December 31,
2018, the carrying value of our portfolio of contract-based intangible assets was $291.5 million, the principal components of which
were as follows:
 Weighted
Average
Remaining
Amortization
Period December 31, 2018  
 Gross
Value   Accumulated
Amortization  Carrying
Value  
Oiltanking customer contracts 4.0 years  $ 293.3  $ (221.1) $ 72.2 
Jonah natural gas gathering agreements 23.0 years   224.4   (166.3)  58.1 
Delaware Basin natural gas processing contracts 8.0 years   82.6   (6.4)  76.2 
§The Oiltanking customer contracts represent the estimated value we assigned to crude oil storage and terminal agreements we
acquired in 2014 associated with our Houston and Beaumont terminals. Amortization expense attributable to these contracts is
recorded using a straight-line approach over the terms of the underlying contracts.
§The Jonah natural gas gathering agreements represent the estimated value we assigned to natural gas gathering contracts
acquired in 2001 associated with the Jonah Gathering System. Amortization expense attributable to these intangible assets is
recorded using a units-of-production method based on gathering volumes.
§The Delaware Basin natural gas processing contracts represent the estimated value we assigned to natural gas processing
contracts we acquired in 2018 in connection with our step acquisition of the remaining 50% member interest in Delaware
Processing (see Note 12). Amortization expense attributable to these contracts is recorded using a straight-line approach over
the terms of the underlying contracts.
Goodwill
Goodwill represents the excess of the purchase price of an acquired business over the amounts assigned to assets acquired and
liabilities assumed in the transaction.  Goodwill is not amortized; however, it is subject to annual impairment testing at the end of
each fiscal year, and more frequently, if circumstances indicate it is probable that the fair value of goodwill is below its carrying
amount.  We did not record any goodwill impairment charges, or reclassify any goodwill amounts between business segments,
during the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 or 2016.  Based on our most recent goodwill impairment test at December 31,
2018, we estimated that the fair value of each of our reporting units was substantially in excess of its carrying value (i.e., by at least
10%).  See Note 10 for our goodwill by segment balances.
F-27
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Note 7.  Debt Obligations
The following table presents our consolidated debt obligations (arranged by company and maturity date) at the dates indicated:
  December 31,  
  2018   2017  
EPO senior debt obligations:       
Commercial Paper Notes, variable-rates  $ --  $ 1,755.7 
Senior Notes V, 6.65% fixed-rate, due April 2018   --   349.7 
Senior Notes OO, 1.65% fixed-rate, due May 2018   --   750.0 
Senior Notes N, 6.50% fixed-rate, due January 2019   700.0   700.0 
364-Day Revolving Credit Agreement, variable-rate, due September 2019   --   -- 
Senior Notes LL, 2.55% fixed-rate, due October 2019   800.0   800.0 
Senior Notes Q, 5.25% fixed-rate, due January 2020   500.0   500.0 
Senior Notes Y, 5.20% fixed-rate, due September 2020   1,000.0   1,000.0 
Senior Notes TT, 2.80% fixed-rate, due February 2021   750.0   -- 
Senior Notes RR, 2.85% fixed-rate, due April 2021   575.0   575.0 
Senior Notes VV, 3.50% fixed-rate, due February 2022   750.0   -- 
Senior Notes CC, 4.05% fixed-rate, due February 2022   650.0   650.0 
Multi-Year Revolving Credit Facility, variable-rate, due September 2022   --   -- 
Senior Notes HH, 3.35% fixed-rate, due March 2023   1,250.0   1,250.0 
Senior Notes JJ, 3.90% fixed-rate, due February 2024   850.0   850.0 
Senior Notes MM, 3.75% fixed-rate, due February 2025   1,150.0   1,150.0 
Senior Notes PP, 3.70% fixed-rate, due February 2026   875.0   875.0 
Senior Notes SS, 3.95% fixed-rate, due February 2027   575.0   575.0 
Senior Notes WW, 4.15% fixed-rate, due October 2028   1,000.0   -- 
Senior Notes D, 6.875% fixed-rate, due March 2033   500.0   500.0 
Senior Notes H, 6.65% fixed-rate, due October 2034   350.0   350.0 
Senior Notes J, 5.75% fixed-rate, due March 2035   250.0   250.0 
Senior Notes W, 7.55% fixed-rate, due April 2038   399.6   399.6 
Senior Notes R, 6.125% fixed-rate, due October 2039   600.0   600.0 
Senior Notes Z, 6.45% fixed-rate, due September 2040   600.0   600.0 
Senior Notes BB, 5.95% fixed-rate, due February 2041   750.0   750.0 
Senior Notes DD, 5.70% fixed-rate, due February 2042   600.0   600.0 
Senior Notes EE, 4.85% fixed-rate, due August 2042   750.0   750.0 
Senior Notes GG, 4.45% fixed-rate, due February 2043   1,100.0   1,100.0 
Senior Notes II, 4.85% fixed-rate, due March 2044   1,400.0   1,400.0 
Senior Notes KK, 5.10% fixed-rate, due February 2045   1,150.0   1,150.0 
Senior Notes QQ, 4.90% fixed-rate, due May 2046   975.0   975.0 
Senior Notes UU, 4.25% fixed-rate, due February 2048   1,250.0   -- 
Senior Notes XX, 4.80% fixed-rate, due February 2049   1,250.0   -- 
Senior Notes NN, 4.95% fixed-rate, due October 2054   400.0   400.0 
TEPPCO senior debt obligations:         
TEPPCO Senior Notes, 6.65% fixed-rate, due April 2018   --   0.3 
TEPPCO Senior Notes, 7.55% fixed-rate, due April 2038   0.4   0.4 
Total principal amount of senior debt obligations   23,750.0   21,605.7 
EPO Junior Subordinated Notes A, variable-rate, redeemed August 2018   --   521.1 
EPO Junior Subordinated Notes B, fixed/variable-rate, redeemed March 2018   --   682.7 
EPO Junior Subordinated Notes C, fixed/variable-rate, due June 2067 (1)   256.4   256.4 
EPO Junior Subordinated Notes D, fixed/variable-rate, due August 2077 (2)   700.0   700.0 
EPO Junior Subordinated Notes E, fixed/variable-rate, due August 2077 (3)   1,000.0   1,000.0 
EPO Junior Subordinated Notes F, fixed/variable-rate, due February 2078 (4)   700.0   -- 
TEPPCO Junior Subordinated Notes, fixed/variable-rate, due June 2067   14.2   14.2 
Total principal amount of senior and junior debt obligations   26,420.6   24,780.1 
Other, non-principal amounts   (242.4)  (211.4)
Less current maturities of debt   (1,500.1)  (2,855.0)
Total long-term debt  $ $ 24,678.1  $ $ 21,713.7 
  
(1) Variable rate is reset quarterly and based on 3-month LIBOR plus 2.778%.
(2) Fixed rate of 4.875% through August 15, 2022; thereafter, a variable rate reset quarterly and based on 3-month LIBOR plus 2.986%.
(3) Fixed rate of 5.250% through August 15, 2027; thereafter, a variable rate reset quarterly and based on 3-month LIBOR plus 3.033%.
(4) Fixed rate of 5.375% through February 14, 2028; thereafter, a variable rate reset quarterly and based on 3-month LIBOR plus 2.57%.  
References in this footnote to “TEPPCO” mean TEPPCO Partners, L.P. prior to its merger with one of our wholly owned
subsidiaries in October 2009.
F-28
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Information Regarding Variable Interest Rates Paid
The following table presents the range of interest rates and weighted-average interest rates paid on our consolidated variable-rate
debt during the year ended December 31, 2018:
 Range of Interest
Rates PaidWeighted-Average
Interest Rate Paid
Commercial Paper Notes 1.50% to 2.50% 2.24%
Multi-Year Revolving Credit Facility 2.58% to 5.00% 3.37%
EPO Junior Subordinated Notes A (prior to redemption) 5.08% to 6.07% 5.71%
EPO Junior Subordinated Notes B (prior to redemption) 7.03% 7.03%
EPO Junior Subordinated Notes C 4.26% to 5.52% 4.91%
The following table presents contractually scheduled maturities of our consolidated debt obligations outstanding at December 31,
2018 for the next five years, and in total thereafter:
   Scheduled Maturities of Debt  
 Total  2019  2020  2021  2022  2023  Thereafter 
Senior Notes  $ 23,750.0  $ 1,500.0  $ 1,500.0  $ 1,325.0  $ 1,400.0  $ 1,250.0  $ 16,775.0 
Junior Subordinated
Notes   2,670.6   --   --   --   --   --   2,670.6 
Total  $ 26,420.6  $ 1,500.0  $ 1,500.0  $ 1,325.0  $ 1,400.0  $ 1,250.0  $ 19,445.6 
Parent-Subsidiary Guarantor Relationships
Enterprise Products Partners L.P. acts as guarantor of the consolidated debt obligations of EPO, with the exception of the remaining
debt obligations of TEPPCO.  If EPO were to default on any of its guaranteed debt, Enterprise Products Partners L.P. would be
responsible for full and unconditional repayment of that obligation.
EPO Debt Obligations
Commercial Paper Notes
In June 2018, EPO increased the aggregate principal amount of short-term notes that it could issue (and have outstanding at any
time) under its commercial paper program from $2.5 billion to $3.0 billion.  As a back-stop to the program, we intend to maintain a
minimum available borrowing capacity under EPO’s Multi-Year Revolving Credit Facility equal to the aggregate amount
outstanding under our commercial paper notes.  All commercial paper notes issued under the program are senior unsecured
obligations of EPO that are unconditionally guaranteed by Enterprise Products Partners L.P.
364-Day Credit Agreement
In September 2018, EPO entered into a 364-Day Revolving Credit Agreement that replaced its prior 364-day credit facility.  The
new 364-Day Revolving Credit Agreement matures in September 2019. There are currently no principal amounts outstanding under
this revolving credit agreement.
Under the terms of the new 364-Day Revolving Credit Agreement, EPO may borrow up to $2.0 billion (which may be increased by
up to $200 million to $2.2 billion at EPO’s election, provided certain conditions are met) at a variable interest rate for a term of up
to 364 days, subject to the terms and conditions set forth therein.  To the extent that principal amounts are outstanding at the
maturity date, EPO may elect to have the entire principal balance then outstanding continued as a non-revolving term loan for a
period of one additional year, payable in September 2020. Borrowings under this revolving credit agreement may be used for
working capital, capital expenditures, acquisitions and general company purposes.
The new 364-Day Revolving Credit Agreement contains customary representations, warranties, covenants (affirmative and
negative) and events of default, the occurrence of which would permit the lenders to accelerate the maturity date of any amounts
borrowed under this credit agreement.  The credit agreement also restricts EPO’s ability to pay cash distributions to its parent,
Enterprise Products Partners L.P., if an event of default (as defined in the credit agreement) has occurred and is continuing at the
time such distribution is scheduled to be paid or would result therefrom.
F-29
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
EPO’s obligations under the new 364-Day Revolving Credit Agreement are not secured by any collateral; however, they are
guaranteed by Enterprise Products Partners L.P.
Multi-Year Revolving Credit Facility
In September 2017, EPO entered into a revolving credit agreement that matures in September 2022 (the “Multi-Year Revolving
Credit Facility”).  This new facility replaced EPO’s prior multi-year revolving credit facility that was scheduled to mature in
September 2020.  There are currently no principal amounts outstanding under the new credit facility.
Under the terms of the new Multi-Year Revolving Credit Facility, EPO may borrow up to $4.0 billion (which may be increased by
up to $500 million to $4.5 billion at EPO’s election, provided certain conditions are met) at a variable interest rate for a term of five
years, subject to the terms and conditions set forth therein.  Borrowings under this revolving credit facility may be used as a
backstop for commercial paper and for working capital, capital expenditures, acquisitions and general company purposes.
The Multi-Year Revolving Credit Facility contains customary representations, warranties, covenants (affirmative and negative) and
events of default, the occurrence of which would permit the lenders to accelerate the maturity date of any amounts borrowed under
this credit facility.  The credit facility also restricts EPO’s ability to pay cash distributions to its parent, Enterprise Products Partners
L.P., if an event of default (as defined in the credit facility) has occurred and is continuing at the time such distribution is scheduled
to be paid or would result therefrom.
EPO’s obligations under the Multi-Year Revolving Credit Facility are not secured by any collateral; however, they are guaranteed
by Enterprise Products Partners L.P.
Senior Notes
EPO’s fixed-rate senior notes are unsecured obligations of EPO that rank equal with its existing and future unsecured and
unsubordinated indebtedness.  They are senior to any existing and future subordinated indebtedness of EPO.  EPO’s senior notes
are subject to make-whole redemption rights and were issued under indentures containing certain covenants, which generally
restrict its ability (with certain exceptions) to incur debt secured by liens and engage in sale and leaseback transactions.  In total,
EPO issued $5.0 billion and $1.25 billion of senior notes during the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2016, respectively.
In February 2018, EPO issued $2.0 billion aggregate principal amount of senior notes comprised of (i) $750 million principal
amount of senior notes due February 2021 (“Senior Notes TT”) and (ii) $1.25 billion principal amount of senior notes due February
2048 (“Senior Notes UU”).
Net proceeds from the February 2018 senior notes offerings, together with the net proceeds from the February 2018 offering of
Junior Subordinated Notes F (described below), were used by EPO for the temporary repayment of amounts outstanding under its
commercial paper program, general company purposes, and the redemption of all $682.7 million outstanding aggregate principal
amount of its Junior Subordinated Notes B.
Senior Notes TT were issued at 99.946% of their principal amount and have a fixed-rate interest rate of 2.80% per year.  Senior
Notes UU were issued at 99.865% of their principal amount and have a fixed-rate interest rate of 4.25% per year.  Enterprise
Products Partners L.P. has guaranteed the senior notes through an unconditional guarantee on an unsecured and unsubordinated
basis.
In October 2018, EPO issued $3.0 billion aggregate principal amount of senior notes comprised of (i) $750 million principal
amount of senior notes due February 2022 (“Senior Notes VV”), (ii) $1.00 billion principal amount of senior notes due October
2028 (“Senior Notes WW”) and (iii) $1.25 billion principal amount of senior notes due February 2049 (“Senior Notes XX”).  Net
proceeds from this offering were used by EPO for the temporary repayment of amounts outstanding under its commercial paper
program and for general company purposes, including for growth capital expenditures.
F-30
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Senior Notes VV were issued at 99.985% of their principal amount and have a fixed-rate interest rate of 3.50% per year.  Senior
Notes WW were issued at 99.764% of their principal amount and have a fixed-rate interest rate of 4.15% per year.  Senior Notes
XX were issued at 99.390% of their principal amount and have a fixed-rate interest rate of 4.80% per year.  Enterprise Products
Partners L.P. has guaranteed the senior notes through an unconditional guarantee on an unsecured and unsubordinated basis.
EPO Junior Subordinated Notes
EPO’s payment obligations under its junior notes are subordinated to all of its current and future senior indebtedness (as defined in
the related indenture agreement).  Enterprise Products Partners L.P. guarantees repayment of amounts due under these junior notes
through an unsecured and subordinated guarantee.  The indenture agreement governing these notes allows EPO to defer interest
payments on one or more occasions for up to ten consecutive years subject to certain conditions.  Subject to certain exceptions,
during any period in which interest payments are deferred, neither we nor EPO can declare or make any distributions on any of our
respective equity securities or make any payments on indebtedness or other obligations that rank equal with or are subordinate to
our junior notes.  Each series of our junior notes rank equal with each other.  Generally, each series of junior notes are not
redeemable by EPO while such notes bear interest at a fixed annual rate. In total, EPO issued $700.0 million and $1.7 billion of
junior notes during the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively.
In connection with the issuance of EPO’s Junior Subordinated Notes A, Junior Subordinated Notes B and Junior Subordinated
Notes C, EPO entered into separate Replacement Capital Covenants in favor of covered debt holders (as defined in the underlying
documents) pursuant to which EPO agreed, for the benefit of such debt holders, that it would not redeem or repurchase such junior
notes unless such redemption or repurchase is made using proceeds from the issuance of certain securities.
In February 2018, EPO issued $700 million in principal amount of junior subordinated notes.  The Junior Subordinated Notes F are
redeemable at EPO’s option, in whole or in part, on one or more occasions, on or after February 15, 2028 at 100% of their principal
amount, plus any accrued and unpaid interest thereon, and bear interest at a fixed rate of 5.375% per year through February 14,
2028.  Beginning February 15, 2028, the Junior Subordinated Notes F will bear interest at a floating rate based on a three-month
LIBOR rate plus 2.57%, reset quarterly. Enterprise Products Partners L.P. has guaranteed the Junior Subordinated Notes F through
an unconditional guarantee on an unsecured and subordinated basis.
In March 2018, EPO redeemed all of the $682.7 million outstanding aggregate principal amount of its Junior Subordinated Notes B
at a price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the notes being redeemed, plus all accrued and unpaid interest thereon to, but
not including, the redemption date.  This redemption was funded by EPO’s issuance of senior notes and junior subordinated notes
in February 2018.
In August 2018, EPO redeemed all of the $521.1 million outstanding aggregate principal amount of its Junior Subordinated Notes
A at a price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the notes being redeemed, plus all accrued and unpaid interest thereon to, but
not including, the redemption date.  This redemption was funded by the issuance of short-term notes under EPO’s commercial
paper program.
Letters of Credit
At December 31, 2018, EPO had $101.4 million of letters of credit outstanding primarily related to our commodity hedging
activities.
Lender Financial Covenants
We were in compliance with the financial covenants of our consolidated debt agreements at December 31, 2018.
F-31
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Note 8.  Equity and Distributions
Partners Equity
Partners’ equity reflects the various classes of limited partner interests (i.e., common units, including restricted common units)
outstanding.  The following table summarizes changes in the number of our outstanding units since January 1, 2016:
  Common
Units
(Unrestricted)  Restricted
Common
Units   Total
Common
Units  
Number of units outstanding at January 1, 2016   2,010,592,504   1,960,520   2,012,553,024 
Common units issued in connection with ATM program   87,867,037   --   87,867,037 
Common units issued in connection with DRIP and EUPP   16,316,534   --   16,316,534 
Common units issued in connection with the vesting of phantom unit awards   1,761,455   --   1,761,455 
Common units issued in connection with the vesting of restricted common unit awards   1,234,502   (1,234,502)  -- 
Forfeiture of restricted common unit awards   --   (43,724)  (43,724)
Cancellation of treasury units acquired in connection with the vesting of
   equity-based awards   (1,000,619)  --   (1,000,619)
Other   134,707   --   134,707 
Number of units outstanding at December 31, 2016   2,116,906,120   682,294   2,117,588,414 
Common units issued in connection with ATM program   21,807,726   --   21,807,726 
Common units issued in connection with DRIP and EUPP   19,046,019   --   19,046,019 
Common units issued in connection with the vesting of phantom unit awards   2,485,580   --   2,485,580 
Common units issued in connection with the vesting of restricted common unit awards   681,044   (681,044)  -- 
Forfeiture of restricted common unit awards   --   (1,250)  (1,250)
Cancellation of treasury units acquired in connection with the vesting of
   equity-based awards   (1,027,798)  --   (1,027,798)
Common units issued in connection with employee compensation   1,176,103   --   1,176,103 
Other   14,685   --   14,685 
Number of units outstanding at December 31, 2017   2,161,089,479   --   2,161,089,479 
Common units issued in connection with DRIP and EUPP   19,861,951   --   19,861,951 
Common units issued in connection with the vesting of phantom unit awards   3,479,958   --   3,479,958 
Cancellation of treasury units acquired in connection with the vesting of
   equity-based awards   (1,037,522)  --   (1,037,522)
Common units issued in connection with employee compensation   1,443,586   --   1,443,586 
Common units issued in connection with land acquisition (see Note 4)   1,223,242   --   1,223,242 
Cancellation of treasury units acquired in connection with buyback program   (1,236,800)  --   (1,236,800)
Other   45,135   --   45,135 
Number of units outstanding at December 31, 2018   2,184,869,029   --   2,184,869,029 
Our common units represent limited partner interests, which give the holders thereof the right to participate in distributions and to
exercise the other rights or privileges available to them under our Sixth Amended and Restated Agreement of Limited Partnership
(as amended from time to time, the “Partnership Agreement”).  We are managed by our general partner, Enterprise GP.
In accordance with our Partnership Agreement, capital accounts are maintained for our limited partners.  The capital account
provisions of our Partnership Agreement incorporate principles established for U.S. federal income tax purposes and are not
comparable to the equity amounts presented in our consolidated financial statements prepared in accordance with GAAP.  Earnings
and cash distributions are allocated to holders of our common units in accordance with their respective percentage interests.
The net cash proceeds we received from the issuance of common units during the year ended December 31, 2018 were used to
temporarily reduce amounts outstanding under EPO’s commercial paper program and revolving credit facilities and for general
partnership purposes.
F-32
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Universal shelf registration statement
We have a universal shelf registration statement (the “2016 Shelf”) on file with the SEC which allows Enterprise Products Partners
L.P. and EPO (each on a standalone basis) to issue an unlimited amount of equity and debt securities, respectively.   EPO issued
$5.7 billion aggregate principal amount of senior notes and junior subordinated notes using the 2016 Shelf during the year ended
December 31, 2018 (see Note 7). In addition, EPO issued (i) $1.7 billion of junior subordinated notes using the 2016 Shelf during
the year ended December 31, 2017 and (ii) $1.25 billion of senior notes using a similar prior universal shelf registration statement
during the year ended December 31, 2016.   The 2016 Shelf will expire in May 2019, and we expect to file a replacement universal
shelf registration statement at or before such time. We may issue additional equity and debt securities in the future to assist us in
meeting our funding and liquidity requirements, including those related to capital investments.
At-the-Market (“ATM”) Program
In November 2017, we filed an amended registration statement with the SEC covering the issuance of up to $2.54 billion of our
common units in amounts, at prices and on terms to be determined by market conditions and other factors at the time of such
offerings in connection with our ATM program.  Pursuant to this program, we may sell common units under an equity distribution
agreement between Enterprise Products Partners L.P. and certain broker-dealers from time-to-time by means of ordinary brokers’
transactions through the NYSE at market prices, in block transactions or as otherwise agreed to with the broker-dealer parties to the
agreement.  
We did not issue any common units under the ATM program in 2018.  During 2017, we issued 21,807,726 common units under the
ATM program for aggregate gross cash proceeds of $603.1 million, resulting in total net cash proceeds of $597.0 million.  During
2016, we issued 87,867,037 common units under the ATM program for aggregate gross cash proceeds of $2.17 billion, resulting in
total net cash proceeds of $2.16 billion. This includes 3,830,256 common units sold in January 2016 to privately held affiliates of
EPCO, which generated gross proceeds of $100 million.  
After taking into account the aggregate sales price of common units sold under the ATM program through December 31, 2018, we
have the capacity to issue additional common units under the ATM program up to an aggregate sales price of $2.54 billion.
Distribution reinvestment plan
We have a registration statement on file with the SEC in connection with our distribution reinvestment plan (“DRIP”). The DRIP
provides unitholders of record and beneficial owners of our common units a voluntary means by which they can increase the
number of our common units they own by reinvesting the quarterly cash distributions they receive from us into the purchase of
additional common units at a discount ranging from 0% to 5%. Beginning with the distribution declared with respect to the fourth
quarter of 2017 and paid in February 2018, the discount was reduced from 5% to 2.5%.  Likewise, beginning with the distribution
declared with respect to the fourth quarter of 2018 and paid in February 2019, the discount was reduced from 2.5% to 0%.  We have
the sole discretion to determine whether common units purchased under the DRIP will come from our authorized but unissued
common units or from common units purchased on the open market by the DRIP administrator.
Activity under our DRIP for the last three years was as follows:  19,316,781 new common units issued during 2018, which
generated net cash proceeds of $523.3 million; 18,541,355 new common units issued during 2017, which generated net cash
proceeds of $462.9 million; and 15,809,503 new common units issued during 2016, which generated net cash proceeds of $374.0
million.  Privately held affiliates of EPCO reinvested $213 million, $100 million and $100 million through the DRIP in each of the
years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively (this amount being a component of the net cash proceeds presented
for each period).
After taking into account the number of common units issued under the DRIP through December 31, 2018, we have the capacity to
deliver an additional 61,400,359 common units under this plan.
Employee unit purchase plan
In addition to the DRIP, we have registration statements on file with the SEC in connection with our employee unit purchase plan
(“EUPP”).  Activity under our EUPP for the last three years was as follows: 545,170 new common units issued during 2018, which
generated net cash proceeds of $15.1 million; 504,664 new common units issued during 2017, which generated net cash proceeds
of $13.5 million; and 507,031 new common units issued during 2016, which generated net cash proceeds of $12.7 million.
F-33
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
After taking into account the number of common units issued under the EUPP through December 31, 2018, we have the capacity to
deliver an additional 5,215,641 common units under this plan. 
Registration Rights Agreement with Oiltanking Holding Americas, Inc. (“OTA”)
In October 2014, we acquired approximately 65.9% of the limited partner interests of Oiltanking Partners, L.P. (“Oiltanking”), all
of the member interests of OTLP GP, LLC, the general partner of Oiltanking (“Oiltanking GP”), and the incentive distribution
rights (“IDRs”) held by Oiltanking GP from OTA, a U.S. corporation, as the first step of a two-step acquisition of Oiltanking.  In
February 2015, we completed the second step of this transaction consisting of the acquisition of the noncontrolling interests in
Oiltanking.
In order to fund the equity consideration paid in Step 1 of the Oiltanking acquisition, we issued 54,807,352 common units to OTA
on October 1, 2014 in a transaction exempt from the registration requirements of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, pursuant
to Section 4(a)(2) thereof, and we granted OTA registration rights with respect to these common units under a Registration Rights
Agreement between us and OTA (the “Registration Rights Agreement”).  The Registration Rights Agreement provides that, subject
to the terms and conditions set forth therein, OTA may request that we prepare and file a registration statement to permit and
otherwise facilitate the public resale of all or a portion of the 54,807,352 Enterprise common units that OTA owns.  Our obligation
to OTA to effect such transactions is limited to five registration statements and underwritten offerings.
Common units issued in connection with employee compensation
In February 2018 and 2017, certain employees of EPCO received discretionary bonus payments, less any retirement plan
deductions and applicable withholding taxes, for work performed on our behalf during the prior fiscal year (e.g., the February 2018
bonus amount was with respect to the year ended December 31, 2017). The net dollar value of the bonus amounts was remitted to
employees through the issuance of an equivalent value of newly issued Enterprise common units under EPCO’s 2008 Enterprise
Products Long-Term Incentive Plan (Third Amendment and Restatement) (“2008 Plan”).  In February 2018, we issued 1,443,586
common units, which had a value of $39.1 million, in connection with the employee bonus awards.  In February 2017, we issued
1,176,103 common units, which had a value of $33.7 million.  The compensation expense associated with each bonus award was
recognized during the year in which the work was performed.  See Note 13 for additional information regarding the 2008 Plan.
Treasury Units
In December 1998, we announced a common unit buyback, or repurchase, program whereby we, together with certain affiliates,
could repurchase up to 4,000,000 of our common units on the open market.  We purchased the remaining authorized amount of
1,236,800 common units in late December 2018 for $30.8 million at an average price of $24.92 per unit.
During the year ended December 31, 2018, a total of 3,479,958 phantom units vested and 1,037,522 units were sold back to us by
employees to cover withholding tax requirements related to the vesting of phantom unit awards.  The total cost of these treasury
unit purchases was $27.3 million.  We cancelled such treasury units immediately upon acquisition.  See Note 13 for additional
information regarding our equity-based awards.
See Note 22 for subsequent event information regarding the establishment of a $2.0 billion unit buyback program in January 2019.
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)
Accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) primarily reflects cumulative gain or loss on derivative instruments designated
and qualified as cash flow hedges from inception less gains or losses previously reclassified from accumulated other
comprehensive income (loss) into earnings.  Gain or loss amounts related to cash flow hedges recorded in accumulated other
comprehensive income (loss) are reclassified to earnings in the same period(s) in which the underlying hedged forecasted
transactions affect earnings.  If it becomes probable that a forecasted transaction will not occur, the related net gain or loss in
accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) is immediately reclassified into earnings.
F-34
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The following tables present the components of accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) as reported on our Consolidated
Balance Sheets at the dates indicated:
 
 
  Cash Flow Hedges        
  Commodity
Derivative
Instruments  Interest Rate
Derivative
Instruments  Other   Total  
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss), January 1, 2017  $ (83.8) $ (199.8) $ 3.6  $ (280.0)
Other comprehensive income (loss) for period, before reclassifications   (38.5)  (5.7)  (0.1)  (44.3)
Reclassification of losses (gains) to net income during period   112.2   40.4   --   152.6 
Total other comprehensive income (loss) for period   73.7   34.7   (0.1)  108.3 
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss), December 31, 2017   (10.1)  (165.1)  3.5   (171.7)
Other comprehensive income (loss) for period, before reclassifications   293.2   22.2   (0.5)  314.9 
Reclassification of losses (gains) to net income during period   (130.4)  38.1   --   (92.3)
Total other comprehensive income (loss) for period   162.8   60.3   (0.5)  222.6 
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss), December 31, 2018  $ 152.7  $ (104.8) $ 3.0  $ 50.9 
The following table presents reclassifications of (income) loss out of accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) into net
income during the years indicated:
 
    For the Year Ended December 31, 
 Location  2018   2017  
Losses (gains) on cash flow hedges:        
Interest rate derivatives Interest expense  $ 38.1  $ 40.4 
Commodity derivatives Revenue   (131.7)  111.6 
Commodity derivatives Operating costs and expenses   1.3   0.6 
Total   $ (92.3) $ 152.6 
Noncontrolling Interests
Noncontrolling interests represent third party ownership interests in our consolidated subsidiaries.
Enterprise Navigator Ethylene Terminal LLC
In January 2018, we formed a new business venture with Navigator Ethylene Terminals LLC (“Navigator”) to construct and own an
ethylene export terminal, which is located at Morgan’s Point on the Houston Ship Channel. Navigator holds a noncontrolling 50%
equity interest in Enterprise Navigator Ethylene Terminal LLC, which owns the export facility.
Whitethorn Pipeline Company LLC
In June 2018, an affiliate of Western Gas Partners, LP (“Western”) acquired a noncontrolling 20% equity interest in our subsidiary,
Whitethorn Pipeline Company LLC (“Whitethorn”), for $189.6 million in cash.  This amount is a component of contributions from
noncontrolling interests as presented on our Statement of Consolidated Cash Flows for the year ended December 31, 2018. 
Whitethorn owns the majority of our Midland-to-ECHO 1 Pipeline System.
F-35
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Cash Distributions
The following table presents Enterprise’s declared quarterly cash distribution rates per common unit with respect to the quarter
indicated.  Actual cash distributions are paid by Enterprise within 45 days after the end of each fiscal quarter.
  Distribution
Per
Common Unit Record
DatePayment
Date
2016:        
1st Quarter  $ 0.3950 4/29/2016 5/6/2016
2nd Quarter  $ 0.4000 7/29/2016 8/5/2016
3rd Quarter  $ 0.4050 10/31/2016 11/7/2016
4th Quarter  $ 0.4100 1/31/2017 2/7/2017
2017:          
1st Quarter  $ 0.4150 4/28/2017 5/8/2017
2nd Quarter  $ 0.4200 7/31/2017 8/7/2017
3rd Quarter  $ 0.4225 10/31/2017 11/7/2017
4th Quarter  $ 0.4250 1/31/2018 2/7/2018
2018:          
1st Quarter  $ 0.4275 4/30/2018 5/8/2018
2nd Quarter  $ 0.4300 7/31/2018 8/8/2018
3rd Quarter  $ 0.4325 10/31/2018 11/8/2018
4th Quarter  $ 0.4350 1/31/2019 2/8/2019
In January 2019, based on current expectations, management announced its plans to continue to recommend to the Board an
increase of $0.0025 per unit per quarter to our cash distribution rate with respect to 2019. The anticipated rate of increase would
result in distributions for 2019 (of $1.7650 per unit) being 2.3% higher than those paid for 2018 (of $1.7250 per unit).  The
payment of any quarterly cash distribution is subject to Board approval and management’s evaluation of our financial condition,
results of operations and cash flows in connection with such payment.
Shin Oak NGL Pipeline Option
In May 2018, we granted Apache Corporation (“Apache”) an option to acquire up to a 33% equity interest in our subsidiary that
owns the Shin Oak NGL Pipeline, which entered limited commercial service in February 2019.  In November 2018, Apache
contributed the Shin Oak option to Altus Midstream Company (“Altus”), which is majority-owned by Apache.  The option is
exercisable within sixty days after certain completion milestones are met (as defined in the underlying agreements), which we
expect to occur in the second quarter of 2019.
F-36
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Note 9.  Revenues
We classify our revenues into sales of products and midstream services.  Product sales relate primarily to our various marketing
activities whereas midstream services represent our other integrated businesses (i.e., processing, fractionation, transportation,
storage and terminaling).  The following table presents our revenues by business segment, and further by revenue type, for the
years indicated:
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018 (1)  2017 (2)  2016 (2) 
NGL Pipelines & Services:          
Sales of NGLs and related products  $ 12,920.9  $ 10,521.3  $ 8,380.5 
Segment midstream services:             
Natural gas processing and fractionation   1,341.0   719.1   714.6 
Transportation   1,007.0   891.7   885.6 
Storage and terminals   380.0   335.9   261.8 
Total segment midstream services   2,728.0   1,946.7   1,862.0 
Total NGL Pipelines & Services   15,648.9   12,468.0   10,242.5 
Crude Oil Pipelines & Services:             
Sales of crude oil   10,001.2   7,365.2   5,802.5 
Segment midstream services:             
Transportation   676.5   473.9   411.1 
Storage and terminals   364.9   317.7   301.4 
Total segment midstream services   1,041.4   791.6   712.5 
Total Crude Oil Pipelines & Services   11,042.6   8,156.8   6,515.0 
Natural Gas Pipelines & Services:             
Sales of natural gas   2,411.7   2,238.5   1,591.9 
Segment midstream services:             
Transportation   1,042.7   907.1   951.1 
Total segment midstream services   1,042.7   907.1   951.1 
Total Natural Gas Pipelines & Services   3,454.4   3,145.6   2,543.0 
Petrochemical & Refined Products Services:             
Sales of petrochemicals and refined products   5,535.4   4,696.3   2,921.9 
Segment midstream services:             
Fractionation and isomerization   188.3   156.3   142.6 
Transportation, including marine logistics   481.8   430.7   456.2 
Storage and terminals   182.8   187.8   201.1 
Total segment midstream services   852.9   774.8   799.9 
Total Petrochemical & Refined Products Services   6,388.3   5,471.1   3,721.8 
Total consolidated revenues  $ 36,534.2  $ 29,241.5  $ 23,022.3 
             
(1)    Revenues are accounted for under ASC 606 upon implementation at January 1, 2018.
(2)    Revenues are accounted for under ASC 605 for historical periods prior to January 1, 2018.  
Substantially all of our revenues are derived from contracts with customers as defined within ASC 606.  In total, product sales and
midstream services accounted for 84% and 16%, respectively, of our consolidated revenues for the year ended December 31, 2018. 
During the year ended December 31, 2017, product sales and midstream services accounted for 85% and 15%, respectively, of our
consolidated revenues.  During the year ended December 31, 2016, product sales and midstream services accounted for 81% and
19%, respectively, of our consolidated revenues.
Apart from the following information regarding natural gas processing, we did not have any significant changes in connection with
the adoption of ASC 606.
§ Natural gas processing utilizes service contracts that are either fee-based, commodity-based or a combination of the two. Our
commodity-based contracts include keepwhole, margin-band, percent-of-liquids, percent-of-proceeds and contracts featuring
a combination of commodity and fee-based terms.  When a cash fee for natural gas processing services is stipulated by a
contract, we record revenue as a producer’s natural gas has been processed.
F-37
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Under ASC 605, our natural gas processing business did not recognize revenue in connection with non-cash consideration
(the “equity NGL volumes”) it received under percent-of-liquids and similar arrangements. We recognized revenue when the
associated NGLs were delivered and sold to downstream customers under NGL marketing product sales contracts.
Under ASC 606, our natural gas processing business recognizes the value of the equity NGL volumes it receives from
customers as a form of midstream service revenue. The value assigned to this non-cash consideration and related inventory is
based on the market value of the equity NGLs we are entitled to when the services are performed.  We also recognize revenue,
along with a corresponding cost of sales, when the NGLs are delivered and sold to downstream customers under NGL
marketing product sales contracts.
The additional service revenue recognized for the non-cash consideration increased our total revenues by approximately 2%
for the year ended December 31, 2018 when compared to the amount of revenues we would have recognized under ASC 605
for the year.  Due to the rapid turnover of our inventories of NGL products each month, there was no significant change in our
gross operating margin from natural gas processing and related NGL marketing activities as a result of the changes required
by ASC 606.
The following information describes the nature of our significant revenue streams by segment and type:
NGL Pipelines & Services
Sales of NGLs and related products
NGL marketing activities generate revenues from merchant activities such as spot and term sales of NGLs and related products that
we take title to through our natural gas processing activities (i.e., our equity NGL production) and open market and long-term
contract purchases.  Revenue from these sales contracts is recognized when the NGLs are sold and delivered to customers at
market-based prices.  
Midstream services
Natural gas processing utilizes contracts that are either fee-based, commodity-based or a combination of the two.  When a cash fee
for natural gas processing services is stipulated by a contract, we record revenue when a producer’s natural gas has been processed
and redelivered.  Our commodity-based contracts include keepwhole, margin-band, percent-of-liquids, percent-of-proceeds and
contracts featuring a combination of commodity and fee-based terms. We recognize revenues related to the equity NGLs we receive
under commodity-based contracts (once the processing service has been performed and we are entitled to such volumes) at market
value.
NGL pipeline transportation contracts and tariffs typically generate revenue based on a fixed fee per gallon of liquids multiplied by
the volume transported and delivered (or capacity reserved).  Transportation fees charged to shippers are based on either tariffs
regulated by governmental agencies or contractual arrangements.  Under certain agreements customers are required to ship a
minimum volume with a provision that allows the shipper to make-up any volume shortfalls over an agreed-upon period (referred
to as “make-up rights”).  Revenue pursuant to such agreements is initially deferred and subsequently recognized at the earlier of
when the deficiency volume is shipped, when the likelihood of the shipper’s ability to meet the minimum volume commitment
becomes remote, or when the pipeline is otherwise released from its performance obligation.
NGL fractionation primarily generates revenue under fee-based arrangements.  These fees are contractually subject to adjustment
for changes in certain fractionation expenses (e.g., natural gas fuel costs) and are recognized in the period services are provided.
NGL and related product storage contracts generate revenue from capacity reservations where we collect a fee for reserving storage
capacity for customers in our underground storage wells and above-ground storage tanks.  Under these agreements, revenue is
recognized on a straight-line basis over the reservation period.   In addition, we generally charge customers throughput fees based
on volumes delivered into and subsequently withdrawn from storage, which are recognized as the service is provided.
F-38
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
NGL import and export terminaling activities generate revenue in the period services are provided.  Customers are typically billed a
fee per unit of volume loaded or unloaded.  
Crude Oil Pipelines & Services
Sales of crude oil
Crude oil marketing activities generate revenues from the sale and delivery of crude oil purchased either directly from producers or
on the open market.  Revenue from these sales contracts is recognized when crude oil is sold and delivered to customers at market-
based prices.
Midstream services
Crude oil transportation contracts and tariffs generate revenue based upon a fixed fee per barrel multiplied by the volume
transported and delivered (or capacity reserved).  Transportation fees charged to shippers are based on either tariffs regulated by
governmental agencies or contractual arrangements.  Under certain agreements, customers are required to ship a minimum volume
over an agreed-upon period, with make-up rights.  Revenue pursuant to such agreements is initially deferred and subsequently
recognized at the earlier of when the deficiency volume is shipped, when the likelihood of the shipper’s ability to meet the
minimum volume commitment becomes remote, or when the pipeline is otherwise released from its performance obligation.
Crude oil storage contracts generate revenue from capacity reservations where we collect a fee for reserving storage capacity for
customers at our terminals.  Under these agreements, revenue is recognized on a straight-line basis over the reservation period.  In
addition, customers are billed a fee per unit of volume loaded or unloaded at our terminals.  Revenue is recognized as the service is
provided.
Natural Gas Pipelines & Services
Sales of natural gas
Natural gas marketing activities generate revenue from the sale and delivery of natural gas purchased from producers, regional
natural gas processing plants and on the open market.  Revenue from these sales contracts is recognized when natural gas is sold
and delivered to customers at market-based prices.
Midstream services
Natural gas transportation contracts generate revenues based on a fee per unit of volume transported multiplied by the volume
gathered or delivered.  Transportation fees charged to shippers are based on either tariffs regulated by governmental agencies or
contractual arrangements.  Certain of our natural gas pipelines offer firm capacity reservation services whereby the shipper pays a
contractual fee based on the level of throughput capacity reserved.  Revenues are recognized when the volumes are transported and
delivered to customers or in the period we provide firm capacity services for the shipper.
Petrochemical & Refined Products Services
Sales of petrochemicals and refined products
Our petrochemical marketing activities include the purchase and fractionation of refinery grade propylene obtained on the open
market and generate revenues from the sale and delivery of polymer grade propylene to customers at market-based prices.
Revenues from our PDH facility are dependent on the level of minimum volume commitments by customers and the associated
contractual fees paid by them for polymer grade propylene during a given period.
Revenue from the production and sale of octane additives and high purity isobutylene is dependent on the volume of such
commodities sold and delivered to customers at market-based prices.
Revenue from refined products marketing is dependent on the volume of such commodities purchased on the open market and sold
and delivered to customers at market-based prices.
F-39
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Midstream services
Propylene fractionation and butane isomerization facilities generate revenue through fee-based toll arrangements with customers,
with such arrangements typically including a base-processing fee subject to adjustment for changes in power, fuel and labor
costs.  Revenue resulting from such agreements is recognized in the period the services are provided.
Petrochemical and refined products transportation contracts generate revenue based upon a fixed fee per volume multiplied by the
volume transported and delivered.  Transportation fees charged to shippers are based on either tariffs regulated by governmental
agencies or contractual arrangements.  Marine transportation contracts generate revenue based on set day rates or a set fee per cargo
movement recognized over the transit time of individual tows.  Additionally, we record revenue for the costs of fuel and other
operating costs that are directly reimbursed by our marine customers.
Refined products storage contracts generate revenue from capacity reservations where we collect a fee for reserving storage
capacity for customers at our terminals.  Under these agreements, revenue is recognized on a straight-line basis over the reservation
period.  In addition, customers are billed a fee per unit of volume loaded or unloaded at our terminals.  Revenue is recognized as
the service is provided.
Unbilled Revenue and Deferred Revenue
The following table provides information regarding our contract assets and contract liabilities at December 31, 2018:
Contract Asset Location  Balance 
Unbilled revenue (current amount) Prepaid and other current assets  $ 13.3 
Total   $ 13.3 
Contract Liability Location  Balance 
Deferred revenue (current amount) Other current liabilities  $ 80.9 
Deferred revenue (noncurrent) Other long-term liabilities   210.3 
Total   $ 291.2 
The following table presents significant changes in our unbilled revenue and deferred revenue balances during the year ended
December 31, 2018:
  Unbilled
Revenue  Deferred
Revenue 
Balance at January 1, 2018 (upon adoption of ASC 606)  $ --  $ 224.7 
Amount included in opening balance transferred to other accounts during period (1)   --   (90.8)
Amount recorded during period   321.7   432.5 
Amounts recorded during period transferred to other accounts (1)   (310.6)  (274.8)
Amount recorded in connection with business combination   2.2   -- 
Other changes   --   (0.4)
Balance at December 31, 2018  $ 13.3  $ 291.2 
         
(1) Unbilled revenues are transferred to accounts receivable once we have an unconditional right to consideration from the customer. Deferred revenues are
recognized as revenue upon satisfaction of our performance obligation to the customer.  
F-40
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Remaining Performance Obligations
The following table presents estimated fixed consideration from contracts with customers that contain minimum volume
commitments, deficiency and similar fees and the term of the contracts exceeds one year. These amounts represent the revenues we
expect to recognize in future periods from these contracts at December 31, 2018.  For a significant portion of our revenue, we bill
customers a contractual rate for the services provided multiplied by the amount of volume handled in a given period.  We have the
right to invoice the customer in the amount that corresponds directly with the value of our performance completed to date. 
Therefore, we are not required to disclose information about the variable consideration of remaining performance obligations as we
recognize revenue equal to the amount that we have the right to invoice.
2019  2020  2021  2022  2023  Thereafter  Total 
$ 3,530.6  $ 3,187.3  $ 2,641.4  $ 2,145.0  $ 1,798.7  $ 7,289.9  $ 20,592.9 
Impact of Change in Accounting Policy – ASC 606 Transition Disclosures
The following information and tables are provided to summarize the impacts of adopting ASC 606 on our consolidated financial
statements for the year ended December 31, 2018.
As noted previously, additional service revenue and related inventory is now recognized in connection with the equity NGL
volumes (a form of non-cash consideration) we receive under natural gas processing agreements.  When the inventory is sold
through our NGL marketing activities, we reflect additional cost of sales amounts within our operating costs and expenses.
Unbilled revenues have historically been presented as a component of accounts receivable on our consolidated balance sheets. 
Upon implementation of ASC 606, we reclassified these amounts to “Prepaid and other current assets” since these amounts
represent conditional rights to consideration.  Once we have an unconditional right to consideration, the amount is transferred to
accounts receivable.
Historically, amounts received from customers as CIACs related to pipeline construction activities and production well tie-ins have
been netted against property, plant and equipment on our consolidated balance sheets and presented as a cash inflow within the
investing activities section of our statements of consolidated cash flows. Upon implementation of ASC 606, these amounts are now
recognized as a component of midstream service revenue on our statement of operations and are a component of cash provided by
operating activities as presented on our statements of consolidated cash flows.
Consolidated Balance Sheet Information at December 31, 2018
  Impact of change in accounting policy  
  Balances
without
adoption of
ASC 606  Impact of
adoption of
ASC 606  As
Reported 
Assets          
Accounts receivable – trade, net  $ 3,672.4  $ (13.3) $ 3,659.1 
Prepaid and other current assets   298.2   13.3   311.5 
Property, plant and equipment, net   38,639.3   98.3   38,737.6 
Liabilities and Equity             
Other current liabilities   404.3   0.5   404.8 
Other long-term liabilities   664.8   86.8   751.6 
Partners' equity   23,842.5   11.0   23,853.5 
The impact of adoption of ASC 606 includes the reclassification of unbilled revenue amounts of $13.3 million from accounts
receivable to other current assets.
F-41
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Consolidated Statement of Operations Information for the Year Ended December 31, 2018
  Impact of change in accounting policy  
  Balances
without
adoption of
ASC 606  Impact of
adoption of
ASC 606  As
Reported 
Revenues  $ 35,901.5  $ 632.7  $ 36,534.2 
Costs and expenses:             
Operating costs and expenses:   30,775.6   621.7   31,397.3 
The impact of adopting ASC 606 on revenues for the year ended December 31, 2018 includes the recognition of $621.7 million of
revenues from non-cash consideration (i.e., equity NGLs) earned when providing natural gas processing services and $11.0 million
recognized in connection with CIACs.  Operating costs and expenses for the year ended December 31, 2018 includes $621.7
million attributable to cost of sales recognized when the equity NGL products were sold and delivered to customers.
Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows Information for the Year Ended December 31, 2018
  Impact of change in accounting policy  
  Balances
without
adoption of
ASC 606  Impact of
adoption of
ASC 606  As
Reported 
Operating activities:          
   Net income  $ 4,227.5  $ 11.0  $ 4,238.5 
   Net effect of changes in operating accounts   (71.1)  87.3   16.2 
Investing activities:             
   Contributions in aid of construction costs   87.3   (87.3)  -- 
Note 10.  Business Segments and Related Information
Segment Overview
Our operations are reported under four business segments: (i) NGL Pipelines & Services, (ii) Crude Oil Pipelines & Services, (iii)
Natural Gas Pipelines & Services and (iv) Petrochemical & Refined Products Services.  Our business segments are generally
organized and managed according to the types of services rendered (or technologies employed) and products produced and/or
sold.  
Financial information regarding these segments is evaluated regularly by our chief operating decision makers in deciding how to
allocate resources and in assessing operating and financial performance.  The principal executive and financial officers of our
general partner have been identified as our chief operating decision makers.  While these two officers evaluate results in a number
of different ways, the business segment structure is the primary basis for which the allocation of resources and financial results are
assessed.
The following information summarizes the assets and operations of each business segment (mileage and other statistics are
unaudited):
§Our NGL Pipelines & Services business segment currently includes our natural gas processing plants and associated NGL
marketing activities; approximately 19,200 miles of NGL pipelines; NGL and related product storage facilities; and 16 NGL
fractionators.  This segment also includes our NGL export docks and related operations.
§Our Crude Oil Pipelines & Services business segment currently includes approximately 5,300 miles of crude oil pipelines,
crude oil storage terminals located in Oklahoma and Texas, and associated crude oil marketing activities.  
§Our Natural Gas Pipelines & Services business segment currently includes approximately 19,700 miles of natural gas pipeline
systems that provide for the gathering and transportation of natural gas in Colorado, Louisiana, New Mexico, Texas and
Wyoming.  This segment also includes our natural gas marketing activities.
F-42
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
§Our Petrochemical & Refined Products Services business segment currently includes (i) propylene production facilities, which
include our propylene fractionation units and recently completed PDH facility, approximately 800 miles of pipelines, and
associated marketing operations; (ii) a butane isomerization complex and related deisobutanizer units; (iii) octane enhancement
and high purity isobutylene production facilities; (iv) refined products pipelines aggregating approximately 4,100 miles,
terminals and associated marketing activities; and (v) marine transportation.
Our plants, pipelines and other fixed assets are located in the U.S.
Segment Gross Operating Margin
We evaluate segment performance based on our financial measure of gross operating margin.  Gross operating margin is an
important performance measure of the core profitability of our operations and forms the basis of our internal financial
reporting.  We believe that investors benefit from having access to the same financial measures that our management uses in
evaluating segment results.  Gross operating margin is exclusive of other income and expense transactions, income taxes, the
cumulative effect of changes in accounting principles and extraordinary charges.  Gross operating margin is presented on a 100%
basis before any allocation of earnings to noncontrolling interests.  Our calculation of gross operating margin may or may not be
comparable to similarly titled measures used by other companies.
The following table presents our measurement of total segment gross operating margin for the years indicated.  The GAAP
financial measure most directly comparable to total segment gross operating margin is operating income.
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Operating income  $ 5,408.6  $ 3,928.9  $ 3,580.7 
Adjustments to reconcile operating income to total gross operating margin:             
   Add depreciation, amortization and accretion expense in operating costs and expenses   1,687.0   1,531.3   1,456.7 
   Add asset impairment and related charges in operating costs and expenses   50.5   49.8   52.8 
   Subtract net gains attributable to asset sales in operating costs
      and expenses   (28.7)  (10.7)  (2.5)
   Add general and administrative costs   208.3   181.1   160.1 
Adjustments for make-up rights on certain new pipeline projects:             
   Add non-refundable payments received from shippers attributable to make-up rights (1)   21.5   24.1   17.5 
   Subtract the subsequent recognition of revenues attributable to make-up rights (2)   (56.2)  (29.9)  (34.6)
Total segment gross operating margin  $ 7,291.0  $ 5,674.6  $ 5,230.7 
             
(1) Since make-up rights entail a future performance obligation by the pipeline to the shipper, these receipts are recorded as deferred revenue for GAAP
purposes; however, these receipts are included in gross operating margin in the period of receipt since they are nonrefundable to the shipper.
(2) As deferred revenues attributable to make-up rights are subsequently recognized as revenue under GAAP, gross operating margin must be adjusted to
remove such amounts to prevent duplication since the associated non-refundable payments were previously included in gross operating margin.  
The results of operations from our liquids pipelines are primarily dependent upon the volumes transported and the associated fees
we charge for such transportation services.  Typically, pipeline transportation revenue is recognized when volumes are re-delivered
to customers.  However, under certain pipeline transportation agreements, customers are required to ship a minimum volume over
an agreed-upon period.  These arrangements may entail the shipper paying a transportation fee based on a minimum volume
commitment, with a provision that allows the shipper to make-up any volume shortfalls over the agreed-upon period (referred to as
shipper “make-up rights”).  Revenue pursuant to such agreements is initially deferred and subsequently recognized under GAAP at
the earlier of when the deficiency volume is shipped, when the likelihood of the shipper’s ability to meet the minimum volume
commitment becomes remote, or when the pipeline is otherwise released from its performance obligation.
F-43
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
However, management includes deferred transportation revenues relating to the “make-up rights” of committed shippers when
reviewing the financial results of certain new pipeline projects (Texas Express Pipeline, Front Range Pipeline, ATEX, Aegis Ethane
Pipeline and Seaway Pipeline).  From an internal (and segment) reporting standpoint, management considers the transportation fees
paid by committed shippers on these pipeline projects, including any non-refundable revenues that may be deferred under GAAP
related to make-up rights, to be important in assessing the financial performance of these pipeline assets.  Although the adjustments
for make-up rights are included in segment gross operating margin, our consolidated revenues do not reflect any deferred revenues
until the conditions for recognizing such revenues are met in accordance with GAAP.
Gross operating margin by segment is calculated by subtracting segment operating costs and expenses from segment revenues, with
both segment totals reflecting the adjustments noted in the preceding table, as applicable, and before the elimination of
intercompany transactions.  The following table presents gross operating margin by segment for the years indicated:
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Gross operating margin by segment:          
NGL Pipelines & Services  $ 3,830.7  $ 3,258.3  $ 2,990.6 
Crude Oil Pipelines & Services   1,511.3   987.2   854.6 
Natural Gas Pipelines & Services   891.2   714.5   734.9 
Petrochemical & Refined Products Services   1,057.8   714.6   650.6 
Total segment gross operating margin  $ 7,291.0  $ 5,674.6  $ 5,230.7 
Summarized Segment Financial Information
Information by business segment, together with reconciliations to amounts presented on our Statements of Consolidated
Operations, is presented in the following table:
  Reportable Business Segments        
  NGL
Pipelines
& Services  Crude Oil
Pipelines
& Services  Natural Gas
Pipelines
& Services  Petrochemical
& Refined
Products
Services  Adjustments
and
Eliminations  Consolidated
Total  
Revenues from third parties:                   
Year ended December 31, 2018  $ 15,630.5  $ 10,968.2  $ 3,439.5  $ 6,388.3  $ --  $ 36,426.5 
Year ended December 31, 2017   12,455.7   8,137.2   3,132.5   5,471.1   --   29,196.5 
Year ended December 31, 2016   10,232.7   6,478.7   2,532.4   3,721.8   --   22,965.6 
Revenues from related parties:                         
Year ended December 31, 2018   18.4   74.4   14.9   --   --   107.7 
Year ended December 31, 2017   12.3   19.6   13.1   --   --   45.0 
Year ended December 31, 2016   9.8   36.3   10.6   --   --   56.7 
Intersegment and intrasegment revenues:                        
Year ended December 31, 2018   26,453.6   35,490.4   721.9   2,917.5   (65,583.4)  -- 
Year ended December 31, 2017   27,278.6   15,943.0   850.8   1,766.9   (45,839.3)  -- 
Year ended December 31, 2016   19,150.0   9,052.0   668.5   1,234.8   (30,105.3)  -- 
Total revenues:                         
Year ended December 31, 2018   42,102.5   46,533.0   4,176.3   9,305.8   (65,583.4)  36,534.2 
Year ended December 31, 2017   39,746.6   24,099.8   3,996.4   7,238.0   (45,839.3)  29,241.5 
Year ended December 31, 2016   29,392.5   15,567.0   3,211.5   4,956.6   (30,105.3)  23,022.3 
Equity in income (loss) of unconsolidated
affiliates:                         
Year ended December 31, 2018   117.0   365.4   6.8   (9.2)  --   480.0 
Year ended December 31, 2017   73.4   358.4   3.8   (9.6)  --   426.0 
Year ended December 31, 2016   61.4   311.9   3.8   (15.1)  --   362.0 
Segment revenues include intersegment and intrasegment transactions, which are generally based on transactions made at market-
based rates.  Our consolidated revenues reflect the elimination of intercompany transactions.  Substantially all of our consolidated
revenues are earned in the U.S. and derived from a wide customer base.
F-44
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
We include equity in income of unconsolidated affiliates in our measurement of segment gross operating margin and operating
income.  Equity investments with industry partners are a significant component of our business strategy.  They are a means by
which we conduct our operations to align our interests with those of customers and/or suppliers.  This method of operation enables
us to achieve favorable economies of scale relative to the level of investment and business risk assumed.  Many of these businesses
perform supporting or complementary roles to our other midstream business operations.
Our integrated midstream energy asset network (including the midstream energy assets owned by our equity method investees)
provides services to producers and consumers of natural gas, NGLs, crude oil, refined products and certain petrochemicals.  In
general, hydrocarbons may enter our asset system in a number of ways, such as through a natural gas processing plant, a natural gas
gathering pipeline, a crude oil pipeline or terminal, an NGL fractionator, an NGL storage facility or an NGL gathering or
transportation pipeline. Many of our equity investees are included within our integrated midstream asset network.  For example, we
use the Front Range Pipeline and Texas Express Pipeline to transport mixed NGLs to our Mont Belvieu NGL fractionation and
storage complex and the Seaway Pipeline to transport crude oil to our terminals in the Houston, Texas area.  Given the integral
nature of our equity method investees to our operations, we believe the presentation of equity earnings from such investees as a
component of gross operating margin and operating income is meaningful and appropriate.
Information by business segment, together with reconciliations to our Consolidated Balance Sheet totals, is presented in the
following table:
  Reportable Business Segments        
  NGL
Pipelines
& Services  Crude Oil
Pipelines
& Services  Natural Gas
Pipelines
& Services  Petrochemical
& Refined
Products
Services  Adjustments
and
Eliminations  Consolidated
Total  
Property, plant and equipment, net: (see
Note 4)                   
At December 31, 2018  $ 14,845.4  $ 5,847.7  $ 8,303.8  $ 6,213.9  $ 3,526.8  $ 38,737.6 
At December 31, 2017   13,831.2   5,208.4   8,375.0   3,507.7   4,698.1   35,620.4 
At December 31, 2016   14,091.5   4,216.1   8,403.0   3,261.2   3,320.7   33,292.5 
Investments in unconsolidated affiliates:
(see Note 5)                         
At December 31, 2018   662.0   1,867.5   22.8   62.8   --   2,615.1 
At December 31, 2017   733.9   1,839.2   20.8   65.5   --   2,659.4 
At December 31, 2016   750.4   1,824.6   21.7   80.6   --   2,677.3 
Intangible assets, net: (see Note 6)                         
At December 31, 2018   380.1   2,094.6   979.3   154.4   --   3,608.4 
At December 31, 2017   322.3   2,186.5   1,018.4   163.1   --   3,690.3 
At December 31, 2016   350.2   2,279.0   1,054.5   180.4   --   3,864.1 
Goodwill: (see Note 6)                         
At December 31, 2018   2,651.7   1,841.0   296.3   956.2   --   5,745.2 
At December 31, 2017   2,651.7   1,841.0   296.3   956.2   --   5,745.2 
At December 31, 2016   2,651.7   1,841.0   296.3   956.2   --   5,745.2 
Segment assets:                         
At December 31, 2018   18,539.2   11,650.8   9,602.2   7,387.3   3,526.8   50,706.3 
At December 31, 2017   17,539.1   11,075.1   9,710.5   4,692.5   4,698.1   47,715.3 
At December 31, 2016   17,843.8   10,160.7   9,775.5   4,478.4   3,320.7   45,579.1 
Segment assets consist of property, plant and equipment, investments in unconsolidated affiliates, intangible assets and
goodwill.  The carrying values of such amounts are assigned to each segment based on each asset’s or investment’s principal
operations and contribution to the gross operating margin of that particular segment.  Since construction-in-progress amounts (a
component of property, plant and equipment) generally do not contribute to segment gross operating margin, such amounts are
excluded from segment asset totals until the underlying assets are placed in service.  Intangible assets and goodwill are assigned to
each segment based on the classification of the assets to which they relate.  The remainder of our consolidated total assets, which
consist primarily of working capital assets, are excluded from segment assets since these amounts are not attributable to one
specific segment (e.g. cash).
F-45
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Other Revenue and Expense Information
The following table presents supplemental information regarding our consolidated revenues and costs and expenses for the years
indicated:
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Consolidated revenues:          
NGL Pipelines & Services  $ 15,648.9  $ 12,468.0  $ 10,242.5 
Crude Oil Pipelines & Services   11,042.6   8,156.8   6,515.0 
Natural Gas Pipelines & Services   3,454.4   3,145.6   2,543.0 
Petrochemical & Refined Products Services   6,388.3   5,471.1   3,721.8 
Total consolidated revenues  $ 36,534.2  $ 29,241.5  $ 23,022.3 
             
Consolidated costs and expenses:             
Operating costs and expenses:             
Cost of sales  $ 26,789.8  $ 21,487.0  $ 15,710.9 
Other operating costs and expenses (1)   2,898.7   2,500.1   2,425.6 
Depreciation, amortization and accretion   1,687.0   1,531.3   1,456.7 
Asset impairment and related charges   50.5   49.8   52.8 
Net gains attributable to asset sales   (28.7)  (10.7)  (2.5)
General and administrative costs   208.3   181.1   160.1 
Total consolidated costs and expenses  $ 31,605.6  $ 25,738.6  $ 19,803.6 
  
(1) Represents the cost of operating our plants, pipelines and other fixed assets excluding: depreciation, amortization and accretion charges; asset impairment
and related charges; and net losses (or gains) attributable to asset sales and insurance recoveries.  
Fluctuations in our product sales revenues and related cost of sales amounts are explained in part by changes in energy commodity
prices.  In general, lower energy commodity prices result in a decrease in our revenues attributable to product sales; however, these
lower commodity prices also decrease the associated cost of sales as purchase costs decline.  The same correlation would be true in
the case of higher energy commodity sales prices and purchase costs.
Major Customer Information
Our largest non-affiliated customer for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016 was Vitol Holding B.V. and its affiliates
(collectively, “Vitol”), which accounted for approximately 7.8%, 11.2% and 9.9%, respectively, of our consolidated revenues.  Vitol
is a global energy and commodity trading company.
F-46
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Note 11.  Earnings Per Unit
Basic earnings per unit is computed by dividing net income or loss available to our common unitholders by the weighted-average
number of our distribution-bearing units outstanding during a period. Diluted earnings per unit is computed by dividing net income
or loss attributable to our limited partners by the sum of (i) the weighted-average number of our distribution-bearing units
outstanding during a period (as used in determining basic earnings per unit) and (ii) the weighted-average number of our phantom
units outstanding during a period.
The following table presents our calculation of basic and diluted earnings per unit for the years indicated:
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
BASIC EARNINGS PER UNIT          
Net income attributable to limited partners  $ 4,172.4  $ 2,799.3  $ 2,513.1 
Undistributed earnings allocated and cash payments on phantom unit awards (1)   (21.5)  (15.9)  (12.9)
Net income available to common unitholders  $ 4,150.9  $ 2,783.4  $ 2,500.2 
             
Basic weighted-average number of common units outstanding   2,176.5   2,145.0   2,081.4 
             
Basic earnings per unit  $ 1.91  $ 1.30  $ 1.20 
             
DILUTED EARNINGS PER UNIT             
Net income attributable to limited partners  $ 4,172.4  $ 2,799.3  $ 2,513.1 
             
Diluted weighted-average number of units outstanding:             
Distribution-bearing common units   2,176.5   2,145.0   2,081.4 
Phantom units (1)   10.5   9.3   7.7 
Total   2,187.0   2,154.3   2,089.1 
             
Diluted earnings per unit  $ 1.91  $ 1.30  $ 1.20 
             
(1) Each phantom unit award includes a DER, which entitles the recipient to receive cash payments equal to the product of the number of phantom unit
awards and the cash distribution per unit paid to our common unitholders. Cash payments made in connection with DERs are nonforfeitable. As a result,
the phantom units are considered participating securities for purposes of computing basic earnings per unit.  
Note 12. Business Combinations
Acquisition of Delaware Processing
On March 29, 2018, we acquired the remaining 50% member interest in our Delaware Processing joint venture for $150.6 million
in cash, net of $3.9 million of cash held by the former joint venture.  As a result, Delaware Processing is now our wholly-owned
consolidated subsidiary.  Delaware Processing owns a cryogenic natural gas processing facility having a capacity of 150 million
cubic feet per day (“MMcf/d”).  The facility is located in Reeves County, Texas and entered service in August 2016.  The acquired
business serves growing production of NGL-rich natural gas from the Delaware Basin in West Texas and southern New Mexico.
F-47
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The following table presents the final fair value allocation of assets acquired and liabilities assumed in the acquisition at March 29,
2018.
Purchase price for remaining 50% equity interest in Delaware Processing  $ 154.5 
Fair value of our 50% equity interest in Delaware Processing held before the acquisition   146.4 
   Total  $ 300.9 
Recognized amounts of identifiable assets acquired and liabilities assumed:     
   Assets acquired in business combination:     
  Current assets, including cash of $3.9 million  $ 10.8 
  Property, plant and equipment   200.0 
  Contract-based intangible assets   82.6 
  Customer relationship intangible assets   9.9 
  Total assets acquired  $ 303.3 
   Liabilities assumed in business combination:     
  Current liabilities  $ (1.8)
  Long-term liabilities   (0.6)
  Total liabilities assumed  $ (2.4)
Total identifiable net assets  $ 300.9 
Goodwill  $ -- 
Prior to this acquisition, we accounted for our investment using the equity method.  On a historical pro forma basis, our revenues,
costs and expenses, operating income, net income attributable to Enterprise Products Partners L.P. and earnings per unit amounts
for the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017 would not have differed materially from those we actually reported had the
acquisition been completed on January 1, 2017 rather than March 29, 2018.
At March 29, 2018, our 50% equity investment in Delaware Processing was recorded at $107.0 million.  Upon acquisition of the
remaining 50% member interest, our existing equity investment was remeasured to fair value resulting in the recognition of a non-
cash $39.4 million gain, which is presented within “Other income (expense)” on our Consolidated Statement of Operations for the
year ended December 31, 2018.
The results for this business are reported under the NGL Pipelines & Services business segment.
Acquisition of Azure Midstream
In April 2017, we closed the acquisition of a midstream energy business from Azure Midstream Partners, LP and its operating
subsidiaries (collectively, “Azure”) for $191.4 million in cash.  The acquired business assets, which are located primarily in East
Texas, include over 750 miles of natural gas gathering pipelines and two natural gas processing facilities (Panola and Fairway) with
an aggregate processing capacity of 130 MMcf/d.  The acquired business primarily serves production from the Haynesville Shale
and Bossier, Cotton Valley and Travis Peak formations.
The financial results of the acquired business are reflected in our consolidated results from April 30, 2017, which was the effective
date of the Azure acquisition.  On a historical pro forma consolidated basis, our revenues, costs and expenses, operating income, net
income attributable to Enterprise Products Partners L.P., and earnings per unit amounts for the years ended December 31, 2017 and
2016 would not have differed materially from those we actually reported had the Azure acquisition been completed on January 1,
2016 rather than April 30, 2017.
The following table presents the final fair value allocation of assets acquired and liabilities assumed in the Azure acquisition at
April 30, 2017.
Assets acquired in business combination:    
Current assets  $ 3.1 
Property, plant and equipment   193.1 
Total assets acquired   196.2 
Liabilities assumed in business combination:     
Current liabilities   (1.4)
Long-term liabilities   (3.4)
Total liabilities assumed   (4.8)
Total identifiable net assets  $ 191.4 
F-48
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The contribution of this newly acquired business to our consolidated revenues and net income was not material for the year ended
December 31, 2017.
Note 13.  Equity-Based Awards
An allocated portion of the fair value of EPCO’s equity-based awards is charged to us under the ASA.  The following table
summarizes compensation expense we recognized in connection with equity-based awards for the years indicated:
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Equity-classified awards:          
Phantom unit awards  $ 99.7  $ 92.8  $ 78.6 
Restricted common unit awards   --   0.5   4.7 
Profits interest awards   6.1   6.0   5.4 
Liability-classified awards   0.3   0.4   0.5 
Total  $ 106.1  $ 99.7  $ 89.2 
The fair value of equity-classified awards is amortized into earnings over the requisite service or vesting period.  Equity-classified
awards are expected to result in the issuance of common units upon vesting.  Compensation expense for liability-classified awards
is recognized over the requisite service or vesting period based on the fair value of the award remeasured at each reporting
date.  Liability-classified awards are settled in cash upon vesting.
At December 31, 2018, all of the phantom unit awards outstanding had been granted under the 2008 Plan.  The 2008 Plan is a long-
term incentive plan under which any employee or consultant of EPCO, us or our affiliates that provides services to us, directly or
indirectly, may receive incentive compensation awards in the form of options, restricted common units, phantom units, distribution
equivalent rights (“DERs”), unit appreciation rights (“UARs”), unit awards, other unit-based awards or substitute awards.  Non-
employee directors of our general partner may also participate in the 2008 Plan.  The maximum number of common units
authorized for issuance under the 2008 Plan was 45,000,000 at December 31, 2018.  This amount automatically increased under the
terms of the 2008 Plan by 5,000,000 common units on January 1, 2019 and will continue to automatically increase annually on
January 1 thereafter during the term of the 2008 Plan; provided, however, that in no event shall the maximum aggregate number
exceed 70,000,000 common units.  The 2008 Plan is effective until September 30, 2023 or, if earlier, until the time that all available
common units under the 2008 Plan have been delivered to participants or the time of termination of the 2008 Plan by the Board of
Directors of EPCO or by the Audit and Conflicts Committee.  After giving effect to awards granted under the 2008 Plan through
December 31, 2018, a total of 19,116,132 additional common units were available for issuance.
EPCO has six limited partnerships (generally referred to as “Employee Partnerships”) to serve as long-term incentive arrangements
for key employees of EPCO by providing them a “profits interest” in an Employee Partnership. The Employee Partnerships named
(i) EPD 2018 Unit IV L.P. (“EPD IV”) and (ii) EPCO Unit II L.P. (“EPCO II”) were formed in December 2018.  The Employee
Partnerships named (i) EPD PubCo Unit I L.P. (“PubCo I”), (ii) EPD PubCo Unit II L.P. (“PubCo II”), (iii) EPD PubCo Unit III
L.P. (“PubCo III”) and (iv) EPD PrivCo Unit I L.P. (“PrivCo I”) were formed in 2016.
At December 31, 2018, there were no restricted common unit awards outstanding under the Enterprise Products 1998 Long-Term
Incentive Plan (“1998 Plan”).   The 1998 Plan is effectively closed and no new awards have been granted under this plan since
2014.  The 1998 Plan provided for awards of our common units and other rights to our non-employee directors and to employees of
EPCO and its affiliates providing services to us.  Historically, awards under the 1998 Plan consisted of unit options and restricted
common units.
Phantom Unit Awards
Phantom unit awards allow recipients to acquire our common units (at no cost to the recipient apart from fulfilling service and other
conditions) once a defined vesting period expires, subject to customary forfeiture provisions.  Phantom unit awards generally vest
at a rate of 25% per year beginning one year after the grant date and are non-vested until the required service periods expire.  All of
the phantom unit awards were issued under the 2008 Plan.
F-49
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
At December 31, 2018, substantially all of our phantom unit awards are expected to result in the issuance of common units upon
vesting; therefore, the applicable awards are accounted for as equity-classified awards.  The grant date fair value of a phantom unit
award is based on the market price per unit of our common units on the date of grant. Compensation expense is recognized based
on the grant date fair value, net of an allowance for estimated forfeitures, over the requisite service or vesting period.  
The following table presents phantom unit award activity for the years indicated:
  Number of
Units   Weighted-
Average Grant
Date Fair
Value
per Unit (1) 
Phantom unit awards at January 1, 2016   5,426,949  $ 33.63 
Granted (2)   4,508,310  $ 21.90 
Vested   (1,761,455) $ 33.10 
Forfeited   (406,303) $ 28.52 
Phantom unit awards at December 31, 2016   7,767,501  $ 27.20 
Granted (3)   4,268,920  $ 28.83 
Vested   (2,490,081) $ 28.30 
Forfeited   (256,839) $ 27.60 
Phantom unit awards at December 31, 2017   9,289,501  $ 27.65 
Granted (4)   5,006,181  $ 26.82 
Vested   (3,479,958) $ 28.57 
Forfeited   (482,447) $ 26.88 
Phantom unit awards at December 31, 2018   10,333,277  $ 26.97 
  
(1)      Determined by dividing the aggregate grant date fair value of awards (before an allowance for forfeitures) by the number of awards issued.
(2)     The aggregate grant date fair value of phantom unit awards issued during 2016 was $98.7 million based on a grant date market price of our common units
ranging from $21.86 to $27.39 per unit. An estimated annual forfeiture rate of 3.9% was applied to these awards.
(3)     The aggregate grant date fair value of phantom unit awards issued during 2017 was $123.1 million based on a grant date market price of our common units
ranging from $24.55 to $28.87 per unit. An estimated annual forfeiture rate of 3.8% was applied to these awards.
(4)     The aggregate grant date fair value of phantom unit awards issued during 2018 was $134.3 million based on a grant date market price of our common units
ranging from $25.40 to $29.22 per unit. An estimated annual forfeiture rate of 3.2% was applied to these awards.  
After taking into account tax withholding requirements, we issued 2,442,436, 1,687,692 and 1,170,600 common units in connection
with the vesting of phantom unit awards in the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively.
The 2008 Plan provides for the issuance of DERs in connection with phantom unit awards.  A DER entitles the participant to
nonforfeitable cash payments equal to the product of the number of phantom unit awards outstanding for the participant and the
cash distribution per common unit paid to our common unitholders.  Cash payments made in connection with DERs are charged to
partners’ equity when the phantom unit award is expected to result in the issuance of common units; otherwise, such amounts are
expensed.
The following table presents supplemental information regarding phantom unit awards for the years indicated:
 
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Cash payments made in connection with DERs  $ 17.7  $ 15.1  $ 11.7 
Total intrinsic value of phantom unit awards that vested during period  $ 90.7  $ 69.8  $ 40.9 
 
For the EPCO group of companies, the unrecognized compensation cost associated with phantom unit awards was $104.2 million
at December 31, 2018, of which our share of the cost is currently estimated to be $84.6 million.  Due to the graded vesting
provisions of these awards, we expect to recognize our share of the unrecognized compensation cost for these awards over a
weighted-average period of 2.1 years.
F-50
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Profits Interest Awards
In 2018 and 2016, EPCO Holdings Inc. (“EPCO Holdings”), a privately held affiliate of EPCO, contributed a portion of the
Enterprise common units it owned to each of the Employee Partnerships as disclosed in the table below.  In exchange for these
contributions, EPCO Holdings was admitted as the Class A limited partner of each Employee Partnership. Also on the applicable
contribution date, certain key EPCO employees were issued Class B limited partner interests (i.e., profits interest awards) and
admitted as Class B limited partners of each Employee Partnership, all without any capital contribution by such employees.  EPCO
serves as the general partner of each Employee Partnership.
In general, the Class A limited partner earns a quarterly preferred return (see table below for details) on the number of Enterprise
common units contributed by EPCO Holdings to each Employee Partnership, with any residual cash amount remaining in each
Employee Partnership being paid to the applicable Class B limited partners on a quarterly basis as a distribution. Upon liquidation
of an Employee Partnership, assets having a then current fair market value equal to the Class A limited partner’s capital base in
such Employee Partnership will be distributed to the Class A limited partner. Any remaining assets of such Employee Partnership
will be distributed to the Class B limited partners of such Employee Partnership as a residual profits interest, which represents the
appreciation in value of the Employee Partnership’s assets since the date of EPCO Holdings’ contribution to it, as described above.
Unless otherwise agreed to by EPCO and a majority in interest of the limited partners of each Employee Partnership, such
Employee Partnership will terminate at the earliest to occur of (i) 30 days following its vesting date, (ii) a change of control or (iii)
a dissolution of the Employee Partnership.
Individually, each Class B limited partner interest is subject to forfeiture if the participating employee’s employment with EPCO is
terminated prior to vesting, with customary exceptions for death, disability and certain retirements. The risk of forfeiture will also
lapse upon certain change of control events. Forfeited individual Class B limited partner interests are allocated to the remaining
Class B limited partners.
The following table summarizes key elements of each Employee Partnership as of December 31, 2018:
 
 
 
Employee
Partnership Enterprise
Common Units
Contributed to
Employee Partnership
by EPCO Holdings Class A
Capital
     Base (1)  Class A
Preference
Return (2) Expected
Vesting/
Liquidation
DateEstimated
Grant Date
Fair Value of
Profits Interest
  Awards (3)Unrecognized
Compensation
  Cost (4)
                 
PubCo I   2,723,052 $63.7 million  $ 0.3900 Feb. 2020 $13.0 million $4.3 million
PubCo II   2,834,198 $66.3 million  $ 0.3900 Feb. 2021 $14.9 million $7.3 million
PubCo III   105,000 $2.5 million  $ 0.3900 Apr. 2020 $0.5 million $0.2 million
PrivCo I   1,111,438 $26.0 million  $ 0.3900 Feb. 2021 $5.8 million $0.5 million
EPD IV   6,400,000 $172.9 million  $ 0.4325 Dec. 2023 $26.7 million $23.1 million
EPCO II   1,600,000 $43.2 million  $ 0.4325 Dec. 2023 $6.7 million $0.5 million
 
(1) Represents fair market value of the Enterprise common units contributed to each Employee Partnership at the applicable contribution date.
(2) Each quarter, the Class A limited partner in each Employee Partnership is paid a cash distribution equal to the product of (i) the number of common units
owned by the Employee Partnership and (ii) the Class A Preference Return (subject to equitable adjustment in order to reflect any equity split, equity
distribution or dividend, reverse split, combination, reclassification, recapitalization or other similar event affecting such common units). To the extent that
the Employee Partnership has cash remaining after making this quarterly payment to the Class A limited partner, the residual cash is distributed to the Class
B limited partners on a quarterly basis.
(3) Represents the total grant date fair value of the profits interest awards irrespective of how such costs will be allocated between us and EPCO and its
privately held affiliates.
(4) Represents our expected share of the unrecognized compensation cost at December 31, 2018. We expect to recognize our share of the unrecognized
compensation cost for PubCo I, PubCo II, PubCo III, PrivCo I, EPD IV and EPCO II over a weighted-average period of 1.1 years, 2.1 years, 1.3 years, 2.1
years, 4.9 years and 4.9 years, respectively.
F-51
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The grant date fair value of each Employee Partnership is based on (i) the estimated value (as determined using a Black-Scholes
option pricing model) of such Employee Partnership’s assets that would be distributed to the Class B limited partners thereof upon
liquidation and (ii) the value, based on a discounted cash flow analysis, of the residual quarterly cash amounts that such Class B
limited partners are expected to receive over the life of the Employee Partnership.
The following table summarizes the assumptions we used in applying a Black-Scholes option pricing model to derive that portion
of the estimated grant date fair value of the profits interest awards for each Employee Partnership:
 Expected Risk-Free Expected Expected Unit
Employee Life Interest Distribution Price
Partnership of Award Rate Yield Volatility
PubCo I 4.0 years 0.9% to 2.7% 5.9% to 7.0% 19% to 40%
PubCo II 5.0 years 1.1% to 3.0% 5.9% to 7.0% 19% to 40%
PubCo III 4.0 years 1.0% to 2.2% 6.1% to 6.8% 27% to 40%
PrivCo I 5.0 years 1.2% to 1.6% 6.1% to 6.7% 28% to 40%
EPD IV 5.0 years 2.8% 6.5% 27%
EPCO II 5.0 years 2.8% 6.5% 27%
Compensation expense attributable to the profits interest awards is based on the estimated grant date fair value of each award. A
portion of the fair value of these equity-based awards is allocated to us under the ASA as a non-cash expense. We are not
responsible for reimbursing EPCO for any expenses of the Employee Partnerships, including the value of any contributions of units
made by EPCO Holdings.
Restricted Common Unit Awards
Restricted common unit awards allowed recipients to acquire our common units (at no cost to the recipient apart from fulfilling
service and other conditions) once a defined vesting period expired, subject to customary forfeiture provisions.  Restricted common
unit awards generally vested at a rate of 25% per year beginning one year after the grant date and were non-vested until the
required service periods expired.  No restricted common unit awards have been outstanding since 2017.
The fair value of a restricted common unit award was based on the market price per unit of our common units on the date of
grant.  Compensation expense was recognized based on the grant date fair value, net of an allowance for estimated forfeitures, over
the requisite service or vesting period.
The following table presents restricted common unit award activity for the years indicated:
  Number of
Units   Weighted-
Average Grant
Date Fair
Value
per Unit (1) 
Restricted common units at January 1, 2016   1,960,520  $ 27.88 
Vested   (1,234,502) $ 27.45 
Forfeited   (43,724) $ 28.48 
Restricted common units at December 31, 2016   682,294  $ 28.61 
Vested   (681,044) $ 28.60 
Forfeited   (1,250) $ 31.07 
Restricted common units at December 31, 2017   --  $ N/A 
         
(1) Determined by dividing the aggregate grant date fair value of awards (before an allowance for forfeitures) by the number of awards issued.  
Each recipient of a restricted common unit award was entitled to nonforfeitable cash distributions equal to the product of the
number of restricted common units outstanding for the participant and the cash distribution per unit paid to our common
unitholders.  These distributions were included in “Cash distributions paid to limited partners” as presented on our Statements of
Consolidated Cash Flows.
F-52
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The following table presents supplemental information regarding restricted common unit awards for the years indicated:
  For the Year Ended December 31, 
  2017   2016  
Cash distributions paid to restricted common unitholders  $ 0.3  $ 1.6 
Total intrinsic value of restricted common unit awards that vested during period  $ 18.9  $ 28.5 
Note 14.  Derivative Instruments, Hedging Activities and Fair Value Measurements
In the normal course of our business operations, we are exposed to certain risks, including changes in interest rates and commodity
prices.  In order to manage risks associated with assets, liabilities and certain anticipated future transactions, we use derivative
instruments such as futures, forward contracts, swaps, options and other instruments with similar characteristics.  Substantially all
of our derivatives are used for non-trading activities.
On January 1, 2018, we early adopted ASU 2017-12, Derivatives and Hedging (Topic 815):  Targeted Improvements to Accounting
for Hedging Activities.  Since the impact of the new guidance was not material to our consolidated financial statements, no
transition adjustments were recorded. In accordance with ASU 2017-12 both the effective and ineffective portion of a cash flow
hedge are initially reported as a component of accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) and reclassified into earnings when
the forecasted transaction affects earnings.
Interest Rate Hedging Activities
We may utilize interest rate swaps, forward starting swaps and similar derivative instruments to manage our exposure to changes in
interest rates charged on borrowings under certain consolidated debt agreements.  This strategy may be used in controlling our
overall cost of capital associated with such borrowings.  
As a result of market conditions, we terminated an aggregate $275 million notional amount of forward starting swaps in 2018,
which resulted in cash proceeds totaling $22.1 million. As cash flow hedges, gains on these derivative instruments are reflected as a
component of accumulated other comprehensive income and will be amortized to earnings (as a decrease in interest expense) over a
30-year period beginning in February 2019.  Likewise, in 2017, we terminated an aggregate $275 million notional amount of
forward starting swaps (cash flow hedges), which resulted in cash proceeds totaling $30.6 million that are being amortized to
earnings (as a decrease in interest expense) over the 30-year life of the associated debt through February 2048.  In 2016, we
terminated an aggregate $250 million notional amount of forward starting swaps (cash flow hedges), which resulted in cash
proceeds totaling $6.1 million that are being amortized to earnings (as a decrease in interest expense) over the 30-year life of the
associated debt through September 2047.
In 2018, we sold swaptions related to our interest rate hedging activities that resulted in the recognition of an aggregate $29.4
million of cash gains (swaption premium income) that were reflected as a reduction in interest expense for the year.
Commodity Hedging Activities
The prices of natural gas, NGLs, crude oil, petrochemicals and refined products are subject to fluctuations in response to changes in
supply and demand, market conditions and a variety of additional factors that are beyond our control.  In order to manage such
price risks, we enter into commodity derivative instruments such as physical forward contracts, futures contracts, fixed-for-float
swaps and basis swaps.
F-53
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
At December 31, 2018, our predominant commodity hedging strategies consisted of (i) hedging anticipated future purchases and
sales of commodity products associated with transportation, storage and blending activities, (ii) hedging natural gas processing
margins and (iii) hedging the fair value of commodity products held in inventory.  
§The objective of our anticipated future commodity purchases and sales hedging program is to hedge the margins of certain
transportation, storage, blending and operational activities by locking in purchase and sale prices through the use of derivative
instruments and related contracts.
§The objective of our natural gas processing hedging program is to hedge an amount of earnings associated with these activities.
We achieve this objective by executing fixed-price sales for a portion of our expected equity NGL production using derivative
instruments and related contracts. For certain natural gas processing contracts, the hedging of expected equity NGL production
also involves the purchase of natural gas for shrinkage, which is hedged using derivative instruments and related contracts.
§The objective of our inventory hedging program is to hedge the fair value of commodity products currently held in inventory
by locking in the sales price of the inventory through the use of derivative instruments and related contracts.
The following table summarizes our portfolio of commodity derivative instruments outstanding at December 31, 2018 (volume
measures as noted):
 Volume (1)  Accounting
Derivative Purpose Current (2) Long-Term (2) Treatment
Derivatives designated as hedging instruments:      
Natural gas processing:        
Forecasted natural gas purchases for plant thermal reduction (Bcf)  4.9   n/a  Cash flow hedge
Forecasted sales of NGLs (MMBbls)  1.0   n/a  Cash flow hedge
Octane enhancement:        
Forecasted purchase of NGLs (MMBbls)  1.8   n/a  Cash flow hedge
Forecasted sales of octane enhancement products (MMBbls)  3.1   0.1  Cash flow hedge
Natural gas marketing:        
Natural gas storage inventory management activities (Bcf)  3.3   n/a  Fair value hedge
NGL marketing:        
Forecasted purchases of NGLs and related hydrocarbon products (MMBbls)  33.6   4.3  Cash flow hedge
Forecasted sales of NGLs and related hydrocarbon products (MMBbls)  45.0   1.7  Cash flow hedge
NGLs inventory management activities (MMBbls)  0.3   n/a  Fair value hedge
Refined products marketing:        
Forecasted purchases of refined products (MMBbls)  1.0   n/a  Cash flow hedge
Forecasted sales of refined products (MMBbls)  2.0   n/a  Cash flow hedge
Refined products inventory management activities (MMBbls)  0.5   n/a  Fair value hedge
Crude oil marketing:        
Forecasted purchases of crude oil (MMBbls)  18.4   1.9  Cash flow hedge
Forecasted sales of crude oil (MMBbls)  28.5   1.9  Cash flow hedge
Derivatives not designated as hedging instruments:        
Natural gas risk management activities (Bcf) (3,4)  77.5   0.9  Mark-to-market
NGL risk management activities (MMBbls) (4)  3.3   n/a  Mark-to-market
Refined products risk management activities (MMBbls) (4)  2.6   n/a  Mark-to-market
Crude oil risk management activities (MMBbls) (4)  26.3   3.2  Mark-to-market
 
(1)      Volume for derivatives designated as hedging instruments reflects the total amount of volumes hedged whereas volume for derivatives not designated as
hedging instruments reflects the absolute value of derivative notional volumes.
(2)      The maximum term for derivatives designated as cash flow hedges, derivatives designated as fair value hedges and derivatives not designated as hedging
instruments is December 2020, June 2019 and December 2020, respectively.
(3)      Current volume includes 29.8 Bcf of physical derivative instruments that are predominantly priced at a marked-based index plus a premium or minus a
discount related to location differences.
(4)      Reflects the use of derivative instruments to manage risks associated with transportation, processing and storage assets.
The carrying amount of our inventories subject to fair value hedges was $50.2 million and $84.0 million at December 31, 2018 and
2017, respectively.
F-54
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Certain basis swaps, basis spread options and other derivative instruments not designated as hedging instruments are used to
manage market risks associated with anticipated purchases and sales of commodity products.  There is some uncertainty involved
in the timing of these transactions often due to the development of more favorable profit opportunities or when spreads are
insufficient to cover variable costs thus reducing the likelihood that the transactions will occur during the periods originally
forecasted.  In accordance with derivatives accounting guidance, these instruments do not qualify for hedge accounting even though
they are effective at managing the risk exposures of the underlying assets.  Due to volatility in commodity prices, any non-cash,
mark-to-market earnings variability cannot be predicted.
Tabular Presentation of Fair Value Amounts, and Gains and Losses on
   Derivative Instruments and Related Hedged Items
The following table provides a balance sheet overview of our derivative assets and liabilities at the dates indicated:
 
  Asset Derivatives  Liability Derivatives  
  December 31, 2018  December 31, 2017  December 31, 2018  December 31, 2017  
  Balance
Sheet
Location Fair
Value Balance
Sheet
Location Fair
Value Balance
Sheet
Location Fair
Value Balance
Sheet
Location Fair
Value 
Derivatives designated as hedging instruments  
Interest rate derivatives  Current assets $ -- Current assets $ -- Current
liabilities $ -- Current
liabilities $ 1.5 
Interest rate derivatives Other assets  -- Other assets  0.1 Other
liabilities  -- Other
liabilities  0.2 
Total interest rate derivatives    --    0.1    --    1.7 
Commodity derivatives  Current assets  138.5 Current assets  109.5 Current
liabilities  115.0 Current
liabilities  104.4 
Commodity derivatives Other assets  5.6 Other assets  6.4 Other
liabilities  11.1 Other
liabilities  6.8 
Total commodity derivatives    144.1    115.9    126.1    111.2 
Total derivatives designated
as hedging instruments   $ 144.1   $ 116.0   $ 126.1   $ 112.9 
                       
Derivatives not designated as hedging instruments  
Commodity derivatives  Current assets $ 15.9 Current assets $ 43.9 Current
liabilities $ 33.2 Current
liabilities $ 62.3 
Commodity derivatives Other assets  1.9 Other assets  1.9 Other
liabilities  3.1 Other
liabilities  3.4 
Total commodity derivatives    17.8    45.8    36.3    65.7 
Total derivatives not
designated as hedging
instruments   $ 17.8   $ 45.8   $ 36.3   $ 65.7 
Certain of our commodity derivative instruments are subject to master netting arrangements or similar agreements.  The following
tables present our derivative instruments subject to such arrangements at the dates indicated:
 Offsetting of Financial Assets and Derivative Assets  
       Gross Amounts Not Offset
in the Balance Sheet    
 Gross
Amounts of
Recognized
Assets  Gross
Amounts
Offset in the
Balance Sheet Amounts
of Assets
Presented
in the
Balance Sheet Financial
Instruments  Cash
Collateral
Paid   Cash
Collateral
Received Amounts That
Would Have
Been Presented
On Net Basis 
 (i) (ii) (iii) = (i) – (ii) (iv)  (v) = (iii) + (iv) 
As of December 31,
2018:           
Commodity
derivatives  $ 161.9  $ --  $ 161.9  $ (158.6) $ --  $ --  $ 3.3 
As of December 31,
2017:                             
Interest rate
derivatives  $ 0.1  $ --  $ 0.1  $ (0.1) $ --  $ --  $ -- 
Commodity
derivatives   161.7   --   161.7   (157.8)  --   --   3.9 
F-55
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 Offsetting of Financial Liabilities and Derivative Liabilities  
       Gross Amounts Not Offset
in the Balance Sheet    
 Gross
Amounts of
Recognized
Liabilities Gross
Amounts
Offset in the
Balance Sheet Amounts
of Liabilities
Presented
in the
Balance Sheet Financial
Instruments Cash
Collateral
Paid  Amounts That
Would Have
Been Presented
On Net Basis 
 (i) (ii) (iii) = (i) – (ii) (iv)  (v) = (iii) + (iv) 
As of December 31, 2018:             
Commodity derivatives  $ 162.4  $ --  $ 162.4  $ (158.6) $ (2.3) $ 1.5 
As of December 31, 2017:                         
Interest rate derivatives  $ 1.7  $ --  $ 1.7  $ (0.1) $ --  $ 1.6 
Commodity derivatives   176.9   --   176.9   (157.8)  (17.3)  1.8 
Derivative assets and liabilities recorded on our Consolidated Balance Sheets are presented on a gross-basis and determined at the
individual transaction level.  This presentation method is applied regardless of whether the respective exchange clearing
agreements, counterparty contracts or master netting agreements contain netting language often referred to as “rights of
offset.”  Although derivative amounts are presented on a gross-basis, having rights of offset enable the settlement of a net as
opposed to gross receivable or payable amount under a counterparty default or liquidation scenario.
Cash is paid and received as collateral under certain agreements, particularly for those associated with exchange transactions.  For
any cash collateral payments or receipts, corresponding assets or liabilities are recorded to reflect the variation margin deposits or
receipts with exchange clearing brokers and customers.  These balances are also presented on a gross-basis on our Consolidated
Balance Sheets.
The tabular presentation above provides a means for comparing the gross amount of derivative assets and liabilities, excluding
associated accounts payable and receivable, to the net amount that would likely be receivable or payable under a default scenario
based on the existence of rights of offset in the respective derivative agreements.  Any cash collateral paid or received is reflected in
these tables, but only to the extent that it represents variation margins.  Any amounts associated with derivative prepayments or
initial margins that are not influenced by the derivative asset or liability amounts or those that are determined solely on their
volumetric notional amounts are excluded from these tables.
The following tables present the effect of our derivative instruments designated as fair value hedges on our Statements of
Consolidated Operations for the years indicated:
 Derivatives in Fair Value
Hedging Relationships Location  Gain (Loss) Recognized in
Income on Derivative  
    For the Year Ended December 31,  
   2018   2017   2016  
Interest rate derivatives Interest expense  $ 1.3  $ (0.2) $ 0.3 
Commodity derivatives Revenue   9.9   1.1   (90.5)
Total   $ 11.2  $ 0.9  $ (90.2)
 Derivatives in Fair Value
Hedging Relationships Location  Gain (Loss) Recognized in
Income on Hedged Item  
    For the Year Ended December 31,  
   2018   2017   2016  
Interest rate derivatives Interest expense  $ (1.4) $ 0.4  $ (0.4)
Commodity derivatives Revenue   (6.9)  27.4   125.0 
Total   $ (8.3) $ 27.8  $ 124.6 
F-56
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The following tables present the effect of our derivative instruments designated as cash flow hedges on our Statements of
Consolidated Operations and Statements of Consolidated Comprehensive Income for the years indicated:
Derivatives in Cash Flow
Hedging Relationships  Change in Value Recognized in
Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)
On Derivative  
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Interest rate derivatives  $ 22.2  $ (5.7) $ 42.3 
Commodity derivatives – Revenue (1)   293.0   (33.7)  (197.4)
Commodity derivatives – Operating costs and expenses (1)   0.2   (4.8)  3.6 
Total  $ 315.4  $ (44.2) $ (151.5)
             
(1) The fair value of these derivative instruments will be reclassified to their respective locations on the Statement of Consolidated Operations upon
settlement of the underlying derivative transactions, as appropriate.  
 
Derivatives in Cash Flow
Hedging Relationships Location  Gain (Loss) Reclassified from
Accumulated Other Comprehensive
Income (Loss) to Income  
    For the Year Ended December 31,  
   2018   2017   2016  
Interest rate derivatives Interest expense  $ (38.1) $ (40.4) $ (37.4)
Commodity derivatives Revenue   131.7   (111.6)  (53.6)
Commodity derivatives Operating costs and expenses   (1.3)  (0.6)  0.2 
Total   $ 92.3  $ (152.6) $ (90.8)
Over the next twelve months, we expect to reclassify $38.0 million of losses attributable to interest rate derivative instruments from
accumulated other comprehensive loss to earnings as an increase in interest expense.  Likewise, we expect to reclassify $168.1
million of gains attributable to commodity derivative instruments from accumulated other comprehensive income to earnings,
$166.9 million as an increase in revenue and $1.2 million as a decrease to operating costs and expenses.
The following table presents the effect of our derivative instruments not designated as hedging instruments on our Statements of
Consolidated Operations for the years indicated:
Derivatives Not Designated as
Hedging Instruments Location  Gain (Loss) Recognized in
Income on Derivative  
    For the Year Ended December 31,  
   2018   2017   2016  
Commodity derivatives Revenue  $ (462.9) $ (42.7) $ (38.4)
Commodity derivatives Operating costs and expenses   8.2   0.1   (0.4)
Total   $ (454.7) $ (42.6) $ (38.8)
The $454.7 million loss recognized in 2018 from derivatives not designated as hedging instruments (as noted in the preceding
table) reflects $443.8 million of realized losses and $10.9 million of net unrealized mark-to-market losses.
In the aggregate, our net unrealized mark-to-market loss for the year ended December 31, 2018 attributable to derivatives
designated as fair value hedges and derivatives not designated as hedging instruments was $19.1 million.  The following table
summarizes the impact of this net unrealized loss on our gross operating margin by segment for the year ended December 31, 2018:
Unrealized mark-to-market gains (losses) by segment:    
NGL Pipelines & Services  $ 18.0 
Crude Oil Pipelines & Services   (44.1)
Natural Gas Pipelines & Services   5.3 
Petrochemical & Refined Products Services   1.7 
Total  $ (19.1)
F-57
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Fair Value Measurements
The following tables set forth, by level within the Level 1, 2 and 3 fair value hierarchy (see Note 2), the carrying values of our
financial assets and liabilities at the dates indicated. These assets and liabilities are measured on a recurring basis and are classified
based on the lowest level of input used to estimate their fair value. Our assessment of the relative significance of such inputs
requires judgment.
The values for commodity derivatives are presented before and after the application of Chicago Mercantile Exchange (“CME”)
Rule 814, which deems that financial instruments cleared by the CME are settled daily in connection with variation margin
payments.  As a result of this exchange rule, CME-related derivatives are considered to have no fair value at the balance sheet date
for financial reporting purposes; however, the derivatives remain outstanding and subject to future commodity price fluctuations
until they are settled in accordance with their contractual terms.  Derivative transactions cleared on exchanges other than the CME
(e.g., the Intercontinental Exchange or ICE) continue to be reported on a gross basis.
  At December 31, 2018
Fair Value Measurements Using     
  Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical
Assets
and Liabilities
(Level 1)  Significant
Other
Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)  Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3)  Total  
Financial assets:             
Commodity derivatives:             
   Value before application of CME Rule 814  $ 172.3  $ 282.4  $ 2.2  $ 456.9 
   Impact of CME Rule 814 change   (134.8)  (159.3)  (0.9)  (295.0)
   Total commodity derivatives   37.5   123.1   1.3   161.9 
Total  $ 37.5  $ 123.1  $ 1.3  $ 161.9 
                 
Financial liabilities:                 
Liquidity Option Agreement (see Note 17)  $ --  $ --  $ 390.0  $ 390.0 
Commodity derivatives:                 
   Value before application of CME Rule 814   85.5   291.2   21.4   398.1 
   Impact of CME Rule 814 change   (48.6)  (172.9)  (14.2)  (235.7)
   Total commodity derivatives   36.9   118.3   7.2   162.4 
Total  $ 36.9  $ 118.3  $ 397.2  $ 552.4 
In the aggregate, the fair value of our commodity hedging portfolios at December 31, 2018 was a net derivative asset of $58.8
million prior to the impact of CME Rule 814.
F-58
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
  At December 31, 2017
Fair Value Measurements Using     
  Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical
Assets
and Liabilities
(Level 1)  Significant
Other
Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)  Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3)  Total  
Financial assets:             
Interest rate derivatives  $ --  $ 0.1  $ --  $ 0.1 
Commodity derivatives:                 
   Value before application of CME Rule 814   47.1   184.9   2.9   234.9 
   Impact of CME Rule 814 change   (47.1)  (26.1)  --   (73.2)
   Total commodity derivatives   --   158.8   2.9   161.7 
Total  $ --  $ 158.9  $ 2.9  $ 161.8 
                 
Financial liabilities:                 
Liquidity Option Agreement (see Note 17)  $ --  $ --  $ 333.9  $ 333.9 
Interest rate derivatives   --   1.7   --   1.7 
Commodity derivatives:                 
   Value before application of CME Rule 814   118.4   270.6   1.7   390.7 
   Impact of CME Rule 814 change   (118.4)  (95.4)  --   (213.8)
   Total commodity derivatives   --   175.2   1.7   176.9 
Total  $ --  $ 176.9  $ 335.6  $ 512.5 
The following tables provide quantitative information regarding our recurring Level 3 fair value measurements for commodity
derivatives at the dates indicated:
  Fair Value At
December 31, 2018       
  Financial
Assets   Financial
Liabilities Valuation
Techniques Unobservable Input Range
Commodity derivatives –
Crude oil  $ 0.9  $ 0.8 Discounted cash flow Forward commodity prices $37.59-$51.99/barrel
Commodity derivatives –
Ethane   0.4   0.6 Discounted cash flow Forward commodity prices $0.28-$0.31/gallon
Commodity derivatives –
Propane   --   1.0 Discounted cash flow Forward commodity prices $0.61-$0.66/gallon
Commodity derivatives –
Normal butane   --   0.7 Discounted cash flow Forward commodity prices $0.66-$0.72/gallon
Commodity derivatives –
Natural gasoline   --   4.1 Discounted cash flow Forward commodity prices $0.99-$1.01/gallon
Total  $ 1.3  $ 7.2      
  Fair Value At
December 31, 2017       
  Financial
Assets   Financial
Liabilities Valuation
Techniques Unobservable Input Range
Commodity derivatives –
Crude oil  $ 2.9  $ 1.7 Discounted cash flow Forward commodity prices $60.21-$66.05/barrel
Total  $ 2.9  $ 1.7      
With respect to commodity derivatives, we believe forward commodity prices are the most significant unobservable inputs in
determining our Level 3 recurring fair value measurements at December 31, 2018.  In general, changes in the price of the
underlying commodity increases or decreases the fair value of a commodity derivative depending on whether the derivative was
purchased or sold.  We generally expect changes in the fair value of our derivative instruments to be offset by corresponding
changes in the fair value of our hedged exposures.
The recurring fair value measurement pertaining to the Liquidity Option Agreement is based on a number of Level 3 inputs. See
Note 17 for a discussion of this liability.
F-59
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The following table sets forth a reconciliation of changes in the fair values of our recurring Level 3 financial assets and liabilities
on a combined basis for the years indicated:
    For the Year Ended December 31, 
Location  2018   2017  
Financial asset (liability) balance, net, January 1   $ (332.7) $ (268.2)
Total gains (losses) included in:          
Net income (1) Revenue   0.7   2.3 
Net income Other expense, net – Liquidity Option Agreement   (56.1)  (64.3)
Other comprehensive income (loss)Commodity derivative instruments – changes in fair value of
cash flow hedges   (3.2)  0.1 
Settlements (1) Revenue   (1.9)  (2.4)
Transfers out of Level 3 (2)    (2.7)  (0.2)
Financial liability balance, net, December 31 (2)   $ (395.9) $ (332.7)
  
(1) There were $1.2 million and $0.1 million of unrealized losses included in these amounts for the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively.
(2) Transfers out of Level 3 into Level 2 were due to shorter remaining transaction maturities falling inside of the Level 2 range at December 31, 2018 and
2017.  
Nonrecurring Fair Value Measurements
Long-lived assets (including intangible assets with finite useful lives and property, plant and equipment) are reviewed for
impairment (i.e., subject to nonrecurring fair value measurements) when events or changes in circumstances indicate that the
carrying amount of such assets may not be recoverable. Long-lived assets with carrying values that are not expected to be
recovered through future cash flows are written-down to their estimated fair values. Similarly, we evaluate our equity method
investments for impairment to determine whether there are events or changes in circumstances that indicate there is a loss in value
of the investment attributable to an other than temporary decline.  In the event we determine that the loss in value of an investment
is an other than temporary decline, we record a non-cash impairment charge to equity earnings to adjust the carrying value of the
investment to its estimated fair value.  
The following table summarizes our non-cash asset impairment charges by segment during the years indicated:
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
NGL Pipelines & Services  $ 18.6  $ 11.5  $ 21.0 
Crude Oil Pipelines & Services   11.2   10.2   2.3 
Natural Gas Pipelines & Services   13.9   14.3   12.3 
Petrochemical & Refined Products Services   3.1   1.8   9.6 
Total  $ 46.8  $ 37.8  $ 45.2 
As presented in the following tables, our estimated fair values were based on management’s expectation of the market values for
such assets based on their knowledge and experience in the industry (a Level 3 type measure involving significant unobservable
inputs).  In many cases, there are no active markets (Level 1) or other similar recent transactions (Level 2) to compare to.  Our
assumptions used in such analyses are based on the highest and best use of the asset and includes estimated probabilities where
multiple cash flow outcomes are possible.
When probability weights are used, the weights are generally obtained from business management personnel having oversight
responsibilities for the assets being tested.  Key commercial assumptions (e.g., anticipated operating margins, throughput or
processing volume growth rates, timing of cash flows, etc.) that represent Level 3 unobservable inputs and test results are reviewed
and certified by members of senior management.
There were no impairment charges related to our equity method investments during the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 or
2016.
F-60
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The following table presents categories of long-lived assets, primarily property, plant and equipment, that were subject to non-
recurring fair value measurements during the year ended December 31, 2018:
   Fair Value Measurements
at the End of the Reporting Period Using    
 Carrying
Value at
December 31,
2018  Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical
Assets
(Level 1) Significant
Other
Observable
Inputs
(Level 2) Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3) Total
Non-Cash
Impairment
Loss  
Long-lived assets disposed of other than by sale  $ --  $ --  $ --  $ --  $ 43.7 
Long-lived assets held and used   --   --   --   --   3.1 
Total                  $ 46.8 
Total non-cash asset impairment and related charges during 2018 were $50.5 million, which consisted of $46.8 million of
impairment charges attributable to long-lived assets and $3.7 million of impairment charges attributable to the write-down of
surplus materials classified as current assets.  Impairment charges attributable to long-lived assets were primarily due to the
planned abandonment of certain terminal and natural gas processing plants in Texas.
The following table presents categories of long-lived assets, primarily property, plant and equipment, that were subject to non-
recurring fair value measurements during the year ended December 31, 2017:
     Fair Value Measurements
at the End of the Reporting Period Using     
  Carrying
Value at
December 31,
2017   Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical
Assets
(Level 1)  Significant
Other
Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)  Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3)  Total
Non-Cash
Impairment
Loss  
Long-lived assets disposed of other than by sale  $ --  $ --  $ --  $ --  $ 16.7 
Long-lived assets held and used   1.5   --   --   1.5   15.4 
Long-lived assets held for sale   2.5   --   --   2.5   2.5 
Long-lived assets disposed of by sale   --   --   --   --   3.2 
Total                  $ 37.8 
Total non-cash asset impairment and related charges during 2017 were $49.8 million, which consisted of $37.8 million of
impairment charges attributable to long-lived assets and $12.0 million of impairment charges attributable to the write-down of
surplus materials classified as current assets.  Impairment charges attributable to long-lived assets were primarily due to the write-
down of certain natural gas pipeline laterals and other pipelines in Texas, which accounted for $13.0 million in charges, and for the
planned abandonment of certain storage and pipeline assets in Texas, which accounted for an additional $12.4 million in charges.
F-61
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The following table presents categories of long-lived assets that were subject to non-recurring fair value measurements during the
year ended December 31, 2016:
     Fair Value Measurements
at the End of the Reporting Period Using     
  Carrying
Value at
December 31,
2016   Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical
Assets
(Level 1)  Significant
Other
Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)  Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3)  Total
Non-Cash
Impairment
Loss  
Long-lived assets disposed of other than by sale  $ --  $ --  $ --  $ --  $ 29.9 
Long-lived assets held  and used   8.0   8.0   --   --   2.2 
Long-lived assets disposed of by sale   --   --   --   --   13.1 
Total                  $ 45.2 
Total non -cash asset impairment and related charges during 2016 were $53.5 million, which consisted of $45.2 million of
impairment charges attributable to long-lived assets, $1.2 million of impairment charges attributable to the write-down of surplus
materials classified as current assets, and $7.1 million of related charges for equipment destroyed by fire at our Pascagoula gas
plant.  Impairment charges attributable to long-lived assets primarily relate to the planned abandonment of certain plant and
pipeline assets in Texas and New Mexico.
Other Fair Value Information
The carrying amounts of cash and cash equivalents (including restricted cash balances), accounts receivable, commercial paper
notes and accounts payable approximate their fair values based on their short-term nature.  
The estimated total fair value of our fixed-rate debt obligations was $25.97 billion and $23.47 billion at December 31, 2018 and
2017, respectively.  The aggregate carrying value of these debt obligations was $26.15 billion and $21.48 billion at December 31,
2018 and 2017, respectively.  These values are primarily based on quoted market prices for such debt or debt of similar terms and
maturities (Level 2) and our credit standing.  Changes in market rates of interest affect the fair value of our fixed-rate debt.  The
amounts reported for fixed-rate debt obligations exclude those amounts hedged using fixed-to-floating interest rate swaps.  See
“Interest Rate Hedging Activities” within this Note 14 for additional information.  
The carrying values of our variable-rate long-term debt obligations approximate their fair values since the associated interest rates
are market-based.  We do not have any long-term investments in debt or equity securities recorded at fair value.
Note 15.  Related Party Transactions
The following table summarizes our related party transactions for the years indicated:
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Revenues – related parties:          
Unconsolidated affiliates  $ 107.7  $ 45.0  $ 56.7 
Costs and expenses – related parties:             
EPCO and its privately held affiliates  $ 1,089.6  $ 1,010.9  $ 963.2 
Unconsolidated affiliates   447.4   223.4   253.9 
Total  $ 1,537.0  $ 1,234.3  $ 1,217.1 
F-62
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The following table summarizes our related party accounts receivable and accounts payable balances at the dates indicated:
  December 31,  
  2018   2017  
Accounts receivable - related parties:       
Unconsolidated affiliates  $ 3.5  $ 1.8 
         
Accounts payable - related parties:         
EPCO and its privately held affiliates  $ 116.3  $ 99.3 
Unconsolidated affiliates   23.9   28.0 
Total  $ 140.2  $ 127.3 
We believe that the terms and provisions of our related party agreements are fair to us; however, such agreements and transactions
may not be as favorable to us as we could have obtained from unaffiliated third parties.
Relationship with EPCO and Affiliates
We have an extensive and ongoing relationship with EPCO and its privately held affiliates (including Enterprise GP, our general
partner), which are not a part of our consolidated group of companies.  
At December 31, 2018, EPCO and its privately held affiliates (including Dan Duncan LLC and certain Duncan family trusts)
beneficially owned the following limited partner interests in us:
Total Number
 of UnitsPercentage of
Total Units
Outstanding
697,529,483 31.9%
Of the total number of units held by EPCO and its privately held affiliates, 108,222,618 have been pledged as security under the
credit facilities of EPCO and its privately held affiliates at December 31, 2018.  These credit facilities contain customary and other
events of default, including defaults by us and other affiliates of EPCO.  An event of default, followed by a foreclosure on the
pledged collateral, could ultimately result in a change in ownership of these units and affect the market price of our common units.
We and Enterprise GP are both separate legal entities apart from each other and apart from EPCO and its other affiliates, with assets
and liabilities that are also separate from those of EPCO and its other affiliates.  EPCO and its privately held affiliates depend on
the cash distributions they receive from us and other investments to fund their other activities and to meet their debt
obligations.  During the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, we paid EPCO and its privately held affiliates cash
distributions totaling $1.16 billion, $1.12 billion and $1.07 billion, respectively.
From time-to-time, EPCO and its privately held affiliates elect to purchase additional common units under our DRIP and our ATM
program.  During the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, privately held affiliates of EPCO reinvested $213 million,
$100 million and $100 million, respectively, through our DRIP.  In addition, during 2016, privately held affiliates of EPCO
purchased common units from us under our ATM program, generating gross proceeds of $100 million.  See Note 8 for additional
information regarding our DRIP and ATM program.
We lease office space from affiliates of EPCO.  The rental rates in these lease agreements approximate market rates.
EPCO ASA.  We have no employees.  All of our operating functions and general and administrative support services are provided
by employees of EPCO pursuant to the ASA or by other service providers.  We and our general partner are parties to the ASA.  The
significant terms of the ASA are as follows:
§EPCO will provide selling, general and administrative services and management and operating services as may be necessary to
manage and operate our businesses, properties and assets (all in accordance with prudent industry practices).  EPCO will
employ or otherwise retain the services of such personnel.
F-63
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
§We are required to reimburse EPCO for its services in an amount equal to the sum of all costs and expenses incurred by EPCO
which are directly or indirectly related to our business or activities (including expenses reasonably allocated to us by
EPCO).  In addition, we have agreed to pay all sales, use, excise, value added or similar taxes, if any, that may be applicable
from time to time with respect to the services provided to us by EPCO.
§EPCO will allow us to participate as a named insured in its overall insurance program, with the associated premiums and other
costs being allocated to us.  See Note 18 for additional information regarding our insurance programs.
Our operating costs and expenses include amounts paid to EPCO for the costs it incurs to operate our facilities, including the
compensation of its employees.  We reimburse EPCO for actual direct and indirect expenses it incurs related to the operation of our
assets.  Likewise, our general and administrative costs include amounts paid to EPCO for administrative services, including the
compensation of its employees.  In general, our reimbursement to EPCO for administrative services is either (i) on an actual basis
for direct expenses it may incur on our behalf (e.g., the purchase of office supplies) or (ii) based on an allocation of such charges
between the various parties to the ASA based on the estimated use of such services by each party (e.g., the allocation of legal or
accounting salaries based on estimates of time spent on each entity’s business and affairs).
The following table presents our related party costs and expenses attributable to the ASA with EPCO for the years indicated:
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Operating costs and expenses  $ 948.8  $ 882.1  $ 840.7 
General and administrative expenses   124.2   110.4   105.3 
     Total costs and expenses  $ 1,073.0  $ 992.5  $ 946.0 
Since the vast majority of such expenses are charged to us on an actual basis (i.e., no mark-up is charged or subsidy is received), we
believe that such expenses are representative of what the amounts would have been on a standalone basis.  With respect to allocated
costs, we believe that the proportional direct allocation method employed by EPCO is reasonable and reflective of the estimated
level of costs we would have incurred on a standalone basis.
Relationships with Unconsolidated Affiliates
Many of our unconsolidated affiliates perform supporting or complementary roles to our other business operations.  The following
information summarizes significant related party transactions with our current unconsolidated affiliates:
§For the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, we paid Seaway $163.2 million, $98.8 million and $161.2 million,
respectively, for pipeline transportation and storage services in connection with our crude oil marketing activities.  Revenues
from Seaway were $74.4 million, $19.6 million and $36.3 million for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016,
respectively.
§During the year ended December 31, 2018, we purchased $157.9 million of NGLs from VESCO.
§We pay Promix for the transportation, storage and fractionation of NGLs.  In addition, we sell natural gas to Promix for its
plant fuel requirements.  Revenues from Promix were $9.5 million, $7.8 million and $7.0 million for the years ended
December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively.  Expenses with Promix were $31.9 million, $27.8 million and $27.1 million
for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively.
§For the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, we paid Texas Express $57.6 million, $29.5 million and $22.8
million, respectively, for pipeline transportation services.  
§For the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, we paid Eagle Ford Crude Oil Pipeline $18.5 million, $42.8 million
and $39.4 million, respectively, for crude oil transportation.
F-64
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
§We perform management services for certain of our unconsolidated affiliates.  We charged such affiliates $11.6 million, $10.6
million and $10.7 million for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively.
Note 16.  Provision for Income Taxes
Publicly traded partnerships like ours are treated as corporations unless they have 90% or more in “qualifying income” (as that term
is defined in the Internal Revenue Code).  We satisfied this requirement in each of the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and
2016 and, as a result, are not subject to federal income tax.  However, our partners are individually responsible for paying federal
income tax on their share of our taxable income.  Net earnings for financial reporting purposes may differ significantly from
taxable income reportable to our unitholders as a result of differences between the tax basis and financial reporting basis of certain
assets and liabilities and other factors.  We do not have access to information regarding each partner’s individual tax basis in our
limited partner interests.  
Provision for income taxes primarily reflects our state tax obligations under the Revised Texas Franchise Tax (the “Texas Margin
Tax”).  Deferred income tax assets and liabilities are recognized for temporary differences between the assets and liabilities of our
tax paying entities for financial reporting and tax purposes.
Our federal, state and foreign income tax provision (benefit) is summarized below:
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Current:          
Federal  $ 5.3  $ 0.1  $ (0.5)
State   33.1   18.5   16.7 
Foreign   0.5   1.0   0.6 
Total current   38.9   19.6   16.8 
Deferred:             
Federal   (0.3)  (1.8)  1.1 
State   21.7   7.9   5.2 
Foreign   --   --   0.3 
Total deferred   21.4   6.1   6.6 
Total provision for income taxes  $ 60.3  $ 25.7  $ 23.4 
A reconciliation of the provision for income taxes with amounts determined by applying the statutory U.S. federal income tax rate
to income before income taxes is as follows:
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Pre-Tax Net Book Income (“NBI”)  $ 4,298.8  $ 2,881.3  $ 2,576.4 
             
Texas Margin Tax (1)  $ 54.8  $ 26.4  $ 22.1 
State income taxes (net of federal benefit)   0.2   0.5   0.2 
Federal income taxes computed by applying the federal 
statutory rate to NBI of corporate entities   2.1   0.1   0.8 
Other permanent differences   3.2   (1.3)  0.3 
Provision for income taxes  $ 60.3  $ 25.7  $ 23.4 
             
Effective income tax rate   1.4%  0.9%  0.9%
  
(1) Although the Texas Margin Tax is not considered a state income tax, it has the characteristics of an income tax since it is determined by applying a tax rate
to a base that considers our Texas-sourced revenues and expenses.  
F-65
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The following table presents the significant components of deferred tax assets and deferred tax liabilities at the dates indicated:
  December 31,  
  2018   2017  
Deferred tax assets:       
Net operating loss carryovers (1)  $ 0.1  $ 0.2 
Accruals   2.6   1.4 
Total deferred tax assets   2.7   1.6 
Less:  Deferred tax liabilities:         
Property, plant and equipment   80.8   58.0 
Equity investment in partnerships   2.3   2.1 
Total deferred tax liabilities   83.1   60.1 
Total net deferred tax liabilities  $ 80.4  $ 58.5 
  
(1) These losses expire in various years between 2019 and 2033 and are subject to limitations on their utilization.  
Accounting guidance provides that a tax benefit from an uncertain tax position may be recognized when it is more likely than not
that the position will be sustained upon examination, including resolutions of any related appeals or litigation processes, based on
the technical merits.  We did not rely on any uncertain tax positions in recording our income tax-related amounts during the years
ended December 31, 2018, 2017 or 2016.
Note 17.  Commitments and Contingencies
Litigation
As part of our normal business activities, we may be named as defendants in legal proceedings, including those arising from
regulatory and environmental matters.  Although we are insured against various risks to the extent we believe it is prudent, there is
no assurance that the nature and amount of such insurance will be adequate, in every case, to fully indemnify us against losses
arising from future legal proceedings.  We will vigorously defend the partnership in litigation matters.
Management has regular quarterly litigation reviews, including updates from legal counsel, to assess the possible need for
accounting recognition and disclosure of these contingencies.  We accrue an undiscounted liability for those contingencies where
the loss is probable and the amount can be reasonably estimated.  If a range of probable loss amounts can be reasonably estimated
and no amount within the range is a better estimate than any other amount, then the minimum amount in the range is accrued.
We do not record a contingent liability when the likelihood of loss is probable but the amount cannot be reasonably estimated or
when the likelihood of loss is believed to be only reasonably possible or remote.  For contingencies where an unfavorable outcome
is reasonably possible and the impact would be material to our consolidated financial statements, we disclose the nature of the
contingency and, where feasible, an estimate of the possible loss or range of loss.  Based on a consideration of all relevant known
facts and circumstances, we do not believe that the ultimate outcome of any currently pending litigation directed against us will
have a material impact on our consolidated financial statements either individually at the claim level or in the aggregate.
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, our accruals for litigation contingencies were $0.5 million and $4.5 million, respectively, and
were recorded in our Consolidated Balance Sheets as a component of “Other current liabilities.”  Our evaluation of litigation
contingencies is based on the facts and circumstances of each case and predicting the outcome of these matters involves
uncertainties.  In the event the assumptions we use to evaluate these matters change in future periods or new information becomes
available, we may be required to record additional accruals.  In an effort to mitigate expenses associated with litigation, we may
settle legal proceedings out of court.
F-66
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Energy Transfer Matter
In connection with a proposed pipeline project, we and ETP signed a non-binding letter of intent in April 2011 that disclaimed any
partnership or joint venture related to such project absent executed definitive documents and board approvals of the respective
companies.  Definitive agreements were never executed and board approval was never obtained for the potential pipeline
project.  In August 2011, the proposed pipeline project was cancelled due to a lack of customer support.
In September 2011, ETP filed suit against us and a third party in connection with the cancelled project alleging, among other things,
that we and ETP had formed a “partnership.”  The case was tried in the District Court of Dallas County, Texas, 298th Judicial
District.  While we firmly believe, and argued during our defense, that no agreement was ever executed forming a legal joint
venture or partnership between the parties, the jury found that the actions of the two companies, nevertheless, constituted a legal
partnership.  As a result, the jury found that ETP was wrongfully excluded from a subsequent pipeline project involving a third
party, and awarded ETP $319.4 million in actual damages on March 4, 2014.  On July 29, 2014, the trial court entered judgment
against us in an aggregate amount of $535.8 million, which included (i) $319.4 million as the amount of actual damages awarded
by the jury, (ii) an additional $150.0 million in disgorgement for the alleged benefit we received due to a breach of fiduciary duties
by us against ETP and (iii) prejudgment interest in the amount of $66.4 million.  The trial court also awarded post-judgment interest
on such aggregate amount, to accrue at a rate of 5%, compounded annually.
We filed our Brief of the Appellant in the Court of Appeals for the Fifth District of Dallas, Texas on March 30, 2015 and ETP filed
its Brief of Appellees on June 29, 2015.  We filed our Reply Brief of Appellant on September 18, 2015.  Oral argument was
conducted on April 20, 2016, and the case was then submitted to the Court of Appeals for its consideration.  On July 18, 2017, a
panel of the Court of Appeals issued a unanimous opinion reversing the trial court’s judgment as to all of ETP’s claims against us,
rendering judgment that ETP take nothing on those claims, and affirming our counterclaim against ETP of $0.8 million, plus
interest.
On August 31, 2017, ETP filed a motion for rehearing before the Dallas Court of Appeals, which was denied on September 13,
2017. On December 27, 2017, ETP filed its Petition for Review with the Supreme Court of Texas and we filed our Response to the
Petition for Review on February 26, 2018.  On June 8, 2018, the Supreme Court of Texas requested that the parties file briefs on the
merits, and the parties have filed their respective submittals.  As of December 31, 2018, we have not recorded a provision for this
matter as management continues to believe that payment of damages by us in this case is not probable. We continue to monitor
developments involving this matter.
PDH Litigation
In July 2013, we executed a contract with Foster Wheeler USA Corporation (“Foster Wheeler”) pursuant to which Foster Wheeler
was to serve as the general contractor responsible for the engineering, procurement, construction and installation of our propane
dehydrogenation (“PDH”) facility.  In November 2014, Foster Wheeler was acquired by an affiliate of AMEC plc to form Amec
Foster Wheeler plc, and Foster Wheeler is now known as Amec Foster Wheeler USA Corporation (“AFW”).  In December 2015,
Enterprise and AFW entered into a transition services agreement under which AFW was partially terminated from the PDH project. 
In December 2015, Enterprise engaged a second contractor, Optimized Process Designs LLC, to complete the construction and
installation of the PDH facility.
On September 2, 2016, we terminated AFW for cause and filed a lawsuit in the 151st Judicial Civil District Court of Harris County,
Texas against AFW and its parent company, Amec Foster Wheeler plc, asserting claims for breach of contract, breach of warranty,
fraudulent inducement, string-along fraud, gross negligence, professional negligence, negligent misrepresentation and attorneys’
fees.  We intend to diligently prosecute these claims and seek all direct, consequential, and exemplary damages to which we may be
entitled.
Redelivery Commitments
We store natural gas, crude oil, NGLs and certain petrochemical products owned by third parties under various agreements.  Under
the terms of these agreements, we are generally required to redeliver volumes to the owner on demand.  At December 31, 2018, we
had approximately 7.7 trillion British thermal units (“TBtus”) of natural gas, 18.4 MMBbls of crude oil, and 38.5 MMBbls of NGL
and petrochemical products in our custody that were owned by third parties.  We maintain insurance coverage in connection with
such volumes that is consistent with our exposure.  See Note 18 for information regarding insurance matters.
F-67
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Commitments Under Equity Compensation Plans of EPCO
In accordance with our agreements with EPCO, we reimburse EPCO for our share of its compensation expense associated with
employees who perform management, administrative and operating functions for us.  See Notes 13 and 15 for additional
information regarding our accounting for equity-based awards and related party information, respectively.
Contractual Obligations
The following table summarizes our various contractual obligations at December 31, 2018.  A description of each type of
contractual obligation follows:
  Payment or Settlement due by Period  
Contractual Obligations  Total  2019   2020   2021   2022   2023   Thereafter 
Scheduled maturities of debt
obligations  $ 26,420.6  $ 1,500.0  $ 1,500.0  $ 1,325.0  $ 1,400.0  $ 1,250.0  $ 19,445.6 
Estimated cash interest payments $ 25,520.2  $ 1,190.4  $ 1,132.5  $ 1,062.9  $ 1,010.1  $ 969.9  $ 20,154.4 
Operating lease obligations  $ 324.8  $ 50.5  $ 45.6  $ 38.7  $ 30.8  $ 20.9  $ 138.3 
Purchase obligations:                             
Product purchase commitments:                            
Estimated payment obligations:                            
   Natural gas  $ 1,631.2  $ 572.0  $ 599.4  $ 459.8  $ --  $ --  $ -- 
   NGLs  $ 3,437.2  $ 760.6  $ 739.4  $ 620.3  $ 527.7  $ 310.3  $ 478.9 
   Crude oil  $ 4,778.2  $ 1,038.6  $ 771.3  $ 557.1  $ 543.1  $ 438.1  $ 1,430.0 
   Petrochemicals & refined
products  $ 399.7  $ 179.0  $ 178.3  $ 42.4  $ --  $ --  $ -- 
   Other  $ 27.4  $ 8.2  $ 8.3  $ 4.3  $ 2.3  $ 2.4  $ 1.9 
    Service payment commitments $ 403.8  $ 75.1  $ 72.2  $ 55.3  $ 53.7  $ 38.9  $ 108.6 
    Capital expenditure commitments $ 171.8  $ 171.8  $ --  $ --  $ --  $ --  $ -- 
Scheduled Maturities of Debt
We have long-term and short-term payment obligations under debt agreements.  Amounts shown in the preceding table represent
our scheduled future maturities of debt principal for the years indicated.  See Note 7 for additional information regarding our
consolidated debt obligations.
Estimated Cash Interest Payments
Our estimated cash payments for interest are based on the principal amount of our consolidated debt obligations outstanding at
December 31, 2018, the contractually scheduled maturities of such balances, and the applicable interest rates.  Our estimated cash
payments for interest are significantly influenced by the long-term maturities of our $2.67 billion in junior subordinated notes (due
June 2067 through February 2078).  Our estimated cash payments for interest assume that these subordinated notes are not repaid
prior to their respective maturity dates.  Our estimated cash payments for interest with respect to each junior subordinated note are
based on either the current fixed interest rate charged or the weighted-average variable rate paid in 2018, as applicable, for each
note applied to the remaining term through the respective maturity date.  See Note 7 for information regarding fixed and weighted-
average variable interest rates charged in 2018.
Operating Lease Obligations
We lease certain property, plant and equipment under noncancelable and cancelable operating leases.  Amounts shown in the
preceding table represent minimum cash lease payment obligations under our operating leases with terms in excess of one year.
Our significant lease agreements consist of (i) land held pursuant to property leases, (ii) the lease of underground storage caverns
for natural gas and NGLs, (iii) the lease of transportation equipment used in our operations, and (iv) leased office space with
affiliates of EPCO.  Currently, our significant lease agreements have terms that range from 5 to 30 years.  The agreements for
leased office space with affiliates of EPCO and underground NGL storage caverns we lease from a third party include renewal
options that could extend these contracts for up to an additional 20 years.  The remainder of our significant lease agreements do not
provide for additional renewal terms.
F-68
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Lease expense is charged to operating costs and expenses on a straight-line basis over the period of expected economic
benefit.  Contingent rental payments are expensed as incurred.  We are generally required to perform routine maintenance on the
underlying leased assets.  In addition, certain leases give us the option to make leasehold improvements.  Maintenance and repairs
of leased assets resulting from our operations are charged to expense as incurred.  
Consolidated costs and expenses include lease and rental expense amounts of $86.4 million, $103.6 million and $110.1 million
during the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively.
Purchase Obligations
We define purchase obligations as agreements with remaining terms in excess of one year to purchase goods or services that are
enforceable and legally binding (i.e., unconditional) on us that specify all significant terms, including: fixed or minimum quantities
to be purchased; fixed, minimum or variable price provisions; and the approximate timing of the transactions.  We classify our
unconditional purchase obligations into the following categories:
§We have long-term product purchase obligations for natural gas, NGLs, crude oil, petrochemicals and refined products with
third party suppliers.  The prices that we are obligated to pay under these contracts approximate market prices at the time we
take delivery of the volumes.  The preceding table shows our estimated payment obligations under these contracts for the years
indicated.  Our estimated future payment obligations are based on the contractual price in each agreement at December 31,
2018 applied to all future volume commitments.  Actual future payment obligations may vary depending on prices at the time
of delivery.  
§We have long-term commitments to pay service providers.  Our contractual service payment commitments primarily represent
our obligations under firm pipeline transportation contracts.  Payment obligations vary by contract, but generally represent a
price per unit of volume multiplied by a firm transportation volume commitment.
§We have short-term payment obligations relating to our capital investment program, including our share of the capital
expenditures of unconsolidated affiliates.  These commitments represent unconditional payment obligations for services to be
rendered or products to be delivered in connection with capital projects.
Other Commitments
In connection with our acquisition of the EFS Midstream System in 2015, we are obligated to spend up to an aggregate of $270
million on specified midstream gathering assets for certain producers, over a ten-year period.  If constructed, these new assets
would be owned by us and be a component of the EFS Midstream System. As of December 31, 2018, we have spent $151 million
of the $270 million commitment.
Other Long-Term Liabilities
The following table summarizes the components of “Other long-term liabilities” as presented on our Consolidated Balance Sheets
at the dates indicated:
  December 31,  
  2018   2017  
Noncurrent portion of AROs (see Note 4)  $ 121.4  $ 81.1 
Deferred revenues – non-current portion (see Note 9)   210.3   135.5 
Liquidity Option Agreement   390.0   333.9 
Derivative liabilities   14.2   10.4 
Centennial guarantees   3.6   4.5 
Other   12.1   13.0 
Total  $ 751.6  $ 578.4 
F-69
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Liquidity Option Agreement
We entered into a put option agreement (the “Liquidity Option Agreement” or “Liquidity Option”) with OTA and Marquard &
Bahls AG, a German corporation and the ultimate parent company of OTA (“M&B”), in connection with the Oiltanking
acquisition.  Under the Liquidity Option Agreement, we granted M&B the option to sell to us 100% of the issued and outstanding
capital stock of OTA at any time within a 90-day period commencing on February 1, 2020.  If the Liquidity Option is exercised
during this period, we would indirectly acquire the Enterprise common units then owned by OTA, currently 54,807,352 units,  and
assume all future income tax obligations of OTA associated with (i) owning common units encumbered by the entity-level taxes of
a U.S. corporation and (ii) any associated net deferred taxes.  If we assume net deferred tax liabilities that exceed the then current
book value of the Liquidity Option liability at the exercise date, we will recognize expense for the difference.
The aggregate consideration to be paid by us for OTA’s capital stock would equal 100% of the then-current fair market value of the
Enterprise common units owned by OTA at the exercise date.  The consideration paid may be in the form of newly issued
Enterprise common units, cash or any mix thereof, as determined solely by us.  We have the ability to issue the requisite number of
common units needed to satisfy any potential obligation under the Liquidity Option.
The Liquidity Option may be exercised prior to February 2020 if a Trigger Event (as defined in the underlying agreements) occurs.
The exercise period for a Trigger Event is 135 days following the notice of such event.  Trigger Events include, among other
scenarios, any Enterprise Tax Event (as defined in the underlying agreements), which includes certain events in which OTA would
recognize a taxable gain on the Enterprise common units that it owns.
The carrying value of the Liquidity Option Agreement, which is a component of “Other long-term liabilities” on our Consolidated
Balance Sheet, was $390.0 million and $333.9 million at December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively.  The fair value of the
Liquidity Option, at any measurement date, represents the present value of estimated federal and state income tax payments that we
believe a market participant would incur on the future taxable income of OTA. We expect that OTA’s taxable income would, in
turn, be based on an allocation of our partnership’s taxable income to the common units held by OTA and reflect certain tax
planning strategies we believe could be employed.
Changes in the fair value of the Liquidity Option are recognized in earnings as a component of other income (expense) on our
Statements of Consolidated Operations.  Results for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016 include $56.1 million,
$64.3 million and $24.5 million, respectively, of aggregate non-cash expense attributable to accretion and changes in management
estimates regarding inputs to the valuation model.
In addition to the effects of recently enacted tax reforms, our valuation estimate for the Liquidity Option at December 31, 2018 is
based on several inputs that are not readily observable in the market (i.e., Level 3 inputs) such as the following:
§OTA remains in existence (i.e., is not dissolved and its assets sold) between one and 30 years following exercise of the
Liquidity Option, depending on the liquidity preference of its owner. An equal probability that OTA will be dissolved was
assigned to each year in the 30-year forecast period;
§Forecasted annual growth rates of Enterprise’s taxable earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization ranging
from 1.9% to 5.6%;
§OTA’s ownership interest in Enterprise common units is assumed to be diluted over time in connection with Enterprise’s
issuance of equity for general company reasons.  For purposes of the valuation at December 31, 2018, we used ownership
interests ranging from 2.3% to 2.5%;
§OTA pays an aggregate federal and state income tax rate of 24% on its taxable income; and
§A discount rate of 7.9% based on our weighted-average cost of capital at December 31, 2018.
F-70
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Furthermore, our valuation estimate incorporates probability-weighted scenarios reflecting the likelihood that M&B may elect to
divest a portion of the Enterprise common units held by OTA prior to exercise of the option (see Note 8 for information regarding
the Registration Rights Agreement granted to OTA).  At December 31, 2018, based on these scenarios, we expect that OTA would
own approximately 94% of the 54,807,352 Enterprise common units it received in Step 1 when the option period begins in
February 2020.  If our valuation estimate assumed that OTA owned all of the Enterprise common units it received in Step 1 at the
time of exercise (and all other inputs remained the same), the estimated fair value of the Liquidity Option liability at December 31,
2018 would increase by $23.1 million.
Centennial Guarantees
At December 31, 2018, Centennial’s debt obligations consisted of $41.8 million borrowed under a master shelf loan
agreement.  Borrowings under the master shelf agreement mature in May 2024 and are collateralized by substantially all of
Centennial’s assets and severally guaranteed 50% by us and 50% by our joint venture partner in Centennial.  If Centennial were to
default on its debt obligations, we and our joint venture partner would each be required to make an approximate $20.9 million
payment to Centennial’s lenders in connection with the guarantee agreements (based on Centennial’s debt principal outstanding at
December 31, 2018).  We recognized a liability of $3.1 million for our share of the Centennial debt guaranty at December 31, 2018.
In lieu of Centennial procuring insurance to satisfy third party claims arising from a catastrophic event, we and Centennial’s other
joint venture partner have entered a limited cash call agreement.  We are obligated to contribute up to a maximum of $50.0 million
in the event of a catastrophic event.  At December 31, 2018, we have a recorded liability of $1.3 million representing the estimated
fair value of our cash call guaranty.  Our cash contributions to Centennial under the agreement may be covered by our other
insurance policies depending on the nature of the catastrophic event.
Note 18.  Significant Risks and Uncertainties
Nature of Operations
We operate predominantly in the midstream energy industry, which includes gathering, transporting, processing, fractionating and
storing natural gas, NGLs, crude oil, petrochemical and refined products.  As such, changes in the prices of hydrocarbon products
and in the relative price levels among hydrocarbon products could have a material adverse effect on our financial position, results
of operations and cash flows.  Changes in prices may impact demand for hydrocarbon products, which in turn may impact
production, demand and the volumes of products for which we provide services.  In addition, decreases in demand may be caused
by other factors, including prevailing economic conditions, reduced demand by consumers for the end products made with
hydrocarbon products, increased competition, adverse weather conditions and government regulations affecting prices and
production levels.
The natural gas, NGLs and crude oil currently transported, gathered or processed at our facilities originate primarily from existing
domestic resource basins, which naturally deplete over time.  To offset this natural decline, our facilities need access to production
from newly discovered properties.  Many economic and business factors beyond our control can adversely affect the decision by
producers to explore for and develop new reserves.  These factors could include relatively low crude oil and natural gas prices, cost
and availability of equipment and labor, regulatory changes, capital budget limitations, the lack of available capital or the
probability of success in finding hydrocarbons.  A decrease in exploration and development activities in the regions where our
facilities and other energy logistics assets are located could result in a decrease in volumes handled by our assets, which could have
a material adverse effect on our financial position, results of operations and cash flows.  
Even if crude oil and natural gas reserves exist in the areas served by our assets, we may not be chosen by producers in these areas
to gather, transport, process, fractionate, store or otherwise handle the hydrocarbons extracted.  We compete with other companies,
including producers of crude oil and natural gas, for any such production on the basis of many factors, including but not limited to
geographic proximity to the production, costs of connection, available capacity, rates and access to markets.
F-71
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Credit Risk
We may incur credit risk to the extent counterparties do not fulfill their obligations to us in connection with our marketing of
natural gas, NGLs, petrochemicals, refined products and crude oil and long-term contracts with minimum volume commitments or
fixed demand charges.  Risks of nonpayment and nonperformance by customers are a major consideration in our businesses, and
our credit procedures and policies may not be adequate to sufficiently eliminate customer credit risk.  Further, adverse economic
conditions in our industry, such as those experienced in 2015 and 2016, increase the risk of nonpayment and nonperformance by
customers, particularly customers that have sub-investment grade credit ratings or small-scale companies. We manage our exposure
to credit risk through credit analysis, credit approvals, credit limits and monitoring procedures, and for certain transactions may
utilize letters of credit, prepayments, net out agreements and guarantees.  However, these procedures and policies do not fully
eliminate customer credit risk.
Our primary markets are located in the Gulf Coast, Southwest, Rocky Mountain, Northeast and Midwest regions of the U.S.  We
have a concentration of trade receivable balances due from independent and major integrated oil and gas companies and other
pipelines and wholesalers.  These concentrations of market areas may affect our overall credit risk in that these energy industry
customers may be similarly affected by changes in economic, regulatory or other factors.  
In those situations where we are exposed to credit risk in our derivative instrument transactions, we analyze the counterparty’s
financial condition prior to entering into an agreement, establish credit and/or margin limits and monitor the appropriateness of
these limits on an ongoing basis.  Generally, we do not require collateral for such transactions nor do we currently anticipate
nonperformance by our material counterparties.
Insurance Matters
We participate as a named insured in EPCO’s insurance program, which provides us with property damage, business interruption
and other insurance coverage, the scope and amounts of which we believe are customary and prudent for the nature and extent of
our operations.  While we believe EPCO maintains adequate insurance coverage on our behalf, insurance may not fully cover every
type of damage, interruption or other loss that might occur.  If we were to incur a significant loss for which we were not fully
insured, it could have a material impact on our financial position, results of operations and cash flows.
In addition, there may be timing differences between amounts we accrue related to property damage expense, amounts we are
required to pay in connection with a loss, and amounts we subsequently receive from insurance carriers as reimbursements.  Any
event that materially interrupts the revenues generated by our consolidated operations, or other losses that require us to make
material expenditures not reimbursed by insurance, could reduce our ability to pay distributions to our unitholders and, accordingly,
adversely affect the market price of our common units.
Involuntary conversions result from the loss of an asset due to some unforeseen event (e.g., destruction due to a fire).  Some of
these events are covered by insurance, thus resulting in a property damage insurance recovery.  Amounts we receive from insurance
carriers are net of any deductibles related to the covered event.  We record a receivable from insurance to the extent we recognize a
loss from an involuntary conversion event and the likelihood of our recovering such loss is deemed probable.  To the extent that any
of our insurance claim receivables are later judged not probable of recovery (e.g., due to new information), such amounts are
expensed.  We recognize gains on involuntary conversions when the amount received from insurance exceeds the net book value of
the retired assets.
In addition, we do not recognize gains related to insurance recoveries until all contingencies related to such proceeds have been
resolved, that is, a non-refundable cash payment is received from the insurance carrier or we have a binding settlement agreement
with the carrier that clearly states that a non-refundable payment will be made.  To the extent that an asset is rebuilt, the associated
expenditures are capitalized, as appropriate, on our Consolidated Balance Sheets and presented as “Capital expenditures” on our
Statements of Consolidated Cash Flows.
F-72
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Under our current insurance program, the standalone deductible for property damage claims is $30 million. We also have business
interruption protection; however, such claims must involve physical damage and have a combined loss value in excess of $30
million and the period of interruption must exceed 60 days. With respect to named windstorm claims, the maximum amount of
insurance coverage available to us for any single event is $200 million, after applying the appropriate deductibles. A named
windstorm is a hurricane, typhoon, tropical storm or cyclone as declared by the U.S. National Weather Service.
Note 19.  Supplemental Cash Flow Information
The following table provides information regarding the net effect of changes in our operating accounts and cash payments for
interest and income taxes for the years indicated:
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Decrease (increase) in:          
Accounts receivable – trade  $ 730.2  $ (1,076.2) $ (679.0)
Accounts receivable – related parties   (2.3)  (0.7)  0.4 
Inventories   121.4   194.6   (871.8)
Prepaid and other current assets   214.4   226.0   (49.3)
Other assets   (9.7)  (111.0)  (2.0)
Increase (decrease) in:             
Accounts payable – trade   18.3   66.6   (21.5)
Accounts payable – related parties   51.4   56.0   21.0 
Accrued product payables   (1,132.0)  952.3   1,193.3 
Accrued interest   37.6   17.3   (11.4)
Other current liabilities   (70.9)  (291.4)  189.9 
Other liabilities   57.8   (1.3)  49.5 
Net effect of changes in operating accounts  $ 16.2  $ 32.2  $ (180.9)
             
Cash payments for interest, net of $147.9, $192.1 and $168.2
capitalized in 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively  $ 1,017.9  $ 912.1  $ 947.9 
             
Cash payments for federal and state income taxes  $ 15.5  $ 20.9  $ 18.7 
We incurred liabilities for construction in progress that had not been paid at December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016 of $567.6 million,
$373.0 million and $124.3 million, respectively.  Such amounts are not included under the caption “Capital expenditures” on our
Statements of Consolidated Cash Flows.
Capital expenditures for the years ended December 31, 2017 and 2016 reflect the receipt of $46.1 million and $41.0 million,
respectively, of CIACs from third parties.
F-73
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The following table presents our cash proceeds from asset sales for the years indicated:
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Cash proceeds from sale of Red River System  $ 134.9  $ --  $ -- 
Cash proceeds from other asset sales   26.3   40.1   46.5 
Total  $ 161.2  $ 40.1  $ 46.5 
The following table presents net gains (losses) attributable to asset sales for the years indicated:
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Gains attributable to sale of Red River System  $ 20.6  $ --  $ -- 
Net gains attributable to other asset sales   8.1   10.7   2.5 
Total  $ 28.7  $ 10.7  $ 2.5 
In July 2015, we purchased EFS Midstream LLC for $2.1 billion in cash, which was payable in two installments.  The second and
final installment of $1.0 billion was paid in July 2016.
See Note 14 for information regarding asset impairment and related charges as presented on our Statements of Consolidated Cash
Flows.
Note 20.  Quarterly Financial Information (Unaudited)
The following table presents selected quarterly financial data for the periods indicated:
  First
Quarter  Second
Quarter  Third
Quarter  Fourth
Quarter 
For the Year Ended December 31, 2018:             
Revenues  $ 9,298.5  $ 8,467.5  $ 9,585.9  $ 9,182.3 
Operating income   1,138.5   986.4   1,643.3   1,640.4 
Net income   911.5   687.2   1,334.6   1,305.2 
Net income attributable to limited partners   900.7   673.8   1,313.2   1,284.7 
                 
Earnings per unit:                 
Basic  $ 0.41  $ 0.31  $ 0.60  $ 0.59 
Diluted  $ 0.41  $ 0.31  $ 0.60  $ 0.59 
                 
For the Year Ended December 31, 2017:                 
Revenues  $ 7,320.4  $ 6,607.6  $ 6,886.9  $ 8,426.6 
Operating income   1,031.6   938.7   879.2   1,079.4 
Net income   771.0   666.0   621.3   797.3 
Net income attributable to limited partners   760.7   653.7   610.9   774.0 
                 
Earnings per unit:                 
Basic  $ 0.36  $ 0.30  $ 0.28  $ 0.36 
Diluted  $ 0.36  $ 0.30  $ 0.28  $ 0.36 
The sum of our quarterly earnings per unit amounts may not equal our full year amounts due to slight rounding differences.
F-74
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Note 21.  Condensed Consolidating Financial Information
EPO conducts all of our business.  Currently, we have no independent operations and no material assets outside those of EPO.
EPO has issued publicly traded debt securities.  As the parent company of EPO, Enterprise Products Partners L.P. guarantees
substantially all of the debt obligations of EPO.  If EPO were to default on any of its guaranteed debt, Enterprise Products Partners
L.P. would be responsible for full and unconditional repayment of that obligation.  See Note 7 for additional information regarding
our consolidated debt obligations.
There are no significant restrictions on the ability of EPO to receive funds from Enterprise Products Partners L.P.
Enterprise Products Partners L.P.
Condensed Consolidating Balance Sheet
December 31, 2018
  EPO and Subsidiaries           
  Subsidiary
Issuer
(EPO)  Other
Subsidiaries
(Non-
guarantor)  EPO and
Subsidiaries
Eliminations
and
Adjustments  Consolidated
EPO and
Subsidiaries  Enterprise
Products
Partners
L.P.
(Guarantor)  Eliminations
and
Adjustments  Consolidated
Total 
ASSETS                      
Current assets:                      
Cash and cash equivalents and
restricted cash  $ 393.4  $ 50.3  $ (33.6) $ 410.1  $ --  $ --  $ 410.1 
Accounts receivable – trade, net  1,303.1   2,356.8   (0.8)  3,659.1   --   --   3,659.1 
Accounts receivable – related
parties   141.8   1,423.7   (1,530.1)  35.4   0.8   (32.7)  3.5 
Inventories   889.3   633.2   (0.4)  1,522.1   --   --   1,522.1 
Derivative assets   105.0   49.1   0.3   154.4   --   --   154.4 
Prepaid and other current assets  166.0   155.1   (10.2)  310.9   --   0.6   311.5 
Total current assets   2,998.6   4,668.2   (1,574.8)  6,092.0   0.8   (32.1)  6,060.7 
Property, plant and equipment, net  6,112.7   32,628.7   (3.8)  38,737.6   --   --   38,737.6 
Investments in unconsolidated
affiliates   43,962.6   4,170.6   (45,518.1)  2,615.1   24,273.6   (24,273.6)  2,615.1 
Intangible assets, net   659.2   2,963.0   (13.8)  3,608.4   --   --   3,608.4 
Goodwill   459.5   5,285.7   --   5,745.2   --   --   5,745.2 
Other assets   292.1   131.9   (222.1)  201.9   0.9   --   202.8 
Total assets  $ 54,484.7  $ 49,848.1  $ (47,332.6) $ 57,000.2  $ 24,275.3  $ (24,305.7) $ 56,969.8 
                             
LIABILITIES AND EQUITY                            
Current liabilities:                             
Current maturities of debt  $ 1,500.0  $ 0.1  $ --  $ 1,500.1  $ --  $ --  $ 1,500.1 
Accounts payable – trade   404.0   734.3   (35.5)  1,102.8   --   --   1,102.8 
Accounts payable – related parties  1,557.3   127.5   (1,543.9)  140.9   31.9   (32.6)  140.2 
Accrued product payables   1,574.7   1,902.3   (1.2)  3,475.8   --   --   3,475.8 
Accrued interest   395.5   0.9   (0.8)  395.6   --   --   395.6 
Derivative liabilities   86.2   61.7   0.3   148.2   --   --   148.2 
Other current liabilities   87.9   326.3   (9.4)  404.8   --   --   404.8 
Total current liabilities   5,605.6   3,153.1   (1,590.5)  7,168.2   31.9   (32.6)  7,167.5 
Long-term debt   24,663.4   14.7   --   24,678.1   --   --   24,678.1 
Deferred tax liabilities   17.0   62.0   (0.9)  78.1   --   2.3   80.4 
Other long-term liabilities   65.2   518.4   (221.9)  361.7   389.9   --   751.6 
Commitments and contingencies                            
Equity:                             
Partners’ and other owners’ equity  24,133.5   46,031.8   (45,917.9)  24,247.4   23,853.5   (24,247.4)  23,853.5 
Noncontrolling interests   --   68.1   398.6   466.7   --   (28.0)  438.7 
Total equity   24,133.5   46,099.9   (45,519.3)  24,714.1   23,853.5   (24,275.4)  24,292.2 
Total liabilities and equity  $ 54,484.7  $ 49,848.1  $ (47,332.6) $ 57,000.2  $ 24,275.3  $ (24,305.7) $ 56,969.8 
F-75
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Enterprise Products Partners L.P.
Condensed Consolidating Balance Sheet
December 31, 2017
  EPO and Subsidiaries           
  Subsidiary
Issuer
(EPO)  Other
Subsidiaries
(Non-
guarantor)  EPO and
Subsidiaries
Eliminations
and
Adjustments  Consolidated
EPO and
Subsidiaries  Enterprise
Products
Partners
L.P.
(Guarantor)  Eliminations
and
Adjustments  Consolidated
Total 
ASSETS                      
Current assets:                      
Cash and cash equivalents and
restricted cash  $ 65.2  $ 31.5  $ (26.4) $ 70.3  $ --  $ --  $ 70.3 
Accounts receivable – trade, net  1,382.3   2,976.6   (0.5)  4,358.4   --   --   4,358.4 
Accounts receivable – related
parties   110.3   1,182.1   (1,289.3)  3.1   --   (1.3)  1.8 
Inventories   1,038.9   572.3   (1.4)  1,609.8   --   --   1,609.8 
Derivative assets   110.0   43.4   --   153.4   --   --   153.4 
Prepaid and other current assets  136.3   189.0   (12.6)  312.7   --   --   312.7 
Total current assets   2,843.0   4,994.9   (1,330.2)  6,507.7   --   (1.3)  6,506.4 
Property, plant and equipment, net  5,622.6   29,996.3   1.5   35,620.4   --   --   35,620.4 
Investments in unconsolidated
affiliates   41,616.6   4,298.0   (43,255.2)  2,659.4   22,881.5   (22,881.5)  2,659.4 
Intangible assets, net   675.5   3,028.6   (13.8)  3,690.3   --   --   3,690.3 
Goodwill   459.5   5,285.7   --   5,745.2   --   --   5,745.2 
Other assets   296.4   110.0   (211.0)  195.4   1.0   --   196.4 
Total assets  $ 51,513.6  $ 47,713.5  $ (44,808.7) $ 54,418.4  $ 22,882.5  $ (22,882.8) $ 54,418.1 
                             
LIABILITIES AND EQUITY                            
Current liabilities:                             
Current maturities of debt  $ 2,854.6  $ 0.4  $ --  $ 2,855.0  $ --  $ --  $ 2,855.0 
Accounts payable – trade   290.2   537.8   (26.4)  801.6   0.1   --   801.7 
Accounts payable – related parties  1,320.3   112.0   (1,305.0)  127.3   1.3   (1.3)  127.3 
Accrued product payables   1,825.9   2,741.7   (1.3)  4,566.3   --   --   4,566.3 
Accrued interest   358.0   --   --   358.0   --   --   358.0 
Derivative liabilities   115.2   53.0   --   168.2   --   --   168.2 
Other current liabilities   108.9   320.1   (10.8)  418.2   --   0.4   418.6 
Total current liabilities   6,873.1   3,765.0   (1,343.5)  9,294.6   1.4   (0.9)  9,295.1 
Long-term debt   21,699.0   14.7   --   21,713.7   --   --   21,713.7 
Deferred tax liabilities   6.7   50.2   (0.5)  56.4   --   2.1   58.5 
Other long-term liabilities   60.4   396.5   (212.4)  244.5   333.9   --   578.4 
Commitments and contingencies                            
Equity:                             
Partners’ and other owners’ equity  22,874.4   43,412.0   (43,433.3)  22,853.1   22,547.2   (22,853.1)  22,547.2 
Noncontrolling interests   --   75.1   181.0   256.1   --   (30.9)  225.2 
Total equity   22,874.4   43,487.1   (43,252.3)  23,109.2   22,547.2   (22,884.0)  22,772.4 
Total liabilities and equity  $ 51,513.6  $ 47,713.5  $ (44,808.7) $ 54,418.4  $ 22,882.5  $ (22,882.8) $ 54,418.1 
F-76
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Enterprise Products Partners L.P.
Condensed Consolidating Statement of Operations
For the Year Ended December 31, 2018
  EPO and Subsidiaries           
  Subsidiary
Issuer
(EPO)  Other
Subsidiaries
(Non-
guarantor)  EPO and
Subsidiaries
Eliminations
and
Adjustments  Consolidated
EPO and
Subsidiaries  Enterprise
Products
Partners
L.P.
(Guarantor)  Eliminations
and
Adjustments  Consolidated
Total 
Revenues  $ 42,946.4  $ 23,756.4  $ (30,168.6) $ 36,534.2  $ --  $ --  $ 36,534.2 
Costs and expenses:                             
Operating costs and expenses   41,718.2   19,845.2   (30,166.1)  31,397.3   --   --   31,397.3 
General and administrative costs  31.8   172.0   2.1   205.9   2.3   0.1   208.3 
Total costs and expenses   41,750.0   20,017.2   (30,164.0)  31,603.2   2.3   0.1   31,605.6 
Equity in income of unconsolidated
affiliates   4,148.3   587.2   (4,255.5)  480.0   4,230.8   (4,230.8)  480.0 
Operating income   5,344.7   4,326.4   (4,260.1)  5,411.0   4,228.5   (4,230.9)  5,408.6 
Other income (expense):                             
Interest expense   (1,097.1)  (10.5)  10.9   (1,096.7)  --   --   (1,096.7)
Other, net   12.1   41.8   (10.9)  43.0   (56.1)  --   (13.1)
Total other expense, net   (1,085.0)  31.3   --   (1,053.7)  (56.1)  --   (1,109.8)
Income before income taxes   4,259.7   4,357.7   (4,260.1)  4,357.3   4,172.4   (4,230.9)  4,298.8 
Provision for income taxes   (29.2)  (29.6)  --   (58.8)  --   (1.5)  (60.3)
Net income   4,230.5   4,328.1   (4,260.1)  4,298.5   4,172.4   (4,232.4)  4,238.5 
Net loss (income) attributable to
noncontrolling interests   --   (7.6)  (63.8)  (71.4)  --   5.3   (66.1)
Net income attributable to entity $ 4,230.5  $ 4,320.5  $ (4,323.9) $ 4,227.1  $ 4,172.4  $ (4,227.1) $ 4,172.4 
Enterprise Products Partners L.P.
Condensed Consolidating Statement of Operations
For the Year Ended December 31, 2017
  EPO and Subsidiaries           
  Subsidiary
Issuer
(EPO)  Other
Subsidiaries
(Non-
guarantor)  EPO and
Subsidiaries
Eliminations
and
Adjustments  Consolidated
EPO and
Subsidiaries  Enterprise
Products
Partners
L.P.
(Guarantor)  Eliminations
and
Adjustments  Consolidated
Total 
Revenues  $ 40,696.8  $ 18,451.2  $ (29,906.5) $ 29,241.5  $ --  $ --  $ 29,241.5 
Costs and expenses:                             
Operating costs and expenses   39,809.6   15,654.9   (29,907.0)  25,557.5   --   --   25,557.5 
General and administrative costs  31.4   148.0   (0.1)  179.3   1.8   --   181.1 
Total costs and expenses   39,841.0   15,802.9   (29,907.1)  25,736.8   1.8   --   25,738.6 
Equity in income of unconsolidated
affiliates   2,990.1   566.8   (3,130.9)  426.0   2,865.4   (2,865.4)  426.0 
Operating income   3,845.9   3,215.1   (3,130.3)  3,930.7   2,863.6   (2,865.4)  3,928.9 
Other income (expense):                             
Interest expense   (982.5)  (11.8)  9.7   (984.6)  --   --   (984.6)
Other, net   9.2   1.8   (9.7)  1.3   (64.3)  --   (63.0)
Total other expense, net   (973.3)  (10.0)  --   (983.3)  (64.3)  --   (1,047.6)
Income before income taxes   2,872.6   3,205.1   (3,130.3)  2,947.4   2,799.3   (2,865.4)  2,881.3 
Provision for income taxes   (12.0)  (13.7)  --   (25.7)  --   --   (25.7)
Net income   2,860.6   3,191.4   (3,130.3)  2,921.7   2,799.3   (2,865.4)  2,855.6 
Net loss (income) attributable to
noncontrolling interests   --   (6.5)  (55.1)  (61.6)  --   5.3   (56.3)
Net income attributable to entity $ 2,860.6  $ 3,184.9  $ (3,185.4) $ 2,860.1  $ 2,799.3  $ (2,860.1) $ 2,799.3 
F-77
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Enterprise Products Partners L.P.
Condensed Consolidating Statement of Operations
For the Year Ended December 31, 2016
  EPO and Subsidiaries           
  Subsidiary
Issuer
(EPO)  Other
Subsidiaries
(Non-
guarantor)  EPO and
Subsidiaries
Eliminations
and
Adjustments  Consolidated
EPO and
Subsidiaries  Enterprise
Products
Partners
L.P.
(Guarantor)  Eliminations
and
Adjustments  Consolidated
Total 
Revenues  $ 28,958.7  $ 15,296.8  $ (21,233.2) $ 23,022.3  $ --  $ --  $ 23,022.3 
Costs and expenses:                             
Operating costs and expenses   28,108.2   12,768.9   (21,233.6)  19,643.5   --   --   19,643.5 
General and administrative costs  22.5   135.3   --   157.8   2.3   --   160.1 
Total costs and expenses   28,130.7   12,904.2   (21,233.6)  19,801.3   2.3   --   19,803.6 
Equity in income of unconsolidated
affiliates   2,686.1   521.7   (2,845.8)  362.0   2,539.9   (2,539.9)  362.0 
Operating income   3,514.1   2,914.3   (2,845.4)  3,583.0   2,537.6   (2,539.9)  3,580.7 
Other income (expense):                             
Interest expense   (973.1)  (17.3)  7.8   (982.6)  --   --   (982.6)
Other, net   8.3   2.3   (7.8)  2.8   (24.5)  --   (21.7)
Total other expense, net   (964.8)  (15.0)  --   (979.8)  (24.5)  --   (1,004.3)
Income before income taxes   2,549.3   2,899.3   (2,845.4)  2,603.2   2,513.1   (2,539.9)  2,576.4 
Provision for income taxes   (13.1)  (8.2)  --   (21.3)  --   (2.1)  (23.4)
Net income   2,536.2   2,891.1   (2,845.4)  2,581.9   2,513.1   (2,542.0)  2,553.0 
Net loss (income) attributable to
noncontrolling interests   --   (7.4)  (37.8)  (45.2)  --   5.3   (39.9)
Net income attributable to entity $ 2,536.2  $ 2,883.7  $ (2,883.2) $ 2,536.7  $ 2,513.1  $ (2,536.7) $ 2,513.1 
F-78
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Enterprise Products Partners L.P.
Condensed Consolidating Statement of Comprehensive Income
For the Year Ended December 31, 2018
  EPO and Subsidiaries           
  Subsidiary
Issuer
(EPO)  Other
Subsidiaries
(Non-
guarantor)  EPO and
Subsidiaries
Eliminations
and
Adjustments  Consolidated
EPO and
Subsidiaries  Enterprise
Products
Partners
L.P.
(Guarantor)  Eliminations
and
Adjustments  Consolidated
Total 
Comprehensive income  $ 4,312.6  $ 4,468.5  $ (4,260.1) $ 4,521.0  $ 4,395.0  $ (4,454.9) $ 4,461.1 
Comprehensive loss (income)
attributable to noncontrolling
interests   --   (7.6)  (63.8)  (71.4)  --   5.3   (66.1)
Comprehensive income
attributable to entity  $ 4,312.6  $ 4,460.9  $ (4,323.9) $ 4,449.6  $ 4,395.0  $ (4,449.6) $ 4,395.0 
Enterprise Products Partners L.P.
Condensed Consolidating Statement of Comprehensive Income
For the Year Ended December 31, 2017
  EPO and Subsidiaries           
  Subsidiary
Issuer
(EPO)  Other
Subsidiaries
(Non-
guarantor)  EPO and
Subsidiaries
Eliminations
and
Adjustments  Consolidated
EPO and
Subsidiaries  Enterprise
Products
Partners
L.P.
(Guarantor)  Eliminations
and
Adjustments  Consolidated
Total 
Comprehensive income  $ 2,951.7  $ 3,208.6  $ (3,130.2) $ 3,030.1  $ 2,907.6  $ (2,973.8) $ 2,963.9 
Comprehensive loss (income)
attributable to noncontrolling
interests   --   (6.5)  (55.1)  (61.6)  --   5.3   (56.3)
Comprehensive income
attributable to entity  $ 2,951.7  $ 3,202.1  $ (3,185.3) $ 2,968.5  $ 2,907.6  $ (2,968.5) $ 2,907.6 
 
Enterprise Products Partners L.P.
Condensed Consolidating Statement of Comprehensive Income
For the Year Ended December 31, 2016
  EPO and Subsidiaries           
  Subsidiary
Issuer
(EPO)  Other
Subsidiaries
(Non-
guarantor)  EPO and
Subsidiaries
Eliminations
and
Adjustments  Consolidated
EPO and
Subsidiaries  Enterprise
Products
Partners
L.P.
(Guarantor)  Eliminations
and
Adjustments  Consolidated
Total 
Comprehensive income  $ 2,544.3  $ 2,822.1  $ (2,845.3) $ 2,521.1  $ 2,452.2  $ (2,481.1) $ 2,492.2 
Comprehensive loss (income)
attributable to noncontrolling
interests   --   (7.4)  (37.8)  (45.2)  --   5.3   (39.9)
Comprehensive income
attributable to entity  $ 2,544.3  $ 2,814.7  $ (2,883.1) $ 2,475.9  $ 2,452.2  $ (2,475.8) $ 2,452.3 
F-79
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Enterprise Products Partners L.P.
Condensed Consolidating Statement of Cash Flows
For the Year Ended December 31, 2018
  EPO and Subsidiaries           
  Subsidiary
Issuer
(EPO)  Other
Subsidiaries
(Non-
guarantor)  EPO and
Subsidiaries
Eliminations
and
Adjustments  Consolidated
EPO and
Subsidiaries  Enterprise
Products
Partners
L.P.
(Guarantor)  Eliminations
and
Adjustments  Consolidated
Total 
Operating activities:                      
Net income  $ 4,230.5  $ 4,328.1  $ (4,260.1) $ 4,298.5  $ 4,172.4  $ (4,232.4) $ 4,238.5 
Reconciliation of net income to net
cash flows provided by operating
activities:                             
Depreciation, amortization and
accretion   279.9   1,512.1   (0.4)  1,791.6   --   --   1,791.6 
Equity in income of
unconsolidated affiliates   (4,148.3)  (587.2)  4,255.5   (480.0)  (4,230.8)  4,230.8   (480.0)
Distributions received on earnings
from unconsolidated affiliates  1,248.9   263.0   (1,032.5)  479.4   3,780.0   (3,780.0)  479.4 
Net effect of changes in operating
accounts and other operating
activities   3,221.5   (3,244.2)  (2.3)  (25.0)  121.2   0.6   96.8 
Net cash flows provided by
operating activities   4,832.5   2,271.8   (1,039.8)  6,064.5   3,842.8   (3,781.0)  6,126.3 
Investing activities:                             
Capital expenditures   (692.0)  (3,476.0)  --   (4,168.0)  (55.2)  --   (4,223.2)
Cash used for business
combinations, net of cash
received   --   (150.6)  --   (150.6)  --   --   (150.6)
Proceeds from asset sales   129.3   31.9   --   161.2   --   --   161.2 
Other investing activities   (2,288.2)  196.2   2,023.0   (69.0)  (523.3)  523.3   (69.0)
Cash used in investing activities  (2,850.9)  (3,398.5)  2,023.0   (4,226.4)  (578.5)  523.3   (4,281.6)
Financing activities:                             
Borrowings under debt agreements  79,588.7   11.5   (11.5)  79,588.7   --   --   79,588.7 
Repayments of debt   (77,956.7)  (0.4)  --   (77,957.1)  --   --   (77,957.1)
Cash distributions paid to partners  (3,780.0)  (1,333.1)  1,333.1   (3,780.0)  (3,726.9)  3,780.0   (3,726.9)
Cash payments made in
connection with DERs   --   --   --   --   (17.7)  --   (17.7)
Cash distributions paid to
noncontrolling interests   --   (9.2)  (73.4)  (82.6)  --   1.0   (81.6)
Cash contributions from
noncontrolling interests   --   --   238.1   238.1   --   --   238.1 
Net cash proceeds from issuance
of common units   --   --   --   --   538.4   --   538.4 
Common units acquired in
connection with buyback
program   --   --   --   --   (30.8)  --   (30.8)
Cash contributions from owners  523.3   2,476.7   (2,476.7)  523.3   --   (523.3)  -- 
Other financing activities   (28.7)  --   --   (28.7)  (27.3)  --   (56.0)
Cash provided by (used in)
financing activities   (1,653.4)  1,145.5   (990.4)  (1,498.3)  (3,264.3)  3,257.7   (1,504.9)
Net change in cash and cash
equivalents,
   including restricted cash   328.2   18.8   (7.2)  339.8   --   --   339.8 
Cash and cash equivalents,
including
   restricted cash, January 1   65.2   31.5   (26.4)  70.3   --   --   70.3 
Cash and cash equivalents,
including
   restricted cash, December 31  $ 393.4  $ 50.3  $ (33.6) $ 410.1  $ --  $ --  $ 410.1 
F-80
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Enterprise Products Partners L.P.
Condensed Consolidating Statement of Cash Flows
For the Year Ended December 31, 2017
  EPO and Subsidiaries           
  Subsidiary
Issuer
(EPO)  Other
Subsidiaries
(Non-
guarantor)  EPO and
Subsidiaries
Eliminations
and
Adjustments  Consolidated
EPO and
Subsidiaries  Enterprise
Products
Partners
L.P.
(Guarantor)  Eliminations
and
Adjustments  Consolidated
Total 
Operating activities:                      
Net income  $ 2,860.6  $ 3,191.4  $ (3,130.3) $ 2,921.7  $ 2,799.3  $ (2,865.4) $ 2,855.6 
Reconciliation of net income to net
cash flows provided by operating
activities:                             
Depreciation, amortization and
accretion   216.6   1,427.8   (0.4)  1,644.0   --   --   1,644.0 
Equity in income of
unconsolidated affiliates   (2,990.1)  (566.8)  3,130.9   (426.0)  (2,865.4)  2,865.4   (426.0)
Distributions received on earnings
from unconsolidated affiliates  1,162.8   272.7   (1,001.8)  433.7   3,574.6   (3,574.6)  433.7 
Net effect of changes in operating
accounts and other operating
activities   2,812.2   (2,726.3)  (19.1)  66.8   93.2   (1.0)  159.0 
Net cash flows provided by
operating activities   4,062.1   1,598.8   (1,020.7)  4,640.2   3,601.7   (3,575.6)  4,666.3 
Investing activities:                             
Capital expenditures   (846.8)  (2,255.0)  --   (3,101.8)  --   --   (3,101.8)
Cash used for business
combinations, net of cash
received   (7.3)  (191.4)  --   (198.7)  --   --   (198.7)
Proceeds from asset sales   17.0   23.1   --   40.1   --   --   40.1 
Other investing activities   (1,908.5)  (28.0)  1,910.8   (25.7)  (1,060.5)  1,060.5   (25.7)
Cash used in investing activities  (2,745.6)  (2,451.3)  1,910.8   (3,286.1)  (1,060.5)  1,060.5   (3,286.1)
Financing activities:                             
Borrowings under debt agreements  69,349.3   --   (34.0)  69,315.3   --   --   69,315.3 
Repayments of debt   (68,459.5)  (0.1)  --   (68,459.6)  --   --   (68,459.6)
Cash distributions paid to partners  (3,574.6)  (1,065.3)  1,065.3   (3,574.6)  (3,569.9)  3,574.6   (3,569.9)
Cash payments made in
connection with DERs   --   --   --   --   (15.1)  --   (15.1)
Cash distributions paid to
noncontrolling interests   --   (9.6)  (40.6)  (50.2)  --   1.0   (49.2)
Cash contributions from
noncontrolling interests   --   0.1   0.3   0.4   --   --   0.4 
Net cash proceeds from issuance
of common units   --   --   --   --   1,073.4   --   1,073.4 
Cash contributions from owners  1,060.5   1,900.0   (1,900.0)  1,060.5   --   (1,060.5)  -- 
Other financing activities   6.8   --   --   6.8   (29.6)  --   (22.8)
Cash provided by (used in)
financing activities   (1,617.5)  825.1   (909.0)  (1,701.4)  (2,541.2)  2,515.1   (1,727.5)
Net change in cash and cash
equivalents,
   including restricted cash   (301.0)  (27.4)  (18.9)  (347.3)  --   --   (347.3)
Cash and cash equivalents,
including
   restricted cash, January 1   366.2   58.9   (7.5)  417.6   --   --   417.6 
Cash and cash equivalents,
including
   restricted cash, December 31  $ 65.2  $ 31.5  $ (26.4) $ 70.3  $ --  $ --  $ 70.3 
F-81
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Enterprise Products Partners L.P.
Condensed Consolidating Statement of Cash Flows
For the Year Ended December 31, 2016
  EPO and Subsidiaries           
  Subsidiary
Issuer
(EPO)  Other
Subsidiaries
(Non-
guarantor)  EPO and
Subsidiaries
Eliminations
and
Adjustments  Consolidated
EPO and
Subsidiaries  Enterprise
Products
Partners
L.P.
(Guarantor)  Eliminations
and
Adjustments  Consolidated
Total 
Operating activities:                      
Net income  $ 2,536.2  $ 2,891.1  $ (2,845.4) $ 2,581.9  $ 2,513.1  $ (2,542.0) $ 2,553.0 
Reconciliation of net income to net
cash flows provided by operating
activities:                             
Depreciation, amortization and
accretion   185.4   1,367.0   (0.4)  1,552.0   --   --   1,552.0 
Equity in income of
unconsolidated affiliates   (2,686.1)  (521.7)  2,845.8   (362.0)  (2,539.9)  2,539.9   (362.0)
Distributions received on earnings
from unconsolidated affiliates  1,127.3   265.9   (1,012.7)  380.5   3,331.2   (3,331.2)  380.5 
Net effect of changes in operating
accounts and other operating
activities   2,448.6   (2,568.5)  43.1   (76.8)  18.9   1.2   (56.7)
Net cash flows provided by
operating activities   3,611.4   1,433.8   (969.6)  4,075.6   3,323.3   (3,332.1)  4,066.8 
Investing activities:                             
Capital expenditures   (1,327.4)  (1,656.7)  --   (2,984.1)  --   --   (2,984.1)
Cash used for business
combinations, net of cash
received   --   (1,000.0)  --   (1,000.0)  --   --   (1,000.0)
Proceeds from asset sales   28.8   17.7   --   46.5   --   --   46.5 
Other investing activities   (2,301.9)  (63.2)  2,296.9   (68.2)  (2,530.9)  2,530.9   (68.2)
Cash used in investing activities  (3,600.5)  (2,702.2)  2,296.9   (4,005.8)  (2,530.9)  2,530.9   (4,005.8)
Financing activities:                             
Borrowings under debt agreements  62,813.9   41.8   (41.8)  62,813.9   --   --   62,813.9 
Repayments of debt   (61,672.5)  (0.1)  --   (61,672.6)  --   --   (61,672.6)
Cash distributions paid to partners  (3,331.2)  (1,089.6)  1,089.6   (3,331.2)  (3,300.5)  3,331.2   (3,300.5)
Cash payments made in
connection with DERs   --   --   --   --   (11.7)  --   (11.7)
Cash distributions paid to
noncontrolling interests   --   (8.5)  (39.8)  (48.3)  --   0.9   (47.4)
Cash contributions from
noncontrolling interests   --   20.4   --   20.4   --   --   20.4 
Net cash proceeds from issuance
of common units   --   --   --   --   2,542.8   --   2,542.8 
Cash contributions from owners  2,530.9   2,292.2   (2,292.2)  2,530.9   --   (2,530.9)  -- 
Other financing activities   (0.2)  --   --   (0.2)  (23.0)  --   (23.2)
Cash provided by (used in)
financing activities   340.9   1,256.2   (1,284.2)  312.9   (792.4)  801.2   321.7 
Net change in cash and cash
equivalents,
   including restricted cash   351.8   (12.2)  43.1   382.7   --   --   382.7 
Cash and cash equivalents,
including
   restricted cash, January 1   14.4   71.1   (50.6)  34.9   --   --   34.9 
Cash and cash equivalents,
including
   restricted cash, December 31  $ 366.2  $ 58.9  $ (7.5) $ 417.6  $ --  $ --  $ 417.6 
F-82
Table of Contents
ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L.P.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Note 22.  Subsequent Event
In January 2019, we announced that the Board of Enterprise GP had approved a $2.0 billion multi-year unit buyback program,
which provides the partnership with an additional method to return capital to investors. The program authorizes the partnership to
repurchase its common units from time to time, including through open market purchases and negotiated transactions.  The timing
and pace of buy backs under the program will be determined by a number of factors including (i) our financial performance and
flexibility, (ii) organic growth and acquisition opportunities with higher potential returns on investment, (iii) our unit price and
implied distributable cash flow yield and (iv) maintaining targeted financial leverage with a debt-to-normalized EBITDA ratio in
the 3.5 times area.  No time limit has been set for completion of the buyback program, and the program may be suspended or
discontinued at any time. When units are repurchased, we plan to cancel such treasury units immediately upon their acquisition.
F-83
